Job Title,Salary Estimate,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,hourly,yearly,Average Salary,job_state,age,python_yn,R_yn,spark_yn,aws_yn,excel_yn
"NAMS2 - Data Scientist I, II, III","$101K
/yr","Company Description

Crown is a leader in planning and implementing aerospace and advanced transportation services, with a focus on advanced air mobility (AAM). We have more than three decades of experience in developing strategy, exploring concepts, assessing technologies, developing use cases, and projecting economic impacts for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), and State Departments of Transportation. We are looking for an exceptional new team member to join our Crown innovators working with companies and government agencies to safely advance aviation’s newest frontier. Join our team to pioneer a better, more sustainable future

Job Description

Crown is looking for all levels of Data Scientists to work on the NAMS-2 project in Mountain View, CA to:
Identify trends, patterns, and anomalies found in big data sets by performing extensive data analysis to develop insights.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes to prepare data, implement data models, conduct analysis, and develop databases.
Interpret results from multiple structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques and tools.
Collaborate with teams to understand each data analysis projects' underlying purpose, focus, and objectives.
Design, develops, and implements the most valuable data-driven solutions for the
organization

Qualifications

Level I - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 0-2 years of related experience.
Level II - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Exposure to some of the complex tasks within the job function. Requires 2 -4 years of related experience.
Level III - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 5 - 8 years of related experience.

Additional Information

Visit: www.crownci.com for additional information on our company.
Competitive benefits program and matching 401K!
Crown is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, age, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.
Persons unable to complete an online application should contact Crown HR for assistance at (703) 650-0663 ext 3059.
Crown is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor
Crown was voted Best Places to Work in 2021
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Crown Consulting, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1989.0,Company - Private,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,101.0,CA,35.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Title: Data Scientist - Big Data Engineer
Place of Performance: Remote - Austin, TX 77040
Duration: 9 Months Approx.

About Radiant
Radiant is committed to solving complex challenges for our customers by delivering innovative technology solutions. Our client-centric model increases transparency and accountability, which helps promote efficiency and effectiveness. We work and grow together with our customers, and we help empower our clients to achieve success. Our flexible delivery model allows us to provide end-to-end solution delivery, single project execution, and, or strategic resources. CMMI Maturity Level III and ISO 9001 2015 certified.

Required Skills:
4 years of Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 years of Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 years of Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 years of Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 years of Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 years of Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 years Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.

Responsibilities:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
The above job description and requirements are general in nature and may be subject to change based on the specific needs and requirements of the organization and project.

This is a remote position.",3.1,Radiant Digital,"Austin, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2000.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,TX,24.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$57.50
/hr","Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Experience:
Data Scientist: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",Not listed,Tekfocus Minds LLC,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,57.5,Remote,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$55.50
/hr","Job Overview:
The Office of the Attorney General’s Chief Data Office (CDO) is seeking a dynamic and visionary Data Scientist to join our team and support our System Modernization efforts for the Child Support Division.
This individual must be able to work in a heavily technical environment, preparing and optimizing data for Snowflake and utilizing SAS Viya to build comprehensive federal and state reports.
You will play a pivotal role in transforming, analyzing, and leveraging our data assets to drive strategic initiatives and business outcomes.
You must be comfortable analyzing data, developing predictive modeling algorithms, and can communicate your findings through visualizations enabling the discovery of solutions to business problems.
As a Data Scientist your role will be impactful, visible, and rewarding.
Responsibilities will include:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
Required Qualification/Skill Experience:
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 Years: Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 Years: Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Position Details:
The primary work location(s) will be at OAG State Office located at 5500 E. Oltorf St, Austin, TX 78741.
Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.
The working position is Telework.
Services are expected to start 11/12/2024 and are expected to complete by 08/31/2025. Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 1000 hours. This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing. ""work made to hire.""
Pay: $58/hr as W2.
S#: 302CSD2504
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $53.00 - $58.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics and business intelligence tools: 4 years (Required)
Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, R: 4 years (Required)
Data conversion and report building Snowflake and SAS Viya.: 4 years (Required)
Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment: 4 years (Required)
Proficiency in ETL processes & tools as AWS Glue and Lambda: 4 years (Required)
Strong knowledge of database Mangat. & Data warehousing: 4 years (Required)
Ability to Commute:
Austin, TX 78741 (Required)
Ability to Relocate:
Austin, TX 78741: Relocate before starting work (Required)
Work Location: In person",5.0,Advanced Proactive Solutions LLC,"Austin, TX",Unknown,,Company - Private,Security & Protective,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,55.5,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Data Lake","$90K
/yr","For over 90 years, Topcon’s vision has been to solve societal challenges around the globe. In healthcare, we are developing innovations that improve patients’ health and quality of life.
We empower eye care providers with advanced imaging, diagnostic solutions, and intelligent data technology. Our robotic devices deliver simplicity without compromise, by capturing clear images with the push of a button.
By joining Topcon Healthcare, you become part of a growing, diverse, global team. With office locations throughout North America, whether you are on-site, remote, or hybrid, our culture empowers you to contribute to company and personal success each day. At Topcon Healthcare, you can grow your career, gain new perspectives, and help address society’s most pressing challenges. If you have drive, passion, and a desire to be part of a collaborative team, we want to hear from you.
At Topcon Healthcare, we don’t wait for the future. We invent it. Join us.
Learn more about working with us at
topconcareers.com
THI is seeking a mission-driven a Data Scientist, Data Lake specialized in data cleaning, curation, and labeling. This role will play a critical role in ensuring the quality and usability of ophthalmic data for machine learning and other analytics initiatives. This individual will be responsible for developing and implementing data cleaning and preprocessing pipelines, curating datasets for specific use cases, and executing data labeling efforts.
Main Responsibilities:
Data Cleaning and Preprocessing:
Design and implement robust data cleaning processes to identify and address missing values, outliers, inconsistencies, and errors in datasets.
Develop and maintain data preprocessing pipelines to standardize, transform, and normalize data.
Utilize statistical and machine learning techniques to identify and correct data quality issues.
Data Curation and Labelling:
Select, extract, and organize relevant data from diverse sources to create curated datasets tailored to specific use cases.
Ensure data consistency, integrity, and documentation throughout the curation process.
Design and manage data labeling projects to generate high-quality labeled data.
Implement quality control measures to ensure the accuracy and consistency of labeled data.
Develop and maintain tools and scripts for automating data cleaning, curation, and labeling tasks.
Collaboration and Communication:
Collaborate with clinical scientists, data engineers, ML engineers, and domain experts to understand data needs and challenges.
Clearly communicate data quality findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Stay up to date on the latest techniques and tools in data cleaning, curation, and labeling.
Qualifications:
BSc or MSc in Life Sciences, Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computer or Data Science
2 years’ experience doing clinical science or developing data-driven algorithms for medical devices.
Experience in the ophthalmic industry is preferred, and experience with OCT data is highly preferred.
Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, set priorities, and handle multiple tasks and projects with a high degree of efficiency and comfort with ambiguity.
Expertise with statistical packages such as Python or R is highly desirable.
Expertise with Matlab, IDL, or similar packages is highly desirable.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with cloud computing applications (such as AWS or Azure)
A passion for leveraging data to improve patient care and drive innovation
Base Pay:
Expected Base Pay Range: $70,000 to $110,000 Annualized
The base pay range included is a projected hiring range for a position, level and potential work location(s) listed. Topcon provides the compensation range that it in good faith believes it might pay and/or offer for this position. This compensation range is based on a full-time schedule.
Benefits*:
Topcon offers a comprehensive benefit package for this position including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, tax saving spending accounts a 401(k) plan with employer match, tuition reimbursement in addition to other perks and benefits. We also offer time off for our employees to recharge. Our employees are eligible for paid company holidays, paid personal time off, and paid sick time that meets or exceeds state/local requirements.
Topcon reserves the right to ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and offer additional benefits and other compensation; individual candidate compensation may be determined based on individual skills, experience, training, certifications, education, final work location and other factors not related to an applicant’s sex or other status protected by local, state, or federal law. Changes in the position level, location or other factors associated with the role may change the final determined compensation. The recruiter can provide additional information during the hiring process.
Topcon time off policies can vary between roles which are exempt or non-exempt. For hourly (“non-exempt”) employees, we offer personal paid time off which accrues in accordance with local standards. For salaried (“exempt”) employees, we offer a flexible paid time off policy giving you flexibility to take time when needed, while supporting business needs. All paid time off policies are in accordance with or exceeding local law. Employees working at least 30 hours per week are eligible for our Health and Welfare benefit package.
EEO Statement:
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status.",3.2,Topcon Healthcare,"La Jolla, CA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,90.0,CA,,1,0,0,1,0
IT Data Scientist I-IV,"$103K
/yr","IT Data Scientist I-IV
- (2400277)

Founded in 1934, Medical Mutual is the oldest and one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio. We provide peace of mind to more than 1.6 million Ohioans through our high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans.
Medical Mutual’ s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we don’t answer to Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us and help our members achieve their best possible health and quality of life.
IT Data Scientist I
Entry-level data scientist developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist II
Experienced junior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends
IT Data Scientist III
Senior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Senior data scientists are expected to be self-sufficient and able to assist in coaching junior data scientists. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist IV
Expert data science developer responsible for leading team activities for design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
Responsibilities
IT Data Scientist I
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist II
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist III
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist IV
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned

Qualifications
IT Data Scientist I
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
0 to 1-year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
Python programming language
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist II
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
2+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
2+ years of experience with SQL programming language
1+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist III
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
4+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
4+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Advanced programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist IV
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
6+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
6+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Mastery of programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
Medical Mutual is looking to grow our team! We truly value and respect the talents and abilities of all of our employees. That's why we offer an exceptional package that includes:
A Great Place to Work
We will provide the equipment you need for this role, including a laptop, monitors, keyboard, mouse, and headset.
Whether you are working remotely or in the office, employees have access to on-site fitness centers at many locations, or a gym membership reimbursement when there is no Medical Mutual facility available. Enjoy the use of weights, cardio machines, locker rooms, classes and more.
On-site cafeteria, serving hot breakfast and lunch, at our Brooklyn, OH location. Convenience stores at many locations.
Discounts at many places in and around town, just for being a Medical Mutual team member.
The opportunity to earn cash rewards for shopping with our customers.
Business casual attire, including jeans.
Excellent Benefits
Employee bonus program
401(k) with company match up to 4% and an additional company contribution.
Health Savings Account with a company matching contribution.
Excellent medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance — insurance is what we do best, and we make affordable coverage for our team a priority.
Access to an Employee Assistance Program, which includes professional counseling, personal and professional coaching, self-help resources and assistance with work/life benefits.
Company holidays and up to 16 PTO days during the first year of employment with options to carry over unused PTO time.
After one year of service, parental leave for eligible employees who become parents through maternity, paternity, or adoption.

An Investment in You
Career development programs and classes.
Mentoring and coaching to help you advance in your career.
Tuition reimbursement up to $5,250 per year, the IRS maximum.
Diverse, inclusive, and welcoming culture with Business Resource Groups.

About Medical Mutual
Medical Mutual’s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we do not answer Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us.
There is a good chance you already know many of our Medical Mutual customers. As the official insurer of everything you love, we are trusted by businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout Ohio to provide high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans. Our plans provide peace of mind to more than 1.5 million Ohioans.
We are not just one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio, we are also the longest running. Founded in 1934, we aree proud of our rich history with the communities where we live and work.
At Medical Mutual and its family of companies we celebrate differences and are mutually invested in our employees and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse and nicotine testing.

Primary Location US-OH-Brooklyn
Work Locations Brooklyn 100 American Road Brooklyn 44144
Job 7 - General Staff
Organization Enterprise Analytics
Schedule Regular
Shift Standard
Employee Status Individual Contributor
Job Type Full-time
Job Level Day Job
Job Posting Oct 16, 2024, 2:39:10 PM",4.1,Medical Mutual of Ohio,"Brooklyn, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1934.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,OH,90.0,1,0,1,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$77K
/yr","Transport is at the core of modern society. Imagine using your expertise to shape sustainable transport and infrastructure solutions for the future? If you seek to make a difference on a global scale, working with next-gen technologies and the sharpest collaborative teams, then we could be a perfect match.
What you will do
As a Data Scientist, you will apply advanced data analytics techniques to analyze various types of vehicle and test data and provide detailed insights to simulation and engineering teams. The position entails a high level of collaboration with engineering teams working on future products, analyzing different types of logged and/or measured data (high frequency and low frequency) from customer trucks, field trucks and test vehicles to help make data driven engineering decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Utilize advanced analytics and machine learning techniques on customer and test vehicle data to extract meaningful insights and provide actionable recommendations to engineering and simulation teams
Integrate data from multiple sources (Customer vehicles, test vehicles etc.) and automate data flow, ensuring data quality and consistency, to facilitate deployment of advanced analytics techniques within vehicle engineering
Create data visualizations and dashboards to translate technical and customer data to provide actionable insights to stakeholders
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product development, and IT, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Collaborate with global teams on developing and improving analysis & simulation strategies based on actual customer data
Collaborate with engineering, testing and IT teams to drive development of AI/ML models to support and accelerate predictive modeling in engineering
Stay updated with the latest advancements in data science and automotive technologies to continuously improve usage of data analytics within vehicle engineering

Your future team
The Advanced Calculation Team is an important part of the Vehicle Engineering function for Volvo Group Trucks Technology, north America. Our team is a dynamic team of highly competent engineers who specialize in various CAE disciplines. We are responsible for ensuring functional requirements are met for durability & reliability, thermal management, cooling performance and other mechanical systems for heavy duty trucks developed for North America.
Who are you?
Do you dream big? We do too, and we are excited to grow together. In this role, you will bring:
A strong attention to detail with the ability to interpret data and translate information into actionable intelligence.
Capable of networking with individuals and teams across various departments and sites, sharing information and resources as needed, and working towards achieving common group goals.
Effective communication with the ability to listen effectively, transmit information accurately, and actively seek feedback from other experienced engineers, project managers, etc.
Ability to perform a wide range of tasks, respond positively to changing timelines and/or project scope, and open to accepting new challenges, responsibilities, and assignments.
Ease with communicating highly technical information to people of varying technical ability.
A desire and passion to create the very best product, working as an integral part of a highly technical organization.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
1-3 years of experience in data analytics with automotive industry background. Heavy duty vehicle experience is considered a plus
Demonstrated experience with machine learning and advanced analytics for predictive modeling such as regression analysis, neural networks (Deep Learning, RNN, LSTM, DQN etc.), time series forecasting, classification, clustering etc.
Proficiency in statistical analysis methods and programming languages such as Python (including libraries like Numpy, SciPy, Pandas, Tensorflow), SQL, Git, Azure, Hadoop, Matlab/Simulink, pySpark
Experience with building dashboards and help create visualizations from data using PowerBI, QlikView, Tableau etc.
Familiarity with Database Management Systems (BDMS) and proficiency in querying and manipulating data using SQL
Experience with Git and version control methods is a plus

What’s in it for you?
We offer a solid package of compensation and benefits, plus you will enjoy:
An organization the prioritizes employee's health and well-being.
Working in an empowered team solving complex challenges.
Opportunity to work with new technologies such as automation, electromobility, and connectivity.
Modern workspaces that allow agility and collaboration.
Multiple electric charging stations for cars.
Onsite facilities and activities that make everyday life easier including a cafeteria, chair massages, fitness center and fitness classes offered daily.
Ready for the next move?
If you are a Data Analyst / Scientist with an interest in working with a global organization focused on impacting everyday lives, apply today and join our team on this exciting journey!

We value your data privacy and therefore do not accept applications via mail.

Who we are and what we believe in
Our focus on Inclusion, Diversity, and Equity allows each of us the opportunity to bring our full authentic self to work and thrive by providing a safe and supportive environment, free of harassment and discrimination. We are committed to removing the barriers to entry, which is why we ask that even if you feel you may not meet every qualification on the job description, please apply and let us decide. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.”

Applying to this job offers you the opportunity to join Volvo Group. Every day, across the globe, our trucks, buses, engines, construction equipment, financial services, and solutions make modern life possible. We are almost 100,000 people empowered to shape the future landscape of efficient, safe and sustainable transport solutions. Fulfilling our mission creates countless career opportunities for talents with sharp minds and passion across the group’s leading brands and entities.

Group Trucks Technology are seeking talents to help design sustainable transportation solutions for the future. As part of our team, you’ll help us by engineering exciting next-gen technologies and contribute to projects that determine new, sustainable solutions. Bring your love of developing systems, working collaboratively, and your advanced skills to a place where you can make an impact. Join our design shift that leaves society in good shape for the next generation.",4.1,Volvo Group,"Greensboro, NC",10000+ Employees,1927.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,77.0,NC,97.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist (Mid),"$118K
/yr","This job opportunity is part of an RFP process; candidates are invited to submit their resumes detailing relevant experience.
Location: Bethesda, MD (Hybrid)
LCG is a minority-owned technology consulting firm that has been a trusted partner to more than 40 federal agencies, including 21 of the 27 Institutes and Centers (ICs) at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). For over 25 years, LCG has brought digitization and innovation to the Health and Human Services (HHS) and the NIH ecosystems. We support IT organizations by bringing precision technology and operation models that achieve mission capabilities and performance success.
Job Title: Data Scientist (Mid)
Job Summary: We are seeking an intermediate-level Data Scientist to perform extensive data analysis on large datasets to develop insights, identify trends, patterns, and anomalies. The successful candidate will collaborate with various teams to understand project objectives, perform data mining, data cleaning, and aggregation, and implement data models. This role will involve working with structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques. The Data Scientist will also support cloud computing initiatives, including developing automation solutions and enabling scientific cloud workflows.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and interpret large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation to prepare data for analysis and model implementation.
Develop and implement data models, conduct analysis, and interpret results using statistical techniques.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand the objectives and focus of data analysis projects.
Design, develop, and implement data-driven solutions to support organizational objectives.
Contribute to cloud computing initiatives, including automated self-service portals, cloud module development, and integration support for scientific computing.
Assist with cloud security operations by supporting the validation of security vulnerabilities and maintaining necessary security documentation.
Provide data analysis and insights to support decision-making for cloud environments, including usage, cost, and workload rationalization.
Support cloud workload migration projects by performing infrastructure assessments and assisting in business case development.
Collaborate with product management and development teams to support data-driven decisions for cloud platforms and products.
Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in data analysis, statistical modeling, and data mining.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, SQL, and experience with data visualization tools.
Knowledge of cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP) and experience with GitHub API integrations.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with attention to detail.
Familiarity with cloud security best practices and compliance standards such as NIST and FISMA.
Experience in cloud computing, scientific workflows, and automation.
Familiarity with Azure Active Directory (AD) and GitHub automation tools.
Experience in cloud enablement and workload migration for scientific computing environments.
Knowledge of federal security and compliance standards.

The projected compensation range for this position is $98,100 to $135,750 per year benchmarked in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. The target salary is 114,000. The salary range provided is a good faith estimate representative of all experience levels. Salary at LCG is determined by various factors, including but not limited to role, location, the combination of education/training, knowledge, skills, competencies, certifications, and work experience.
LCG offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance options (medical, dental, vision), life and disability insurance, retirement plan contributions, as well as paid leave, federal holidays, professional development, and lifestyle benefits.
Devoted to Fair and Inclusive Practices
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. If you are interested in applying for employment with LCG and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department by email at hr@lcginc.com.
Securing Your Data
Beware of fraudulent job offers using LCG's name. LCG will never request payment-related details or advancement of money during the application process. Legitimate communication will only come from lcginc.com or system@hirebridgemail.com emails, not free commercial services like Gmail or WhatsApp. If you receive suspicious emails asking for payment or personal information, contact us immediately at hr@lcginc.com.
If you believe you are the victim of a scam, contact your local law enforcement and report the incident to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.",3.8,"LCG, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1990.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,118.0,MD,34.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist / Data Resource Analyst II,"$78K
/yr","International Studies and Programs (ISP) supports MSU global learning and international engagement under the MSU Strategic Plan 2030 in the areas of research, teaching, and outreach. To fulfill its main objectives, ISP communicates key international data to university leadership and the public and serve as a campus-wide analytical resource. ISP manages MSU’s International Data Portals, which provide visualizations of MSU's Externally Funded International Projects, International Student Enrollment, Education Abroad, International Agreements Data, and International Research Collaboration. These dashboards utilize Tableau, Tableau Prep, and SQL Oracle to draw from MSU’s electronic data warehouse (EDW). International Studies and Programs (ISP) collaborates with units across campus to streamline and upgrade the international data plan.
ISP is seeking a Data Scientist who is curious, creative, and can see both the big picture and work with attention to detail. The successful candidate will have strong technical, interpersonal and communication skills to convey findings to various audiences and positively influence university leadership. The Data Scientist will need to articulate complex issues to a non-technical audience clearly and effectively. Daily activities may include development of data representations and visualizations, advising on predictive models and creating easy to understand reports and dashboards. This will be a full-time (100% FTE) 12-month fixed-term position funded for one year with the possibility of reappointments depending on funding and performance.
ISP is currently operating under a hybrid modality structure, with staff working three days in person and two days remote. ISP values individual and group differences and encourages applicants who will contribute to a culture of inclusion on campus.
Primary responsibilities include:
Data Analysis and Reporting
Analyze, interpret, summarize, and present data and findings in a clear, comprehensive, and effective manner
Conduct internal and external benchmarking analysis for ISP
Develop and design reports and dashboards in Tableau
Support Data-Driven Decision Making
Consult with and support ISP leadership and units by pulling and analyzing data
With ISP leadership, collaborate with other campus units on communicating, building, and evaluating data tools and streamlining data reporting
Provide analysis and decision support for university international initiatives, projects, and planning as needed
Provide training/capacity development support for ISP units in various data-related topics
Represent ISP on university-wide data-related committees
Keep apprised of trends and conversations about data in higher education and international education
Database Management and Development
Build custom SQL to meet reporting requirements and manage ISP International Data Portals
Perform query tuning and root cause analysis to optimize database performance and correct errors
Develop SQL to create database tables, views, and stored procedures to support data storage and report development
Provide targeted training on tools and platforms when necessary
Minimum Requirements
Master’s degree in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field including other degrees with a strong quantitative emphasis
Three to five years of post-graduate work experience in data mining, data warehousing, data science, data management, as well as data analysis and visualization
Experience writing advanced SQL queries; expertise with Oracle PL/SQL, expertise with Tableau
Experience using data retrieval and manipulation, and expertise in statistical tools (such as SAS, SQL, STATA, R, D3, Python) and data visualization tools (such as Tableau and Tableau Prep)
Demonstrated success in managing collaborative projects involving cross-functional and interdisciplinary teams
Excellent communication skills including presenting, editing, and writing, as well as ability to demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy
Desired Qualifications
Doctorate in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field with a strong quantitative emphasis
Proven excellence in program or project management
Experience working in a university setting and in-depth knowledge of university administrative organization, policies, procedures, and practices for institutional research-oriented roles
Experience managing higher education related data (student, research, business support systems)
Understanding of data warehouse technologies (Oracle preferred) and familiarity with data integration processes using enterprise ETL tools (DataStage preferred) and the role of data stewardship
Ability to model and analyze data in statistical tools (SPSS, R, SAS, Python, or similar) combined with experience integrating large datasets from a variety of sources; experience with ETL tools (DataStage, Informatica)
Ability to work closely with clients to build custom dashboards, conduct data analysis to support ISP centers and other units, as well as develop and streamline data reporting
Make data-informed recommendations to administrators to contribute to decision making
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, age, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Application Materials
Resume and cover letter
Work Hours
STANDARD 8-5
Description of End Date
one year from date of hire
Website
https://www.isp.msu.edu/
Bidding eligibility ends October 22, 2024 at 11:55 P.M.",4.3,Michigan State University,"East Lansing, MI",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,78.0,MI,169.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US; Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_113619
ABOUT US
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
OUR TEAM
Zynga’s Applied AI group focuses on developing innovative ways to tackle problems within the game development process, demonstrating directly the ways that AI can improve the creativity and productivity of team members across Zynga. Our team is multi-disciplinary, and includes Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers among others. We build cloud-based tools and technologies to support every aspect of the development process, from concept development through to LiveOps and publishing operations.
To be successful in this role you should have curiosity about the areas of Game Development, Artificial Intelligence and Computational Creativity, be a proactive learner, have good depth in technical skills, and a strong desire to build high quality software that delivers value and efficiency.
KEY ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Write well-crafted, efficient and testable code and algorithms
Design and build AI systems that solve computational creativity challenges
Implement and deploy solutions as part of a larger microservice architecture
Plan and implement tasks of small to medium scale independently
Excellent communication skills and comfort working in a collaborative inter-discipline environment
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Ph.D. or M.S. in Computer Science with specialization in AI, or equivalent experience
Experience building AI systems for games, procedural content generation, or computational creativity
Understanding of principles of AI, including ML
Familiarity with principles of game design and implementation
Familiarity with Python, and at least one of Typescript, C++, or Unity C#
Familiarity with containers and cloud infrastructure principles – AWS preferred
Desire to learn and share knowledge with peers, collaborate in a cross-functional team
WHAT WE OFFER YOU
Competitive salary, bonus plan and ESPP (Employee Stock Purchase Plan)
401K Company Match Contribution (US)
RRSP/DPSP company match contribution (Canada)
Health coverage, dental, disability, critical illness, EAP, and life insurance (Canada)
Medical, dental, vision, EAP, life insurance, and disability benefits (US)
Virtual mental health and neurodiversity support programs
Global Fitness reimbursement program
Global Wellbeing Program
Financial wellness program with unlimited access to certified financial planners
Discretionary Time Off policy for many employees
Family planning support program
Generous paid parental, pregnancy-related disability, caregiver, and compassionate leaves
Zynga happy hours and frequent employee events
Flexible working hours on many teams
Culture of diversity and inclusion including employee resource groups
Work with cool people and impact millions of daily player
This is a fully remote role that may be based anywhere in the United States. Below are the expected salary and wage ranges for applicants based in locations where the pay transparency law is in effect:
Colorado: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
California: $87,400 and $129,340 per year
New York State (inclusive of New York City): $98,400 and $145,620 per year
Washington: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
Base pay offered is based on market location, and may vary further depending on individualized factors for job candidates, such as job-related knowledge, skills, experience, and other objective business considerations. Subject to those same considerations, the total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a bonus and/or equity awards and eligibility to participate in our 401(K) plan, in addition to a full range of medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees will also receive 16 paid holidays per calendar year, unlimited discretionary time off, and will receive up to 6.5 sick days per calendar year. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation or benefit program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.
#LI-RK2
Zynga does not engage in financial exchanges during the recruitment or onboarding process. We do not conduct job interviews over third-party messaging apps such as Telegram, WhatsApp or others. We will never ask you for your personal or financial information over unofficial chat channels. Our in-house recruitment team only contacts individuals via official company email addresses (i.e., via a zynga.com or naturalmotion.com email domain).
If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you may wish to contact the authorities. In the United States, you may file a complaint with the FBI. More information is available here: https://www.ic3.gov.",4.2,Zynga,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,114.0,United States,17.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Type: Description:
Position: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
Duration: 12 months +
Job Description
Minimum Qualifications:
Have image processing background and a good understanding on image quality
Experience in data science and analytics, including statistical data analysis.
Strong programming skills, including python and Linux scripting for data processing and tool development.
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or related areas.
Good communication skill and positive working attitude
Expect to be self-motivated, proactive, and solution-oriented
Preferred Qualifications:
Hands-on experience with data batch processing and handling
Experience with deep learning network model training and inferencing
3 years of relevant work experience
Please send your resumes to gjose@sisinc.com (Max 3-4 pages)
Location San Diego , CA Min Experience (yrs): Required Education: Not Specified Benefits:",4.1,SIS,"San Diego, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1987.0,Company - Private,Film Production,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,CA,37.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$88K
/yr","Position Description:

Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead and support data processing and analysis tasks, such as building data pipelines, monitoring data quality, developing documentation, applying statistical and data science methods, and creating data visualizations. Our junior data scientists underpin our company's core offerings in program improvement and data science, which yield crucial evidence and information for policy and decision makers. This position will either work remotely or flexibly in one of our office locations.
This position focuses on health policy, which includes projects such as:
Enhancing knowledge management and library curation across all VRDC projects by developing Python scripts that leverage large language models for automated document classification.
Monitoring the impacts of an alternative payment model for primary care in terms of care quality, cost, and health outcomes for diverse beneficiaries, using claims from thousands of primary care practices across the country and predicting future hospital costs and behavior.
Developing and testing how claims and survey data from federal and state-level programs could be used to measure patients’ experience of care, quality of life, care coordination, and long-term outcomes for beneficiaries enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid.
Creating an interactive data visualization tool to help local policy and decision makers understand how social determinants of health are related to health outcomes in their county, using open-source data from public agencies and non-profits.
Specifically, this Data Scientist contributes to team-based projects by:
Co-developing analysis plans with a senior data scientist or researcher
Writing and maintaining programming systems in languages such as Python and R to obtain, combine, and transform datasets on cloud, internal, and client servers
Developing and maintaining documentation
Implementing quality assurance practices, such as version control and testing
Conducting analysis and communicating results, both to clients and internal teams, such as descriptive statistics, data visualizations, and model diagnostics
Leading and managing small teams and tasks with oversight from a senior staff member
Position Requirements:

Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree, with an academic record including courses in subjects such as statistics, data science, data analytics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, and/or social science; equivalent years of experience can be substituted
Demonstrated interest and/or experience using programming and data science and/or statistics to contribute to projects with a policy/social impact in academic and/or professional settings
At least three years of experience performing data cleaning and analysis using programming languages such as R, Python, or Julia in the academic, extra-curricular, or professional environment
Experience executing data science and statistics techniques including regression modeling, machine learning algorithms, network analysis, or natural language processing
Ability and desire to work independently as part of an interdisciplinary team that may be geographically dispersed. This includes being able to learn from and apply resources such as self-guided tutorials, package documentation, and academic articles and willingness to constantly learn and contribute to knowledge sharing with team members.
Experience with reproducible research principles, version control, interactive visualizations, and common packages/libraries for supporting data science work in R, Python, and/or Julia (e.g., tidyverse, R Shiny, R Markdown, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, MLJ.jl, DataFrames.jl, and/or Makie.jl).
Desired but not required: experience with healthcare datasets (for example, Medicare or Medicaid claims and enrollment data), production-quality machine learning applications, cloud computing environments, and algorithmic fairness and ethics
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $75,000- $100,000. This position is eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance. To apply, please submit a cover letter (optional), resume, code samples, and salary expectations.
Staff in our Health or Human Services units will eventually work with some of our largest clients, including the Centers for Medicaid & Medicare Services (CMS) and other agencies. Most staff working on these contracts will be required to complete a successful background investigation including the Questionnaire for Public Trust Position SF-85 (https://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/sf85p.pdf). Staff that are unable to successfully undergo the background investigation will need to be able to obtain work outside these contracts. Staff will work with their supervisor to get re-staffed, however if they are unable to do so it may result in employment termination due to lack of work.
STAFFING AGENCIES AND THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS: Mathematica is not accepting candidates for this role or any technical role from staffing agencies or third-party recruiters. Please do not contact technical or senior staff at Mathematica or share unsolicited resumes. All agency inquiries go through the talent acquisition team and will be routed accordingly.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ; Remote
#LI-AR1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1986.0,Company - Private,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,88.0,DC,38.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$192K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modeling project
At least 3 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, be able to work with cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $144000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,192.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","Recipient of the 2023 Exceptional PeopleFirst Workplace Award by IWPL, HelloGov® is an Artificial General Intelligence (AGI) company founded by ex-Machine Learning (ML) Researchers from OpenAI, Google, and the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), united by our shared patriotism and belief of advancing AI in the U.S. public sector to maintain global competitiveness. We conduct AGI research, solution development, and human capital resourcing with the declared intention of Democratizing AI for the Public Sector™.
HelloGov® was founded on the principles of nurturing our employees’ careers and wellness. We take pride in providing a work-life balance that stems from years of building companies in Silicon Valley. Our founders have pioneered some of the best AI technologies in the market and have always operated with humility and ambition. We operate with an award-winning people first mantra of:
Transparency.
Flexibility.
Work life balance.
Culture of sharing credit.
Empowering every employee, from the shop floor to the top floor.
Good company policies.
Investment in people.
Focus on ergonomics.
Fun traditions.
Benefits (Tier I Health/Vision/Dental insurance, 401K, EAP, Equity, Stipends, Investment in your wellness)
Equality in Compensation (i.e. every team member, from Junior to Executive staff, receives a Sign-On Bonus)
We are seeking a team of Data Scientists with 3+ years of experience in multi-intelligence and multi-domain systems, with a strong background in NLP, computer vision, statistical learning theory, and ML model development. Candidates should be proficient in Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++, and have experience communicating technical concepts to business, technical, and non-technical audiences. This role leverages advanced AI technology set to dominate the market for the next decade, supporting national biodefense through integrated biosurveillance (IB).
Major Duties:
Designs, configures, develops, tests, and supports informatics and data science solutions for a wide array of technical use cases;
Applies analytical methodologies to diagnose data-related challenges, implement solutions, and evaluate performance;
Documents and presents requirements, design alternatives, and findings to team members and clients;
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships; and
Experience with integrated development environments, data integration, data visualization, data mining, and analysis tools.
Maintains and guides the development of common libraries and tools used by multiple teams.
Aids in formulating a strategy on how to achieve rapid prototyping
Required Skills/Experience:
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory;
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models;
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility;
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models; and
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations.
LOCATION:
Falls Church, VA (Hybrid)
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATIONS:
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence, or related field required (Master's degree preferred).
CLEARANCE:
Top Secret (SCI eligible)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $138,997.00 - $189,983.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
No weekends
Experience:
Natural language processing: 3 years (Required)
AI models: 3 years (Required)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++: 5 years (Required)
large scale data handling + data mining: 5 years (Required)
GPU Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
DoD: 10 years (Preferred)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Falls Church, VA 22041",Not listed,HelloGov,"Falls Church, VA",-1,-1.0,-1,-1,-1,-1,0,1,164.0,VA,-1.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,1
DATA SCIENTIST,"$112K
/yr","Description
Applies knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to the development and improvement of processes. Identify limitations, or potential issues with datasets and data types that may impact performance from machine learning algorithms. Re-train models as needed to address new challenges, or novel goals. Aid investigators and stakeholders in the validation of results. Generate detailed reports and presentations. May mentor and train junior staff members.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Compile, manipulate, and analyze data using descriptive and inferential statistics to address a broad spectrum of research and administrative questions.
Use statistical software to create data analysis programs/syntax with appropriate documentation.
Understand and interpret data analysis programs/syntax written by others involved in data analysis in the department.
Explain complex statistical concepts in the form of presentations or written project reports/documentation
Write and/or review relevant portions of research study manuscripts and/or abstracts.
Effectively visualize and organize complex datasets for the production of high-quality figures and tables for reports, manuscripts, and presentations
Consult with various researchers or administrators regarding data analytic needs, feasibility of proposed analyses, sequential procedures, and project timelines
Perform other duties as assigned
Salary Range: $85,600 - $139,100

Qualifications
Doctorate degree in a related field OR Master's degree in a related field and two (2) years of related experience OR Bachelor's degree in related field and four (4) years of related experience required. Work experience may NOT substitute for education requirement.
UAB is an Equal Employment/Equal Educational Opportunity Institution dedicated to providing equal opportunities and equal access to all individuals regardless of race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, sex (including pregnancy), genetic information, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and veteran’s status. As required by Title IX, UAB prohibits sex discrimination in any education program or activity that it operates. Individuals may report concerns or questions to UAB’s Assistant Vice President and Senior Title IX Coordinator. The Title IX notice of nondiscrimination is located at uab.edu/titleix.

Primary Location: University
Job Category: Professional & Managerial
Organization: 312000000 Dept of Medical Education
Employee Status: Regular
Shift: Day/1st Shift
Work Arrangement (final schedule to be determined by the department/hiring manager): Onsite",4.0,University of Alabama at Birmingham,"Birmingham, AL",10000+ Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,AL,,0,0,0,0,0
Product Data Scientist,"$124K
/yr","The Company
PayPal has been revolutionizing commerce globally for more than 25 years. Creating innovative experiences that make moving money, selling, and shopping simple, personalized, and secure, PayPal empowers consumers and businesses in approximately 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy.

We operate a global, two-sided network at scale that connects hundreds of millions of merchants and consumers. We help merchants and consumers connect, transact, and complete payments, whether they are online or in person. PayPal is more than a connection to third-party payment networks. We provide proprietary payment solutions accepted by merchants that enable the completion of payments on our platform on behalf of our customers.

We offer our customers the flexibility to use their accounts to purchase and receive payments for goods and services, as well as the ability to transfer and withdraw funds. We enable consumers to exchange funds more safely with merchants using a variety of funding sources, which may include a bank account, a PayPal or Venmo account balance, PayPal and Venmo branded credit products, a credit card, a debit card, certain cryptocurrencies, or other stored value products such as gift cards, and eligible credit card rewards. Our PayPal, Venmo, and Xoom products also make it safer and simpler for friends and family to transfer funds to each other. We offer merchants an end-to-end payments solution that provides authorization and settlement capabilities, as well as instant access to funds and payouts. We also help merchants connect with their customers, process exchanges and returns, and manage risk. We enable consumers to engage in cross-border shopping and merchants to extend their global reach while reducing the complexity and friction involved in enabling cross-border trade.

Our beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We live each day guided by our core values of Inclusion, Innovation, Collaboration, and Wellness. Together, our values ensure that we work together as one global team with our customers at the center of everything we do – and they push us to ensure we take care of ourselves, each other, and our communities.
Job Description Summary: As a Data Scientist, you will spearhead our efforts to measure and enhance developer experience to integrate with PayPal's products. This role is central to our mission, offering you the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technology in a fast-paced environment. You will lead the data science projects for the initiatives that optimize features that are adopted by the external developer community, directly impacting PayPal's ability to offer seamless payment solutions to millions of users worldwide.
Job Description:
The Global Analytics and Data Science team is seeking a Data Scientist of PayPal’s SMB Analytics and ML Team to join us as exceptional problem solver with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus.
We are responsible to find opportunities and gaps in developer experience, product flows using statistical methods to strategize Product roadmap. This team empowers senior leadership with actionable insights for informed, data-driven decisions.
In this role, we are tackling the complex and fascinating challenge of optimizing the developer experience at PayPal. Developers go through a non-linear journey, from onboarding to integration, and it's crucial to understand their pain points at each stage. This includes analyzing what they search for, how they navigate the platform, when they begin integrating our APIs, and their activities during sandbox testing.
We aim to provide deep insights into these areas by applying advanced statistical methods and cutting-edge data science techniques. This allows us to uncover friction points and provide actionable recommendations to enhance the overall developer journey. Additionally, we leverage the latest generative AI tools to assist developers throughout their integration process. A key part of this role is to measure the efficacy and accuracy of these AI-driven solutions, ensuring they deliver value and improve the experience.
This is a unique opportunity to dissect the end-to-end developer journey, identify opportunities for product improvement, and collaborate with our product and engineering partners to drive innovation in developer tools and resources. The role goes beyond simple analytics, offering the chance to shape PayPal’s developer ecosystem and influence the tools that developers rely on to build seamlessly integrated solutions.
Your day to day:
Data Analysis and Decision Making:
Utilize large, complex datasets to drive improvements in developer KPIs.
Employ advanced analytical and statistical techniques to identify trends, issues, and opportunities.
Perform deep-dive analytics including Causal Inference analysis, Pre-Post analysis, Sensitivity analysis, financial projections, and additional ad-hoc exercises to provide holistic recommendations.
Strategic Influence: Develop and present insights and strategic recommendations to Product and Data Science leadership. Influence product direction and strategic decisions through data-driven insights.
Collaboration and Communication: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including product development, engineering, and marketing to implement data-driven improvements. Occasionally collaborate with developers to optimize their experiences. Mentor junior team members .
Innovation and Improvement: Lead initiatives to refine existing analytical processes and develop new approaches to business challenges. Promote a culture of continuous improvement and testing.
What do you need to bring
3+ years of experience in analyzing multi-dimensional datasets and creating actionable business solutions.
Strong educational background with a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Expertise in SQL, Excel, and visualization tools such as Tableau or Qlikview. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python is preferred.
Demonstrable experience with big data technologies such as Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, and BigQuery.
Knowledge of Python, Jupyter Notebooks, and SQL.
Exceptional communication skills to effectively articulate insights and influence cross-functional teams.
Prior experience in performing data science to fuel insights to drive Product within a high-tech environment.
Personal Attributes:
A data-driven decision maker, passionate about solving complex problems using analytical solutions.
A self-starter who is motivated to take initiative and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
A fun-loving team player who brings energy and enthusiasm to the workplace.
Comfortable with ambiguity and uncertainty in a dynamic business landscape.
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000
For the majority of employees, PayPal's balanced hybrid work model offers 3 days in the office for effective in-person collaboration and 2 days at your choice of either the PayPal office or your home workspace, ensuring that you equally have the benefits and conveniences of both locations.

Our Benefits:
At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.
We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:
To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.
Belonging at PayPal:
Our employees are central to advancing our mission, and we strive to create an environment where everyone can do their best work with a sense of purpose and belonging. Belonging at PayPal means creating a workplace with a sense of acceptance and security where all employees feel included and valued. We are proud to have a diverse workforce reflective of the merchants, consumers, and communities that we serve, and we continue to take tangible actions to cultivate inclusivity and belonging at PayPal.

Any general requests for consideration of your skills, please Join our Talent Community.

We know the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can get in the way of meeting spectacular candidates. Please don’t hesitate to apply.",3.7,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",10000+ Employees,1998.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,124.0,CA,26.0,1,0,0,0,1
Research Data Scientist,"$116K
/yr","Job ID
34394667
Category
Research and Development
Organization
University Library
Department
University Library Dept
Location
Main Campus - UCR
Salary
$81,500 - $150,100
Date Posted
October 10, 2024
Application Deadline
Open Until Filled
Schedule
8AM - 5PM
Full/Part Time
Full-time(100%)
Level of Supervision
General Supervision
Other Information
Qualifies for Employee Referral Bonus: No
UC Internal Job: No
Position Information
Reporting to the Director of Research Services, this position will be the driving force of the library's Data Science Initiative to support campus research through interdisciplinary collaboration on cutting-edge projects in STEM, Liberal Arts, and Social Sciences. Seeks opportunities to embed themselves in campus research teams to directly address UCR researchers' data and AI related needs through activities including but are not limited to: designing, developing and implementing infrastructure, systems, software and solutions; directly answering compute- and data- intensive research questions; contributing novel ideas, expertise, and methods to the teams' intellectual discourse and advancement; providing data/AI related consultation and instruction. In partnership with other library colleagues as well as UCR colleges, academic programs, and Research and Economic Development, Information Technology Services, and Research Computing, will continuously develop specialized and sought-after data science and AI expertise synergistic with UCR faculty's research agendas.

Candidates are encouraged to include a CV and/or portfolio link with examples of AI/Data related work, if available.

Finalists will be asked to conduct a presentation (including providing visual representation of work samples) as part of the interview process.

The full salary range for the Research Data Scientist is $81,500 - $150,100 annually. However, the expected pay scale for this position is up to $115,000 annually. We base salary offers on a variety of considerations, such as education, licensure and certifications, experience, and other business and organizational needs.

Applicants must have current work authorization when accepting a UCR staff position. Currently, we are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa for staff.

As a University employee, you will be required to comply with all applicable University policies and/or collective bargaining agreements, as may be amended from time to time. Federal, state, or local government directives may impose additional requirements.",4.2,"University of California, Riverside","Riverside, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,116.0,CA,,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Company Description
At Red Hat, we connect an innovative community of customers, partners, and contributors to deliver an open source stack of trusted, high-performing solutions. We offer cloud, Linux, middleware, and virtualization technologies, together with award-winning global customer support, consulting, and implementation services. Red Hat is a rapidly growing company supporting more than 90% of Fortune 500 companies.
Job Summary
Red Hat’s Global Engineering team is looking for an experienced data scientist to join the InstructLab team. In this role, you’ll contribute directly to Red Hat’s rapidly growing AI/ML (artificial intelligence and machine learning) family of products. You will be responsible for the investigation, evaluation, integration, and development of open source AI/ML systems and functionality to improve the overall development and operations of both Red Hat's downstream AI products and upstream open source AI projects. Qualified data scientists in this role regularly participate in design reviews and productization for major product features and bug fixes, and are experienced and comfortable working with Linux-based operating systems.

The ideal candidate will be a highly collaborative individual with a passion for working on complex projects in an open organization where contributions are valued and expected from all levels. This job role will require engaging in upstream open source communities. As this is a fast-moving area of opportunity for Red Hat, the ability to communicate productively and effectively with team members, stakeholders, and Red Hat leadership is critical.
This position reports directly to a Manager of Software Engineering for InstructLab. This position must have the ability to partner collaboratively in our Boston, MA office at least 3 days per week.
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop innovative capabilities for open source platforms used for building, training, testing, and serving models for AI-enabled applications, carrying your work through all phases of software development and delivery, including: researching and conceptualization, team design review, writing the implementation, authoring a testing strategy and necessary automation, productizing and packaging the code, and supporting its deployment through to end-users.
Monitor and participate in upstream open source AI/ML communities, evaluating new AI/ML-related technologies in the space and considering potential integrations and collaborations upstream.
Regularly reading papers and keeping up with AI/ML developments, particularly in the Generative AI space.
Promote and foster Red Hat’s open-source value proposition as it pertains to AI/ML engineering and product infusion and development.
Contribute to the development of the open-source projects that comprise Red Hat’s AI family of products.
Take part in the shared responsibility of delivering and maintaining assigned products.
Regularly communicate with project stakeholders including other teams of Red Hat engineers, product managers, consultants, management, and senior leadership.
Take on the role of Subject Matter Expert, as needed, per domain and project.
Lead, coach and collaborate with junior engineers as they build AI/ML knowledge and skills.
Coordinate and collaborate with external teams, including IBM Research on key strategic vision and implementation details.
Share our experiments and learnings from an experienced position in the Data Science community through blogs, presentations, new ideas and existing work at various technical outlets and conferences.
Promote upstream acceptance and community building.

Required Skills
Bachelor's degree in computer science, data science, computer engineering or equivalent
5+ years of experience as a data scientist (or similar roles).
Extensive, advanced experience with Python development.
Experience with AI and Machine Learning platforms, tools, and frameworks, such as: Tensorflow, PyTorch, LLaMA.cpp, and Kubeflow.
Experience working with Kubernetes/OpenShift and containers, troubleshooting issues, and working with YAML.
Experience with Cloud Native Technologies and Platforms (e.g. Kubernetes)
Demonstrates knowledge of unit testing frameworks and methodologies
Demonstrates knowledge of machine learning relevant mathematics and statistics.
Strong self-motivation and organizational skills.
Demonstrates ability to context switch between multiple concurrent projects.
Excellent English written and verbal communication skills.
Collaborative attitude and willingness to share ideas openly.
Ability to quickly learn and use new tools and technologies.
Passion for developing open source software.
Nice to Haves
Familiarity with participating in an agile development team
Experience writing Kubernetes controllers and operators.
Experience creating Ansible automation scripts.
Experience with big data storage techniques, such as Parquet, Avro, and S3.
Experience with hardware accelerators, such as GPU, CUDA, and ROCm.
Understanding of DevOps methodology.
The salary range for this position is $127,890.00 - $211,180.00. Actual offer will be based on your qualifications.
Pay Transparency
Red Hat determines compensation based on several factors including but not limited to job location, experience, applicable skills and training, external market value, and internal pay equity. Annual salary is one component of Red Hat’s compensation package. This position may also be eligible for bonus, commission, and/or equity. For positions with Remote-US locations, the actual salary range for the position may differ based on location but will be commensurate with job duties and relevant work experience.
About Red Hat
Red Hat
is the world’s leading provider of enterprise
open source
software solutions, using a community-powered approach to deliver high-performing Linux, cloud, container, and Kubernetes technologies. Spread across 40+ countries, our associates work flexibly across work environments, from in-office, to office-flex, to fully remote, depending on the requirements of their role. Red Hatters are encouraged to bring their best ideas, no matter their title or tenure. We're a leader in open source because of our open and inclusive environment. We hire creative, passionate people ready to contribute their ideas, help solve complex problems, and make an impact.
Benefits
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Flexible Spending Account - healthcare and dependent care
Health Savings Account - high deductible medical plan
Retirement 401(k) with employer match
Paid time off and holidays
Paid parental leave plans for all new parents
Leave benefits including disability, paid family medical leave, and paid military leave
Additional benefits including employee stock purchase plan, family planning reimbursement, tuition reimbursement, transportation expense account, employee assistance program, and more!
Note: These benefits are only applicable to full time, permanent associates at Red Hat located in the United States.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion at Red Hat
Red Hat’s culture is built on the open source principles of transparency, collaboration, and inclusion, where the best ideas can come from anywhere and anyone. When this is realized, it empowers people from diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and experiences to come together to share ideas, challenge the status quo, and drive innovation. Our aspiration is that everyone experiences this culture with equal opportunity and access, and that all voices are not only heard but also celebrated. We hope you will join our celebration, and we welcome and encourage applicants from all the beautiful dimensions of diversity that compose our global village.
Equal Opportunity Policy (EEO)
Red Hat is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer. We review applications for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, veteran status, genetic information, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

Red Hat does not seek or accept unsolicited resumes or CVs from recruitment agencies. We are not responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions, or any other payment related to unsolicited resumes or CVs except as required in a written contract between Red Hat and the recruitment agency or party requesting payment of a fee.
Red Hat supports individuals with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodations to job applicants. If you need assistance completing our online job application, email
application-assistance@redhat.com
. General inquiries, such as those regarding the status of a job application, will not receive a reply.",4.2,"Red Hat, Inc.","Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,1993.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,170.0,MA,31.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$163K
/yr","It's time to transform markets
Existing workflows within syndicated loan and CLO markets are painful for clients: they are outdated, overcomplicated, and time-consuming. It's time for a change.
Octaura is reimagining the way these markets trade, with efficiency, transparency and simplicity at the heart of what we do. We bring trading capabilities, data and analytics together for the first time on a digitized platform–fundamentally transforming the markets and streamlining workflows like never before.
At Octaura, everyone belongs
It's essential that Octaurians are confident in knowing they have the space to use their voice and talents. The world is diverse and we actively want our team to reflect this. We're a values-driven company and by engaging, solving and evolving together, we create a culture that is collaborative, transparent, impactful and innovative. And fun!
The role in a nutshell
As a Senior Data Scientist at Octaura, you'll be a key member of our Product team, playing a critical role in the development and growth of our Data and Analytics products. This is an early-stage opportunity to shape the future of our data science initiatives and make a significant contribution to the company's success.
What You'll Do
Drive the full product lifecycle: From ideation and market research to model development, deployment, and performance monitoring, you'll be involved in every stage of creating impactful data-driven solutions.
Develop advanced models: You'll leverage your expertise in machine learning and statistical modelling to extract valuable insights from large and complex datasets, building predictive models that fuel our product offerings.
Build scalable infrastructure: Design, implement, and maintain cloud-based infrastructure on AWS and/or Azure to support our data processing and model deployment needs.
Collaborate effectively: Work closely with the Go-to-Market team to understand client needs and market trends, and partner with the Technology team to build robust data pipelines.
Communicate insights: Clearly and effectively communicate your findings to stakeholders across the company, translating complex data into actionable insights
The Opportunity
Make a real impact: You'll have a direct and significant impact on the company's growth and success.
Early-stage opportunity: Shape the future of our data science products and be a part of building something truly innovative.
Collaborative environment: Work alongside a talented and passionate cross functional teams in a supportive and collaborative environment.
Growth potential: Ample opportunities for professional development and career advancement within a rapidly growing startup.
The Person
Advanced degree and experience: PhD (or MSc + 5 years of experience) in statistics, physics, mathematics, computer science, or a related field.
Strong programming skills: Proficiency in Python and experience with popular machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Proven modelling experience: A track record of building and deploying predictive models using machine learning algorithms.
Data analysis expertise: Strong analytical skills with the ability to analyse and interpret complex datasets, identify patterns, and draw meaningful conclusions.
Excellent communication: Exceptional written and verbal communication skills with the ability to explain technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Cloud proficiency: Experience with cloud-based architectures (AWS and/or Azure) is highly preferred.
Fintech/Financial Services experience is a plus: Experience in the financial services industry, particularly within the fixed income market, is a valuable asset.
If you are passionate about data science in finance, have a strong background in technical majors, and are excited about building predictive models and cloud-based infrastructure using AWS and Azure, we want to hear from you. As a startup, we offer a dynamic and entrepreneurial work environment, where you will have the opportunity to take ownership of your work and make a real impact on our business.
The base pay range for this position in New York is $150,000 - $175,000 annually. Pay may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Equity and year-end bonus may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and other benefits, dependent on the position offered. Applicants should apply via Octaura's internal or external careers site.

Octaura Work Perks
At Octaura, our people are our most valuable asset, and we are pleased to offer the following benefits to all full-time employees:
Competitive compensation and equity
Unlimited Paid Time Off
Competitive Parental Leave
Daily breakfast, coffee and snacks in the office
90% company-paid healthcare
Onsite gym & discounted membership
We're committed to equal opportunity employment
Octaura is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status.",5.0,Octaura,"New York, NY",1 to 50 Employees,2022.0,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,163.0,NY,2.0,1,0,0,1,1
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$193K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 18, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200573520

Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products, such as Siri and Search. Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products. This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.
Solid foundation in data science, machine learning, and evaluation, with hands-on experience in independently conducting and analyzing experiments. Ability to take ownership of smaller analytical projects and contribute effectively to larger initiatives.
Proficiency in critical thinking, problem-solving, and collaboration with cross-functional teams to address business needs. Strong communication skills for articulating and translating business questions into actionable insights using statistical techniques and available data.
Strong programming skills in Python for data processing, with expertise in SQL or Spark. Proficient in data wrangling, and able to assist in prototyping data quality and evaluation pipelines, working alongside engineering teams to help solve data challenges.
Some relevant internship or work experience for M.S. or Ph.D. candidates, or 3 years of relevant work experiences for people with other degrees in quantitative fields.

Preferred Qualifications
Experience in generative model and application development, with a focus on data, evaluation, and automation. Ability to adopt or implement established methodologies and apply statistical analysis in problem-solving.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $135,400 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,193.0,WA,48.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Monitoring Operations","$270K
/yr","About the Team
OpenAI’s mission is to ensure that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We believe that achieving our goal requires real world deployment and iteratively updating based on what we learn.
The Intelligence and Investigations team supports this by identifying and investigating misuses of our products – especially new types of abuse. This enables our partner teams to develop data-backed product policies and build scaled safety mitigations. Precisely understanding abuse allows us to safely enable users to build useful things with our products.
About the Role
As a Data Scientist on the Monitoring Operations team, you will be responsible for building systems to proactively identify abuse on OpenAI’s products. This includes ensuring we have robust monitoring in place for new products, and can sustain monitoring for existing products. You will also respond to critical escalations, especially those that are not caught by our existing safety systems. This will require expert understanding of our products and data, and involves working cross-functionally with product, policy, and engineering teams.
This role is based in our San Francisco office and includes participation in an on-call rotation that will involve resolving urgent escalations outside of normal work hours. Some investigations may involve sensitive content, including sexual, violent, or otherwise-disturbing material.
In this role, you will:
Scope and implement monitoring requirements for new product launches. This involves working with Product and Policy teams to understand key risks, and working with Engineering teams to ensure we have sufficient data and tooling.
Improve processes to sustain monitoring operations for existing products. This includes developing approaches to automate monitoring subtasks.
You might thrive in this role if you:
Have at least 4 years of experience doing technical analysis, especially in SQL and Python.
Have experience in trust and safety and/or have worked closely with policy, enforcement, and engineering teams
Have experience with basic data engineering, such as building core tables or writing data pipelines (not expected to build infrastructure or write production code)
Have experience scaling and automating processes, especially with language models
About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,270.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II,"$130K
/yr","Want a meaningful career where you can make a difference? Edward Jones sounds perfect for you.

Collaboration. Autonomy. Opportunity. Words our headquarters associates use when talking about working at Edward Jones. Words that describe what it's like being part of a firm where everyone is aligned toward a singular focus: serving the client. And everyone is working to make the firm better together - as they grow as individuals. If these words resonate with you, we should talk.

Job Overview

Position Schedule: Full-Time

Overview:
Come join us in Firm Strategy, where we strive to unleash the full potential of data and AI to address business challenges. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will design, develop and deliver data science solutions requiring advanced mathematical methods, statistical and machine learning models in support of data-driven strategies. You will combine data from multiple sources to develop innovative solutions to business problems and collaborate with business partners and other data scientists to develop tailored analytic solutions that inform and influence decisions across the firm.

Key Responsibilities:
Partner with business partners to design, develop and deploy solutions that enable hyper-personalized interactions.
Use machine learning, numerical optimization, and statistical modeling to discover and explain patterns in data.
Create features and develop models beyond standard toolset libraries to meet unique business challenges.
Proactively interpret and communicate findings and insights from the data to business partners. Clear communication without technical jargon is important to success.
Execute projects from design and data-gathering, through implementation, final delivery, and monitoring.
Define data needs and evaluate data quality for applicability to posed problems.
Rapidly optimize data and model inputs to increase predictiveness and relevance in response to changes in data availability, data quality, or business specifications.


Edward Jones' compensation and benefits package includes medical and prescription drug, dental, vision, voluntary benefits (such as accident, hospital indemnity, and critical illness), short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage. Short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage are provided at no cost to associates. Edward Jones offers a 401k retirement plan, and tax-advantaged accounts: health savings account, and flexible spending account. Edward Jones observes ten paid holidays and provides 15 days of vacation for new associates beginning on January 1 of each year, as well as sick time, personal days, and a paid day for volunteerism. Associates may be eligible for bonuses and profit sharing. All associates are eligible for the firm's Employee Assistance Program. For more information on the Benefits available to Edward Jones associates, please visit our benefits page.

At Edward Jones, we value and respect our associates and their contributions, and we recognize individual efforts through a rewards program that promotes a long-term career, financial security and well-being. Visit our career site to learn more about our total compensation approach, which in addition to base salary, typically includes benefits, bonuses and profit sharing. The salary range for this role is based on national data and actual pay is based on skills, experience, education, and other relevant factors for a potential new associate:

Hiring Minimum: $96471
Hiring Maximum: $164262

Read More About Job Overview

Skills/Requirements
Master of Science Degree in a quantitative field required. PhD degree desired.
5+ years professional experience.
Proficiency with one or more computing languages (Python, SQL).
Ability to deliver capabilities that derive insights or novel ideas from data and mathematical models using best data science practices. Connect insights to desired research or business outcomes.
Demonstrated ability and interest in learning new algorithms and tools, e.g. GenAI, machine learning, and optimization.
Proficiency with cloud computing platforms and distributed systems for large-scale data processing.

Please note: Candidates that live within a commutable distance from our Tempe, AZ and St. Louis, MO home office locations are expected to work in the office three days per week, with preference for Tuesday through Thursday.

Read More About Skills/Requirements

Awards & Accolades

At Edward Jones, we are building a place where everyone feels like they belong. We're proud of our associates' contributions to the firm and the recognitions we have received.

Check out our U.S. awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Check out our Canadian awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Read More About Awards & Accolades

About Us

Join a financial services firm where your contributions are valued. Edward Jones is a Fortune 500¹ company where people come first. With over 8 million clients and 19,000 financial advisors across the U.S. and Canada, we're proud to be privately-owned, placing the focus on our clients rather than shareholder returns.

Behind everything we do is our purpose: We partner for positive impact to improve the lives of our clients and colleagues, and together, better our communities and society. We are an innovative, flexible, and inclusive organization that attracts, develops, and inspires performance excellence and a sense of belonging.

People are at the center of our partnership. Edward Jones associates are seen, heard, respected, and supported. This is what we believe makes us the best place to start or build your career.

View our Purpose, Inclusion and Citizenship Report.

1Fortune 500, published June 2023, data as of December 2022. Compensation provided for using, not obtaining, the rating.

Edward Jones does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, gender, religion, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, pregnancy, veteran status, genetic information or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.",3.7,Edward Jones,United States,10000+ Employees,1922.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,United States,102.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection","$170K
/yr","Proof is the world's first identity-assured transaction management platform and we are on a mission to digitize trust for all of life’s most critical transactions. Developed by the same market leaders and experts who brought notarization online with Notarize℠, Proof offers trust in a digital world by verifying identities and securing transactions to protect businesses and their customers. Since 2015, we’ve completed many of the world’s first digital commerce transactions, including the first online real estate closing, online mortgage closing, online auto sale, and online will and we're still just getting started!

We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our Fraud Tech product engineering team. As a member of this team, you will use your analytical skills to identify and prevent fraud risks. You will work with product and engineering partners, as well as risk and policy teams to build solutions that fit product needs.

Proof is a growing startup. You will get a chance to meaningfully contribute to building new products and services leveraging novel, data driven solutions, wear multiple hats, and closely collaborate within and outside of a small team.
What you’ll do as the Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection at Proof:
Leverage advanced analytics, machine learning, and statistical methods to detect and mitigate fraudulent activities on Proof platform
Contribute to large-scale analytical fraud research and implementation projects through all stages
Partner with product managers, engineers, operational and legal teams to envision and implement best in class data based solutions
Evaluate fraud cases holistically to identify areas of improvement
Analyze and incorporate additional signals that continuously improve fraud detection
Maintain knowledge and understanding of current trends and issues affecting the area of expertise
What we're looking for:
Master’s degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related field
5+ years of experience in data science with a focus on fraud detection or a similar domain
Traditional and advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms
Excellent quantitative and analytical skills; ability to derive patterns, trends and insights, and perform risk/reward tradeoff analysis
Deep understanding of data management such as data pipeline and data quality
Experience in building machine learning powered products
Analytic thought leadership; intellectual curiosity
Effective communication skills and experience presenting findings to stakeholders
$130,000 - $210,000 a year
This is the expected cash compensation range for this position. The salary offered within this range will be determined based on factors including but not limited to skills, qualifications, experience and location. The total compensation package for this role also includes benefits such as medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability coverage, flexible paid time off, Carrot Fertility, participation in a 401(k) with company match and more!
Proof is committed to building an inclusive environment for people of all backgrounds and everyone is encouraged to apply. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We'd love to hear from you.",4.7,Proof.com,United States,1 to 50 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,170.0,United States,3.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II (NLP Required),"$90K
/yr","Job Summary:
The Data Scientist II is responsible for designing and validating predictive models, machine learning models, and artificial intelligence that inform and improve business processes across the organization (operational, clinical, financial, marketing, etc.).
Targeting a candidate fluent in NLP, generalized linear models, LLM, deep learning and predictive modeling.
Essential Functions:
Create, maintain, and communicate an analytical plan for each project
Mine and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets
Employ wide range of data sources to develop algorithms for predicting risk and understanding drivers, detecting outliers, etc.
Develop visualizations that demonstrate the efficacy of developed algorithms
Provide statistical validation and analysis of outcomes associated with clinical programs and interventions
Collaborate with other teams to integrate with existing solutions
Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders
Prepare code for operationalization of end-to-end model pipeline and deliverable for business consumption
Perform any other job duties as requested
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, other related field or equivalent years of relevant work experience is required
Minimum of three (3) years of experience in data analysis and/or analytic programming required
Experience with cloud services (such as Azure, AWS or GCP) and modern data stack (such as Databricks or Snowflakes) is preferred
Healthcare experience is preferred
Competencies, Knowledge, and Skills:
Proficient in SQL and at least one of the following programming languages: Python or R
Preferred beginner level of knowledge of developing reports or dashboards in Power BI or other business intelligence applications
Ability to perform basic statistical analyses and techniques including A/B testing, general significance testing, and sampling methodologies
Working knowledge of predictive modeling and machine learning algorithms such as generalized linear models, non-linear supervised learning models, clustering, decision trees, dimensionality reduction and natural language processing
Proficient in feature engineering techniques and exploratory data analysis
Familiarity with optimization techniques and artificial intelligence methods
Ability to analyze large quantities of information and identify patterns, irregularities, and deficiencies
Proficient with MS office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Access)
Demonstrated critical thinking, verbal communication, presentation and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and within a cross-functional team environment
Licensure and Certification:
None
Working Conditions:
General office environment; may be required to sit or stand for extended periods of time
Compensation Range:
$69,400.00 - $111,000.00
CareSource takes into consideration a combination of a candidate’s education, training, and experience as well as the position’s scope and complexity, the discretion and latitude required for the role, and other external and internal data when establishing a salary level. We are highly invested in every employee’s total well-being and offer a substantial and comprehensive total rewards package.
Compensation Type (hourly/salary):
Salary
Organization Level Competencies
Create an Inclusive Environment
Cultivate Partnerships
Develop Self and Others
Drive Execution
Influence Others
Pursue Personal Excellence
Understand the Business

This job description is not all inclusive. CareSource reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. CareSource is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are dedicated to fostering an inclusive environment that welcomes and supports individuals of all backgrounds.",3.7,CareSource,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,90.0,Remote,35.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","About Us
At Vast.ai, we value creativity, energy, drive and teamwork. We are looking for talented people who share these values to join as we grow our team. Our vision is to widely distribute AI computing to reshape our future for the good of humanity. Come join us. If witnessing the birth of AGI excites you, we can't wait to hear from you!
Vast.ai is a market based cloud computing platform focused on reducing the cost and friction of compute-intensive workloads, enabling anyone to easily leverage large-scale GPU liquidity. Vast.ai is the market leader for low cost GPU rentals. Our GPU marketplace powers AI projects and businesses all over the world.
NOTE: Currently hiring for on-site work in Westwood, Los Angeles.
About the Role
We're looking for a skilled Marketing Data Scientist to join our growing team. In this role, you'll be instrumental in applying advanced analytics to our marketing and sales funnels, driving growth and efficiency through data-driven insights. You'll work closely with our marketing, sales, and product teams to implement measurement tools, design and run A/B tests, and develop predictive models that inform our marketing strategies. This position offers a unique opportunity to apply your data science expertise in a dynamic startup environment at the forefront of AI technology.
Key Responsibilities
Develop and implement predictive analytics models for our marketing and sales funnels.
Design, implement, and analyze A/B tests to optimize marketing campaigns and user experiences.
Create SQL queries and custom analysis for production sales and website tracking data.
Develop innovative approaches using LLMs/AI for customer analysis.
Develop data-driven recommendations to inform marketing strategy and budget allocation.
Stay current with the latest data science techniques and marketing analytics trends.
You Are
A data-driven problem solver with a passion for marketing analytics.
Familiar with SQL and direct database manipulation.
Experienced in designing and implementing A/B tests and experimentation frameworks.
Proficient in statistical analysis and machine learning techniques.
An excellent communicator, able to present technical concepts to diverse audiences.
Proactive and self-motivated, with the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.
Qualifications
Master's degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or a related field.
3+ years of experience applying data science in a marketing context.
Strong programming skills in Python or R, and proficiency with SQL.
Experience with marketing analytics tools (e.g., Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics) and A/B testing platforms.
Proven track record of implementing predictive models in a business setting.
Familiarity with machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Knowledge of digital marketing channels and metrics.
Bonus: Experience in the B2B SaaS or cloud computing industry.
Benefits
Full-Time, Monday - Friday.
Onsite at the Vast.ai HQ in Westwood, Los Angeles.
Health, dental, vision and life insurance coverage.
Matching 401K.
Ambitious, fast-paced startup environment.
Generous equity.",4.5,Vast.ai,"Los Angeles, CA",201 to 500 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,CA,3.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$154K
/yr","The Microsoft AI (Artifical Intelligence) Web Data team is looking for a Data Scientist II to help us build the next generation platform for Bing and Microsoft AI. In Web Data, we are on a mission to build the most vast and accurate model of the Web to power search and AI. We are pushing frontiers of scalability and index quality by creating models and systems for discovering, storing, processing Web content, and operating AI solutions. Our core set of engineering challenges includes:
Discovering diverse content on the Web quickly and efficiently by understanding the structure and dynamics of the Web and optimizing crawl scheduling.
Building Big Data pipelines, creating ML(Machine Learning) and AI models for index selection, and determining document quality.
Designing and implementing models and pipelines for near-real time (NRT) indexing and content freshness.
Designing and implementing methods for leveraging AI in platform and backend solutions.
This is a great opportunity for someone who loves to tackle deep technical challenges and strives for industry-wide impact. At this role, you'd be dealing with and learning how to do data collection, analysis and cleaning, building Big Data pipelines, making decision based on data, doing model training and deployment, and working with LLMs both for prompt engineering and fine-tuning.

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
Acquire the data necessary for your project plan and use querying, visualization, and reporting techniques to describe that data. You’ll also explore data for key attributes and collaborate with others to perform data science experiments using established methodologies.
Understand modeling techniques, select the correct tool and approach to complete objectives, and evaluate the output for statistical and business significance. You’ll also analyze model performance and incorporate customer feedback into its evaluation.
Understand the current state of the industry, including current trends, so that you can contribute to thought leadership best practices.
Write efficient code for a specific feature, and develop a working expertise of proper debugging techniques.
Understand each customer’s business goals and learn best practices for identifying growth opportunities.
Examine projects through a customer-oriented focus, and manage customer expectations regarding project progress.
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 2+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR equivalent experience.
1+ year(s) customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR equivalent experience.
Data Science IC3 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $98,300 - $193,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $127,200 - $208,800 per year.

Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until October 21, 2024.

#Bing
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,"Redmond, WA",10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,154.0,WA,49.0,0,0,0,1,0
"NAMS2 - Data Scientist I, II, III","$101K
/yr","Company Description

Crown is a leader in planning and implementing aerospace and advanced transportation services, with a focus on advanced air mobility (AAM). We have more than three decades of experience in developing strategy, exploring concepts, assessing technologies, developing use cases, and projecting economic impacts for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), and State Departments of Transportation. We are looking for an exceptional new team member to join our Crown innovators working with companies and government agencies to safely advance aviation’s newest frontier. Join our team to pioneer a better, more sustainable future

Job Description

Crown is looking for all levels of Data Scientists to work on the NAMS-2 project in Mountain View, CA to:
Identify trends, patterns, and anomalies found in big data sets by performing extensive data analysis to develop insights.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes to prepare data, implement data models, conduct analysis, and develop databases.
Interpret results from multiple structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques and tools.
Collaborate with teams to understand each data analysis projects' underlying purpose, focus, and objectives.
Design, develops, and implements the most valuable data-driven solutions for the
organization

Qualifications

Level I - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 0-2 years of related experience.
Level II - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Exposure to some of the complex tasks within the job function. Requires 2 -4 years of related experience.
Level III - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 5 - 8 years of related experience.

Additional Information

Visit: www.crownci.com for additional information on our company.
Competitive benefits program and matching 401K!
Crown is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, age, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.
Persons unable to complete an online application should contact Crown HR for assistance at (703) 650-0663 ext 3059.
Crown is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor
Crown was voted Best Places to Work in 2021
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Crown Consulting, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1989.0,Company - Private,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,101.0,CA,35.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Title: Data Scientist - Big Data Engineer
Place of Performance: Remote - Austin, TX 77040
Duration: 9 Months Approx.

About Radiant
Radiant is committed to solving complex challenges for our customers by delivering innovative technology solutions. Our client-centric model increases transparency and accountability, which helps promote efficiency and effectiveness. We work and grow together with our customers, and we help empower our clients to achieve success. Our flexible delivery model allows us to provide end-to-end solution delivery, single project execution, and, or strategic resources. CMMI Maturity Level III and ISO 9001 2015 certified.

Required Skills:
4 years of Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 years of Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 years of Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 years of Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 years of Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 years of Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 years Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.

Responsibilities:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
The above job description and requirements are general in nature and may be subject to change based on the specific needs and requirements of the organization and project.

This is a remote position.",3.1,Radiant Digital,"Austin, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2000.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,TX,24.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$57.50
/hr","Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Experience:
Data Scientist: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",Not listed,Tekfocus Minds LLC,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,57.5,Remote,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$55.50
/hr","Job Overview:
The Office of the Attorney General’s Chief Data Office (CDO) is seeking a dynamic and visionary Data Scientist to join our team and support our System Modernization efforts for the Child Support Division.
This individual must be able to work in a heavily technical environment, preparing and optimizing data for Snowflake and utilizing SAS Viya to build comprehensive federal and state reports.
You will play a pivotal role in transforming, analyzing, and leveraging our data assets to drive strategic initiatives and business outcomes.
You must be comfortable analyzing data, developing predictive modeling algorithms, and can communicate your findings through visualizations enabling the discovery of solutions to business problems.
As a Data Scientist your role will be impactful, visible, and rewarding.
Responsibilities will include:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
Required Qualification/Skill Experience:
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 Years: Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 Years: Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Position Details:
The primary work location(s) will be at OAG State Office located at 5500 E. Oltorf St, Austin, TX 78741.
Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.
The working position is Telework.
Services are expected to start 11/12/2024 and are expected to complete by 08/31/2025. Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 1000 hours. This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing. ""work made to hire.""
Pay: $58/hr as W2.
S#: 302CSD2504
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $53.00 - $58.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics and business intelligence tools: 4 years (Required)
Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, R: 4 years (Required)
Data conversion and report building Snowflake and SAS Viya.: 4 years (Required)
Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment: 4 years (Required)
Proficiency in ETL processes & tools as AWS Glue and Lambda: 4 years (Required)
Strong knowledge of database Mangat. & Data warehousing: 4 years (Required)
Ability to Commute:
Austin, TX 78741 (Required)
Ability to Relocate:
Austin, TX 78741: Relocate before starting work (Required)
Work Location: In person",5.0,Advanced Proactive Solutions LLC,"Austin, TX",Unknown,,Company - Private,Security & Protective,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,55.5,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Data Lake","$90K
/yr","For over 90 years, Topcon’s vision has been to solve societal challenges around the globe. In healthcare, we are developing innovations that improve patients’ health and quality of life.
We empower eye care providers with advanced imaging, diagnostic solutions, and intelligent data technology. Our robotic devices deliver simplicity without compromise, by capturing clear images with the push of a button.
By joining Topcon Healthcare, you become part of a growing, diverse, global team. With office locations throughout North America, whether you are on-site, remote, or hybrid, our culture empowers you to contribute to company and personal success each day. At Topcon Healthcare, you can grow your career, gain new perspectives, and help address society’s most pressing challenges. If you have drive, passion, and a desire to be part of a collaborative team, we want to hear from you.
At Topcon Healthcare, we don’t wait for the future. We invent it. Join us.
Learn more about working with us at
topconcareers.com
THI is seeking a mission-driven a Data Scientist, Data Lake specialized in data cleaning, curation, and labeling. This role will play a critical role in ensuring the quality and usability of ophthalmic data for machine learning and other analytics initiatives. This individual will be responsible for developing and implementing data cleaning and preprocessing pipelines, curating datasets for specific use cases, and executing data labeling efforts.
Main Responsibilities:
Data Cleaning and Preprocessing:
Design and implement robust data cleaning processes to identify and address missing values, outliers, inconsistencies, and errors in datasets.
Develop and maintain data preprocessing pipelines to standardize, transform, and normalize data.
Utilize statistical and machine learning techniques to identify and correct data quality issues.
Data Curation and Labelling:
Select, extract, and organize relevant data from diverse sources to create curated datasets tailored to specific use cases.
Ensure data consistency, integrity, and documentation throughout the curation process.
Design and manage data labeling projects to generate high-quality labeled data.
Implement quality control measures to ensure the accuracy and consistency of labeled data.
Develop and maintain tools and scripts for automating data cleaning, curation, and labeling tasks.
Collaboration and Communication:
Collaborate with clinical scientists, data engineers, ML engineers, and domain experts to understand data needs and challenges.
Clearly communicate data quality findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Stay up to date on the latest techniques and tools in data cleaning, curation, and labeling.
Qualifications:
BSc or MSc in Life Sciences, Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computer or Data Science
2 years’ experience doing clinical science or developing data-driven algorithms for medical devices.
Experience in the ophthalmic industry is preferred, and experience with OCT data is highly preferred.
Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, set priorities, and handle multiple tasks and projects with a high degree of efficiency and comfort with ambiguity.
Expertise with statistical packages such as Python or R is highly desirable.
Expertise with Matlab, IDL, or similar packages is highly desirable.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with cloud computing applications (such as AWS or Azure)
A passion for leveraging data to improve patient care and drive innovation
Base Pay:
Expected Base Pay Range: $70,000 to $110,000 Annualized
The base pay range included is a projected hiring range for a position, level and potential work location(s) listed. Topcon provides the compensation range that it in good faith believes it might pay and/or offer for this position. This compensation range is based on a full-time schedule.
Benefits*:
Topcon offers a comprehensive benefit package for this position including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, tax saving spending accounts a 401(k) plan with employer match, tuition reimbursement in addition to other perks and benefits. We also offer time off for our employees to recharge. Our employees are eligible for paid company holidays, paid personal time off, and paid sick time that meets or exceeds state/local requirements.
Topcon reserves the right to ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and offer additional benefits and other compensation; individual candidate compensation may be determined based on individual skills, experience, training, certifications, education, final work location and other factors not related to an applicant’s sex or other status protected by local, state, or federal law. Changes in the position level, location or other factors associated with the role may change the final determined compensation. The recruiter can provide additional information during the hiring process.
Topcon time off policies can vary between roles which are exempt or non-exempt. For hourly (“non-exempt”) employees, we offer personal paid time off which accrues in accordance with local standards. For salaried (“exempt”) employees, we offer a flexible paid time off policy giving you flexibility to take time when needed, while supporting business needs. All paid time off policies are in accordance with or exceeding local law. Employees working at least 30 hours per week are eligible for our Health and Welfare benefit package.
EEO Statement:
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status.",3.2,Topcon Healthcare,"La Jolla, CA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,90.0,CA,,1,0,0,1,0
IT Data Scientist I-IV,"$103K
/yr","IT Data Scientist I-IV
- (2400277)

Founded in 1934, Medical Mutual is the oldest and one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio. We provide peace of mind to more than 1.6 million Ohioans through our high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans.
Medical Mutual’ s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we don’t answer to Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us and help our members achieve their best possible health and quality of life.
IT Data Scientist I
Entry-level data scientist developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist II
Experienced junior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends
IT Data Scientist III
Senior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Senior data scientists are expected to be self-sufficient and able to assist in coaching junior data scientists. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist IV
Expert data science developer responsible for leading team activities for design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
Responsibilities
IT Data Scientist I
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist II
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist III
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist IV
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned

Qualifications
IT Data Scientist I
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
0 to 1-year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
Python programming language
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist II
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
2+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
2+ years of experience with SQL programming language
1+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist III
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
4+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
4+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Advanced programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist IV
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
6+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
6+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Mastery of programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
Medical Mutual is looking to grow our team! We truly value and respect the talents and abilities of all of our employees. That's why we offer an exceptional package that includes:
A Great Place to Work
We will provide the equipment you need for this role, including a laptop, monitors, keyboard, mouse, and headset.
Whether you are working remotely or in the office, employees have access to on-site fitness centers at many locations, or a gym membership reimbursement when there is no Medical Mutual facility available. Enjoy the use of weights, cardio machines, locker rooms, classes and more.
On-site cafeteria, serving hot breakfast and lunch, at our Brooklyn, OH location. Convenience stores at many locations.
Discounts at many places in and around town, just for being a Medical Mutual team member.
The opportunity to earn cash rewards for shopping with our customers.
Business casual attire, including jeans.
Excellent Benefits
Employee bonus program
401(k) with company match up to 4% and an additional company contribution.
Health Savings Account with a company matching contribution.
Excellent medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance — insurance is what we do best, and we make affordable coverage for our team a priority.
Access to an Employee Assistance Program, which includes professional counseling, personal and professional coaching, self-help resources and assistance with work/life benefits.
Company holidays and up to 16 PTO days during the first year of employment with options to carry over unused PTO time.
After one year of service, parental leave for eligible employees who become parents through maternity, paternity, or adoption.

An Investment in You
Career development programs and classes.
Mentoring and coaching to help you advance in your career.
Tuition reimbursement up to $5,250 per year, the IRS maximum.
Diverse, inclusive, and welcoming culture with Business Resource Groups.

About Medical Mutual
Medical Mutual’s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we do not answer Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us.
There is a good chance you already know many of our Medical Mutual customers. As the official insurer of everything you love, we are trusted by businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout Ohio to provide high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans. Our plans provide peace of mind to more than 1.5 million Ohioans.
We are not just one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio, we are also the longest running. Founded in 1934, we aree proud of our rich history with the communities where we live and work.
At Medical Mutual and its family of companies we celebrate differences and are mutually invested in our employees and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse and nicotine testing.

Primary Location US-OH-Brooklyn
Work Locations Brooklyn 100 American Road Brooklyn 44144
Job 7 - General Staff
Organization Enterprise Analytics
Schedule Regular
Shift Standard
Employee Status Individual Contributor
Job Type Full-time
Job Level Day Job
Job Posting Oct 16, 2024, 2:39:10 PM",4.1,Medical Mutual of Ohio,"Brooklyn, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1934.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,OH,90.0,1,0,1,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$77K
/yr","Transport is at the core of modern society. Imagine using your expertise to shape sustainable transport and infrastructure solutions for the future? If you seek to make a difference on a global scale, working with next-gen technologies and the sharpest collaborative teams, then we could be a perfect match.
What you will do
As a Data Scientist, you will apply advanced data analytics techniques to analyze various types of vehicle and test data and provide detailed insights to simulation and engineering teams. The position entails a high level of collaboration with engineering teams working on future products, analyzing different types of logged and/or measured data (high frequency and low frequency) from customer trucks, field trucks and test vehicles to help make data driven engineering decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Utilize advanced analytics and machine learning techniques on customer and test vehicle data to extract meaningful insights and provide actionable recommendations to engineering and simulation teams
Integrate data from multiple sources (Customer vehicles, test vehicles etc.) and automate data flow, ensuring data quality and consistency, to facilitate deployment of advanced analytics techniques within vehicle engineering
Create data visualizations and dashboards to translate technical and customer data to provide actionable insights to stakeholders
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product development, and IT, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Collaborate with global teams on developing and improving analysis & simulation strategies based on actual customer data
Collaborate with engineering, testing and IT teams to drive development of AI/ML models to support and accelerate predictive modeling in engineering
Stay updated with the latest advancements in data science and automotive technologies to continuously improve usage of data analytics within vehicle engineering

Your future team
The Advanced Calculation Team is an important part of the Vehicle Engineering function for Volvo Group Trucks Technology, north America. Our team is a dynamic team of highly competent engineers who specialize in various CAE disciplines. We are responsible for ensuring functional requirements are met for durability & reliability, thermal management, cooling performance and other mechanical systems for heavy duty trucks developed for North America.
Who are you?
Do you dream big? We do too, and we are excited to grow together. In this role, you will bring:
A strong attention to detail with the ability to interpret data and translate information into actionable intelligence.
Capable of networking with individuals and teams across various departments and sites, sharing information and resources as needed, and working towards achieving common group goals.
Effective communication with the ability to listen effectively, transmit information accurately, and actively seek feedback from other experienced engineers, project managers, etc.
Ability to perform a wide range of tasks, respond positively to changing timelines and/or project scope, and open to accepting new challenges, responsibilities, and assignments.
Ease with communicating highly technical information to people of varying technical ability.
A desire and passion to create the very best product, working as an integral part of a highly technical organization.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
1-3 years of experience in data analytics with automotive industry background. Heavy duty vehicle experience is considered a plus
Demonstrated experience with machine learning and advanced analytics for predictive modeling such as regression analysis, neural networks (Deep Learning, RNN, LSTM, DQN etc.), time series forecasting, classification, clustering etc.
Proficiency in statistical analysis methods and programming languages such as Python (including libraries like Numpy, SciPy, Pandas, Tensorflow), SQL, Git, Azure, Hadoop, Matlab/Simulink, pySpark
Experience with building dashboards and help create visualizations from data using PowerBI, QlikView, Tableau etc.
Familiarity with Database Management Systems (BDMS) and proficiency in querying and manipulating data using SQL
Experience with Git and version control methods is a plus

What’s in it for you?
We offer a solid package of compensation and benefits, plus you will enjoy:
An organization the prioritizes employee's health and well-being.
Working in an empowered team solving complex challenges.
Opportunity to work with new technologies such as automation, electromobility, and connectivity.
Modern workspaces that allow agility and collaboration.
Multiple electric charging stations for cars.
Onsite facilities and activities that make everyday life easier including a cafeteria, chair massages, fitness center and fitness classes offered daily.
Ready for the next move?
If you are a Data Analyst / Scientist with an interest in working with a global organization focused on impacting everyday lives, apply today and join our team on this exciting journey!

We value your data privacy and therefore do not accept applications via mail.

Who we are and what we believe in
Our focus on Inclusion, Diversity, and Equity allows each of us the opportunity to bring our full authentic self to work and thrive by providing a safe and supportive environment, free of harassment and discrimination. We are committed to removing the barriers to entry, which is why we ask that even if you feel you may not meet every qualification on the job description, please apply and let us decide. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.”

Applying to this job offers you the opportunity to join Volvo Group. Every day, across the globe, our trucks, buses, engines, construction equipment, financial services, and solutions make modern life possible. We are almost 100,000 people empowered to shape the future landscape of efficient, safe and sustainable transport solutions. Fulfilling our mission creates countless career opportunities for talents with sharp minds and passion across the group’s leading brands and entities.

Group Trucks Technology are seeking talents to help design sustainable transportation solutions for the future. As part of our team, you’ll help us by engineering exciting next-gen technologies and contribute to projects that determine new, sustainable solutions. Bring your love of developing systems, working collaboratively, and your advanced skills to a place where you can make an impact. Join our design shift that leaves society in good shape for the next generation.",4.1,Volvo Group,"Greensboro, NC",10000+ Employees,1927.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,77.0,NC,97.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist (Mid),"$118K
/yr","This job opportunity is part of an RFP process; candidates are invited to submit their resumes detailing relevant experience.
Location: Bethesda, MD (Hybrid)
LCG is a minority-owned technology consulting firm that has been a trusted partner to more than 40 federal agencies, including 21 of the 27 Institutes and Centers (ICs) at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). For over 25 years, LCG has brought digitization and innovation to the Health and Human Services (HHS) and the NIH ecosystems. We support IT organizations by bringing precision technology and operation models that achieve mission capabilities and performance success.
Job Title: Data Scientist (Mid)
Job Summary: We are seeking an intermediate-level Data Scientist to perform extensive data analysis on large datasets to develop insights, identify trends, patterns, and anomalies. The successful candidate will collaborate with various teams to understand project objectives, perform data mining, data cleaning, and aggregation, and implement data models. This role will involve working with structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques. The Data Scientist will also support cloud computing initiatives, including developing automation solutions and enabling scientific cloud workflows.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and interpret large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation to prepare data for analysis and model implementation.
Develop and implement data models, conduct analysis, and interpret results using statistical techniques.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand the objectives and focus of data analysis projects.
Design, develop, and implement data-driven solutions to support organizational objectives.
Contribute to cloud computing initiatives, including automated self-service portals, cloud module development, and integration support for scientific computing.
Assist with cloud security operations by supporting the validation of security vulnerabilities and maintaining necessary security documentation.
Provide data analysis and insights to support decision-making for cloud environments, including usage, cost, and workload rationalization.
Support cloud workload migration projects by performing infrastructure assessments and assisting in business case development.
Collaborate with product management and development teams to support data-driven decisions for cloud platforms and products.
Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in data analysis, statistical modeling, and data mining.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, SQL, and experience with data visualization tools.
Knowledge of cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP) and experience with GitHub API integrations.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with attention to detail.
Familiarity with cloud security best practices and compliance standards such as NIST and FISMA.
Experience in cloud computing, scientific workflows, and automation.
Familiarity with Azure Active Directory (AD) and GitHub automation tools.
Experience in cloud enablement and workload migration for scientific computing environments.
Knowledge of federal security and compliance standards.

The projected compensation range for this position is $98,100 to $135,750 per year benchmarked in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. The target salary is 114,000. The salary range provided is a good faith estimate representative of all experience levels. Salary at LCG is determined by various factors, including but not limited to role, location, the combination of education/training, knowledge, skills, competencies, certifications, and work experience.
LCG offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance options (medical, dental, vision), life and disability insurance, retirement plan contributions, as well as paid leave, federal holidays, professional development, and lifestyle benefits.
Devoted to Fair and Inclusive Practices
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. If you are interested in applying for employment with LCG and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department by email at hr@lcginc.com.
Securing Your Data
Beware of fraudulent job offers using LCG's name. LCG will never request payment-related details or advancement of money during the application process. Legitimate communication will only come from lcginc.com or system@hirebridgemail.com emails, not free commercial services like Gmail or WhatsApp. If you receive suspicious emails asking for payment or personal information, contact us immediately at hr@lcginc.com.
If you believe you are the victim of a scam, contact your local law enforcement and report the incident to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.",3.8,"LCG, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1990.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,118.0,MD,34.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","We are searching for a Data Scientist – someone who works well in a fast-paced setting. In this position, you will harness the largest pediatric healthcare dataset in the nation to deliver analytics, insights, and solutions that help us create a healthier future for our global community.
The individual in this role delivers data analytics and supports the development and implementation of advanced analytic tools to meet the needs of teams throughout the organization. Works with a multidisciplinary team to design, develop, and create analytical solutions through applications of data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), and emerging technologies. Collaborates with clinical, business, and information systems team members to ideate and create new analytic solutions impacting patient care and hospital operations. Partners with subject matter experts to understand the relationship
between workflows and data and uses that data to create innovative solutions that support and advance targeted outcomes.
Exercises knowledge of descriptive, predictive, and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques, to develop strategic insights to drive operational and clinical goals.
Teaches developers, architects and analysts how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Provides data science and statistical support for advanced analytics projects at Texas Children's Hospital. Analyzes and interprets clinical, operational, and other data to provide insight into care delivery and operational initiatives. Responsible for evaluating data quality, preparing data, generating insights, and developing and presenting high-impact data stories. Serves as a subject matter expert associated with data analysis processes, advanced analytics techniques, statistics, and meaningful data visualizations. Provides consultation and support in the development, analysis, interpretation, and management of a
variety of complex data sources. Works on multiple concurrent projects.
Think you’ve got what it takes?
Job Duties & Responsibilities
Creates data models and generates data insights
Generates and communicates business and clinical insights, using various techniques and understanding the strengths and risks of different approaches to data analysis
Analyzes large, noisy datasets and identifies meaningful patterns that provide actionable results. Data sources may include the Enterprise Data Warehouse, various source systems and databases, and data from external sources such as the Census Bureau. Source data may include both structured and unstructured data
Evaluates and communicates data quality within the context of the problem being analyzed, and implements appropriate data cleaning techniques when preparing data
Performs basic and advanced statistical analyses, modeling, interpretation, documentation, and presentation
Builds and tests statistical, optimization, and machine learning models, including regression, classification, clustering, natural language processing, deep learning, and/or statistical modeling. Applies best practices for data preparation, statistical methods, and approaches to data analysis to ensure valid and reliable results
Independently owns descriptive, diagnostic analysis of complex data problems, consulting with data architects and subject matter experts as needed.
Designs, develops, and creates advanced analytical solutions
Communicates data insights and acts as a data storyteller by translating data analyses into easily understandable dialogue and terms to influence business decisions or actions.
Provides statistical consultation
Plans, communicates, and manages risk related to tasks
Participates in overall analytics and application support delivery activities
Skills & Requirements
Required master's degree in mathematics, computer science, statistics, engineering, analytics, life sciences, or a specific healthcare field (such as nursing, pharmacy, respiratory, etc.)
Preferred Ph. D
3 years of experience in experience in data science, data analytics, business analysis, data modeling, statistical analysis, statistical modeling, or machine learning
A Ph. D may substitute for 2 years of experience.",3.7,Texas Children's Hospital,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1954.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,TX,70.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Data Scientist, Growth","$175K
/yr","The Wealthfront Data Science Team utilizes our rich financial and behavioral data to influence key product and marketing decisions, as well as to safeguard our clients’ information and assets. The team draws from backgrounds in Computer Science, Natural Sciences, Statistics, Operations Research and Econometrics.

The Data Scientist in this role will be primarily embedded within Wealthfront’s Growth Team. The Growth Team is focused on acquiring new clients, as well as deepening Wealthfront’s relationship to existing clients. The team addresses this mandate by designing creative initiatives that cut across product lines. These initiatives can include testing new in-app features, discovering new channels of client acquisition, launching email campaigns, or targeted incentives – all based on unique insights about our clients and their interaction with the prevailing economic environment.

A fundamental trait for an effective Growth Data Scientist is curiosity for discovering new insights about client behavior. This person will enjoy going deep into the data to understand what’s driving client actions, proposing ideas for new projects and for driving clarity on the ‘why’ behind experiment results.

Technical tools used in this role include Hypothesis testing (potentially with atypical distributions), mathematical transforms of variables, data mining, natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML). You don't need experience in all of the techniques but must have the ability to pick them up as needed.

Potential project areas for this role include (but are not limited to) analyzing client signup flow, creating client groups according to business rules or automated clustering, creating ML models for estimating incentive revenues or costs and Named Entity Recognition using NLP.
Responsibilities
Demonstrate an owner’s mindset in formulation, execution, communication and timing of your projects.
Analyze and explain A/B test experiment results. Investigate why the experiment was a success or a failure. Discover client segments for whom the experiment worked unusually well or otherwise.
Suggest follow ups for recently concluded initiatives and experiments. Create and present rationales for questions including whether the experiment should be continued, and what should be different in the next iteration.
Work closely with Product, Design, Engineering and User Research members on the Growth Team to craft a long term (quarterly) learning plan and subsequently execute your part in that plan.
Collaborate with cross functional stakeholders to come up with feasibility of an experiment, experiment structure and opportunity sizing/impact of the experiment to guide the team’s roadmap.
Work with Data platform teams to procure required (but unavailable) data.
Enhance overall Data Science team execution through hands-on help, design feedback and peer review.
Requirements
A Master's or a PhD degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, or Natural Sciences with 4+ years of prior experience in a Data Science role. Exceptions to these requirements may be considered on a case-by-case basis.
Prior experience in Growth or Marketing
Prior experience analyzing complex experiments, including developing data insights and data backed recommendations for stakeholders.
Strong communication, storytelling and collaboration skills and a record of partnering across organizations to sharpen project requirements. Sometimes this includes re-framing the original request to solve a more general problem with similar effort.
Hands-on mathematical and software engineering skills to execute on complex projects.
Proficiency in Python and SQL.
Desire and ability to mentor junior Data Scientists within the team by exemplifying math, engineering and technical communication skills.
Estimated annual salary range: $165,000 - $185,000 USD plus equity and a discretionary bonus.

Benefits include medical, vision, dental, 401K plan, generous time off, parental leave, wellness reimbursements, professional development, employee investing discount, and more!

About Wealthfront

Wealthfront started with the ambition to transform the investment advisory business, with the goal to unlock access to high quality investment advice for millions who were underserved by the traditional institutions. We built one of the first automated investment products that allows you to invest in a personalized portfolio of thousands of companies in seconds for a remarkably low fee. We then expanded. We now work with partner banks to offer exceptional banking features through a Wealthfront Brokerage Cash Account, which makes it remarkably easy for people to automate their finances end-to-end and eliminated the hassle of money management, all of which resulted in attracting more than $70 billion of our client’s hard earned money, pioneering the robo-advisor category and transforming the broader industry. And yet, we have a long way to go to achieve our mission to build a financial system that favors people, not institutions.

Wealthfront’s vision is to make it delightfully easy to build long-term wealth on your own terms. This vision is more relevant than ever because millions more people are getting into the market early and investing their hard earned savings in a handful of stocks. While this is a great way to start, it is inconsistent with building long-term wealth. We want to empower young investors to expand their horizon, and easily explore and execute on a wider range of investing strategies, make informed investment decisions that are consistent with their values and beliefs while also making it effortless to grow and compound their savings exponentially in a way that’s transformational to their lives and their long-term future.

For more information please visit www.wealthfront.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Please review our candidate privacy notice.",4.1,Wealthfront,"Palo Alto, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,CA,13.0,1,0,0,1,0
DH Data Scientist,"$173K
/yr","Job Description:
Job Summary
The Data Scientist is responsible for maximizing the value of rich date resources available. This person will independently investigate and derive actionable insights to drive improvement for research and development and for clinical deployment of DeepHealth products.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Utilize statistics, data mining and programming knowledge to analyze clinical data and present insights to key stakeholders.
Identify patterns to drive improvement of research, product development and clinical deployment.
Generate and test hypotheses independently.
Investigate and improve data quality.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze product performance.
Summarize data in concise reports including tables, plots and other visual representations.
Document analysis for the engineering and clinical teams.

PLEASE NOTE: This is not an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities and requirements of the position described above. Other functions may be assigned and management retains the right to add or change duties at any time.

Minimum Qualifications, Education, and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in relevant field such as computer science, math, statistics, engineering (M.S. preferred).
At least two (2) years of experience (five plus (5+) years preferred).
Expertise in Python and scientific libraries such as numpy and pandas.
Expertise with data visualization techniques.
Experience working with medical data.
Experience evaluating machine learning models.
Experience evaluating clinical performance preferred.
Familiarity with machine learning techniques preferred.
Strong individual team contributor and collaborator.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.

Quality Standards
Communicates, cooperates, and consistently functions professionally and harmoniously with all levels of supervision, co-workers, patients, visitors, and vendors.
Demonstrates initiative, personal awareness, professionalism and integrity, and exercise confidentiality in all areas of performance.
Follows all local, state and federal laws concerning employment to include but not limited to: I-9, Harassment, EEOC, Civil rights and ADA.
Follows OSHA regulations, RadNet and site protocols, policies and procedures.
Follows HIPAA, compliance, privacy, safety and confidentiality standards at all times.
Practices universal safety precautions.
Promotes good public relations on the phone and in person.
Adapts and is willing to learn new tasks, methods, and systems.
Reports to work regularly as scheduled; consistently punctual with respect to working hours and lunch schedules, and maintains satisfactory personal attendance in accordance with RadNet guidelines.
Consistently adheres to the time management policies and procedures.
Completes job responsibilities in a quality and timely manner.

Physical Demands
This position often requires sitting, standing, walking, bending, twisting, reaching with hands and arms, using hands and fingers, handling, or feeling, speaking, listening, and high-level cognitive thinking. Must be able to use a computer and other office machinery including copiers, scanners and computer software. Must be able to lift up to 10 pounds occasionally. The position requires the ability to travel (~20% of time), drive a vehicle, and utilize other forms of transportation.

Working Environment
Office setting

Pay Range: USD $165,000.00 - USD $180,000.00 /Yr.",2.6,Deephealth,"Cambridge, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,173.0,MA,40.0,1,0,0,1,1
Wildfire Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills and talents to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.
Position Summary

We are seeking a highly skilled Data Scientist to join our team focused on innovative Wildfire Mitigation strategies. As a Data Scientist specializing in wildfire mitigation, you will play a crucial role in leveraging data-driven insights to develop and implement proactive measures to mitigate the impact of wildfires on communities and utility infrastructure. This position will analyze historical wildfire data, data on wildfire ignitions, data from vegetation management, and other relevant datasets to develop predictive models to assess wildfire risks and behavior to aid in prevention of wildfire events.
This is a hybrid position with 3-days per week (T-W-Th) in office at the Xcel Energy location listed for this position.
Applicants must be authorized to work for ANY employer in the U.S. We are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment visa at this time for this position.

Essential Responsibilities
Follow consistent practices to ensure data integrity and deal with imperfections in data. Champion the acquisition of new data sources to enhance value and fill gaps; automate collection processes; effectively process structured and semi-structured/unstructured data; proficiently integrate varied datasets; collaborate with business stakeholders as needed to ensure solid data understanding and proper data transformation; work cross-functionally with development and engineering teams; analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns; draw conclusions and gain actionable insights.
Build predictive models; propose solutions and strategies for business problems; apply the appropriate machine learning algorithm to data problems (e.g. supervised vs. unsupervised machine learning, clustering, ensemble methods, etc.); validate model results. Work closely with architecture and engineering team to deploy models; communicate results in a clear and non-technical manner.
Interact with senior management and effectively communicate technical information to numerous audiences (e.g. senior management, client community, peers and junior associates);effectively develop relationships with individuals inside and outside of IT; deliver difficult messages and express disagreement with others with confidence and self-control; address challenges to analytic processes and influence others to change their approach and work collectively to implement new tools/techniques; gain support from related stakeholders for analytic solutions and champion data driven business decisions.
Apply appropriate statistical techniques to data exploration and model development/assessment; communicate complex statistical concepts to non-technical audiences; maintain skills through continuing education.
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate results and highlight business impact; utilize various techniques and delivery methods of visualization that are audience appropriate.
Effectively collaborate with others to deliver efficient and high quality code; implement solid validation process to ensure consistency and minimize errors; champion more efficient ways to produce code iteratively; maintain skills through continuing education; stay up to date on new technologies/ tools; seamlessly transition between languages to apply the right approach to the problem.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT or math related field and 7 years of experience in analytics OR Master's degree in IT or math related field and 5 years of experience in an analytics
Problem solving skills, business acumen, and demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills
Expert SQL, Python skills Distributed Computing experience Excellent data visualization skills
Knowledge of data architecture and structure
Experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, predictive modeling are imperative; text mining and topic modeling are plus
Experience with Neural Networks and corresponding technologies
As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com.
Non-Bargaining
The anticipated starting base pay for this position is: $92,300.00 to $130,567.00 per year
This position is eligible for the following benefits: Annual Incentive Program, Medical/Pharmacy Plan, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Dependent Care Reimbursement Account, Health Care Reimbursement Account, Health Savings Account (HSA) (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Limited-Purpose FSA (if enrolled in eligible health plan and HSA), Transportation Reimbursement Account, Short-term disability (STD), Long-term disability (LTD), Employee Assistance Program (EAP), Fitness Center Reimbursement (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Tuition reimbursement, Transit programs, Employee recognition program, Pension, 401(k) plan, Paid time off (PTO), Holidays, Volunteer Paid Time Off (VPTO), Parental Leave
Benefit plans are subject to change and Xcel Energy has the right to end, suspend, or amend any of its plans, at any time, in whole or in part.
Deadline to Apply: 10/24/24
EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)
ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.",3.3,Xcel Energy,"Denver, CO",10000+ Employees,1909.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,111.0,CO,115.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","As a Data Scientist with a focus on machine learning, you will be responsible for developing and deploying data models that provide critical insights to drive data-driven decision-making across the organization. You'll work with large datasets to build predictive and prescriptive models, evaluate their performance, and collaborate with cross-functional teams to implement these models into business processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection, Cleaning, and Preparation:
Source and collect large datasets from multiple sources, ensuring high data quality.
Perform data preprocessing, including cleaning, normalization, transformation, and feature engineering, to prepare data for machine learning models.
Manage data pipelines and ensure efficient data flow for real-time analysis.
Model Development and Deployment:
Design, develop, and validate machine learning models for classification, regression, clustering, and recommendation systems.
Deploy machine learning models in production environments, ensuring they operate efficiently and scale as needed.
Continuously monitor, test, and update models in production to maintain optimal performance.
Machine Learning Techniques and Analysis:
Apply machine learning algorithms, including supervised and unsupervised learning techniques, to solve complex business problems.
Conduct A/B testing, cross-validation, and hyperparameter tuning to optimize models for accuracy and generalizability.
Leverage advanced techniques such as deep learning, reinforcement learning, or natural language processing when appropriate.
Visualization and Communication:
Visualize complex data and model outcomes using data visualization tools like Matplotlib, Seaborn, and Tableau to effectively communicate insights.
Present findings and actionable insights to non-technical stakeholders through clear, concise reports and presentations.
Collaborate with product managers, engineers, and business analysts to translate data insights into strategic initiatives.
Project Management and Cross-Functional Collaboration:
Lead data science projects from concept to completion, managing timelines, objectives, and deliverables.
Work closely with data engineers to maintain data infrastructure and optimize data processing workflows.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business goals and ensure that data science efforts are aligned with organizational objectives.
Continuous Learning and Development:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in data science and machine learning, and experiment with new tools and techniques.
Share knowledge and best practices with the data science team, contributing to the team's growth and development.
Attend conferences, workshops, and other professional development opportunities to enhance skills and knowledge.
Key Skills and Qualifications:
Technical Skills:
Programming Languages: Proficiency in Python or R, with strong knowledge of libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and Scikit-learn for data manipulation and model building.
Machine Learning Frameworks: Experience with TensorFlow, PyTorch, or Keras for building and deploying machine learning models.
Big Data Technologies: Familiarity with tools like Apache Spark, Hadoop, or Dask for processing and analyzing large datasets.
SQL: Ability to write complex SQL queries to extract, transform, and load data from relational databases.
Machine Learning Knowledge:
Supervised Learning: Experience with classification, regression, and time-series forecasting models.
Unsupervised Learning: Knowledge of clustering, principal component analysis (PCA), and anomaly detection.
Deep Learning: Understanding of neural networks and deep learning architectures for tasks such as image and speech recognition.
NLP: Familiarity with natural language processing techniques, such as topic modeling, sentiment analysis, and text classification.
Data Visualization:
Proficiency in data visualization tools, such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, Plotly, or Power BI, to create compelling visualizations of data and model results.
Experience with dashboarding tools, like Tableau or Power BI, to create interactive reports and dashboards.
Statistical and Mathematical Skills:
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, hypothesis testing, and probability.
Knowledge of linear algebra, calculus, and optimization methods commonly used in machine learning.
Soft Skills:
Problem-Solving: Ability to analyze complex problems and develop data-driven solutions.
Communication: Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to present technical information to non-technical stakeholders.
Collaboration: Experience working in cross-functional teams, with the ability to build strong relationships with team members across the organization.
Education and Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field. A Ph.D. is a plus.
Experience: 2+ years of experience in data science, with a focus on building and deploying machine learning models in a business setting.
Portfolio: A portfolio of completed projects demonstrating experience in machine learning, with examples of model development, deployment, and impact on business outcomes.
Example Projects:
Predictive Analytics: Developed a model to predict customer churn, enabling the company to implement targeted retention strategies.
Recommendation System: Built a recommendation engine for personalized product recommendations, which increased customer engagement.
Sentiment Analysis: Implemented a sentiment analysis model for customer feedback, helping the marketing team to understand customer sentiment and adjust campaigns accordingly.
Anomaly Detection: Created an anomaly detection model for fraud detection, reducing fraudulent transactions by identifying patterns in real-time.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $118,635.00 - $128,216.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Natural language processing: 1 year (Required)
Machine learning: 1 year (Required)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
Regression analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work Location: On the road",1.0,KesarWeb,United States,1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,123.0,United States,,1,0,1,0,1
"Data Scientist I, Lega Lab","$94K
/yr","WHY UT SOUTHWESTERN?
With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. As a world-renowned medical and research center, we strive to provide the best possible care, resources, and benefits for our valued employees. Ranked as the number 1 hospital in Dallas-Fort Worth according to U.S. News & World Report , we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development to align with your future goals. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more. We invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you'll discover a culture of teamwork, professionalism, and a rewarding career!

JOB SUMMARY
Works under specific direction to provide analysis and develops algorithms and software for clinical and/or basic research problems. Impacts data acquisition, management, and analysis in basic, translational, and clinical research, including clinical trials.

A Data Scientist I position is available in the Dr. Bradley Lega laboratory. Dr. Lega is an Associate Professor in the Department of Neurological Surgery at UT Southwestern Medical Center. He has secondary appointments in Neurology and Psychiatry. Dr. Lega's research focuses on how brain conditions affect memory. The research he began at the University of Pennsylvania, and that he continues at UT Southwestern, focuses on preserving memory function and restoring memory to patients with brain injuries or brain tumors.

This candidate will support study efforts studying intercranial Signal and data analysis for a new project. Prefer Master's degree or PHD in computational field. Candidate will need to be organized and have the ability to collaborate with trainees including undergraduate, graduate, medical students, as well as post-doctoral fellows and co-workers.

BENEFITS
UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:

PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage

100% coverage for preventive healthcare-no copay

Paid Time Off, available day one

Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)

Paid Parental Leave Benefit

Wellness programs

Tuition Reimbursement

Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer

Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!

EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATION
Required

Education
Master's Degree M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field or
Bachelor's Degree B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics

Experience

JOB DUTIES

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.

SECURITY AND EEO STATEMENT
Security
This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code 51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information.

EEO Statement
UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. Benefits UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:
PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage
100% coverage for preventive healthcare – no copay
Paid Time Off, available day one
Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)
Paid Parental Leave Benefit
Wellness programs
Tuition Reimbursement
Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer
Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!",3.9,UT Southwestern,"Dallas, TX",10000+ Employees,1943.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,94.0,TX,81.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","The Group:
Morningstar’s Research group provides independent analysis on individual securities, funds, markets, and portfolios. The Research group also provides data on hundreds of thousands of investment offerings, including stocks, mutual funds, and similar vehicles, along with real-time global market data on millions of equities, indexes, futures, options, commodities, and precious metals, in addition to foreign exchange and Treasury markets. Morningstar is one of the largest independent sources of fund, equity, and credit data and research in the world, and our advocacy for investors’ interests is the foundation of our company.

The Role:
As a Data Scientist, you will be a leading contributor in the implementation of Artificial Intelligence (AI) within Data Collections software applications, API’s, and other data products. This role requires significant interaction with both upstream and downstream stakeholders across Technology, Data, Products, Sales/Service, and Research.

The Data Scientist will transition approved Data Collections AI products from a prototype phase to a scalable and consumable service. Often, these services must be integrated into Morningstar’s platform of financial products, so that our clients can use these software tools in the investment decision-making process.

We are looking for an individual who possesses strong technical development skills, an ability to follow analyst requirements and technical specifications for robust code, and a passion for investment research.

This position reports to the Tech Manager of the Data Collections AI team. This position is based in our Chicago office. We follow a hybrid policy of 3 days onsite and 2 days remote work. Candidates must be currently authorized to work Permanently in the United States - this position does not sponsor H-1B Visa.

Responsibilities:
Automate manual data collection processes by applying cutting-edge solutions to tackle NLP problems, e.g., text classification, NER tasks.
Collaborate with upstream data analysts to clarify business needs, define project scope, design ML/AI solutions, and iteratively improve workflows and data storage practices
Implement ML/AI solutions from start to finish and collaborate with peer engineering teams for model deployment
Design innovative ways to improve automation rates for data collection
Research on latest technologies and propose new solutions to existing problems
Participate in team brainstorming sessions, provide guidance to MLDAs (machine learning data analysts), and contribute to the codebase
Introduce and follow good development practices, innovative frameworks and technology solutions
Follow best practices like estimation, planning, reporting and improvement brought to processes in daily work

Requirements:
No minimal industrial experience is required, if you have a Ph.D. degree in engineering, computer science, statistics or related field
Must demonstrate ML/AI knowledge and skills through research and/or side-projects in NLP related fields, if you have no prior industrial experience
Must have 2+ years of industrial experience in a data science role featuring NLP tasks, if you have a master’s degree or below
Fluent with Python and related packages like NumPy, pandas, scikit-learn, NLTK, PyTorch, TensorFlow, etc.
Sound knowledge of common ML/AI algorithms (e.g., linear/logistic regression, random forest, gradient boosting) and Deep Learning algorithms in particular (e.g., transformers, BERT, open-source LLMs)
Experience with SQL
Great communication and presentation skills
Able to work independently and being proactive
Experience with generative AI is preferred
Experience with finetuning LLMs is preferred
Experience with DevOps tools (e.g. Sagemaker, Git, Jenkins) is desirable
Experience developing and deploying solutions using services in the Amazon AWS ecosystem (Lambda, Sagemaker, EC2, RDS, EMR) is desirable
Intermediate knowledge of statistical methods is desirable
Familiarity with common data cleaning and munging techniques
Familiarity with data visualization
Familiarity with statistical methods, e.g., linear/logistic regression, optimization
Familiarity with mutual fund, fixed income, and equity data is a plus

001_MstarInc Morningstar Inc. Legal Entity
Morningstar’s hybrid work environment gives you the opportunity to work remotely and collaborate in-person each week. We’ve found that we’re at our best when we’re purposely together on a regular basis, at least three days each week. A range of other benefits are also available to enhance flexibility as needs change. No matter where you are, you’ll have tools and resources to engage meaningfully with your global colleagues.",3.9,Morningstar,"Chicago, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,IL,40.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$108K
/yr","Feedzai is the world's first RiskOps platform for financial risk management, and the market leader in safeguarding global commerce with today's most advanced cloud-based risk management platform, powered by machine learning and artificial intelligence. Feedzai is securing the transition to a cashless world while enabling digital trust in every transaction and payment type. The world's largest banks, processors, and retailers trust Feedzai to protect trillions of dollars and manage risk while improving the customer experience for everyday users, without compromising privacy. Feedzai is a Series D company and has raised $282M to date. With a valuation of +$1.5B, the company's technology protects 900 million people in 190 countries.
The Data Science Team within Customer Success is highly engaged with our clients making use of their critical thinking skills with a business-focused mentality and customer-facing attitude. They activate, maintain, and support clients, develop models and rules, and train & enable them. In addition, they work cross-functionally with other departments (e.g., Research, Product, Marketing) in a collaborative team spirit spanning the globe to ensure we deliver best in class risk prevention solutions. Being on the frontline of fighting crime and protecting people from financial harm is incredibly inspiring to each of us. Join Us!
Your Day to Day:
Understanding the data which our clients provide to us;
Cleaning that data and validating that it is correct;
Preprocessing the data, usually by using a mixture of shell scripts and a programming language such as Python, Java, Scala, etc
Iteratively computing features and tuning parameters to improve the quality of the model;
Communicating your findings to the project manager and assisting him/her in decision making on the Data Science part of the project;
Work together with key stakeholders (data scientists, engineers, risk managers) from our clients;
Work with other parts of the organization (Product, Research, etc.) to improve processes, best practices and tooling.
You Have & You Know-how:
MSc or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related field;
We welcome candidates with a minimum of 2 years of experience, ranging up to senior-level professionals;
Proficient in Machine Learning (training and testing, avoiding overfit, etc.);
Knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Spark, Hadoop and related;
Proficiency in bash, Python and either Java or Scala;
Knowledge of resource monitoring and runtime optimization (both at JVM and OS level);
Knowledge of statistics or data visualization is a plus;
Knowledge of tree based algorithms (Random Forests, XGBoost, LGBM) is a plus;
Knowledge of Deep Learning algorithms is a plus;
Ability to communicate your findings in a clear way.
The Customer Success Team is responsible for delivering our product to our clients. This includes education, configuration, solution development, and risk strategy to enable our clients to address their pain points. We collaborate with our clients to ensure they have the right solution, build out a strategy and training plan for them, and then support them through each phase of our client lifecycle. We grow at a fast clip and believe no challenge is too big or too small. Therefore, we have an open environment that encourages us to lean in, try new things, and discover our potential. Join Us!
#LI-IP1 #LI-Hybrid
Your First 30-Days at Feedzai:
You will be immersed in our brand with training, connections, and one-on-one time with your manager. You may shadow your colleagues virtually or onsite at an office depending on where you work as you are supported through your Feedzai journey. In addition, you will have access to a ton of information to give you history, context, and all the knowledge you can handle about Feedzai and the team. Finally, you will start working on projects and collaborating on work currently being done. We can't wait to have you join the team!
Life at Feedzai Instagram
Feedzai Culture
Feedzai is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Feedzai does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies.
Feedzai will use the personal data you provide us with by filling out this form for reviewing your application and to potentially negotiate a contract with you. Your personal data will be retained by Feedzai for 24 months following your application. Please see our Privacy Notice available at https://feedzai.com/about-us/privacy/ for more information on how we process your personal data.",3.1,Feedzai,"Atlanta, GA",501 to 1000 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,108.0,GA,13.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$127K
/yr","Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.
Micron Technology is a world leader in innovating memory and storage solutions that accelerate the transformation of information into intelligence, inspiring the world to learn, communicate and advance faster than ever.
As a Data Scientist at Micron Technologies, you will play a crucial role in analyzing and extracting valuable insights from large datasets related to semiconductor manufacturing, process optimization, and quality control. You'll collaborate with multi-functional teams to develop innovative solutions that improve product performance, yield, and reliability.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Data Analysis: Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) on semiconductor manufacturing data, including wafer fabrication, yield, and defect rates.
Model Development: Develop predictive models using machine learning techniques (such as regression, classification, and clustering) to optimize manufacturing processes and improve product quality.
Feature Engineering: Extract relevant features from raw data, considering factors like material properties, process parameters, and environmental conditions.
Anomaly Detection: Identify anomalies and outliers in semiconductor production data, suggesting corrective actions to improve yield.
Collaboration: Work closely with engineers, physicists, and domain experts to understand semiconductor processes and translate business requirements into data-driven solutions.
Visualization: Build clear and informative visualizations to communicate findings and insights to collaborators.
Continuous Improvement: Stay up to date with industry trends, research advancements, and emerging technologies in data science and semiconductor manufacturing.
QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
Master’s or Ph.D. in Data Analytics, Data Science, or related field with practical experience with Virtual Metrology, AI, process control, yield improvement, quality control, semiconductor process engineering, image analytics, or related semiconductor field focus.
EXPERIENCE
Prior experience in semiconductor manufacturing, yield optimization, or process control is highly desirable.
Technical Skills:
Proficiency in Python,
Strong knowledge of machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques.
Familiarity with web application and reporting, Experience with SQL and database management
Technologies:
ML frameworks: Decision trees, Clustering, Regression, Neural Networks, NLP, Pytorch, Big Data, Tensorflow, Pandas, Streamlit
Tools and technologies:
Docker, Containerization, Kubernetes, Jenkins, Ansible, Elasticsearch, SSL, Microservices, data visualization tools (e.g., Streamlit, Tableau, PowerBI, etc.).
Cloud expertise:
Google Cloud Platform, OpenShift Container Platform
AI Skills:
AI specialization and Virtual Metrology/Modeling/Computation:
Python library sklearn, xgboost, pycaret, etc. with the ability to learn any new package.
Knowledgeable with the general process of data science work like data extraction, feature extraction, feature selection and modeling.
Familiar with the skills to deal with time series data (feature extraction, modelling, similarity measure of time series).
Image specialization:
Familiar with deep learning network CNN and package keras.
Frontend:
Languages: HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Typescript
Frameworks/Libraries: Angular, HighCharts, Plotly, AG Grid, BootStrap, Ngx Bootstrap, RxJS
Packaging: npm, Jenkins
Backend/API:
Languages: Python,
Preferred, but not required: Java, C#, PHP, Perl, C++
Frameworks: Flask, FastAPI, Experience with RESTful APIs, Minor experience with WSLs
Databases: MySQL, MSSQL, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, BigQuery SQL, Snowflake SQL, basic understanding of SSL
Tools:
Git, Bitbucket
Soft Skills:
Analytical approach and problem-solving abilities.
Strong communication skills to work effectively with teams from various functions.
Adaptability and willingness to learn new technologies and methodologies.
Project Skills:
AGILE, Waterfall, Scrum, Software Development Lifecycle, JIRA, Change management, Release management, Configuration management
Schedule: Ability to conduct and/or attend meetings when needed in the evening.
As a world leader in the semiconductor industry, Micron is dedicated to your personal wellbeing and professional growth. Micron benefits are designed to help you stay well, provide peace of mind and help you prepare for the future. We offer a choice of medical, dental and vision plans in all locations enabling team members to select the plans that best meet their family healthcare needs and budget. Micron also provides benefit programs that help protect your income if you are unable to work due to illness or injury, and paid family leave. Additionally, Micron benefits include a robust paid time-off program and paid holidays. For additional information regarding the Benefit programs available, please see the Benefits Guide posted on micron.com/careers/benefits.
Micron is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other factor protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws.
To learn about your right to work click here.
To learn more about Micron, please visit micron.com/careers
For US Sites Only: To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact Micron’s People Organization at hrsupport_na@micron.com or 1-800-336-8918 (select option #3)
Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.
Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron.",3.8,Micron,"Manassas, VA",10000+ Employees,1978.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,127.0,VA,46.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The CDC Foundation helps the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) save and improve lives by unleashing the power of collaboration between CDC, philanthropies, corporations, organizations and individuals to protect the health, safety and security of America and the world. The CDC Foundation is the go-to nonprofit authorized by Congress to mobilize philanthropic partners and private-sector resources to support CDC’s critical health protection mission. Since 1995, the CDC Foundation has raised over $1.9 billion and launched more than 1,300 programs impacting a variety of health threats from chronic disease conditions including cardiovascular disease and cancer, to infectious diseases like rotavirus and HIV, to emergency responses, including COVID-19 and Ebola. The CDC Foundation managed hundreds of programs in the United States and in more than 90 countries last year. Visit www.cdcfoundation.org for more information.

Job Highlights
Location: Remote, must be based in the United States
Salary Range: $92,700-$134,275 per year, plus benefits. Individual salary offers will be based on experience and qualifications unique to each candidate.
Position Type: Grant funded, limited-term opportunity
Position End Date: June 30, 2025
Overview
The Data Scientist will play a crucial role in advancing the CDC Foundation's mission by providing informatics expertise and performing health informatics activities for a public health organization, which require specialized knowledge and skills in both health and information technology, including health informatics, scientific analysis, data management, and security standards. This role is aligned to the Workforce Acceleration Initiative (WAI). WAI is a federally funded CDC Foundation program with the goal of helping the nation’s public health agencies by providing them with the technology and data experts they need to accelerate their information system improvements.

Working within North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office, the Data Scientist will plan and manage the development, implementation, and maintenance of data systems and informatics processes needed for data generation, storage, processing, and analysis. The Data Scientist will collaborate with data content experts, analysts, data scientists, data modelers, warehouse architects, IT staff and other organization staff to design and implement proposed solutions that meet the needs of the public health agency.

The Data Scientist will be hired by the CDC Foundation and assigned to the North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office. This position is eligible for a fully remote work arrangement for U.S. based candidates.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, select, test, implement, and evaluate new or modified informatics solutions, data structures, and decision-support mechanisms to support agency information management needs within various contexts.
Create and manage the systems and pipelines that enable efficient and reliable flow of data, including ingestion, processing, and storage.
Create new and update existing health integration engine (Rhapsody) routes to handle new data elements and formats creating the necessary output for upload into surveillance systems and databases as well as reporting to the CDC.
Develop, implement, and improve data analysis and visualization tools for use by organization staff, to provide timely, relevant information that informs decisions affecting the public’s health.
Analyze diverse datasets related to public health issues to identify trends, patterns, and correlations.
Apply statistical methods and machine learning algorithms to extract actionable insights.
Develop predictive models to anticipate disease patterns, assess risk factors, and guide intervention strategies.
Continuously optimize algorithms for enhanced accuracy and performance.
Create compelling visualizations and reports to communicate findings to partners and decision-makers.
Present data-driven insights in a clear and understandable manner to facilitate informed decision-making.
Collaborate with the public health organization and its partners to understand their data needs and objectives.
Provide data-driven support and guidance to inform public health policies and initiatives.
Knowledgeable about industry trends, best practices, and emerging technologies in informatics and data management, and incorporating the trends into the organization's data infrastructure.
Provide technical guidance to other staff.
Prepare and maintain system documentation and architecture diagrams for processes assigned (new and existing).
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Informatics, Computer Science, Information Technology, Data Science, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of relevant professional experience
Proficiency in programming languages commonly used in data engineering, such as Python, Java, Scala, or SQL. Candidate should be able to implement data automations within existing frameworks as opposed to writing one off scripts.
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Scikit-learn).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Strong analytical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to interpret complex datasets and derive meaningful insights.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Expertise with Rhapsody Integration Engine (Rhapsody Certification or ability to obtain certification preferred)
Experience with multiple health data types (i.e. HL7, ELR, eCR, FHIR)
Solid understanding of API-based architectures (including FHIR)
Ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical partners effectively.
Flexibility to adapt to evolving project requirements and priorities.
Professional certifications in data science, machine learning, or public health analytics preferred.
Outstanding interpersonal and teamwork skills; collegial; energetic; and able to develop productive relationships with colleagues, partners, and partners.
Demonstrated ability to work well independently and within teams
Experience working in a virtual environment with remote partners and teams
Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Special Notes
This role is involved in a dynamic public health program. As such, roles and responsibilities are subject to change as situations evolve. Roles and responsibilities listed above may be expanded upon or updated to match priorities and needs, once written approval is received by the CDC Foundation in order to best support the public health programming.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status, and all other characteristics protected by law.

We comply with all applicable laws including E.O. 11246 and the Vietnam Era Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 governing employment practices and do not discriminate on the basis of any unlawful criteria in accordance with 41 C.F.R. §§ 60-300.5(a)(12) and 60-741.5(a)(7). As a federal government contractor, we take affirmative action on behalf of protected veterans.

The CDC Foundation is a smoke-free environment.
Relocation expenses are not included.",4.3,CDC Foundation,North Dakota,1001 to 5000 Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,113.0,North Dakota,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Details
Position Details
Job Title
Data Scientist

Position Number
8150736

Job Category
University Staff

Job Type
Full-Time

FLSA Status
Exempt

Campus
Maywood-Health Sciences Campus

Department Name
PHYSIOLOGY

Location Code
PHYSIOLOGY (06240A)

Is this split and/or fully grant funded?
Yes

Duties and Responsibilities
The Data Scientist will perform detailed analyses of large bodies of heterogeneous omics and clinical data to discover new patterns and insights that impact patient health or augment human capabilities. The Data Scientist should have deep expertise in the methods used to analyze data and deep knowledge of data types, topics, and scientific challenges and approaches that will be used to help inform and define new products, experiences, and technologies. This position works in conjunction with basic and clinical scientists to create intelligence-driven systems to solve complex translational problems.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Participates in multidisciplinary teams to design, develop, and recommend new approaches for data-driven decision-making.
Leads discovery processes on pioneering Artificial Intelligence (“AI"")/Machine Learning (“ML”) based approaches to solve complex data problems across a variety of domains.
Provides strategic direction regarding data science and AI.
Guides and educates basic science and clinical teams to provide unbiased and accurate information, analysis, consultation, and recommendations to support strategic and operational data science initiatives.
Develops analytics tools that can be used by other staff with non-technical expertise.
Supports scientific projects under the supervision of the principal investigator.
Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis.


Minimum Education and/or Work Experience
Bachelor’s degree in related field required

Qualifications
BS, the position would not necessarily require a PhD, as considerable experience in the field would be acceptable.

Certificates/Credentials/Licenses
N/A

Computer Skills
Office Suite skills, AI/Machine Learning based approaches. Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Required operation of university owned vehicles
No

Does this position require direct animal or patient contact?
No

Physical Demands
None

Working Conditions
None

Open Date
10/01/2024

Close Date

Special Instructions to Applicants

Diversity and Inclusion Statement
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion

As one of the nation’s largest Jesuit, Catholic universities, Loyola University Chicago fosters a transformative cultural experience that honors diversity, equity, and inclusion. We are committed to not only recruiting, but also retaining a diverse, mission driven workforce and enabling a culture of inclusiveness in an environment that values service excellence, stewardship, personal well-being, and professional development for all of our employees. Loyola University Chicago supports its staff and faculty with a wide array of affordable, comprehensive and competitive benefits centered on health and wellness, financial security, equity, and work-life balance. We actively seek those who wish to join our faculty, staff, and students in a community of diverse opinions, perspectives, and backgrounds supporting our Jesuit mission and striving toward the same goal of being persons for and with others.


Quick Link for Posting
https://www.careers.luc.edu/postings/29300",3.8,Loyola University Chicago,"Maywood, IL",1001 to 5000 Employees,1870.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,105.0,IL,154.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$175K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 4 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 2 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$145,000/year to $204,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,175.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$93K
/yr","Job Overview:
Graham Tech is seeking a skilled and experienced Data Scientist to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing a set of techniques and analytics applications that transform raw data into meaningful insights, supporting strategic decision-making processes. This role will require proficiency in data-oriented programming languages, visualization software, and a deep understanding of data mining, data modeling, natural language processing, and machine learning.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement data-driven techniques and analytics applications to transform raw data into actionable insights.
Apply advanced data mining, data modeling, natural language processing (NLP), and machine learning (ML) techniques to extract and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets.
Visualize data findings using cutting-edge visualization tools, ensuring that data is presented clearly and effectively to stakeholders.
Interpret and report data analysis results, providing insights to inform decision-making processes.
Create and maintain dynamic data reports that offer real-time insights for business needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and implement strategies that leverage data analysis to solve complex business challenges.
Work independently to perform all functional duties and responsibilities in a fast-paced, results-driven environment.
Requirements:
Experience: 3-10 years of experience in data science, analytics, or a related field.
Education: BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field.
Technical Skills: Proficiency in data-oriented programming languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL) and visualization software (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, D3.js).
Strong expertise in data mining, data modeling, NLP, and ML techniques.
Experience working with large datasets, both structured and unstructured.
Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI (Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information) clearance required.
Additional Qualifications:
Strong analytical, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to present technical findings to non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to work independently and manage multiple projects in a high-pressure environment.
Compensation:
At Graham Technologies, we believe in treating every person the way we want to be treated - fairly. Our compensation package ensures everyone at Graham Technologies is given equal pay for equal work - regardless of race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, disability, religion, age, nationality, or even negotiation skills!
Most IT companies can probably offer many of the same services, but what sets us apart from the others is truly our people! We care about our employees and show it often with sincere appreciation and acknowledgment of not only the final work products but also the little steps taken along the way! In addition, our generous benefits package helps our team members live well and prosper.
Here are just a few highlights:
Four Week's Accrued PTO First Year
Ten Paid Federal Holidays
Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
401(k) Plan with Annual Employer Contributions
Flexible Schedules
Reimbursements for Continued Education and Training

Why Graham Technologies?
Our Core Values say it all!
Value our Customers
Care about our Employees
Passionate about Innovation
Believe in a Strong Work Ethic
Rely on Teamwork
Integrity Matters

Founded in 2007, GTech is a consulting services firm zealous about providing the best solutions to address our client's needs and maximize the value of their investments. One way we do this is by providing exceptional employees for our clients-whose range of expertise expands the entire IT industry! We've cultivated a family of individuals where integrity, commitment, and reliability are etched into the heart of our delivery teams.
In addition, we are equally zealous about caring for our employees - the lifeblood of our business! We've purposefully created a culture that is friendly, family-oriented, and all-inclusive. Our team members are encouraged to ""have a life,"" both in and out of the office, through flexible schedules (where available), continuing education, and support to pursue their passions!",4.4,Graham Technologies,"Tampa, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,93.0,FL,17.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist III, Analytics","$179K
/yr","Expedia Group brands power global travel for everyone, everywhere. We design cutting-edge tech to make travel smoother and more memorable, and we create groundbreaking solutions for our partners. Our diverse, vibrant, and welcoming community is essential in driving our success.
Why Join Us?
To shape the future of travel, people must come first. Guided by our Values and Leadership Agreements, we foster an open culture where everyone belongs, differences are celebrated and know that when one of us wins, we all win.
We provide a full benefits package, including exciting travel perks, generous time-off, parental leave, a global hybrid work setup (with some pretty cool offices), and career development resources, all to fuel our employees' passion for travel and ensure a rewarding career journey. We’re building a more open world. Join us.
Data Scientist III, Analytics
Are you excited by the opportunity to pioneer the future of travel? Do you want to redefine the way people plan, search for, and book their travel? At Expedia Group, we believe that travel brings the world together, and we are passionate about the endless possibilities.
The InsurTech team at Expedia is responsible for managing the InsurTech P&L and driving its strategy and business development efforts across the Expedia Group globally. We deliver millions of dollars of incremental revenue making a direct and meaningful impact to the company's bottom-line. At the same time, we increase customers’ confidence to book travel and make difference in their lives.
Introduction to team
This role is an excellent opportunity to join the InsurTech Analytics Team where we are passionate about delivering outstanding user experience! We power and deliver product analytics, user behavior analysis, experimentation, and visualization services that enable highly tailored and optimized experiences using the scientific methods and applied insights. We’re looking for a highly motivated individual to join our team to help us formulate business strategy and to deliver impactful analytics insights. If you enjoy using data to build business cases, solve business problems, improve ongoing business activities, and to work on a team that functions as the “business owner” you will fit right in. In this role, you will use your analytical and business skills to inspire product, engineering, finance and customer support, and our strategic partners to prioritize, implement and scale our product ideas
In this role, you will:
Provide strategic analysis and insights for the InsurTech business, while actively looking for opportunities to grow the business
Own end to end process in evaluating A/B or multivariate tests to improve learning; proactively uncover opportunities and recommend new features for test and learn; evaluate and apply alternative methods to supplement randomized testing
Performs advanced statistical analyses on experimental data to identify trends and derive actionable insights
Apply your expertise in data modeling, quantitative analysis, data mining, data visualization with a goal of improving customer experience and business results with a religious focus on impactful analytics, steward product team to drive insights
A high performing individual contributor who consistently applies and enhances the analytics capabilities, best practices and processes to solve complex business issues and identify opportunities
Function independently, assessing existing and upcoming business needs
Works with data engineers to ensure best practices are implemented through experimentation platform
Effectively communicates statistical findings and insights to stakeholders and collaborate with product development teams to integrate statistical insights into decision-making
Experience and qualifications:
Bachelor's, Masters or PhD degree in Mathematics, Science, Statistics, Engineering or 5+ years’ data analytics experience in a business context
Strong analytical/modeling skills with ability to convert raw data into measurable insights
Able to structure / work on data exploration problems, with innovative ways and solutions, bringing to bear strong reporting and data visualization skills
Strong hands-on experience in SQL
Proficient in building data visualizations (Tableau, Looker, etc.)
Intermediate (or better) knowledge of Statistics
Experience with R, python, or other coding language a plus
Experience with web analytics tools such as Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics a plus
Experience in modeling selection, building and evaluation
The total cash range for this position in Seattle is $137,500.00 to $192,500.00. Employees in this role have the potential to increase their pay up to $220,000.00, which is the top of the range, based on ongoing, demonstrated, and sustained performance in the role.
Starting pay for this role will vary based on multiple factors, including location, available budget, and an individual’s knowledge, skills, and experience. Pay ranges may be modified in the future.
Accommodation requests
If you need assistance with any part of the application or recruiting process due to a disability, or other physical or mental health conditions, please reach out to our Recruiting Accommodations Team through the Accommodation Request.
We are proud to be named as a Best Place to Work on Glassdoor in 2024 and be recognized for award-winning culture by organizations like Forbes, TIME, Disability:IN, and others.
Expedia Group's family of brands includes: Brand Expedia®, Hotels.com®, Expedia® Partner Solutions, Vrbo®, trivago®, Orbitz®, Travelocity®, Hotwire®, Wotif®, ebookers®, CheapTickets®, Expedia Group™ Media Solutions, Expedia Local Expert®, CarRentals.com™, and Expedia Cruises™. © 2024 Expedia, Inc. All rights reserved. Trademarks and logos are the property of their respective owners. CST: 2029030-50
Employment opportunities and job offers at Expedia Group will always come from Expedia Group’s Talent Acquisition and hiring teams. Never provide sensitive, personal information to someone unless you’re confident who the recipient is. Expedia Group does not extend job offers via email or any other messaging tools to individuals with whom we have not made prior contact. Our email domain is @expediagroup.com. The official website to find and apply for job openings at Expedia Group is careers.expediagroup.com/jobs.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. This employer participates in E-Verify. The employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.8,Expedia Partner Solutions,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1996.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,179.0,WA,28.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist / Data Resource Analyst II,"$78K
/yr","International Studies and Programs (ISP) supports MSU global learning and international engagement under the MSU Strategic Plan 2030 in the areas of research, teaching, and outreach. To fulfill its main objectives, ISP communicates key international data to university leadership and the public and serve as a campus-wide analytical resource. ISP manages MSU’s International Data Portals, which provide visualizations of MSU's Externally Funded International Projects, International Student Enrollment, Education Abroad, International Agreements Data, and International Research Collaboration. These dashboards utilize Tableau, Tableau Prep, and SQL Oracle to draw from MSU’s electronic data warehouse (EDW). International Studies and Programs (ISP) collaborates with units across campus to streamline and upgrade the international data plan.
ISP is seeking a Data Scientist who is curious, creative, and can see both the big picture and work with attention to detail. The successful candidate will have strong technical, interpersonal and communication skills to convey findings to various audiences and positively influence university leadership. The Data Scientist will need to articulate complex issues to a non-technical audience clearly and effectively. Daily activities may include development of data representations and visualizations, advising on predictive models and creating easy to understand reports and dashboards. This will be a full-time (100% FTE) 12-month fixed-term position funded for one year with the possibility of reappointments depending on funding and performance.
ISP is currently operating under a hybrid modality structure, with staff working three days in person and two days remote. ISP values individual and group differences and encourages applicants who will contribute to a culture of inclusion on campus.
Primary responsibilities include:
Data Analysis and Reporting
Analyze, interpret, summarize, and present data and findings in a clear, comprehensive, and effective manner
Conduct internal and external benchmarking analysis for ISP
Develop and design reports and dashboards in Tableau
Support Data-Driven Decision Making
Consult with and support ISP leadership and units by pulling and analyzing data
With ISP leadership, collaborate with other campus units on communicating, building, and evaluating data tools and streamlining data reporting
Provide analysis and decision support for university international initiatives, projects, and planning as needed
Provide training/capacity development support for ISP units in various data-related topics
Represent ISP on university-wide data-related committees
Keep apprised of trends and conversations about data in higher education and international education
Database Management and Development
Build custom SQL to meet reporting requirements and manage ISP International Data Portals
Perform query tuning and root cause analysis to optimize database performance and correct errors
Develop SQL to create database tables, views, and stored procedures to support data storage and report development
Provide targeted training on tools and platforms when necessary
Minimum Requirements
Master’s degree in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field including other degrees with a strong quantitative emphasis
Three to five years of post-graduate work experience in data mining, data warehousing, data science, data management, as well as data analysis and visualization
Experience writing advanced SQL queries; expertise with Oracle PL/SQL, expertise with Tableau
Experience using data retrieval and manipulation, and expertise in statistical tools (such as SAS, SQL, STATA, R, D3, Python) and data visualization tools (such as Tableau and Tableau Prep)
Demonstrated success in managing collaborative projects involving cross-functional and interdisciplinary teams
Excellent communication skills including presenting, editing, and writing, as well as ability to demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy
Desired Qualifications
Doctorate in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field with a strong quantitative emphasis
Proven excellence in program or project management
Experience working in a university setting and in-depth knowledge of university administrative organization, policies, procedures, and practices for institutional research-oriented roles
Experience managing higher education related data (student, research, business support systems)
Understanding of data warehouse technologies (Oracle preferred) and familiarity with data integration processes using enterprise ETL tools (DataStage preferred) and the role of data stewardship
Ability to model and analyze data in statistical tools (SPSS, R, SAS, Python, or similar) combined with experience integrating large datasets from a variety of sources; experience with ETL tools (DataStage, Informatica)
Ability to work closely with clients to build custom dashboards, conduct data analysis to support ISP centers and other units, as well as develop and streamline data reporting
Make data-informed recommendations to administrators to contribute to decision making
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, age, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Application Materials
Resume and cover letter
Work Hours
STANDARD 8-5
Description of End Date
one year from date of hire
Website
https://www.isp.msu.edu/
Bidding eligibility ends October 22, 2024 at 11:55 P.M.",4.3,Michigan State University,"East Lansing, MI",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,78.0,MI,169.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US; Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_113619
ABOUT US
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
OUR TEAM
Zynga’s Applied AI group focuses on developing innovative ways to tackle problems within the game development process, demonstrating directly the ways that AI can improve the creativity and productivity of team members across Zynga. Our team is multi-disciplinary, and includes Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers among others. We build cloud-based tools and technologies to support every aspect of the development process, from concept development through to LiveOps and publishing operations.
To be successful in this role you should have curiosity about the areas of Game Development, Artificial Intelligence and Computational Creativity, be a proactive learner, have good depth in technical skills, and a strong desire to build high quality software that delivers value and efficiency.
KEY ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Write well-crafted, efficient and testable code and algorithms
Design and build AI systems that solve computational creativity challenges
Implement and deploy solutions as part of a larger microservice architecture
Plan and implement tasks of small to medium scale independently
Excellent communication skills and comfort working in a collaborative inter-discipline environment
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Ph.D. or M.S. in Computer Science with specialization in AI, or equivalent experience
Experience building AI systems for games, procedural content generation, or computational creativity
Understanding of principles of AI, including ML
Familiarity with principles of game design and implementation
Familiarity with Python, and at least one of Typescript, C++, or Unity C#
Familiarity with containers and cloud infrastructure principles – AWS preferred
Desire to learn and share knowledge with peers, collaborate in a cross-functional team
WHAT WE OFFER YOU
Competitive salary, bonus plan and ESPP (Employee Stock Purchase Plan)
401K Company Match Contribution (US)
RRSP/DPSP company match contribution (Canada)
Health coverage, dental, disability, critical illness, EAP, and life insurance (Canada)
Medical, dental, vision, EAP, life insurance, and disability benefits (US)
Virtual mental health and neurodiversity support programs
Global Fitness reimbursement program
Global Wellbeing Program
Financial wellness program with unlimited access to certified financial planners
Discretionary Time Off policy for many employees
Family planning support program
Generous paid parental, pregnancy-related disability, caregiver, and compassionate leaves
Zynga happy hours and frequent employee events
Flexible working hours on many teams
Culture of diversity and inclusion including employee resource groups
Work with cool people and impact millions of daily player
This is a fully remote role that may be based anywhere in the United States. Below are the expected salary and wage ranges for applicants based in locations where the pay transparency law is in effect:
Colorado: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
California: $87,400 and $129,340 per year
New York State (inclusive of New York City): $98,400 and $145,620 per year
Washington: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
Base pay offered is based on market location, and may vary further depending on individualized factors for job candidates, such as job-related knowledge, skills, experience, and other objective business considerations. Subject to those same considerations, the total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a bonus and/or equity awards and eligibility to participate in our 401(K) plan, in addition to a full range of medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees will also receive 16 paid holidays per calendar year, unlimited discretionary time off, and will receive up to 6.5 sick days per calendar year. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation or benefit program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.
#LI-RK2
Zynga does not engage in financial exchanges during the recruitment or onboarding process. We do not conduct job interviews over third-party messaging apps such as Telegram, WhatsApp or others. We will never ask you for your personal or financial information over unofficial chat channels. Our in-house recruitment team only contacts individuals via official company email addresses (i.e., via a zynga.com or naturalmotion.com email domain).
If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you may wish to contact the authorities. In the United States, you may file a complaint with the FBI. More information is available here: https://www.ic3.gov.",4.2,Zynga,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,114.0,United States,17.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Type: Description:
Position: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
Duration: 12 months +
Job Description
Minimum Qualifications:
Have image processing background and a good understanding on image quality
Experience in data science and analytics, including statistical data analysis.
Strong programming skills, including python and Linux scripting for data processing and tool development.
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or related areas.
Good communication skill and positive working attitude
Expect to be self-motivated, proactive, and solution-oriented
Preferred Qualifications:
Hands-on experience with data batch processing and handling
Experience with deep learning network model training and inferencing
3 years of relevant work experience
Please send your resumes to gjose@sisinc.com (Max 3-4 pages)
Location San Diego , CA Min Experience (yrs): Required Education: Not Specified Benefits:",4.1,SIS,"San Diego, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1987.0,Company - Private,Film Production,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,CA,37.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$88K
/yr","Position Description:

Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead and support data processing and analysis tasks, such as building data pipelines, monitoring data quality, developing documentation, applying statistical and data science methods, and creating data visualizations. Our junior data scientists underpin our company's core offerings in program improvement and data science, which yield crucial evidence and information for policy and decision makers. This position will either work remotely or flexibly in one of our office locations.
This position focuses on health policy, which includes projects such as:
Enhancing knowledge management and library curation across all VRDC projects by developing Python scripts that leverage large language models for automated document classification.
Monitoring the impacts of an alternative payment model for primary care in terms of care quality, cost, and health outcomes for diverse beneficiaries, using claims from thousands of primary care practices across the country and predicting future hospital costs and behavior.
Developing and testing how claims and survey data from federal and state-level programs could be used to measure patients’ experience of care, quality of life, care coordination, and long-term outcomes for beneficiaries enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid.
Creating an interactive data visualization tool to help local policy and decision makers understand how social determinants of health are related to health outcomes in their county, using open-source data from public agencies and non-profits.
Specifically, this Data Scientist contributes to team-based projects by:
Co-developing analysis plans with a senior data scientist or researcher
Writing and maintaining programming systems in languages such as Python and R to obtain, combine, and transform datasets on cloud, internal, and client servers
Developing and maintaining documentation
Implementing quality assurance practices, such as version control and testing
Conducting analysis and communicating results, both to clients and internal teams, such as descriptive statistics, data visualizations, and model diagnostics
Leading and managing small teams and tasks with oversight from a senior staff member
Position Requirements:

Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree, with an academic record including courses in subjects such as statistics, data science, data analytics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, and/or social science; equivalent years of experience can be substituted
Demonstrated interest and/or experience using programming and data science and/or statistics to contribute to projects with a policy/social impact in academic and/or professional settings
At least three years of experience performing data cleaning and analysis using programming languages such as R, Python, or Julia in the academic, extra-curricular, or professional environment
Experience executing data science and statistics techniques including regression modeling, machine learning algorithms, network analysis, or natural language processing
Ability and desire to work independently as part of an interdisciplinary team that may be geographically dispersed. This includes being able to learn from and apply resources such as self-guided tutorials, package documentation, and academic articles and willingness to constantly learn and contribute to knowledge sharing with team members.
Experience with reproducible research principles, version control, interactive visualizations, and common packages/libraries for supporting data science work in R, Python, and/or Julia (e.g., tidyverse, R Shiny, R Markdown, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, MLJ.jl, DataFrames.jl, and/or Makie.jl).
Desired but not required: experience with healthcare datasets (for example, Medicare or Medicaid claims and enrollment data), production-quality machine learning applications, cloud computing environments, and algorithmic fairness and ethics
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $75,000- $100,000. This position is eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance. To apply, please submit a cover letter (optional), resume, code samples, and salary expectations.
Staff in our Health or Human Services units will eventually work with some of our largest clients, including the Centers for Medicaid & Medicare Services (CMS) and other agencies. Most staff working on these contracts will be required to complete a successful background investigation including the Questionnaire for Public Trust Position SF-85 (https://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/sf85p.pdf). Staff that are unable to successfully undergo the background investigation will need to be able to obtain work outside these contracts. Staff will work with their supervisor to get re-staffed, however if they are unable to do so it may result in employment termination due to lack of work.
STAFFING AGENCIES AND THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS: Mathematica is not accepting candidates for this role or any technical role from staffing agencies or third-party recruiters. Please do not contact technical or senior staff at Mathematica or share unsolicited resumes. All agency inquiries go through the talent acquisition team and will be routed accordingly.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ; Remote
#LI-AR1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1986.0,Company - Private,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,88.0,DC,38.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$192K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modeling project
At least 3 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, be able to work with cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $144000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,192.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","Recipient of the 2023 Exceptional PeopleFirst Workplace Award by IWPL, HelloGov® is an Artificial General Intelligence (AGI) company founded by ex-Machine Learning (ML) Researchers from OpenAI, Google, and the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), united by our shared patriotism and belief of advancing AI in the U.S. public sector to maintain global competitiveness. We conduct AGI research, solution development, and human capital resourcing with the declared intention of Democratizing AI for the Public Sector™.
HelloGov® was founded on the principles of nurturing our employees’ careers and wellness. We take pride in providing a work-life balance that stems from years of building companies in Silicon Valley. Our founders have pioneered some of the best AI technologies in the market and have always operated with humility and ambition. We operate with an award-winning people first mantra of:
Transparency.
Flexibility.
Work life balance.
Culture of sharing credit.
Empowering every employee, from the shop floor to the top floor.
Good company policies.
Investment in people.
Focus on ergonomics.
Fun traditions.
Benefits (Tier I Health/Vision/Dental insurance, 401K, EAP, Equity, Stipends, Investment in your wellness)
Equality in Compensation (i.e. every team member, from Junior to Executive staff, receives a Sign-On Bonus)
We are seeking a team of Data Scientists with 3+ years of experience in multi-intelligence and multi-domain systems, with a strong background in NLP, computer vision, statistical learning theory, and ML model development. Candidates should be proficient in Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++, and have experience communicating technical concepts to business, technical, and non-technical audiences. This role leverages advanced AI technology set to dominate the market for the next decade, supporting national biodefense through integrated biosurveillance (IB).
Major Duties:
Designs, configures, develops, tests, and supports informatics and data science solutions for a wide array of technical use cases;
Applies analytical methodologies to diagnose data-related challenges, implement solutions, and evaluate performance;
Documents and presents requirements, design alternatives, and findings to team members and clients;
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships; and
Experience with integrated development environments, data integration, data visualization, data mining, and analysis tools.
Maintains and guides the development of common libraries and tools used by multiple teams.
Aids in formulating a strategy on how to achieve rapid prototyping
Required Skills/Experience:
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory;
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models;
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility;
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models; and
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations.
LOCATION:
Falls Church, VA (Hybrid)
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATIONS:
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence, or related field required (Master's degree preferred).
CLEARANCE:
Top Secret (SCI eligible)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $138,997.00 - $189,983.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
No weekends
Experience:
Natural language processing: 3 years (Required)
AI models: 3 years (Required)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++: 5 years (Required)
large scale data handling + data mining: 5 years (Required)
GPU Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
DoD: 10 years (Preferred)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Falls Church, VA 22041",Not listed,HelloGov,"Falls Church, VA",-1,-1.0,-1,-1,-1,-1,0,1,164.0,VA,-1.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,1
DATA SCIENTIST,"$112K
/yr","Description
Applies knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to the development and improvement of processes. Identify limitations, or potential issues with datasets and data types that may impact performance from machine learning algorithms. Re-train models as needed to address new challenges, or novel goals. Aid investigators and stakeholders in the validation of results. Generate detailed reports and presentations. May mentor and train junior staff members.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Compile, manipulate, and analyze data using descriptive and inferential statistics to address a broad spectrum of research and administrative questions.
Use statistical software to create data analysis programs/syntax with appropriate documentation.
Understand and interpret data analysis programs/syntax written by others involved in data analysis in the department.
Explain complex statistical concepts in the form of presentations or written project reports/documentation
Write and/or review relevant portions of research study manuscripts and/or abstracts.
Effectively visualize and organize complex datasets for the production of high-quality figures and tables for reports, manuscripts, and presentations
Consult with various researchers or administrators regarding data analytic needs, feasibility of proposed analyses, sequential procedures, and project timelines
Perform other duties as assigned
Salary Range: $85,600 - $139,100

Qualifications
Doctorate degree in a related field OR Master's degree in a related field and two (2) years of related experience OR Bachelor's degree in related field and four (4) years of related experience required. Work experience may NOT substitute for education requirement.
UAB is an Equal Employment/Equal Educational Opportunity Institution dedicated to providing equal opportunities and equal access to all individuals regardless of race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, sex (including pregnancy), genetic information, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and veteran’s status. As required by Title IX, UAB prohibits sex discrimination in any education program or activity that it operates. Individuals may report concerns or questions to UAB’s Assistant Vice President and Senior Title IX Coordinator. The Title IX notice of nondiscrimination is located at uab.edu/titleix.

Primary Location: University
Job Category: Professional & Managerial
Organization: 312000000 Dept of Medical Education
Employee Status: Regular
Shift: Day/1st Shift
Work Arrangement (final schedule to be determined by the department/hiring manager): Onsite",4.0,University of Alabama at Birmingham,"Birmingham, AL",10000+ Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,AL,,0,0,0,0,0
Product Data Scientist,"$124K
/yr","The Company
PayPal has been revolutionizing commerce globally for more than 25 years. Creating innovative experiences that make moving money, selling, and shopping simple, personalized, and secure, PayPal empowers consumers and businesses in approximately 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy.

We operate a global, two-sided network at scale that connects hundreds of millions of merchants and consumers. We help merchants and consumers connect, transact, and complete payments, whether they are online or in person. PayPal is more than a connection to third-party payment networks. We provide proprietary payment solutions accepted by merchants that enable the completion of payments on our platform on behalf of our customers.

We offer our customers the flexibility to use their accounts to purchase and receive payments for goods and services, as well as the ability to transfer and withdraw funds. We enable consumers to exchange funds more safely with merchants using a variety of funding sources, which may include a bank account, a PayPal or Venmo account balance, PayPal and Venmo branded credit products, a credit card, a debit card, certain cryptocurrencies, or other stored value products such as gift cards, and eligible credit card rewards. Our PayPal, Venmo, and Xoom products also make it safer and simpler for friends and family to transfer funds to each other. We offer merchants an end-to-end payments solution that provides authorization and settlement capabilities, as well as instant access to funds and payouts. We also help merchants connect with their customers, process exchanges and returns, and manage risk. We enable consumers to engage in cross-border shopping and merchants to extend their global reach while reducing the complexity and friction involved in enabling cross-border trade.

Our beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We live each day guided by our core values of Inclusion, Innovation, Collaboration, and Wellness. Together, our values ensure that we work together as one global team with our customers at the center of everything we do – and they push us to ensure we take care of ourselves, each other, and our communities.
Job Description Summary: As a Data Scientist, you will spearhead our efforts to measure and enhance developer experience to integrate with PayPal's products. This role is central to our mission, offering you the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technology in a fast-paced environment. You will lead the data science projects for the initiatives that optimize features that are adopted by the external developer community, directly impacting PayPal's ability to offer seamless payment solutions to millions of users worldwide.
Job Description:
The Global Analytics and Data Science team is seeking a Data Scientist of PayPal’s SMB Analytics and ML Team to join us as exceptional problem solver with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus.
We are responsible to find opportunities and gaps in developer experience, product flows using statistical methods to strategize Product roadmap. This team empowers senior leadership with actionable insights for informed, data-driven decisions.
In this role, we are tackling the complex and fascinating challenge of optimizing the developer experience at PayPal. Developers go through a non-linear journey, from onboarding to integration, and it's crucial to understand their pain points at each stage. This includes analyzing what they search for, how they navigate the platform, when they begin integrating our APIs, and their activities during sandbox testing.
We aim to provide deep insights into these areas by applying advanced statistical methods and cutting-edge data science techniques. This allows us to uncover friction points and provide actionable recommendations to enhance the overall developer journey. Additionally, we leverage the latest generative AI tools to assist developers throughout their integration process. A key part of this role is to measure the efficacy and accuracy of these AI-driven solutions, ensuring they deliver value and improve the experience.
This is a unique opportunity to dissect the end-to-end developer journey, identify opportunities for product improvement, and collaborate with our product and engineering partners to drive innovation in developer tools and resources. The role goes beyond simple analytics, offering the chance to shape PayPal’s developer ecosystem and influence the tools that developers rely on to build seamlessly integrated solutions.
Your day to day:
Data Analysis and Decision Making:
Utilize large, complex datasets to drive improvements in developer KPIs.
Employ advanced analytical and statistical techniques to identify trends, issues, and opportunities.
Perform deep-dive analytics including Causal Inference analysis, Pre-Post analysis, Sensitivity analysis, financial projections, and additional ad-hoc exercises to provide holistic recommendations.
Strategic Influence: Develop and present insights and strategic recommendations to Product and Data Science leadership. Influence product direction and strategic decisions through data-driven insights.
Collaboration and Communication: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including product development, engineering, and marketing to implement data-driven improvements. Occasionally collaborate with developers to optimize their experiences. Mentor junior team members .
Innovation and Improvement: Lead initiatives to refine existing analytical processes and develop new approaches to business challenges. Promote a culture of continuous improvement and testing.
What do you need to bring
3+ years of experience in analyzing multi-dimensional datasets and creating actionable business solutions.
Strong educational background with a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Expertise in SQL, Excel, and visualization tools such as Tableau or Qlikview. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python is preferred.
Demonstrable experience with big data technologies such as Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, and BigQuery.
Knowledge of Python, Jupyter Notebooks, and SQL.
Exceptional communication skills to effectively articulate insights and influence cross-functional teams.
Prior experience in performing data science to fuel insights to drive Product within a high-tech environment.
Personal Attributes:
A data-driven decision maker, passionate about solving complex problems using analytical solutions.
A self-starter who is motivated to take initiative and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
A fun-loving team player who brings energy and enthusiasm to the workplace.
Comfortable with ambiguity and uncertainty in a dynamic business landscape.
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000
For the majority of employees, PayPal's balanced hybrid work model offers 3 days in the office for effective in-person collaboration and 2 days at your choice of either the PayPal office or your home workspace, ensuring that you equally have the benefits and conveniences of both locations.

Our Benefits:
At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.
We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:
To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.
Belonging at PayPal:
Our employees are central to advancing our mission, and we strive to create an environment where everyone can do their best work with a sense of purpose and belonging. Belonging at PayPal means creating a workplace with a sense of acceptance and security where all employees feel included and valued. We are proud to have a diverse workforce reflective of the merchants, consumers, and communities that we serve, and we continue to take tangible actions to cultivate inclusivity and belonging at PayPal.

Any general requests for consideration of your skills, please Join our Talent Community.

We know the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can get in the way of meeting spectacular candidates. Please don’t hesitate to apply.",3.7,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",10000+ Employees,1998.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,124.0,CA,26.0,1,0,0,0,1
Research Data Scientist,"$116K
/yr","Job ID
34394667
Category
Research and Development
Organization
University Library
Department
University Library Dept
Location
Main Campus - UCR
Salary
$81,500 - $150,100
Date Posted
October 10, 2024
Application Deadline
Open Until Filled
Schedule
8AM - 5PM
Full/Part Time
Full-time(100%)
Level of Supervision
General Supervision
Other Information
Qualifies for Employee Referral Bonus: No
UC Internal Job: No
Position Information
Reporting to the Director of Research Services, this position will be the driving force of the library's Data Science Initiative to support campus research through interdisciplinary collaboration on cutting-edge projects in STEM, Liberal Arts, and Social Sciences. Seeks opportunities to embed themselves in campus research teams to directly address UCR researchers' data and AI related needs through activities including but are not limited to: designing, developing and implementing infrastructure, systems, software and solutions; directly answering compute- and data- intensive research questions; contributing novel ideas, expertise, and methods to the teams' intellectual discourse and advancement; providing data/AI related consultation and instruction. In partnership with other library colleagues as well as UCR colleges, academic programs, and Research and Economic Development, Information Technology Services, and Research Computing, will continuously develop specialized and sought-after data science and AI expertise synergistic with UCR faculty's research agendas.

Candidates are encouraged to include a CV and/or portfolio link with examples of AI/Data related work, if available.

Finalists will be asked to conduct a presentation (including providing visual representation of work samples) as part of the interview process.

The full salary range for the Research Data Scientist is $81,500 - $150,100 annually. However, the expected pay scale for this position is up to $115,000 annually. We base salary offers on a variety of considerations, such as education, licensure and certifications, experience, and other business and organizational needs.

Applicants must have current work authorization when accepting a UCR staff position. Currently, we are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa for staff.

As a University employee, you will be required to comply with all applicable University policies and/or collective bargaining agreements, as may be amended from time to time. Federal, state, or local government directives may impose additional requirements.",4.2,"University of California, Riverside","Riverside, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,116.0,CA,,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Company Description
At Red Hat, we connect an innovative community of customers, partners, and contributors to deliver an open source stack of trusted, high-performing solutions. We offer cloud, Linux, middleware, and virtualization technologies, together with award-winning global customer support, consulting, and implementation services. Red Hat is a rapidly growing company supporting more than 90% of Fortune 500 companies.
Job Summary
Red Hat’s Global Engineering team is looking for an experienced data scientist to join the InstructLab team. In this role, you’ll contribute directly to Red Hat’s rapidly growing AI/ML (artificial intelligence and machine learning) family of products. You will be responsible for the investigation, evaluation, integration, and development of open source AI/ML systems and functionality to improve the overall development and operations of both Red Hat's downstream AI products and upstream open source AI projects. Qualified data scientists in this role regularly participate in design reviews and productization for major product features and bug fixes, and are experienced and comfortable working with Linux-based operating systems.

The ideal candidate will be a highly collaborative individual with a passion for working on complex projects in an open organization where contributions are valued and expected from all levels. This job role will require engaging in upstream open source communities. As this is a fast-moving area of opportunity for Red Hat, the ability to communicate productively and effectively with team members, stakeholders, and Red Hat leadership is critical.
This position reports directly to a Manager of Software Engineering for InstructLab. This position must have the ability to partner collaboratively in our Boston, MA office at least 3 days per week.
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop innovative capabilities for open source platforms used for building, training, testing, and serving models for AI-enabled applications, carrying your work through all phases of software development and delivery, including: researching and conceptualization, team design review, writing the implementation, authoring a testing strategy and necessary automation, productizing and packaging the code, and supporting its deployment through to end-users.
Monitor and participate in upstream open source AI/ML communities, evaluating new AI/ML-related technologies in the space and considering potential integrations and collaborations upstream.
Regularly reading papers and keeping up with AI/ML developments, particularly in the Generative AI space.
Promote and foster Red Hat’s open-source value proposition as it pertains to AI/ML engineering and product infusion and development.
Contribute to the development of the open-source projects that comprise Red Hat’s AI family of products.
Take part in the shared responsibility of delivering and maintaining assigned products.
Regularly communicate with project stakeholders including other teams of Red Hat engineers, product managers, consultants, management, and senior leadership.
Take on the role of Subject Matter Expert, as needed, per domain and project.
Lead, coach and collaborate with junior engineers as they build AI/ML knowledge and skills.
Coordinate and collaborate with external teams, including IBM Research on key strategic vision and implementation details.
Share our experiments and learnings from an experienced position in the Data Science community through blogs, presentations, new ideas and existing work at various technical outlets and conferences.
Promote upstream acceptance and community building.

Required Skills
Bachelor's degree in computer science, data science, computer engineering or equivalent
5+ years of experience as a data scientist (or similar roles).
Extensive, advanced experience with Python development.
Experience with AI and Machine Learning platforms, tools, and frameworks, such as: Tensorflow, PyTorch, LLaMA.cpp, and Kubeflow.
Experience working with Kubernetes/OpenShift and containers, troubleshooting issues, and working with YAML.
Experience with Cloud Native Technologies and Platforms (e.g. Kubernetes)
Demonstrates knowledge of unit testing frameworks and methodologies
Demonstrates knowledge of machine learning relevant mathematics and statistics.
Strong self-motivation and organizational skills.
Demonstrates ability to context switch between multiple concurrent projects.
Excellent English written and verbal communication skills.
Collaborative attitude and willingness to share ideas openly.
Ability to quickly learn and use new tools and technologies.
Passion for developing open source software.
Nice to Haves
Familiarity with participating in an agile development team
Experience writing Kubernetes controllers and operators.
Experience creating Ansible automation scripts.
Experience with big data storage techniques, such as Parquet, Avro, and S3.
Experience with hardware accelerators, such as GPU, CUDA, and ROCm.
Understanding of DevOps methodology.
The salary range for this position is $127,890.00 - $211,180.00. Actual offer will be based on your qualifications.
Pay Transparency
Red Hat determines compensation based on several factors including but not limited to job location, experience, applicable skills and training, external market value, and internal pay equity. Annual salary is one component of Red Hat’s compensation package. This position may also be eligible for bonus, commission, and/or equity. For positions with Remote-US locations, the actual salary range for the position may differ based on location but will be commensurate with job duties and relevant work experience.
About Red Hat
Red Hat
is the world’s leading provider of enterprise
open source
software solutions, using a community-powered approach to deliver high-performing Linux, cloud, container, and Kubernetes technologies. Spread across 40+ countries, our associates work flexibly across work environments, from in-office, to office-flex, to fully remote, depending on the requirements of their role. Red Hatters are encouraged to bring their best ideas, no matter their title or tenure. We're a leader in open source because of our open and inclusive environment. We hire creative, passionate people ready to contribute their ideas, help solve complex problems, and make an impact.
Benefits
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Flexible Spending Account - healthcare and dependent care
Health Savings Account - high deductible medical plan
Retirement 401(k) with employer match
Paid time off and holidays
Paid parental leave plans for all new parents
Leave benefits including disability, paid family medical leave, and paid military leave
Additional benefits including employee stock purchase plan, family planning reimbursement, tuition reimbursement, transportation expense account, employee assistance program, and more!
Note: These benefits are only applicable to full time, permanent associates at Red Hat located in the United States.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion at Red Hat
Red Hat’s culture is built on the open source principles of transparency, collaboration, and inclusion, where the best ideas can come from anywhere and anyone. When this is realized, it empowers people from diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and experiences to come together to share ideas, challenge the status quo, and drive innovation. Our aspiration is that everyone experiences this culture with equal opportunity and access, and that all voices are not only heard but also celebrated. We hope you will join our celebration, and we welcome and encourage applicants from all the beautiful dimensions of diversity that compose our global village.
Equal Opportunity Policy (EEO)
Red Hat is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer. We review applications for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, veteran status, genetic information, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

Red Hat does not seek or accept unsolicited resumes or CVs from recruitment agencies. We are not responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions, or any other payment related to unsolicited resumes or CVs except as required in a written contract between Red Hat and the recruitment agency or party requesting payment of a fee.
Red Hat supports individuals with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodations to job applicants. If you need assistance completing our online job application, email
application-assistance@redhat.com
. General inquiries, such as those regarding the status of a job application, will not receive a reply.",4.2,"Red Hat, Inc.","Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,1993.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,170.0,MA,31.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$163K
/yr","It's time to transform markets
Existing workflows within syndicated loan and CLO markets are painful for clients: they are outdated, overcomplicated, and time-consuming. It's time for a change.
Octaura is reimagining the way these markets trade, with efficiency, transparency and simplicity at the heart of what we do. We bring trading capabilities, data and analytics together for the first time on a digitized platform–fundamentally transforming the markets and streamlining workflows like never before.
At Octaura, everyone belongs
It's essential that Octaurians are confident in knowing they have the space to use their voice and talents. The world is diverse and we actively want our team to reflect this. We're a values-driven company and by engaging, solving and evolving together, we create a culture that is collaborative, transparent, impactful and innovative. And fun!
The role in a nutshell
As a Senior Data Scientist at Octaura, you'll be a key member of our Product team, playing a critical role in the development and growth of our Data and Analytics products. This is an early-stage opportunity to shape the future of our data science initiatives and make a significant contribution to the company's success.
What You'll Do
Drive the full product lifecycle: From ideation and market research to model development, deployment, and performance monitoring, you'll be involved in every stage of creating impactful data-driven solutions.
Develop advanced models: You'll leverage your expertise in machine learning and statistical modelling to extract valuable insights from large and complex datasets, building predictive models that fuel our product offerings.
Build scalable infrastructure: Design, implement, and maintain cloud-based infrastructure on AWS and/or Azure to support our data processing and model deployment needs.
Collaborate effectively: Work closely with the Go-to-Market team to understand client needs and market trends, and partner with the Technology team to build robust data pipelines.
Communicate insights: Clearly and effectively communicate your findings to stakeholders across the company, translating complex data into actionable insights
The Opportunity
Make a real impact: You'll have a direct and significant impact on the company's growth and success.
Early-stage opportunity: Shape the future of our data science products and be a part of building something truly innovative.
Collaborative environment: Work alongside a talented and passionate cross functional teams in a supportive and collaborative environment.
Growth potential: Ample opportunities for professional development and career advancement within a rapidly growing startup.
The Person
Advanced degree and experience: PhD (or MSc + 5 years of experience) in statistics, physics, mathematics, computer science, or a related field.
Strong programming skills: Proficiency in Python and experience with popular machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Proven modelling experience: A track record of building and deploying predictive models using machine learning algorithms.
Data analysis expertise: Strong analytical skills with the ability to analyse and interpret complex datasets, identify patterns, and draw meaningful conclusions.
Excellent communication: Exceptional written and verbal communication skills with the ability to explain technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Cloud proficiency: Experience with cloud-based architectures (AWS and/or Azure) is highly preferred.
Fintech/Financial Services experience is a plus: Experience in the financial services industry, particularly within the fixed income market, is a valuable asset.
If you are passionate about data science in finance, have a strong background in technical majors, and are excited about building predictive models and cloud-based infrastructure using AWS and Azure, we want to hear from you. As a startup, we offer a dynamic and entrepreneurial work environment, where you will have the opportunity to take ownership of your work and make a real impact on our business.
The base pay range for this position in New York is $150,000 - $175,000 annually. Pay may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Equity and year-end bonus may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and other benefits, dependent on the position offered. Applicants should apply via Octaura's internal or external careers site.

Octaura Work Perks
At Octaura, our people are our most valuable asset, and we are pleased to offer the following benefits to all full-time employees:
Competitive compensation and equity
Unlimited Paid Time Off
Competitive Parental Leave
Daily breakfast, coffee and snacks in the office
90% company-paid healthcare
Onsite gym & discounted membership
We're committed to equal opportunity employment
Octaura is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status.",5.0,Octaura,"New York, NY",1 to 50 Employees,2022.0,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,163.0,NY,2.0,1,0,0,1,1
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$193K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 18, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200573520

Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products, such as Siri and Search. Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products. This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.
Solid foundation in data science, machine learning, and evaluation, with hands-on experience in independently conducting and analyzing experiments. Ability to take ownership of smaller analytical projects and contribute effectively to larger initiatives.
Proficiency in critical thinking, problem-solving, and collaboration with cross-functional teams to address business needs. Strong communication skills for articulating and translating business questions into actionable insights using statistical techniques and available data.
Strong programming skills in Python for data processing, with expertise in SQL or Spark. Proficient in data wrangling, and able to assist in prototyping data quality and evaluation pipelines, working alongside engineering teams to help solve data challenges.
Some relevant internship or work experience for M.S. or Ph.D. candidates, or 3 years of relevant work experiences for people with other degrees in quantitative fields.

Preferred Qualifications
Experience in generative model and application development, with a focus on data, evaluation, and automation. Ability to adopt or implement established methodologies and apply statistical analysis in problem-solving.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $135,400 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,193.0,WA,48.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Monitoring Operations","$270K
/yr","About the Team
OpenAI’s mission is to ensure that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We believe that achieving our goal requires real world deployment and iteratively updating based on what we learn.
The Intelligence and Investigations team supports this by identifying and investigating misuses of our products – especially new types of abuse. This enables our partner teams to develop data-backed product policies and build scaled safety mitigations. Precisely understanding abuse allows us to safely enable users to build useful things with our products.
About the Role
As a Data Scientist on the Monitoring Operations team, you will be responsible for building systems to proactively identify abuse on OpenAI’s products. This includes ensuring we have robust monitoring in place for new products, and can sustain monitoring for existing products. You will also respond to critical escalations, especially those that are not caught by our existing safety systems. This will require expert understanding of our products and data, and involves working cross-functionally with product, policy, and engineering teams.
This role is based in our San Francisco office and includes participation in an on-call rotation that will involve resolving urgent escalations outside of normal work hours. Some investigations may involve sensitive content, including sexual, violent, or otherwise-disturbing material.
In this role, you will:
Scope and implement monitoring requirements for new product launches. This involves working with Product and Policy teams to understand key risks, and working with Engineering teams to ensure we have sufficient data and tooling.
Improve processes to sustain monitoring operations for existing products. This includes developing approaches to automate monitoring subtasks.
You might thrive in this role if you:
Have at least 4 years of experience doing technical analysis, especially in SQL and Python.
Have experience in trust and safety and/or have worked closely with policy, enforcement, and engineering teams
Have experience with basic data engineering, such as building core tables or writing data pipelines (not expected to build infrastructure or write production code)
Have experience scaling and automating processes, especially with language models
About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,270.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II,"$130K
/yr","Want a meaningful career where you can make a difference? Edward Jones sounds perfect for you.

Collaboration. Autonomy. Opportunity. Words our headquarters associates use when talking about working at Edward Jones. Words that describe what it's like being part of a firm where everyone is aligned toward a singular focus: serving the client. And everyone is working to make the firm better together - as they grow as individuals. If these words resonate with you, we should talk.

Job Overview

Position Schedule: Full-Time

Overview:
Come join us in Firm Strategy, where we strive to unleash the full potential of data and AI to address business challenges. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will design, develop and deliver data science solutions requiring advanced mathematical methods, statistical and machine learning models in support of data-driven strategies. You will combine data from multiple sources to develop innovative solutions to business problems and collaborate with business partners and other data scientists to develop tailored analytic solutions that inform and influence decisions across the firm.

Key Responsibilities:
Partner with business partners to design, develop and deploy solutions that enable hyper-personalized interactions.
Use machine learning, numerical optimization, and statistical modeling to discover and explain patterns in data.
Create features and develop models beyond standard toolset libraries to meet unique business challenges.
Proactively interpret and communicate findings and insights from the data to business partners. Clear communication without technical jargon is important to success.
Execute projects from design and data-gathering, through implementation, final delivery, and monitoring.
Define data needs and evaluate data quality for applicability to posed problems.
Rapidly optimize data and model inputs to increase predictiveness and relevance in response to changes in data availability, data quality, or business specifications.


Edward Jones' compensation and benefits package includes medical and prescription drug, dental, vision, voluntary benefits (such as accident, hospital indemnity, and critical illness), short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage. Short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage are provided at no cost to associates. Edward Jones offers a 401k retirement plan, and tax-advantaged accounts: health savings account, and flexible spending account. Edward Jones observes ten paid holidays and provides 15 days of vacation for new associates beginning on January 1 of each year, as well as sick time, personal days, and a paid day for volunteerism. Associates may be eligible for bonuses and profit sharing. All associates are eligible for the firm's Employee Assistance Program. For more information on the Benefits available to Edward Jones associates, please visit our benefits page.

At Edward Jones, we value and respect our associates and their contributions, and we recognize individual efforts through a rewards program that promotes a long-term career, financial security and well-being. Visit our career site to learn more about our total compensation approach, which in addition to base salary, typically includes benefits, bonuses and profit sharing. The salary range for this role is based on national data and actual pay is based on skills, experience, education, and other relevant factors for a potential new associate:

Hiring Minimum: $96471
Hiring Maximum: $164262

Read More About Job Overview

Skills/Requirements
Master of Science Degree in a quantitative field required. PhD degree desired.
5+ years professional experience.
Proficiency with one or more computing languages (Python, SQL).
Ability to deliver capabilities that derive insights or novel ideas from data and mathematical models using best data science practices. Connect insights to desired research or business outcomes.
Demonstrated ability and interest in learning new algorithms and tools, e.g. GenAI, machine learning, and optimization.
Proficiency with cloud computing platforms and distributed systems for large-scale data processing.

Please note: Candidates that live within a commutable distance from our Tempe, AZ and St. Louis, MO home office locations are expected to work in the office three days per week, with preference for Tuesday through Thursday.

Read More About Skills/Requirements

Awards & Accolades

At Edward Jones, we are building a place where everyone feels like they belong. We're proud of our associates' contributions to the firm and the recognitions we have received.

Check out our U.S. awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Check out our Canadian awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Read More About Awards & Accolades

About Us

Join a financial services firm where your contributions are valued. Edward Jones is a Fortune 500¹ company where people come first. With over 8 million clients and 19,000 financial advisors across the U.S. and Canada, we're proud to be privately-owned, placing the focus on our clients rather than shareholder returns.

Behind everything we do is our purpose: We partner for positive impact to improve the lives of our clients and colleagues, and together, better our communities and society. We are an innovative, flexible, and inclusive organization that attracts, develops, and inspires performance excellence and a sense of belonging.

People are at the center of our partnership. Edward Jones associates are seen, heard, respected, and supported. This is what we believe makes us the best place to start or build your career.

View our Purpose, Inclusion and Citizenship Report.

1Fortune 500, published June 2023, data as of December 2022. Compensation provided for using, not obtaining, the rating.

Edward Jones does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, gender, religion, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, pregnancy, veteran status, genetic information or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.",3.7,Edward Jones,United States,10000+ Employees,1922.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,United States,102.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection","$170K
/yr","Proof is the world's first identity-assured transaction management platform and we are on a mission to digitize trust for all of life’s most critical transactions. Developed by the same market leaders and experts who brought notarization online with Notarize℠, Proof offers trust in a digital world by verifying identities and securing transactions to protect businesses and their customers. Since 2015, we’ve completed many of the world’s first digital commerce transactions, including the first online real estate closing, online mortgage closing, online auto sale, and online will and we're still just getting started!

We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our Fraud Tech product engineering team. As a member of this team, you will use your analytical skills to identify and prevent fraud risks. You will work with product and engineering partners, as well as risk and policy teams to build solutions that fit product needs.

Proof is a growing startup. You will get a chance to meaningfully contribute to building new products and services leveraging novel, data driven solutions, wear multiple hats, and closely collaborate within and outside of a small team.
What you’ll do as the Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection at Proof:
Leverage advanced analytics, machine learning, and statistical methods to detect and mitigate fraudulent activities on Proof platform
Contribute to large-scale analytical fraud research and implementation projects through all stages
Partner with product managers, engineers, operational and legal teams to envision and implement best in class data based solutions
Evaluate fraud cases holistically to identify areas of improvement
Analyze and incorporate additional signals that continuously improve fraud detection
Maintain knowledge and understanding of current trends and issues affecting the area of expertise
What we're looking for:
Master’s degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related field
5+ years of experience in data science with a focus on fraud detection or a similar domain
Traditional and advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms
Excellent quantitative and analytical skills; ability to derive patterns, trends and insights, and perform risk/reward tradeoff analysis
Deep understanding of data management such as data pipeline and data quality
Experience in building machine learning powered products
Analytic thought leadership; intellectual curiosity
Effective communication skills and experience presenting findings to stakeholders
$130,000 - $210,000 a year
This is the expected cash compensation range for this position. The salary offered within this range will be determined based on factors including but not limited to skills, qualifications, experience and location. The total compensation package for this role also includes benefits such as medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability coverage, flexible paid time off, Carrot Fertility, participation in a 401(k) with company match and more!
Proof is committed to building an inclusive environment for people of all backgrounds and everyone is encouraged to apply. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We'd love to hear from you.",4.7,Proof.com,United States,1 to 50 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,170.0,United States,3.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II (NLP Required),"$90K
/yr","Job Summary:
The Data Scientist II is responsible for designing and validating predictive models, machine learning models, and artificial intelligence that inform and improve business processes across the organization (operational, clinical, financial, marketing, etc.).
Targeting a candidate fluent in NLP, generalized linear models, LLM, deep learning and predictive modeling.
Essential Functions:
Create, maintain, and communicate an analytical plan for each project
Mine and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets
Employ wide range of data sources to develop algorithms for predicting risk and understanding drivers, detecting outliers, etc.
Develop visualizations that demonstrate the efficacy of developed algorithms
Provide statistical validation and analysis of outcomes associated with clinical programs and interventions
Collaborate with other teams to integrate with existing solutions
Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders
Prepare code for operationalization of end-to-end model pipeline and deliverable for business consumption
Perform any other job duties as requested
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, other related field or equivalent years of relevant work experience is required
Minimum of three (3) years of experience in data analysis and/or analytic programming required
Experience with cloud services (such as Azure, AWS or GCP) and modern data stack (such as Databricks or Snowflakes) is preferred
Healthcare experience is preferred
Competencies, Knowledge, and Skills:
Proficient in SQL and at least one of the following programming languages: Python or R
Preferred beginner level of knowledge of developing reports or dashboards in Power BI or other business intelligence applications
Ability to perform basic statistical analyses and techniques including A/B testing, general significance testing, and sampling methodologies
Working knowledge of predictive modeling and machine learning algorithms such as generalized linear models, non-linear supervised learning models, clustering, decision trees, dimensionality reduction and natural language processing
Proficient in feature engineering techniques and exploratory data analysis
Familiarity with optimization techniques and artificial intelligence methods
Ability to analyze large quantities of information and identify patterns, irregularities, and deficiencies
Proficient with MS office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Access)
Demonstrated critical thinking, verbal communication, presentation and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and within a cross-functional team environment
Licensure and Certification:
None
Working Conditions:
General office environment; may be required to sit or stand for extended periods of time
Compensation Range:
$69,400.00 - $111,000.00
CareSource takes into consideration a combination of a candidate’s education, training, and experience as well as the position’s scope and complexity, the discretion and latitude required for the role, and other external and internal data when establishing a salary level. We are highly invested in every employee’s total well-being and offer a substantial and comprehensive total rewards package.
Compensation Type (hourly/salary):
Salary
Organization Level Competencies
Create an Inclusive Environment
Cultivate Partnerships
Develop Self and Others
Drive Execution
Influence Others
Pursue Personal Excellence
Understand the Business

This job description is not all inclusive. CareSource reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. CareSource is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are dedicated to fostering an inclusive environment that welcomes and supports individuals of all backgrounds.",3.7,CareSource,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,90.0,Remote,35.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","About Us
At Vast.ai, we value creativity, energy, drive and teamwork. We are looking for talented people who share these values to join as we grow our team. Our vision is to widely distribute AI computing to reshape our future for the good of humanity. Come join us. If witnessing the birth of AGI excites you, we can't wait to hear from you!
Vast.ai is a market based cloud computing platform focused on reducing the cost and friction of compute-intensive workloads, enabling anyone to easily leverage large-scale GPU liquidity. Vast.ai is the market leader for low cost GPU rentals. Our GPU marketplace powers AI projects and businesses all over the world.
NOTE: Currently hiring for on-site work in Westwood, Los Angeles.
About the Role
We're looking for a skilled Marketing Data Scientist to join our growing team. In this role, you'll be instrumental in applying advanced analytics to our marketing and sales funnels, driving growth and efficiency through data-driven insights. You'll work closely with our marketing, sales, and product teams to implement measurement tools, design and run A/B tests, and develop predictive models that inform our marketing strategies. This position offers a unique opportunity to apply your data science expertise in a dynamic startup environment at the forefront of AI technology.
Key Responsibilities
Develop and implement predictive analytics models for our marketing and sales funnels.
Design, implement, and analyze A/B tests to optimize marketing campaigns and user experiences.
Create SQL queries and custom analysis for production sales and website tracking data.
Develop innovative approaches using LLMs/AI for customer analysis.
Develop data-driven recommendations to inform marketing strategy and budget allocation.
Stay current with the latest data science techniques and marketing analytics trends.
You Are
A data-driven problem solver with a passion for marketing analytics.
Familiar with SQL and direct database manipulation.
Experienced in designing and implementing A/B tests and experimentation frameworks.
Proficient in statistical analysis and machine learning techniques.
An excellent communicator, able to present technical concepts to diverse audiences.
Proactive and self-motivated, with the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.
Qualifications
Master's degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or a related field.
3+ years of experience applying data science in a marketing context.
Strong programming skills in Python or R, and proficiency with SQL.
Experience with marketing analytics tools (e.g., Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics) and A/B testing platforms.
Proven track record of implementing predictive models in a business setting.
Familiarity with machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Knowledge of digital marketing channels and metrics.
Bonus: Experience in the B2B SaaS or cloud computing industry.
Benefits
Full-Time, Monday - Friday.
Onsite at the Vast.ai HQ in Westwood, Los Angeles.
Health, dental, vision and life insurance coverage.
Matching 401K.
Ambitious, fast-paced startup environment.
Generous equity.",4.5,Vast.ai,"Los Angeles, CA",201 to 500 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,CA,3.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$154K
/yr","The Microsoft AI (Artifical Intelligence) Web Data team is looking for a Data Scientist II to help us build the next generation platform for Bing and Microsoft AI. In Web Data, we are on a mission to build the most vast and accurate model of the Web to power search and AI. We are pushing frontiers of scalability and index quality by creating models and systems for discovering, storing, processing Web content, and operating AI solutions. Our core set of engineering challenges includes:
Discovering diverse content on the Web quickly and efficiently by understanding the structure and dynamics of the Web and optimizing crawl scheduling.
Building Big Data pipelines, creating ML(Machine Learning) and AI models for index selection, and determining document quality.
Designing and implementing models and pipelines for near-real time (NRT) indexing and content freshness.
Designing and implementing methods for leveraging AI in platform and backend solutions.
This is a great opportunity for someone who loves to tackle deep technical challenges and strives for industry-wide impact. At this role, you'd be dealing with and learning how to do data collection, analysis and cleaning, building Big Data pipelines, making decision based on data, doing model training and deployment, and working with LLMs both for prompt engineering and fine-tuning.

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
Acquire the data necessary for your project plan and use querying, visualization, and reporting techniques to describe that data. You’ll also explore data for key attributes and collaborate with others to perform data science experiments using established methodologies.
Understand modeling techniques, select the correct tool and approach to complete objectives, and evaluate the output for statistical and business significance. You’ll also analyze model performance and incorporate customer feedback into its evaluation.
Understand the current state of the industry, including current trends, so that you can contribute to thought leadership best practices.
Write efficient code for a specific feature, and develop a working expertise of proper debugging techniques.
Understand each customer’s business goals and learn best practices for identifying growth opportunities.
Examine projects through a customer-oriented focus, and manage customer expectations regarding project progress.
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 2+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR equivalent experience.
1+ year(s) customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR equivalent experience.
Data Science IC3 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $98,300 - $193,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $127,200 - $208,800 per year.

Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until October 21, 2024.

#Bing
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,"Redmond, WA",10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,154.0,WA,49.0,0,0,0,1,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Overview:
At LMI, we’re reimagining the path from insight to outcome at The New Speed of Possible™. Combining a legacy of over 60 years of federal expertise with our innovation ecosystem, we minimize time to value and accelerate mission success. We energize the brightest minds with emerging technologies to inspire creative solutioning and push the boundaries of capability. LMI advances the pace of progress, enabling our customers to thrive while adapting to evolving mission needs.
Responsibilities:
Frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available visualization and dashboard tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to research questions.
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications:
Pursuit of a bachelor’s degree from a HBCU or MSI in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline
Previous experience or internships at a government consulting or technology consulting firm is required
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
Preferred experience with data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics; additional preferred qualifications include working with unstructured text and natural language processing
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Applicants for this position may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Please note that only US citizens are eligible to obtain security clearances.",4.1,Logistics Management Institute,"Tysons Corner, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1961.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,105.0,VA,63.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","The Data Lab team seeks a talented data scientist - with experience in data engineering, data analysis and documentation, workflow management, and web development - to lead the team’s technical priorities. Following is an overview of key duties:

Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,131.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","ABOUT THIS POSITION
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist. The data scientist role involves solving data-driven Healthcare problems using various machine learning and predictive modeling methods. This person will primarily work as part of the larger Data Science team interacting Product Management and Application teams to conduct analysis and experimentation to maximize the utility of predictive modeling and data driven strategies across Waystar. applying machine learning, predictive modeling, and analytic components to maximize operational outcomes for healthcare providers. The ideal candidate for this position will have exposure to the healthcare revenue cycle, can approach problem-solving challenges independently, has a strong attention to detail, and enjoys working in a fast-paced, collaborative, and team-based environment.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
Must be a quick-learner with the ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Presentation abilities and the ability to communicate with all levels of the Business.
Comfortable working in ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability are key skills.
Competent communication and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Bachelor’s degree in the fields of Computer or Data Science, Statistics, or Mathematics is required. Additional experience and/or education in healthcare, business operations or other areas is preferred.
An aptitude for medical informatics is preferred
ABOUT WAYSTAR
Through a smart platform and better experience, Waystar helps providers simplify healthcare payments and yield powerful results throughout the complete revenue cycle.
Waystar’s healthcare payments platform combines innovative, cloud-based technology, robust data, and unparalleled client support to streamline workflows and improve financials so providers can focus on what matters most: their patients and communities. Waystar is trusted by 1M+ providers, 1K+ hospitals and health systems, and is connected to over 5K commercial and Medicaid/Medicare payers. We are deeply committed to living out our organizational values: honesty; kindness; passion; curiosity; fanatical focus; best work, always; making it happen; and joyful, optimistic & fun.
Waystar products have won multiple Best in KLAS® or Category Leader awards since 2010 and earned multiple #1 rankings from Black Book™ surveys since 2012. The Waystar platform supports more than 500,000 providers, 1,000 health systems and hospitals, and 5,000 payers and health plans. For more information, visit
waystar.com
or follow
@Waystar
on Twitter.
WAYSTAR PERKS
Competitive total rewards (base salary + bonus, if applicable)
Customizable benefits package (3 medical plans with Health Saving Account company match)
Generous paid time off starting at 3 weeks + 13 paid holidays including 2 personal floating holidays
Paid parental leave (including maternity + paternity leave)
Education assistance opportunities and free LinkedIn Learning access
Free mental health and family planning programs, including adoption assistance and fertility support
401(K) program with company match
Pet insurance
Employee resource groups
Waystar is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We celebrate, value, and support diversity and inclusion. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws.
This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",4.2,Waystar,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1999.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,126.0,GA,25.0,0,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Our mission is to open the door to the life-changing impact of education and help make education accessible for all. As a nimble growth stage start-up, we've emerged as the leading online education platform helping over 30 million learners and educators each month. Study.com has earned numerous awards and it has been recognized as one of the most transformational companies in EdTech, living up to our commitment to all learners: Breakthroughs Start Here. From students and educators in over 9,000 school districts that use Study.com, to working adults striving to complete their college degree or gain professional certifications, we empower them to reach their full potential. Our product is our impact! Across our college programs alone we have saved students over $200M in tuition and enabled tens of thousands to become nurses, teachers, accountants and more. Additionally, as part of our mission we've donated over $27 million across social impact programs to learners and educators.
As an education technology leader, Study.com owes much of its success to its data-driven approach. We help over thirty million learners and instructors on Study.com each month, improving their user experience and driving growth by collecting, storing, and presenting massive amounts of data that are crucial to everyday business decisions.
We're looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing team. The ideal candidate is passionate about all aspects of data – digging deep to explain observations or gain business insights, turning complex data into intuitive visualizations, transforming it to simplify future tasks and building machine learning models to provide the business with accurate predictions.
This role is based in our Mountain View, CA office and is hybrid in office Mondays, Wednesdays, and Thursdays.
What You'll Do:
Share ownership and maintenance responsibilities of our entire data warehouse, including 50-100 million events coming through a Kafka queue each day, a 20 node Cassandra cluster, a 15 TB relational database, and an integration with Google BigQuery.
Monitor and analyze the team's A/B tests and proactively communicate key insights within your team and to external stakeholders.
Be the voice of data by supporting the team's product owner in finding business opportunities, defining KPIs, and setting team goals.
Provide leadership with data pulls, analyses and deep dives that significantly influence important company decisions.
Create and update ETLs as our source data and data needs evolve
Build data visualizations and reports using Tableau
Build, maintain, and improve machine learning models (neural networks, logistic regressions, boosted trees, k-means clustering, etc.)
Innovate! We're a team that likes to stay on the cutting edge. Everyone is expected to always be looking for ways to leverage the latest technology to improve our processes and drive better results.
What You'll Bring To The Role:
3-5 years of experience in a Data Science or related role (experience with web analytics is a plus)
BS in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field (master's degree or PhD a plus)
Strong proficiency in SQL (Google BigQuery and MySQL)
Experience writing code (Python and Java/Groovy)
A willingness to work in a face-paced, dynamic environment while juggling multiple projects
A passion for innovation and learning with a driven mindset
Excellent communication skills
Nice To Have:
Experience creating complex data visualizations with Tableau
Hands-on experience with advanced statistical concepts, such as cluster analysis, singular value decomposition, gradient descent, etc.
Knowledge of web analytics software and best practices
Strong ability to use Generative AI (e.g. ChatGPT, copilot, etc.) to assist with technical tasks
The salary range for this position is $120,000 - $150,000 per year. Pay and is dependent upon factors including skills, work experience, business needs, and market demands.
At Study.com, we know that strong communities are built on the power of our diversity, and we respect and strive to understand for the diverse identities, race, ethnicities, backgrounds, and perspectives of our team members. Our work and company culture have been consistently recognized, including:
Inc. Best Place to Work
Fortune Great Places to Work – Best Workplaces in the Bay Area
Golden Bridge Awards – Gold Winner, Corporate Social Responsibility
San Francisco Business Times & Silicon Valley Business Journal – Best Places to Work
Study.com provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran or disability status. In addition to federal law requirements.
Study.com complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. Additionally, qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records will be considered for the position in accordance with applicable state and local laws.",3.0,Study.com,"Mountain View, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2002.0,Company - Private,Education & Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,135.0,CA,22.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","This Opportunity
WSP is currently initiating a search for a Data Scientist for our Baltimore, MD office. Be a member of our Planning Advisory Team a growing organization that meets our client’s objectives and solves their challenges. This position will be working full-time for our client The Maryland Transit Administration, Office of Performance Management/Office of Customer Experience (OPM/OPX) requiring on-site work in the client’s office in Baltimore’s Inner Harbor 2-3 days per week.
As a Data Scientist, you will work on a scrum team with other embedded Data Scientists, the Manager of Data Science, and the Manager of Performance Programs and Data Analytics. Your work will fall into two categories: building and maintaining technical artifacts, and building and refining processes and policies. The Data Science Team is currently working to expand its capacity, and you will contribute to that effort by building data pipelines in our Data Lake to support enterprise intelligence products, building data services that drive institutional goals, and conducting various analyses to answer specific questions for stakeholders. You will also help develop internal processes and policies by writing and updating pages in our team handbook, building Github actions and unit tests, and collaborating with team members to solve recurring technical problems.
Your Impact
Support efficient and effective operations by analyzing data in R and/or Python programming languages and delivering clear answers to specific questions.
Support the data analyst's Power BI products by designing, building, and modifying data models and data
pipelines in a manner consistent with the data science team's data governance policy.
Maintain transparency and minimize technical debt by using Git DevOps platforms to commit code, submit
merge requests, and track your work using issues and epics in a manner consistent with the data science team's DevOps policy.
Prioritize performance management projects by working with the Data Analytics team to define enterprise
objectives, user stories, and data stories.
Promote teamwork by making meaningful contributions to our team handbook, creating and modifying policies and procedures to enhance productivity.
Honor the data science team's warranty on artifacts in production by debugging and solving programming and data problems.
Identify new opportunities to improve MTA customer experience by conducting self-guided exploratory work or as part of assigned tasks.
Who You Are
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Math, Data Analysis, Accounting, Finance or related field.
1 to 3 years of relevant post education experience working as a data scientist/analyst.
A passion for improving public transportation through the effective use of data analytics.
The ability to construct complex queries in SQL involving multiple joins, sub-queries, case when statements, etc.
R and Python programming skills.
Ability to problem-solve independently using Google searches, Stack Overflow, Chat GPT, and other similar
resources.
Ability to communicate clearly and respectfully to technical and non-technical staff of differing backgrounds and experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with version control such as Git, and cloud-based services such as GitHub.
Experience working on a scrum team.
Prior experience within the engineering consulting industry is preferred.
#LI-MH4



About WSP
WSP USA is the U.S. operating company of WSP, one of the world's leading engineering and professional services firms. Dedicated to serving local communities, we are engineers, planners, technical experts, strategic advisors and construction management professionals. WSP USA designs lasting solutions in the buildings, transportation, energy, water and environment markets. With more than 15,000 employees in over 300 offices across the U.S., we partner with our clients to help communities prosper.
www.wsp.com
WSP provides a flexible and agile workplace model while meeting client needs. Employees are also afforded a comprehensive suite of benefits including medical, dental, vision, disability, life, and retirement savings focused on providing health and financial stability throughout the employee’s career.
At WSP, we want to give our employees the challenges they seek to grow their careers and knowledge base. Your daily contributions to your team will be essential in meeting client objectives, goals and challenges. Are you ready to get started?
WSP USA (and all of its U.S. companies) is an Equal Opportunity Employer Race/Age/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disability or Protected Veteran Status.
The selected candidate must be authorized to work in the United States.
NOTICE TO THIRD PARTY AGENCIES:
WSP does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters, employment agencies, or other staffing services. Unsolicited resumes include any resume or hiring document sent to WSP in the absence of a signed Service Agreement where WSP has expressly requested recruitment/staffing services specific to the position at hand. Any unsolicited resumes, including those submitted to hiring managers or other business leaders, will become the property of WSP and WSP will have the right to hire that candidate without reservation – no fee or other compensation will be owed or paid to the recruiter, employment agency, or other staffing service.",3.7,WSP,"Baltimore, MD",10000+ Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,102.0,MD,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$130K
/yr","About the Role

Houzz is looking for a world-class Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.
What You'll Do
Collaborate with leadership, product, data, and engineering teams to identify, define, and launch strategic and operational data science initiatives to improve growth performance
Define key metrics (KPIs) to guide business decision-making across various aspects of our site
Manage the key metrics of the business and product efficiently
Design product experiments, interpret results to draw detailed and impactful conclusions, and conduct root cause analysis
Work with data infrastructure/product engineering teams to define the data collection needs
Provide recommendations to assist quick product ideation and feature launch decisions
Develop and maintain data products to serve real-time business insights or to be used in production environments
Build and maintain dashboards and reports that provide actionable insights for finance, product, and sales
At a Minimum, We'd Like You to Have
Bachelors/Masters Degree with 2+ years of experience working within an analytical role in a high-growth tech company
Proficiency in writing complex SQL queries such as using aggregate functions and all types of joins using Hadoop, Hive and Presto. Strong programming skills in Python or R
Strong in problem-solving and analytical thinking to take an open business question from exploratory data analysis to actionable insights and guided execution recommendations
Proficiency in using Tableau for visualization
Proficiency in advanced experimental designing, testing, and analysis
Strong communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
A passion for analytics and product development
Self-motivated, independent, and eager to learn
Ability to have fun!
Ideally, You'll Also Have
An advanced degree in a technical field such as Statistics, Operations Research, or Engineering
Experience with subscription-based analytics, web/app user engagement, and funnel conversion
Ability to learn and act quickly, making decisions and drawing conclusions in the face of ambiguity
Experience with statistical modeling
Experience working with remote teams with a time zone difference
Compensation, Benefits and Perks

This role has an annual starting salary range of $120,000 - $140,000. In addition to salary, you’re eligible for competitive benefits that support you and your family as part of your total rewards package at Houzz. Also, depending on the role, you could be eligible for an equity award. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors, including, but not limited to, skills, experience, and specific work location.

Benefits and perks include:
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Home internet stipend
Medical, dental, and vision benefits
Maternity/paternity leave program
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Professional Development Reimbursement Program
401(k) retirement savings plans (Pre-Tax and Roth)
- Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA) - Medical & Dependent Care
Health Savings Account (HSA) with company contribution
Healthy at Houzz program

Houzz is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. When applying for a role at Houzz, we guarantee your application will be considered regardless of your sex; race; color; gender; national origin; height or weight; ancestry; physical or mental disability; medical condition; genetic information; marital status; registered domestic partner status; age; sexual orientation; military and veteran status; or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law or ordinance or regulation.

We embrace and celebrate the value that diversity brings to an organization. Diverse backgrounds and different points of view help Houzz provide the best experience for our community. Houzz is committed to fostering an inclusive environment through projects and initiatives, such as employee resource groups, that support Houzzers’ efforts to be themselves and share their lives at work.

If you would like assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please email us at accommodations@houzz.com. This information will be treated as confidential and used only for determining an appropriate accommodation for the interview process.

Houzz is an Equal Opportunity Employer. M/F/Disability/Veterans
__________________

Be Who You Are and Do What You Love at Houzz

About Houzz
When founders Adi and Alon remodeled their home, they were frustrated by the lack of resources and inspiration to help them articulate a vision and select the right pro to make it a reality.

So they built Houzz.

Houzz is now the leading platform for home remodeling and design, providing an all-in-one software solution for industry professionals and tools for homeowners to update their homes from start to finish. Using Houzz, people can find ideas and inspiration, hire professionals, and shop for products. Houzz Pro (houzz.com/pro) provides home industry professionals with a business management and marketing SaaS solution that helps them to win projects, collaborate with clients and teams, and run their business efficiently and profitably.

Our Mission and Core Values
We're proud to say there's no one quite like us. Houzz is a community-centric, innovative tech company that continues to disrupt the home renovation and design industry. Our mission-driven culture is rooted in our core values, and we’re all here for one purpose: make the home remodeling and design process more fun and productive for everyone.

Our Mission
To create the best experience for home renovation and design.

Our Core Values
We’re a Community
We put our community of Houzzers, industry professionals and homeowners first. We approach our work with care, humility and respect. We deliver value to our community through our products and services.

We Build the Future
We are visionaries who challenge the status quo. We are creative, innovative and curious. We embrace change and different ideas to drive our industry forward.

We Make Things Happen
We are solution-seekers and self-starters. We listen, move fast and empower our teams to deliver extraordinary results and products. We play to win.

By applying for a job with us, you acknowledge and agree to the terms of our Job Applicant Privacy Notice.

Roles listing ‘Remote - US’ as a location are not currently available in the following states: Alaska, Hawaii, Louisiana and Montana.

#LI-Remote",3.8,Houzz,United States,501 to 1000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,130.0,United States,15.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","Overview:
The Data Scientist will create data science and data engineering products that include data models, data ingestion/transform, analytics which may include machine learning, and some form of output as either a machine-readable format (e.g. file output, database output, standard/streaming output) or a user interface or dashboard.
Responsibilities:
Demonstrated experience with the following:
Python programming
REST APIs and microservices.
Demonstrated experience performing the extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) of structured and unstructured data
Demonstrated experience modeling, structuring, cleaning, and conditioning data from multiple sources and in multiple different formats, languages, and encodings.
Demonstrated experience with cloud services, such as AWS.preferred",2.3,SilverEdge,"Chantilly, VA",Unknown,,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,0
Associate Data Scientist,"$86K
/yr","Requisition ID: R10174460
Category: Research and Sciences
Location: Chandler, Arizona, United States of America
Clearance Type: None
Telecommute: No- Teleworking not available for this position
Shift: 1st Shift (United States of America)
Travel Required: No
Positions Available: 1
At Northrop Grumman, our employees have incredible opportunities to work on revolutionary systems that impact people's lives around the world today, and for generations to come. Our pioneering and inventive spirit has enabled us to be at the forefront of many technological advancements in our nation's history - from the first flight across the Atlantic Ocean, to stealth bombers, to landing on the moon. We look for people who have bold new ideas, courage and a pioneering spirit to join forces to invent the future, and have fun along the way. Our culture thrives on intellectual curiosity, cognitive diversity and bringing your whole self to work — and we have an insatiable drive to do what others think is impossible. Our employees are not only part of history, they're making history.
Space Systems is looking for an Associate Data Scientist to join the Launch Vehicles business unit within the Mission Assurance team located in Chandler, AZ.
This position requires the incumbent to work on-site at our Chandler campus that features engineering, office and state-of -the-art manufacturing space.
You will be part of a team that supports all of Launch Vehicles, its sibling business units and sector level initiatives. Work may vary with shifting priorities based on business needs.
The Associate Data Scientist will:
Create data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.
Conduct Analysis utilizing many applications to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization. Requires strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Create/maintain documentation of all aspects or work duties, applications, charts, training, etc. related to any tasks within the scope of responsibilities or assignment.
Generate monthly CAB metrics, Supplier Scorecards, support QA Call Board.
Create and maintain digital solutions that support Chandler/Space Sector initiatives for digital transformation.
Able to work/collaborate with a team to develop/maintain existing products/applications and supporting documentation
Able to innovate new solutions and applications from ground up to full implementation.
Must be able to take verbal feedback and determine how to implement it into the tools/applications to provide desired results to requestors
Must be able to analyze data, determine causes for discrepancies or areas of improvement, offer alternative solutions and implement them
Works primarily with immediate supervisor, project leaders, and other professionals in the section or group. May be called in to groups or meetings with high level participants. Communication of applications, skills, supporting documentation and demonstration of tools may be required.
Typical work week is 9/80A schedule. General hours are day shift, core hours of 9:00AM to 3:00PM. Hours for monthly metric generation and review will need to be flexible and could require flex schedule some evenings.
Basic Qualifications:
This position requires a Bachelor's degree with 1 year of related work experience.
Intermediate level experience in Tableau and Excel is required.
Experience using SQL databases and tools to extract necessary information for Tableau charts required.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
No clearance is required to start.
Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science with 2 years of experience is preferred.
Ability to code in Python/SQL a plus.
Salary Range: $68,500 - $102,700
The above salary range represents a general guideline; however, Northrop Grumman considers a number of factors when determining base salary offers such as the scope and responsibilities of the position and the candidate's experience, education, skills and current market conditions.
Employees may be eligible for a discretionary bonus in addition to base pay. Annual bonuses are designed to reward individual contributions as well as allow employees to share in company results. Employees in Vice President or Director positions may be eligible for Long Term Incentives. In addition, Northrop Grumman provides a variety of benefits including health insurance coverage, life and disability insurance, savings plan, Company paid holidays and paid time off (PTO) for vacation and/or personal business.
The application period for the job is estimated to be 20 days from the job posting date. However, this timeline may be shortened or extended depending on business needs and the availability of qualified candidates.
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit. U.S. Citizenship is required for all positions with a government clearance and certain other restricted positions.",4.0,Northrop Grumman,"Chandler, AZ",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,86.0,AZ,85.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","Software Bloc LLC, Plano, TX
Technologies –Proficient in Python and R with experience in SQL, GitHub (not a deal breaker), and AWS/Azure and cloud storage related experience.
Full Time

JOB DESCRIPTION

Your role will work to inform the business on strategic recommendations on data collection, integration, and retention requirements incorporating business needs and knowledge of best practices
Work on improvements to methods and algorithms, developing innovative and effective approaches to solve businesses’ analytical problems and communicate these results and methodologies to our teams
Support recommendations of ongoing improvements that lead to findings, including new information, in collaboration with our Lead Data Scientist
QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field
3+ years in a related field is preferred
Skills to communicate well in a global environment",Not listed,Software Bloc,"Plano, TX",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,102.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","DESCRIPTION:
The Data Scientist may be responsible for any of the following tasks: Analyzing data that is collected in our current and future products and services, Develop statistical and machine learning models using state of the art Machine Learning and AI technologies, Visualize insights for business actions and collaborate with Software Developers to implement into our products and services. The Data Scientist would need to be able to apply the data analysis, models, and software to the markets our products are in for us to better serve our customers. The Data Scientist must have good communication and organization skills, along with a working knowledge of day-to-day operations and priorities within their department and the company. Assume other duties as assigned.
Now offering a 4.5-day workweek!




QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Statistics or Mathematics preferred or any other quantitative discipline
Strong proficiencies in the languages, development tools, and frameworks of Python, R, SQL and Tableau
Ability to gain knowledge of the products and customers of the Auction and Heavy Equipment industries
Technical understanding regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques
General understanding of Machine Learning and AI tools and frameworks
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Knowledge of Data Ops and Data Management tools, such as Docker, Jenkins and Spark.
Adept at generating reports and presenting findings in an understandable manner
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Able to work independently and communicate within a team environment
Results oriented
Flexible and open to change
Stable and progressive work history
Professional appearance and demeanor
Ability to travel by air and ground - valid driver’s license required
Able to work with minimal supervision
In Office Position. 4.5 day regular work week. Ability to commute daily to local office is required.",3.1,"Sandhills Global, Inc.","Lincoln, NE",1001 to 5000 Employees,1978.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,111.0,NE,46.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$109K
/yr","This Data Scientist position at Mimecast is the advanced analytical engine of the Business Intelligence team, focused on solving high-value business problems using cutting-edge AI/ML tools and techniques. This role involves building and enhancing machine learning models, collaborating with stakeholders to develop new Generative AI tools, and transforming the business with actionable insights. We prioritize providing exceptional user experiences and taking on projects with game-changing potential. At Mimecast, we deliver the right data to the right people at the right time, supporting data-driven decisions with self-service dashboards, custom alerts, and executive presentations. As the company grows, so does our appetite for data, analysis, and insights.
What You'll Do:
Work cross-functionally with stakeholders across the business to evaluate, prioritize, and develop new Machine Learning and Generative AI powered solutions to solve business problems.
Own, maintain, and optimize existing Machine Learning models, as required
Work collaboratively with analysts, data engineers, and analytics engineers to bring data science and machine learning powered solutions to life.
Partner directly with functional teams to bring data and analytics expertise to our decision-making processes.
Contribute to the Data Science team’s capabilities as an internal expert on machine learning and advanced analytics.
Foster stakeholder partnerships, and work to create a culture of collaboration and data literacy to increase the company’s analytics maturity.
Present findings and technically challenging topics to a diverse group of technical and non-technical business stakeholders.
What You'll Bring:
A minimum of 3 years of work experience in data science, analytics or directly related area, during which both technical and analytical capabilities have been clearly demonstrated.
Prior success deploying machine learning solutions based on complex datasets at scale in production environments with an emphasis on creating impact to business outcomes.
Proven ability to extract actionable insights from statistical and machine learning powered models.
Strong knowledge of the underlying mathematical foundations of machine learning algorithms including linear regression, classification methods, clustering algorithms, Random Forests, time series analysis, and deep learning.
Demonstrated excellence in using Python and SQL to develop data science workflows usings tools such as scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Snowflake, and dbt.
Strong communication and presentation skills with the ability to explain complex concepts in a simple manner to colleagues & stakeholders.
Demonstrated experience collaborating and working cross-functionally with teams and stakeholders to design and implement machine learning powered solutions.
Strong understanding of best practices and KPIs around e-commerce, transactional and subscription-based products is a plus.
Experience with building solutions and utilizing tools in AWS is a plus.
Familiarity with generative AI techniques (LLMs, GANS, VAEs) and their applications in business operations is highly desirable.
What We Bring:
We’re fast thinking. We go big to reach our cyberattack-disrupting goals. And we do what we need to protect the world of business from getting important (and potentially compromising) data stolen. We never leave anyone behind. We deliver quickly – and outstandingly. We’re big on honesty because it makes us better. We’re empowered by our mission. And if cybercriminals have a good day, we work twice as hard to make the rest of their days a nightmare. That’s The Mimecast Way. And the Mimecast way is also a hybrid-working way. We empower our people to balance their time between home and the office in a way that works best for them, their team, and our stakeholders Become a Mimecaster and put corporate data under your protection. Fill our teams with respect. And bring cybercrime-obstructing energy to your work. Be passionate. Be powerful. Be alive with purpose.
#LI-ND1
DEI Statement
Cybersecurity is a community effort. That’s why we’re committed to building an inclusive, diverse community that celebrates and welcomes everyone – unless they’re a cybercriminal, of course.
We’re proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, and we’d encourage you to join us whatever your background. We particularly welcome applicants from traditionally underrepresented groups.
We consider everyone equally: your race, age, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, ability, marital status, nationality, or any other protected characteristic won’t affect your application.
If you require any adjustments or accommodations due to a disability, or any other reason that may help you in your interview process, please let us know by emailing careers@mimecast.com.
Due to certain obligations to our customers, an offer of employment will be subject to your successful completion of applicable background checks, conducted in accordance with local law.",4.0,Mimecast,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,109.0,MA,21.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","Role: Data Scientist, Senior Consultant/Consultant
Location: Miami/South Florida

Please note: This role is not eligible for 100% remote work. Employees must live within a commutable distance of the Miami Metro Area and must be willing to be onsite at the client and/or Slalom Florida office up to 5 days a week.

Who You’ll Work With
As a modern technology company, we've never met a technical challenge we didn't like. We enable our clients to learn from their data, create incredible digital experiences, and make the most of new technologies. We blend design, engineering, and analytics expertise to build the future. We surround our technologists with interesting challenges, innovative minds, and emerging technologies. Our Florida Data & Analytics practice is looking to add a Data Scientist Consultant to our locally based team.

What You’ll Do
Apply fundamental and advanced quantitative methods, including machine learning and statistical modeling, to solve complex business problems and enable data-driven decision-making (e.g., build statistical and machine learning models for trend analysis and forecasting to predict future business outcomes for a Fortune 100 company)
Collaborate with client data science teams to enhance, scale, and operationalize existing models
Communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Provide thought leadership on the latest ML/AI technologies and applications to client industry and use cases
Lead and participate in solutioning sessions, working hand-in-hand with businesses/clients, translating business objectives into actionable machine learning/data science use cases
What You’ll Bring
Production-level experience with core quantitative analysis techniques (e.g., predictive modeling, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or natural language processing) in a consulting environment
Quantitative background with relevant experience using data to solve problems and answer questions
Strong proficiency in Python, R, SQL, and experience with libraries/frameworks such as PyTorch, TensorFlow, and Scikit-learn
Experience with cloud and modern data science tools and platforms such as Databricks MLFlow, GCP BigQuery, AWS SageMaker, Kubeflow, and Azure ML
Experience using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Qlik, or Power BI
Knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practices
About Us
Slalom is a purpose-led, global business and technology consulting company. From strategy to implementation, our approach is fiercely human. In six countries and 43 markets, we deeply understand our customers—and their customers—to deliver practical, end-to-end solutions that drive meaningful impact. Backed by close partnerships with over 400 leading technology providers, our 11,000+ strong team helps people and organizations dream bigger, move faster, and build better tomorrows for all. We’re honored to be consistently recognized as a great place to work, including being one of Fortune’s 100 Best Companies to Work For seven years running. Learn more at slalom.com.
Compensation and Benefits
Slalom prides itself on helping team members thrive in their work and life. As a result, Slalom is proud to invest in benefits that include meaningful time off and paid holidays, parental leave, 401(k) with a match, a range of choices for highly subsidized health, dental, & vision coverage, adoption and fertility assistance, and short/long-term disability. We also offer additional benefits such as a yearly $350 reimbursement account for any well-being related expenses as well as discounted home, auto, and pet insurance.

Slalom is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices. Actual compensation will depend upon an individual’s skills, experience, qualifications, location, and other relevant factors.

Application Deadline:
The anticipated application deadline for this role is 11/1/2024

EEO and Accommodations
Slalom is an equal-opportunity employer and is committed to inclusion, diversity, and equity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veterans’ status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. Slalom will also consider qualified applications with criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. Slalom welcomes and encourages applications from individuals with disabilities. Reasonable accommodations are available for candidates during all aspects of the selection process. Please advise the talent acquisition team if you require accommodations during the interview process.",3.8,Slalom Consulting,"Miami, FL",10000+ Employees,2001.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,118.0,FL,23.0,1,0,0,1,0
Senior Clinical Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","As the Senior Clinical Data Scientist, you will partner with a broad range of stakeholders across the organization. You will be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data that will drive critical growth decisions and positive outcomes.

What you’ll do
Define and demonstrate clinical, operational and financial excellence of Best Buy Health products and services
Lead collaborative relationships with external partners and conduct analyses to produce peer-reviewed scientific evidence about the economic value and return on investment for care at home programs
Identify data sources, gaps in data, and metrics of value, considerations for preprocessing data, and potential internal improvements
Maintain industry knowledge to support Best Buy Health as a subject matter expert and ensure we are considering the latest trends in data and clinical research (e.g. experimental design, HEOR methodologies)
Contribute and demonstrate knowledge of ‘bread and butter’ data science techniques within, and outside of, the team

Basic qualifications
Master’s Degree in health economics, health service research, data science, epidemiology, public health or a closely related field
5+ years conducting comprehensive data analysis and research studies
3+ years of relevant experience within a healthcare / health technology setting
Publication track record in clinical field
Preferred qualifications
PhD
5+ years of experience leading data science strategy in a healthcare or health technology setting
3+ years of health economics and outcomes research experience
Strong relationship-building skills
Strong communication skills, including executive presence

Best Buy Health is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer dedicated to creating an inclusive environment that values the diversity of our employees and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant. We are committed to equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic under applicable law. Learn more about our Affirmative Action Policy Statement HERE.

Reasonable Accommodation

Best Buy Health will make reasonable accommodations for employees and applicants for their religious beliefs and practices, mental or physical disabilities, and pregnancy, childbirth and related conditions. If you need a reasonable accommodation in the application process - to access job postings, to apply for a job, for a job interview, for pre-employment testing or with the onboarding process - please contact Talent Acquisition at talent.acquisition@bestbuy.com.

To learn more about, view the “Know Your Rights” poster and Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision HERE.
Position Type: Full time",3.6,Best Buy Health,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,131.0,Remote,6.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Data Scientist II at its facility located at 500 N. Morton Ave., Morton, IL 61550. Lead large/complex projects within a systems process area. Serve as subject matter expert for global team for all key metric reporting and tools. Define requirements for system processes for major releases or emergency changes. Test accountability for systems processes for major releases or emergency changes. Manage and coordinate work for team in Bangalore. Provide guidance to other members on the global team. Perform deep-dive analysis. Generate ad-hoc reporting. Execute medium and high complexity data requests. Develop medium and high complexity PowerBI reporting. Develop medium and high complexity SAS programs and reports. Independent contributor to multi-person analytic teams. Work is typically directed by a direct supervisor, project, or team lead through a review of results. Make decisions on routine, medium risk issues that may affect the project team, suppliers, or internal customers. Mentor and develop the capabilities and organizational knowledge of more junior information scientists I & II. REQS: This position requires a Bachelor's, degree, or foreign equivalent, in Civil Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Supply Chain, Business Management or a related field and 4 years Professional experience in supply chain industry or IT. Additionally, the applicant must have employment experience with: (1) SAS; (2) SQL; (3) Datawarehouse applications Snowflake and Microsoft Power BI; (4) Python; (5) Supply Chain experience with a focus on Inventory Management; (6) Project Management; and (7) Microsoft Office tools. Telecommuting: 4 days/week. Applicants who are interested in this position should apply via www.caterpillar.com/careers , search [Data Scientist II / Reference # R0000278409]. #LI-DNI
Posting Dates:
October 14, 2024 - February 10, 2025
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Morton, IL",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,IL,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","CHEP helps move more goods to more people, in more places than any other organization on earth via our 300 million pallets, crates and containers. We employ 11,000 people and operate in more than 55 countries. Through our pioneering and sustainable share-and-reuse business model, the world’s biggest brands trust us to help them transport their goods more efficiently, safely and with less environmental impact.

What does that mean for you? You’ll join an international organization big enough to take you anywhere, and small enough to get you there sooner. You’ll help change how goods get to market and contribute to global sustainability. You’ll be empowered to bring your authentic self to work and be surrounded by diverse and driven professionals. And you can maximize your work-life balance and flexibility through our
Hybrid Work Model
.
Job Description
POSITION PURPOSE
To assist in developing tools and technologies that leverage data from a variety of sources to increase supply chain efficiencies and provide value to our customers.
MAJOR / KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
Responsible for experimenting with and implementing machine learning techniques on internal/external customer projects
Responsible for learning new data science techniques/programming languages and exploring their viability on current projects
Will contribute to data science team discussions, providing insight as needed on current approaches and methods
MEASURES
Successful application of data science principles
Successful completion of projects
AUTHORITY / DECISION MAKING
Data science model selection and implementation
Working autonomously
KEY CONTACTS
Internal: Other data scientists, data science manager, project stakeholders
External: Project stakeholders
QUALIFICATIONS
BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems and/or equivalent formal training
Proficient with machine learning and statistics
Proficient with Python, deep learning frameworks, Spark
Excellent communication skills
Desirable Qualifications:
1-2 years work experience in data science position
Proficient with Go, C/C++, other languages
Proficient with cloud computing environments, Kubernetes, etc.
Software development experience
EXPERIENCE
Participated in numerous data science projects
Utilized several data science methodologies
Have worked autonomously and delivered results on schedule
Have presented results to non-data scientist audience
SKILLS AND KNOWLEDGE
Strong programming skills (Python, R, etc.)
Knowledge of major data science topics, models, and methods (from logistic regression to advanced neural networks)
Strong analytical skills
Preferred Education
Bachelors
Preferred Level of Work Experience
1 - 3 years
Remote Type
Hybrid Remote
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, and we are committed to developing a diverse workforce in which everyone is treated fairly, with respect, and has the opportunity to contribute to business success while realizing his or her potential. This means harnessing the unique skills and experience that each individual brings and we do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state, or local protected class.
Individuals fraudulently misrepresenting themselves as Brambles or CHEP representatives have scheduled interviews and offered fraudulent employment opportunities with the intent to commit identity theft or solicit money. Brambles and CHEP never conduct interviews via online chat or request money as a term of employment. If you have a question as to the legitimacy of an interview or job offer, please contact us at recruitment@brambles.com.",4.4,Brambles Group,"Santa Clara, CA",10000+ Employees,1875.0,Company - Public,Shipping & Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,125.0,CA,149.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist III,"$151K
/yr","Our Opportunity:
Do you want to build a model that impacts the company's bottom line? Do you want to see how your ideas, insights, recommendations, and experiments affect top-level decision-makers? If so, Chewy is looking for a Data Scientist III to join our Merchandising Data Science Team. In this role, you will combine deep understanding of machine learning, advanced data analysis, statistical testing, and the ability to communicate insights effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders. As a Data Scientist III, you will play a crucial part in designing, implementing, and deploying machine learning models to solve complex problems for our Retail Operations business partners.
The ideal candidate will operate as a full stack data scientist who should have expertise in both machine learning and cloud technologies. In this role, they will have the opportunity to develop and implement sophisticated data models and analytics solutions to support strategic decision-making across the organization.
What you'll do:
Design, develop, and implement machine learning models for various applications, including but not limited to predictive analytics, natural language processing, and computer vision.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms to address specific business challenges.
Analyze large, complex data sets to extract actionable insights and identify trends, patterns, and opportunities.
Oversee data collection, cleansing, and validation processes to ensure data integrity and reliability.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data scientists, software engineers, and domain experts, to understand requirements and deliver effective solutions.
Document code, algorithms, and processes to facilitate knowledge sharing and ensure reproducibility.
Provide technical guidance in best practices for model development to the data science team.
Effectively communicate complex technical concepts and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
What you'll need:
Candidate must possess a Graduate Degree (MS/PhD) in Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, Mathematics, or related discipline.
6+ years of experience in developing and deploying advanced machine learning models and algorithms in a production environment.
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, machine learning, and deep learning techniques.
Expertise in programming languages such as Python.
Advanced proficiency with SQL
Proficiency with version control systems (e.g., Git) and collaborative coding practices.
Good understanding of cloud platforms such as AWS.
Strong problem-solving skills and the ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent oral and written communication skills including the ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time
Chewy is committed to equal opportunity. We value and embrace diversity and inclusion of all Team Members. If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or similar law, and you need an accommodation during the application process or to perform these job requirements, or if you need a religious accommodation, please contact CAAR@chewy.com.

If you have a question regarding your application, please contact HR@chewy.com.

To access Chewy's Customer Privacy Policy, please click here. To access Chewy's California CPRA Job Applicant Privacy Policy, please click here.",3.4,Chewy,"Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,2011.0,Company - Public,Pet & Pet Supplies Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,151.0,MA,13.0,1,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist I,"$116K
/yr","JOB DESCRIPTION:
Apply statistical modeling, data transformation, data mining and machine learning to develop predictive models, attributes, alerts and indicators to improve Identity Access Management and Point of Contact processes for insurance carriers. Execute database queries to extract and aggregate LN’s data assets into attributes used for predictive modeling, reporting and analysis. Analyze client data to prepare for analysis. Identifies data quality concerns and opportunities (i.e. performance indicators, scores, approval/declination indicators, etc.) and clearly communicate these concerns to stakeholders. Explore and mine new data sources to help optimize and validate existing models. Review product results and communicate findings to internal and external stakeholders. Ideate, research and design new analytics and data science methodologies on large scale and complex data assets. Store, archive, index, transfer and analyze large and complex datasets (structured and unstructured data). Create and enhance Python/R or GUI-based reporting tools that allow team members to gain insights about LexisNexis data assets. Enforce data quality testing best practices. Perform other duties as needed.
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s or foreign equivalent degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Information Systems, or a related field required.
3 years of experience in job offered or related occupations required.
Also required is: 2 years of experience: in advanced ECL Programming (HPCC Systems); with Record Linking for Insurance Header files; creating product dashboards using PowerBI; and batch LexID assignment for customer records.
Employee reports to LexisNexis Risk Solutions, Inc. office in Alpharetta, GA, but may telecommute from any location within the U.S.
Experience can be concurrent.
#LI-DNI
#ICT
LexisNexis, a division of RELX, is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. We are committed to providing a fair and accessible hiring process. If you have a disability or other need that requires accommodation or adjustment, please let us know by completing our Applicant Request Support Form:
https://forms.office.com/r/eVgFxjLmAK
, or please contact 1-855-833-5120.
Please read our
Candidate Privacy Policy
.",4.2,RELX,"Alpharetta, GA",10000+ Employees,1880.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,116.0,GA,144.0,1,0,0,0,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$91K
/yr","Orbis Operations is seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Junior Data Scientist to support our growing team in the collection, transformation, and analysis of open source data. In this role, you will be responsible for building data pipelines, cleaning and organizing datasets, and providing data-driven insights to support government missions. While experience with AI and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, this role focuses primarily on open source data collection and processing, offering an excellent opportunity for career growth in the data science field.
Key Responsibilities
Duties/Responsibilities
Assist in the collection, preprocessing, and transformation of large-scale open source datasets from various structured and unstructured sources.
Develop and maintain data pipelines to ensure efficient data flow and integration across different platforms.
Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) to uncover patterns and insights in open source data that align with mission objectives.
Collaborate with data engineers, software developers, and mission stakeholders to understand data requirements and deliver tailored solutions.
Write clear, well-documented code to automate data processing tasks and streamline workflows.
Generate reports and visualizations that communicate findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Stay up to date with trends in open-source data tools, technologies, and methodologies to continuously improve data collection and pipelining processes.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This position has no supervisory responsibilities
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, or related field, or equivalent work experience.
1-3 years of experience working in data science, with a focus on open source data collection, cleaning, and pipelining.
Strong programming skills in Python, with familiarity in libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and requests for data manipulation and processing.
Experience working with APIs and web scraping tools to collect and integrate data from open source platforms.
Understanding of data cleaning, transformation, and storage best practices.
Strong problem-solving skills, with an ability to manage multiple tasks and projects simultaneously.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to work effectively in a team and present findings to non-technical audiences.
ACTIVE Security Clearance TS SCI w POLY
Preferred Qualifications
Experience working with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) for data storage and processing.
Familiarity with SQL or NoSQL databases for querying and managing datasets.
Knowledge of data visualization tools such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, or Power BI.
Experience with natural language processing (NLP) and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, but not required.
Prior experience working on government or public sector projects.
Physical Requirements
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer.
Routine video conference and/or in-person meetings.
Ability to attend planned meetings within the Washington Metro Area region.
We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

Location
McLean, VA",3.9,Orbis Operations Management Company,"McLean, VA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,91.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$160K
/yr","Snapshot
We are a highly innovative AI startup that builds products and solutions from the ground up while using cutting-edge technology. We are seeking a data scientist with machine learning and Python experience to work with our team to develop our products for predictive maintenance (PMX) and digital signals processing (DSP).
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in a quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
2+ years of experience in Python data science stack: NumPy, Pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow/PyTorch, PySpark, Dask, Matplotlib, Seaborn, Bokeh, etc.
A strong sense of ownership and accountability; eagerness to learn skills as needed by business focus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable with public speaking and presenting to executives
Responsibilities
Build innovative data analytics and machine learning pipelines.
Become an expert in predictive maintenance (PMX) or signals processing products. Attend conferences and assess competitive products.
Meet with domain experts and present to stakeholders regularly.
Salary range: $140,000-$180,000",4.3,PUTNAM RECRUITING GROUP,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Private,Staffing & Subcontracting,Human Resources & Staffing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,160.0,Remote,,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","At Similarweb, we are revolutionizing the way businesses interact with the digital world by revealing to them everything that happens online.
Our unique data and solutions empower over 4,300 customers globally, including industry giants like Google, eBay, and Adidas, to make game-changing decisions that drive their digital strategies.
In 2021, we went public on the New York Stock Exchange, and we continue to reach new heights! Come work alongside Similarwebbers across the globe who are bright, curious, practical and good people.
We're looking for a Data Analyst / Data Scientist to partner with our consulting team by delivering best-in-class data analysis for research projects for prospective and existing clients, and driving value for clients' strategic business needs.
This role will report to the Research Analytics Manager of Data Labs.
Why is this role so important at Similarweb?
Similarweb is more than just a data provider. We develop long-term and collaborative partnerships with our clients, and are constantly striving to help them make better business decisions using our data. One of the ways we do this is through our advisory services.
As a Data Analyst, you will work with our team of Advisory Services Consultants and Data Engineering team, to create customized data analyses using Similarweb data.
Your data analysis will support our prospective clients' and existing clients' strategic business needs, and help the business increase and retain customers.
So, what will you be doing all day?
Your role as part of the Data Labs Team means your daily responsibilities may include:
Partnering with our in-house consultants and GTM teams to scope out custom data analysis projects for client
Building models and utilizing sophisticated technology such as web scraping and AI to enrich datasets to target client pain points
Collaborating with Data Engineering to ensure the existence of use-case specific data, and estimating the availability and effort required to produce specific custom reports
Preparing and communicating customized data analysis to advisory services consultant, to ensure successful delivery to clients
This is the perfect job for someone who:
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in data analysis (Python, Excel, Tableau, SQL)
Can use their analytical skills to drive business impact
Has a general understanding of digital marketing trends
Has experience in client-facing roles (preferred)
Has experience working collectively with other teams and stakeholders to accomplish business goals
Is able to apply relevant industry knowledge to solve specific client business needs, and demonstrate value within individual client use cases
**At Similarweb, collaborating with our colleagues in-office creates a more connected, unified culture. Our best work is a product of our face-to-face collaboration, with the ability to work partially from home.**
Why you'll love being a Similarwebber:
You'll actually love the product you work with: Our customers aren't our only raving fans. When we asked our employees why they chose to come work at Similarweb, 99% of them said ""the product."" Imagine how exciting your job is when you get to work with the most powerful digital intelligence platform in the world.
You'll find a home for your big ideas: We encourage an open dialogue and empower employees to bring their ideas to the table. You'll find the resources you need to take initiative and create meaningful change within the organization.
We offer competitive perks & benefits: We take your well-being seriously, and offer competitive compensation packages to all employees. We also put a strong emphasis on community, with regular team outings and happy hours.
You can grow your career in any direction you choose: Interested in becoming a VP or want to transition into a different department? Whether it's Career Week, personalized coaching, or our ongoing learning solutions, you'll find all the tools and opportunities you need to develop your career right here.
Diversity isn't just a buzzword: People want to work in a place where they can be themselves. We strive to create a workplace that is reflective of the communities we serve, where everyone is empowered to bring their full, authentic selves to work. We are committed to inclusivity across race, gender, ethnicity, culture, sexual orientation, age, religion, spirituality, identity and experience. Our culture of equality and mutual respect also helps us better understand and serve our customers in a world that is becoming more global, more diverse, and more digital every day.
We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here, as applicable: https://www.similarweb.com/corp/legal/applicant-privacy-policies/
* Please note: We're unable to sponsor employment visas at this time.*
#LI-DC #LI-Hybrid

We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here.",3.9,Similarweb,"Burlington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,118.0,MA,16.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$120K
/yr","Job Overviews
Location:
Salt Lake City, UTAH
Job Title:
Data Engineer
Experience:
9 Years
Employement:
Full Time
Job Code:
998163

Job Details
The Data Scientist will be responsible for utilizing advanced analytics and statistical modeling techniques to extract valuable insights from complex data sets. S/he will play a pivotal role in developing innovative solutions, optimizing business operations, and driving data-driven decision-making processes. S/he will possess a strong background in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling, and exceptional problem-solving and communication skills. The Data Scientist will use various methods to transform raw data into useful data systems. S/he will create algorithms and conduct statistical analysis. Overall, you’ll strive for efficiency by aligning data systems with business goals.
Job Responsibilities
Identify, collect, and analyze large volumes of structured and unstructured data from various sources, including internal databases, external APIs, and third-party vendors.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure its quality, integrity, and suitability for analysis.
Conduct exploratory data analysis to identify patterns, trends, and anomalies that can provide actionable insights.
Develop and implement advanced statistical models and machine learning algorithms to solve complex business problems, such as demand forecasting, customer segmentation, or anomaly detection.
Apply state-of-the-art machine learning techniques, including deep learning, natural language processing, and computer vision, to extract meaningful information from diverse data types.
Evaluate and optimize models for accuracy, performance, and scalability.
Create visually appealing and intuitive data visualizations to effectively communicate findings and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Prepare clear and concise reports, presentations, and dashboards that summarize analytical results and provide actionable recommendations.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to deliver data-driven insights and contribute to evidence-based decision-making processes.
Collaborate with IT teams to identify and implement appropriate data infrastructure and tools, such as data lakes, data warehouses, or cloud-based solutions.
Develop and maintain robust data pipelines and workflows for efficient data ingestion, processing, and storage.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries and manage database performance and scalability.
Job Requirements
Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, including software engineers, data engineers, business analysts, and product managers, to define project requirements and deliverables.
Mentor and provide guidance to junior data scientists and analysts, fostering a culture of learning and growth.
Work with stakeholders, including the Executive, Product, Data, and Design teams, to support their data infrastructure needs and assist with data-related technical issues.
Collect, manage, and convert raw data into information that can be interpreted by data scientists and business analysts.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, assembling large, complex data sets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements.
Implement server-side logic and database integration using programming languages like Python, Java, or Node.js.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries, and manage database performance and scalability.
Conduct unit testing, integration testing, and troubleshooting issues to ensure the overall quality and reliability of software applications.
Identify and resolve performance bottlenecks in both front-end and back-end systems to ensure optimal user experience.
Create and maintain technical documentation, including system architecture, API documentation, and user guides.
Continuously research and evaluate emerging technologies, tools, and frameworks to improve development practices and enhance the software stack.
Skill & Experience
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or Information Systems, or Progressive experience in Computer Science with experience in the development of applications.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or Scala, along with familiarity with data manipulation libraries (e.g., pandas, NumPy) and machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Strong knowledge of statistical analysis, machine learning techniques, and data modeling.
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI) and proficiency in SQL and working with databases.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving abilities, with the capability to interpret complex data sets and derive actionable insights.
Outstanding communication skills, with the ability to effectively present complex ideas and findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.",5.0,CloudBerg Tec,"Salt Lake City, UT",Unknown,,Unknown,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,UT,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$132K
/yr","About Direct To Consumer (DTC)
Disney’s Direct to Consumer team oversees the Hulu and Disney+ streaming businesses within Disney Entertainment helping to bring The Walt Disney Company’s best-in-class storytelling to fans and families everywhere.
The Walt Disney Company Direct to Consumer’s (DTC) Data Science team combines deep data analysis and research of our rich user data to present a compelling vision around user retention and preferences across the vast ecosystem of our product offerings and content. We are the insights and modeling partners for the content, marketing, product, and engineering teams at Disney+, Hulu and ESPN+.
As Data Scientists, we use data to empower decision-makers with information, predictions, and insights that ultimately influence the experiences of millions of users worldwide. If you are someone who loves to work cross-functionally, build models, perform statistical analysis, and create visualizations to provide scalable and iterative capabilities, then this is a fantastic role for you!
What You'll Do
Modeling: Apply state of the art machine learning and statistical analysis to develop models related to opportunity sizing, targeting, and optimization.
Deep analysis: Analyze user behavioral data to identify patterns, uncover opportunities, and create common understanding of how people are interacting with the service and content.
Visualization of Insights: Development of prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, and robust analytics leading to impactful insights communicated clearly and visually.
Partnership: Partner closely with business stakeholders to identify and unlock opportunities, and with other data teams to improve platform capabilities around data modeling, data visualization, experimentation and data architecture.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field
3+ years related experience with developing machine learning models and conducting statistical analysis
Deep understanding of machine learning concepts and statistical methods
Ability to draw insights and conclusions from data to inform model development and business decisions
Desire to collaborate with other data scientists, data analysts, and key business partners
Proficient in analyzing data and developing ML models using Python (with ML frameworks like tensorflow, scikit-learn, etc.)
Capable of reading and writing Object-Oriented code to review and implement modeling pipelines (Airflow, Luigi, etc.)
Understanding of SQL and distributed data technologies (Hive, Spark)
Preferred Qualifications
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Physics or related quantitative field (e.g. Econometrics, Mathematics, Operations Research)
Working knowledge of Bayesian modeling and familiarity with probabilistic programming packages/language such as Stan, PyMC
Experience fully integrating data science solutions into the business and operationalizing ML models
Additional Information
#DISNEYTECH

The hiring range for this position in the Los Angeles, CA area is $112,600-$151,000. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate’s geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",3.9,Disney Direct to Consumer,"Santa Monica, CA",10000+ Employees,1923.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,132.0,CA,101.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$177K
/yr","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the team
The Data Science team of the Tech and Product department at TikTok USDS is responsible for building high-quality and timely data solutions for the business as the single source of truth and for building easy-to-use and scalable data products to support business growth. You will have the exciting opportunity to:
Conduct product analytics to provide product recommendations that drive product growth
Deep dive into data sources, understand their limitations, and communicate complex data insights through exploratory analysis and research to suggest improvement
Design and monitor core metrics; understand root causes of metric movements
Design and build advanced analytical solutions and models to deliver superior business outcomes
In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.
Qualifications
Previous internship(s) or 1-2 years of full-time experience
Experience with SQL, Python, or R
Experience navigating and working with large data sets using SQL
Self-motivated, detail-oriented, learn autonomously, and highly organized
Ability to conduct rigorous analysis and communicate conclusions to both technical and non-technical audiences
BS/MS in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Statistics, or other science and engineering fields
Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States. This position is not eligible for visa sponsorship or support.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at https://shorturl.at/ktJP6

This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $114000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,177.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
"NAMS2 - Data Scientist I, II, III","$101K
/yr","Company Description

Crown is a leader in planning and implementing aerospace and advanced transportation services, with a focus on advanced air mobility (AAM). We have more than three decades of experience in developing strategy, exploring concepts, assessing technologies, developing use cases, and projecting economic impacts for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), and State Departments of Transportation. We are looking for an exceptional new team member to join our Crown innovators working with companies and government agencies to safely advance aviation’s newest frontier. Join our team to pioneer a better, more sustainable future

Job Description

Crown is looking for all levels of Data Scientists to work on the NAMS-2 project in Mountain View, CA to:
Identify trends, patterns, and anomalies found in big data sets by performing extensive data analysis to develop insights.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes to prepare data, implement data models, conduct analysis, and develop databases.
Interpret results from multiple structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques and tools.
Collaborate with teams to understand each data analysis projects' underlying purpose, focus, and objectives.
Design, develops, and implements the most valuable data-driven solutions for the
organization

Qualifications

Level I - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 0-2 years of related experience.
Level II - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Exposure to some of the complex tasks within the job function. Requires 2 -4 years of related experience.
Level III - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 5 - 8 years of related experience.

Additional Information

Visit: www.crownci.com for additional information on our company.
Competitive benefits program and matching 401K!
Crown is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, age, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.
Persons unable to complete an online application should contact Crown HR for assistance at (703) 650-0663 ext 3059.
Crown is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor
Crown was voted Best Places to Work in 2021
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Crown Consulting, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1989.0,Company - Private,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,101.0,CA,35.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Title: Data Scientist - Big Data Engineer
Place of Performance: Remote - Austin, TX 77040
Duration: 9 Months Approx.

About Radiant
Radiant is committed to solving complex challenges for our customers by delivering innovative technology solutions. Our client-centric model increases transparency and accountability, which helps promote efficiency and effectiveness. We work and grow together with our customers, and we help empower our clients to achieve success. Our flexible delivery model allows us to provide end-to-end solution delivery, single project execution, and, or strategic resources. CMMI Maturity Level III and ISO 9001 2015 certified.

Required Skills:
4 years of Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 years of Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 years of Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 years of Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 years of Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 years of Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 years Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.

Responsibilities:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
The above job description and requirements are general in nature and may be subject to change based on the specific needs and requirements of the organization and project.

This is a remote position.",3.1,Radiant Digital,"Austin, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2000.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,TX,24.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$57.50
/hr","Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Experience:
Data Scientist: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",Not listed,Tekfocus Minds LLC,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,57.5,Remote,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$55.50
/hr","Job Overview:
The Office of the Attorney General’s Chief Data Office (CDO) is seeking a dynamic and visionary Data Scientist to join our team and support our System Modernization efforts for the Child Support Division.
This individual must be able to work in a heavily technical environment, preparing and optimizing data for Snowflake and utilizing SAS Viya to build comprehensive federal and state reports.
You will play a pivotal role in transforming, analyzing, and leveraging our data assets to drive strategic initiatives and business outcomes.
You must be comfortable analyzing data, developing predictive modeling algorithms, and can communicate your findings through visualizations enabling the discovery of solutions to business problems.
As a Data Scientist your role will be impactful, visible, and rewarding.
Responsibilities will include:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
Required Qualification/Skill Experience:
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 Years: Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 Years: Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Position Details:
The primary work location(s) will be at OAG State Office located at 5500 E. Oltorf St, Austin, TX 78741.
Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.
The working position is Telework.
Services are expected to start 11/12/2024 and are expected to complete by 08/31/2025. Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 1000 hours. This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing. ""work made to hire.""
Pay: $58/hr as W2.
S#: 302CSD2504
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $53.00 - $58.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics and business intelligence tools: 4 years (Required)
Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, R: 4 years (Required)
Data conversion and report building Snowflake and SAS Viya.: 4 years (Required)
Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment: 4 years (Required)
Proficiency in ETL processes & tools as AWS Glue and Lambda: 4 years (Required)
Strong knowledge of database Mangat. & Data warehousing: 4 years (Required)
Ability to Commute:
Austin, TX 78741 (Required)
Ability to Relocate:
Austin, TX 78741: Relocate before starting work (Required)
Work Location: In person",5.0,Advanced Proactive Solutions LLC,"Austin, TX",Unknown,,Company - Private,Security & Protective,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,55.5,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Data Lake","$90K
/yr","For over 90 years, Topcon’s vision has been to solve societal challenges around the globe. In healthcare, we are developing innovations that improve patients’ health and quality of life.
We empower eye care providers with advanced imaging, diagnostic solutions, and intelligent data technology. Our robotic devices deliver simplicity without compromise, by capturing clear images with the push of a button.
By joining Topcon Healthcare, you become part of a growing, diverse, global team. With office locations throughout North America, whether you are on-site, remote, or hybrid, our culture empowers you to contribute to company and personal success each day. At Topcon Healthcare, you can grow your career, gain new perspectives, and help address society’s most pressing challenges. If you have drive, passion, and a desire to be part of a collaborative team, we want to hear from you.
At Topcon Healthcare, we don’t wait for the future. We invent it. Join us.
Learn more about working with us at
topconcareers.com
THI is seeking a mission-driven a Data Scientist, Data Lake specialized in data cleaning, curation, and labeling. This role will play a critical role in ensuring the quality and usability of ophthalmic data for machine learning and other analytics initiatives. This individual will be responsible for developing and implementing data cleaning and preprocessing pipelines, curating datasets for specific use cases, and executing data labeling efforts.
Main Responsibilities:
Data Cleaning and Preprocessing:
Design and implement robust data cleaning processes to identify and address missing values, outliers, inconsistencies, and errors in datasets.
Develop and maintain data preprocessing pipelines to standardize, transform, and normalize data.
Utilize statistical and machine learning techniques to identify and correct data quality issues.
Data Curation and Labelling:
Select, extract, and organize relevant data from diverse sources to create curated datasets tailored to specific use cases.
Ensure data consistency, integrity, and documentation throughout the curation process.
Design and manage data labeling projects to generate high-quality labeled data.
Implement quality control measures to ensure the accuracy and consistency of labeled data.
Develop and maintain tools and scripts for automating data cleaning, curation, and labeling tasks.
Collaboration and Communication:
Collaborate with clinical scientists, data engineers, ML engineers, and domain experts to understand data needs and challenges.
Clearly communicate data quality findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Stay up to date on the latest techniques and tools in data cleaning, curation, and labeling.
Qualifications:
BSc or MSc in Life Sciences, Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computer or Data Science
2 years’ experience doing clinical science or developing data-driven algorithms for medical devices.
Experience in the ophthalmic industry is preferred, and experience with OCT data is highly preferred.
Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, set priorities, and handle multiple tasks and projects with a high degree of efficiency and comfort with ambiguity.
Expertise with statistical packages such as Python or R is highly desirable.
Expertise with Matlab, IDL, or similar packages is highly desirable.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with cloud computing applications (such as AWS or Azure)
A passion for leveraging data to improve patient care and drive innovation
Base Pay:
Expected Base Pay Range: $70,000 to $110,000 Annualized
The base pay range included is a projected hiring range for a position, level and potential work location(s) listed. Topcon provides the compensation range that it in good faith believes it might pay and/or offer for this position. This compensation range is based on a full-time schedule.
Benefits*:
Topcon offers a comprehensive benefit package for this position including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, tax saving spending accounts a 401(k) plan with employer match, tuition reimbursement in addition to other perks and benefits. We also offer time off for our employees to recharge. Our employees are eligible for paid company holidays, paid personal time off, and paid sick time that meets or exceeds state/local requirements.
Topcon reserves the right to ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and offer additional benefits and other compensation; individual candidate compensation may be determined based on individual skills, experience, training, certifications, education, final work location and other factors not related to an applicant’s sex or other status protected by local, state, or federal law. Changes in the position level, location or other factors associated with the role may change the final determined compensation. The recruiter can provide additional information during the hiring process.
Topcon time off policies can vary between roles which are exempt or non-exempt. For hourly (“non-exempt”) employees, we offer personal paid time off which accrues in accordance with local standards. For salaried (“exempt”) employees, we offer a flexible paid time off policy giving you flexibility to take time when needed, while supporting business needs. All paid time off policies are in accordance with or exceeding local law. Employees working at least 30 hours per week are eligible for our Health and Welfare benefit package.
EEO Statement:
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status.",3.2,Topcon Healthcare,"La Jolla, CA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,90.0,CA,,1,0,0,1,0
IT Data Scientist I-IV,"$103K
/yr","IT Data Scientist I-IV
- (2400277)

Founded in 1934, Medical Mutual is the oldest and one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio. We provide peace of mind to more than 1.6 million Ohioans through our high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans.
Medical Mutual’ s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we don’t answer to Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us and help our members achieve their best possible health and quality of life.
IT Data Scientist I
Entry-level data scientist developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist II
Experienced junior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends
IT Data Scientist III
Senior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Senior data scientists are expected to be self-sufficient and able to assist in coaching junior data scientists. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist IV
Expert data science developer responsible for leading team activities for design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
Responsibilities
IT Data Scientist I
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist II
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist III
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist IV
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned

Qualifications
IT Data Scientist I
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
0 to 1-year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
Python programming language
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist II
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
2+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
2+ years of experience with SQL programming language
1+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist III
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
4+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
4+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Advanced programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist IV
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
6+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
6+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Mastery of programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
Medical Mutual is looking to grow our team! We truly value and respect the talents and abilities of all of our employees. That's why we offer an exceptional package that includes:
A Great Place to Work
We will provide the equipment you need for this role, including a laptop, monitors, keyboard, mouse, and headset.
Whether you are working remotely or in the office, employees have access to on-site fitness centers at many locations, or a gym membership reimbursement when there is no Medical Mutual facility available. Enjoy the use of weights, cardio machines, locker rooms, classes and more.
On-site cafeteria, serving hot breakfast and lunch, at our Brooklyn, OH location. Convenience stores at many locations.
Discounts at many places in and around town, just for being a Medical Mutual team member.
The opportunity to earn cash rewards for shopping with our customers.
Business casual attire, including jeans.
Excellent Benefits
Employee bonus program
401(k) with company match up to 4% and an additional company contribution.
Health Savings Account with a company matching contribution.
Excellent medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance — insurance is what we do best, and we make affordable coverage for our team a priority.
Access to an Employee Assistance Program, which includes professional counseling, personal and professional coaching, self-help resources and assistance with work/life benefits.
Company holidays and up to 16 PTO days during the first year of employment with options to carry over unused PTO time.
After one year of service, parental leave for eligible employees who become parents through maternity, paternity, or adoption.

An Investment in You
Career development programs and classes.
Mentoring and coaching to help you advance in your career.
Tuition reimbursement up to $5,250 per year, the IRS maximum.
Diverse, inclusive, and welcoming culture with Business Resource Groups.

About Medical Mutual
Medical Mutual’s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we do not answer Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us.
There is a good chance you already know many of our Medical Mutual customers. As the official insurer of everything you love, we are trusted by businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout Ohio to provide high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans. Our plans provide peace of mind to more than 1.5 million Ohioans.
We are not just one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio, we are also the longest running. Founded in 1934, we aree proud of our rich history with the communities where we live and work.
At Medical Mutual and its family of companies we celebrate differences and are mutually invested in our employees and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse and nicotine testing.

Primary Location US-OH-Brooklyn
Work Locations Brooklyn 100 American Road Brooklyn 44144
Job 7 - General Staff
Organization Enterprise Analytics
Schedule Regular
Shift Standard
Employee Status Individual Contributor
Job Type Full-time
Job Level Day Job
Job Posting Oct 16, 2024, 2:39:10 PM",4.1,Medical Mutual of Ohio,"Brooklyn, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1934.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,OH,90.0,1,0,1,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$77K
/yr","Transport is at the core of modern society. Imagine using your expertise to shape sustainable transport and infrastructure solutions for the future? If you seek to make a difference on a global scale, working with next-gen technologies and the sharpest collaborative teams, then we could be a perfect match.
What you will do
As a Data Scientist, you will apply advanced data analytics techniques to analyze various types of vehicle and test data and provide detailed insights to simulation and engineering teams. The position entails a high level of collaboration with engineering teams working on future products, analyzing different types of logged and/or measured data (high frequency and low frequency) from customer trucks, field trucks and test vehicles to help make data driven engineering decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Utilize advanced analytics and machine learning techniques on customer and test vehicle data to extract meaningful insights and provide actionable recommendations to engineering and simulation teams
Integrate data from multiple sources (Customer vehicles, test vehicles etc.) and automate data flow, ensuring data quality and consistency, to facilitate deployment of advanced analytics techniques within vehicle engineering
Create data visualizations and dashboards to translate technical and customer data to provide actionable insights to stakeholders
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product development, and IT, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Collaborate with global teams on developing and improving analysis & simulation strategies based on actual customer data
Collaborate with engineering, testing and IT teams to drive development of AI/ML models to support and accelerate predictive modeling in engineering
Stay updated with the latest advancements in data science and automotive technologies to continuously improve usage of data analytics within vehicle engineering

Your future team
The Advanced Calculation Team is an important part of the Vehicle Engineering function for Volvo Group Trucks Technology, north America. Our team is a dynamic team of highly competent engineers who specialize in various CAE disciplines. We are responsible for ensuring functional requirements are met for durability & reliability, thermal management, cooling performance and other mechanical systems for heavy duty trucks developed for North America.
Who are you?
Do you dream big? We do too, and we are excited to grow together. In this role, you will bring:
A strong attention to detail with the ability to interpret data and translate information into actionable intelligence.
Capable of networking with individuals and teams across various departments and sites, sharing information and resources as needed, and working towards achieving common group goals.
Effective communication with the ability to listen effectively, transmit information accurately, and actively seek feedback from other experienced engineers, project managers, etc.
Ability to perform a wide range of tasks, respond positively to changing timelines and/or project scope, and open to accepting new challenges, responsibilities, and assignments.
Ease with communicating highly technical information to people of varying technical ability.
A desire and passion to create the very best product, working as an integral part of a highly technical organization.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
1-3 years of experience in data analytics with automotive industry background. Heavy duty vehicle experience is considered a plus
Demonstrated experience with machine learning and advanced analytics for predictive modeling such as regression analysis, neural networks (Deep Learning, RNN, LSTM, DQN etc.), time series forecasting, classification, clustering etc.
Proficiency in statistical analysis methods and programming languages such as Python (including libraries like Numpy, SciPy, Pandas, Tensorflow), SQL, Git, Azure, Hadoop, Matlab/Simulink, pySpark
Experience with building dashboards and help create visualizations from data using PowerBI, QlikView, Tableau etc.
Familiarity with Database Management Systems (BDMS) and proficiency in querying and manipulating data using SQL
Experience with Git and version control methods is a plus

What’s in it for you?
We offer a solid package of compensation and benefits, plus you will enjoy:
An organization the prioritizes employee's health and well-being.
Working in an empowered team solving complex challenges.
Opportunity to work with new technologies such as automation, electromobility, and connectivity.
Modern workspaces that allow agility and collaboration.
Multiple electric charging stations for cars.
Onsite facilities and activities that make everyday life easier including a cafeteria, chair massages, fitness center and fitness classes offered daily.
Ready for the next move?
If you are a Data Analyst / Scientist with an interest in working with a global organization focused on impacting everyday lives, apply today and join our team on this exciting journey!

We value your data privacy and therefore do not accept applications via mail.

Who we are and what we believe in
Our focus on Inclusion, Diversity, and Equity allows each of us the opportunity to bring our full authentic self to work and thrive by providing a safe and supportive environment, free of harassment and discrimination. We are committed to removing the barriers to entry, which is why we ask that even if you feel you may not meet every qualification on the job description, please apply and let us decide. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.”

Applying to this job offers you the opportunity to join Volvo Group. Every day, across the globe, our trucks, buses, engines, construction equipment, financial services, and solutions make modern life possible. We are almost 100,000 people empowered to shape the future landscape of efficient, safe and sustainable transport solutions. Fulfilling our mission creates countless career opportunities for talents with sharp minds and passion across the group’s leading brands and entities.

Group Trucks Technology are seeking talents to help design sustainable transportation solutions for the future. As part of our team, you’ll help us by engineering exciting next-gen technologies and contribute to projects that determine new, sustainable solutions. Bring your love of developing systems, working collaboratively, and your advanced skills to a place where you can make an impact. Join our design shift that leaves society in good shape for the next generation.",4.1,Volvo Group,"Greensboro, NC",10000+ Employees,1927.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,77.0,NC,97.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist (Mid),"$118K
/yr","This job opportunity is part of an RFP process; candidates are invited to submit their resumes detailing relevant experience.
Location: Bethesda, MD (Hybrid)
LCG is a minority-owned technology consulting firm that has been a trusted partner to more than 40 federal agencies, including 21 of the 27 Institutes and Centers (ICs) at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). For over 25 years, LCG has brought digitization and innovation to the Health and Human Services (HHS) and the NIH ecosystems. We support IT organizations by bringing precision technology and operation models that achieve mission capabilities and performance success.
Job Title: Data Scientist (Mid)
Job Summary: We are seeking an intermediate-level Data Scientist to perform extensive data analysis on large datasets to develop insights, identify trends, patterns, and anomalies. The successful candidate will collaborate with various teams to understand project objectives, perform data mining, data cleaning, and aggregation, and implement data models. This role will involve working with structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques. The Data Scientist will also support cloud computing initiatives, including developing automation solutions and enabling scientific cloud workflows.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and interpret large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation to prepare data for analysis and model implementation.
Develop and implement data models, conduct analysis, and interpret results using statistical techniques.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand the objectives and focus of data analysis projects.
Design, develop, and implement data-driven solutions to support organizational objectives.
Contribute to cloud computing initiatives, including automated self-service portals, cloud module development, and integration support for scientific computing.
Assist with cloud security operations by supporting the validation of security vulnerabilities and maintaining necessary security documentation.
Provide data analysis and insights to support decision-making for cloud environments, including usage, cost, and workload rationalization.
Support cloud workload migration projects by performing infrastructure assessments and assisting in business case development.
Collaborate with product management and development teams to support data-driven decisions for cloud platforms and products.
Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in data analysis, statistical modeling, and data mining.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, SQL, and experience with data visualization tools.
Knowledge of cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP) and experience with GitHub API integrations.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with attention to detail.
Familiarity with cloud security best practices and compliance standards such as NIST and FISMA.
Experience in cloud computing, scientific workflows, and automation.
Familiarity with Azure Active Directory (AD) and GitHub automation tools.
Experience in cloud enablement and workload migration for scientific computing environments.
Knowledge of federal security and compliance standards.

The projected compensation range for this position is $98,100 to $135,750 per year benchmarked in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. The target salary is 114,000. The salary range provided is a good faith estimate representative of all experience levels. Salary at LCG is determined by various factors, including but not limited to role, location, the combination of education/training, knowledge, skills, competencies, certifications, and work experience.
LCG offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance options (medical, dental, vision), life and disability insurance, retirement plan contributions, as well as paid leave, federal holidays, professional development, and lifestyle benefits.
Devoted to Fair and Inclusive Practices
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. If you are interested in applying for employment with LCG and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department by email at hr@lcginc.com.
Securing Your Data
Beware of fraudulent job offers using LCG's name. LCG will never request payment-related details or advancement of money during the application process. Legitimate communication will only come from lcginc.com or system@hirebridgemail.com emails, not free commercial services like Gmail or WhatsApp. If you receive suspicious emails asking for payment or personal information, contact us immediately at hr@lcginc.com.
If you believe you are the victim of a scam, contact your local law enforcement and report the incident to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.",3.8,"LCG, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1990.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,118.0,MD,34.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","We are searching for a Data Scientist – someone who works well in a fast-paced setting. In this position, you will harness the largest pediatric healthcare dataset in the nation to deliver analytics, insights, and solutions that help us create a healthier future for our global community.
The individual in this role delivers data analytics and supports the development and implementation of advanced analytic tools to meet the needs of teams throughout the organization. Works with a multidisciplinary team to design, develop, and create analytical solutions through applications of data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), and emerging technologies. Collaborates with clinical, business, and information systems team members to ideate and create new analytic solutions impacting patient care and hospital operations. Partners with subject matter experts to understand the relationship
between workflows and data and uses that data to create innovative solutions that support and advance targeted outcomes.
Exercises knowledge of descriptive, predictive, and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques, to develop strategic insights to drive operational and clinical goals.
Teaches developers, architects and analysts how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Provides data science and statistical support for advanced analytics projects at Texas Children's Hospital. Analyzes and interprets clinical, operational, and other data to provide insight into care delivery and operational initiatives. Responsible for evaluating data quality, preparing data, generating insights, and developing and presenting high-impact data stories. Serves as a subject matter expert associated with data analysis processes, advanced analytics techniques, statistics, and meaningful data visualizations. Provides consultation and support in the development, analysis, interpretation, and management of a
variety of complex data sources. Works on multiple concurrent projects.
Think you’ve got what it takes?
Job Duties & Responsibilities
Creates data models and generates data insights
Generates and communicates business and clinical insights, using various techniques and understanding the strengths and risks of different approaches to data analysis
Analyzes large, noisy datasets and identifies meaningful patterns that provide actionable results. Data sources may include the Enterprise Data Warehouse, various source systems and databases, and data from external sources such as the Census Bureau. Source data may include both structured and unstructured data
Evaluates and communicates data quality within the context of the problem being analyzed, and implements appropriate data cleaning techniques when preparing data
Performs basic and advanced statistical analyses, modeling, interpretation, documentation, and presentation
Builds and tests statistical, optimization, and machine learning models, including regression, classification, clustering, natural language processing, deep learning, and/or statistical modeling. Applies best practices for data preparation, statistical methods, and approaches to data analysis to ensure valid and reliable results
Independently owns descriptive, diagnostic analysis of complex data problems, consulting with data architects and subject matter experts as needed.
Designs, develops, and creates advanced analytical solutions
Communicates data insights and acts as a data storyteller by translating data analyses into easily understandable dialogue and terms to influence business decisions or actions.
Provides statistical consultation
Plans, communicates, and manages risk related to tasks
Participates in overall analytics and application support delivery activities
Skills & Requirements
Required master's degree in mathematics, computer science, statistics, engineering, analytics, life sciences, or a specific healthcare field (such as nursing, pharmacy, respiratory, etc.)
Preferred Ph. D
3 years of experience in experience in data science, data analytics, business analysis, data modeling, statistical analysis, statistical modeling, or machine learning
A Ph. D may substitute for 2 years of experience.",3.7,Texas Children's Hospital,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1954.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,TX,70.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Data Scientist, Growth","$175K
/yr","The Wealthfront Data Science Team utilizes our rich financial and behavioral data to influence key product and marketing decisions, as well as to safeguard our clients’ information and assets. The team draws from backgrounds in Computer Science, Natural Sciences, Statistics, Operations Research and Econometrics.

The Data Scientist in this role will be primarily embedded within Wealthfront’s Growth Team. The Growth Team is focused on acquiring new clients, as well as deepening Wealthfront’s relationship to existing clients. The team addresses this mandate by designing creative initiatives that cut across product lines. These initiatives can include testing new in-app features, discovering new channels of client acquisition, launching email campaigns, or targeted incentives – all based on unique insights about our clients and their interaction with the prevailing economic environment.

A fundamental trait for an effective Growth Data Scientist is curiosity for discovering new insights about client behavior. This person will enjoy going deep into the data to understand what’s driving client actions, proposing ideas for new projects and for driving clarity on the ‘why’ behind experiment results.

Technical tools used in this role include Hypothesis testing (potentially with atypical distributions), mathematical transforms of variables, data mining, natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML). You don't need experience in all of the techniques but must have the ability to pick them up as needed.

Potential project areas for this role include (but are not limited to) analyzing client signup flow, creating client groups according to business rules or automated clustering, creating ML models for estimating incentive revenues or costs and Named Entity Recognition using NLP.
Responsibilities
Demonstrate an owner’s mindset in formulation, execution, communication and timing of your projects.
Analyze and explain A/B test experiment results. Investigate why the experiment was a success or a failure. Discover client segments for whom the experiment worked unusually well or otherwise.
Suggest follow ups for recently concluded initiatives and experiments. Create and present rationales for questions including whether the experiment should be continued, and what should be different in the next iteration.
Work closely with Product, Design, Engineering and User Research members on the Growth Team to craft a long term (quarterly) learning plan and subsequently execute your part in that plan.
Collaborate with cross functional stakeholders to come up with feasibility of an experiment, experiment structure and opportunity sizing/impact of the experiment to guide the team’s roadmap.
Work with Data platform teams to procure required (but unavailable) data.
Enhance overall Data Science team execution through hands-on help, design feedback and peer review.
Requirements
A Master's or a PhD degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, or Natural Sciences with 4+ years of prior experience in a Data Science role. Exceptions to these requirements may be considered on a case-by-case basis.
Prior experience in Growth or Marketing
Prior experience analyzing complex experiments, including developing data insights and data backed recommendations for stakeholders.
Strong communication, storytelling and collaboration skills and a record of partnering across organizations to sharpen project requirements. Sometimes this includes re-framing the original request to solve a more general problem with similar effort.
Hands-on mathematical and software engineering skills to execute on complex projects.
Proficiency in Python and SQL.
Desire and ability to mentor junior Data Scientists within the team by exemplifying math, engineering and technical communication skills.
Estimated annual salary range: $165,000 - $185,000 USD plus equity and a discretionary bonus.

Benefits include medical, vision, dental, 401K plan, generous time off, parental leave, wellness reimbursements, professional development, employee investing discount, and more!

About Wealthfront

Wealthfront started with the ambition to transform the investment advisory business, with the goal to unlock access to high quality investment advice for millions who were underserved by the traditional institutions. We built one of the first automated investment products that allows you to invest in a personalized portfolio of thousands of companies in seconds for a remarkably low fee. We then expanded. We now work with partner banks to offer exceptional banking features through a Wealthfront Brokerage Cash Account, which makes it remarkably easy for people to automate their finances end-to-end and eliminated the hassle of money management, all of which resulted in attracting more than $70 billion of our client’s hard earned money, pioneering the robo-advisor category and transforming the broader industry. And yet, we have a long way to go to achieve our mission to build a financial system that favors people, not institutions.

Wealthfront’s vision is to make it delightfully easy to build long-term wealth on your own terms. This vision is more relevant than ever because millions more people are getting into the market early and investing their hard earned savings in a handful of stocks. While this is a great way to start, it is inconsistent with building long-term wealth. We want to empower young investors to expand their horizon, and easily explore and execute on a wider range of investing strategies, make informed investment decisions that are consistent with their values and beliefs while also making it effortless to grow and compound their savings exponentially in a way that’s transformational to their lives and their long-term future.

For more information please visit www.wealthfront.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Please review our candidate privacy notice.",4.1,Wealthfront,"Palo Alto, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,CA,13.0,1,0,0,1,0
DH Data Scientist,"$173K
/yr","Job Description:
Job Summary
The Data Scientist is responsible for maximizing the value of rich date resources available. This person will independently investigate and derive actionable insights to drive improvement for research and development and for clinical deployment of DeepHealth products.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Utilize statistics, data mining and programming knowledge to analyze clinical data and present insights to key stakeholders.
Identify patterns to drive improvement of research, product development and clinical deployment.
Generate and test hypotheses independently.
Investigate and improve data quality.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze product performance.
Summarize data in concise reports including tables, plots and other visual representations.
Document analysis for the engineering and clinical teams.

PLEASE NOTE: This is not an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities and requirements of the position described above. Other functions may be assigned and management retains the right to add or change duties at any time.

Minimum Qualifications, Education, and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in relevant field such as computer science, math, statistics, engineering (M.S. preferred).
At least two (2) years of experience (five plus (5+) years preferred).
Expertise in Python and scientific libraries such as numpy and pandas.
Expertise with data visualization techniques.
Experience working with medical data.
Experience evaluating machine learning models.
Experience evaluating clinical performance preferred.
Familiarity with machine learning techniques preferred.
Strong individual team contributor and collaborator.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.

Quality Standards
Communicates, cooperates, and consistently functions professionally and harmoniously with all levels of supervision, co-workers, patients, visitors, and vendors.
Demonstrates initiative, personal awareness, professionalism and integrity, and exercise confidentiality in all areas of performance.
Follows all local, state and federal laws concerning employment to include but not limited to: I-9, Harassment, EEOC, Civil rights and ADA.
Follows OSHA regulations, RadNet and site protocols, policies and procedures.
Follows HIPAA, compliance, privacy, safety and confidentiality standards at all times.
Practices universal safety precautions.
Promotes good public relations on the phone and in person.
Adapts and is willing to learn new tasks, methods, and systems.
Reports to work regularly as scheduled; consistently punctual with respect to working hours and lunch schedules, and maintains satisfactory personal attendance in accordance with RadNet guidelines.
Consistently adheres to the time management policies and procedures.
Completes job responsibilities in a quality and timely manner.

Physical Demands
This position often requires sitting, standing, walking, bending, twisting, reaching with hands and arms, using hands and fingers, handling, or feeling, speaking, listening, and high-level cognitive thinking. Must be able to use a computer and other office machinery including copiers, scanners and computer software. Must be able to lift up to 10 pounds occasionally. The position requires the ability to travel (~20% of time), drive a vehicle, and utilize other forms of transportation.

Working Environment
Office setting

Pay Range: USD $165,000.00 - USD $180,000.00 /Yr.",2.6,Deephealth,"Cambridge, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,173.0,MA,40.0,1,0,0,1,1
Wildfire Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills and talents to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.
Position Summary

We are seeking a highly skilled Data Scientist to join our team focused on innovative Wildfire Mitigation strategies. As a Data Scientist specializing in wildfire mitigation, you will play a crucial role in leveraging data-driven insights to develop and implement proactive measures to mitigate the impact of wildfires on communities and utility infrastructure. This position will analyze historical wildfire data, data on wildfire ignitions, data from vegetation management, and other relevant datasets to develop predictive models to assess wildfire risks and behavior to aid in prevention of wildfire events.
This is a hybrid position with 3-days per week (T-W-Th) in office at the Xcel Energy location listed for this position.
Applicants must be authorized to work for ANY employer in the U.S. We are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment visa at this time for this position.

Essential Responsibilities
Follow consistent practices to ensure data integrity and deal with imperfections in data. Champion the acquisition of new data sources to enhance value and fill gaps; automate collection processes; effectively process structured and semi-structured/unstructured data; proficiently integrate varied datasets; collaborate with business stakeholders as needed to ensure solid data understanding and proper data transformation; work cross-functionally with development and engineering teams; analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns; draw conclusions and gain actionable insights.
Build predictive models; propose solutions and strategies for business problems; apply the appropriate machine learning algorithm to data problems (e.g. supervised vs. unsupervised machine learning, clustering, ensemble methods, etc.); validate model results. Work closely with architecture and engineering team to deploy models; communicate results in a clear and non-technical manner.
Interact with senior management and effectively communicate technical information to numerous audiences (e.g. senior management, client community, peers and junior associates);effectively develop relationships with individuals inside and outside of IT; deliver difficult messages and express disagreement with others with confidence and self-control; address challenges to analytic processes and influence others to change their approach and work collectively to implement new tools/techniques; gain support from related stakeholders for analytic solutions and champion data driven business decisions.
Apply appropriate statistical techniques to data exploration and model development/assessment; communicate complex statistical concepts to non-technical audiences; maintain skills through continuing education.
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate results and highlight business impact; utilize various techniques and delivery methods of visualization that are audience appropriate.
Effectively collaborate with others to deliver efficient and high quality code; implement solid validation process to ensure consistency and minimize errors; champion more efficient ways to produce code iteratively; maintain skills through continuing education; stay up to date on new technologies/ tools; seamlessly transition between languages to apply the right approach to the problem.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT or math related field and 7 years of experience in analytics OR Master's degree in IT or math related field and 5 years of experience in an analytics
Problem solving skills, business acumen, and demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills
Expert SQL, Python skills Distributed Computing experience Excellent data visualization skills
Knowledge of data architecture and structure
Experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, predictive modeling are imperative; text mining and topic modeling are plus
Experience with Neural Networks and corresponding technologies
As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com.
Non-Bargaining
The anticipated starting base pay for this position is: $92,300.00 to $130,567.00 per year
This position is eligible for the following benefits: Annual Incentive Program, Medical/Pharmacy Plan, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Dependent Care Reimbursement Account, Health Care Reimbursement Account, Health Savings Account (HSA) (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Limited-Purpose FSA (if enrolled in eligible health plan and HSA), Transportation Reimbursement Account, Short-term disability (STD), Long-term disability (LTD), Employee Assistance Program (EAP), Fitness Center Reimbursement (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Tuition reimbursement, Transit programs, Employee recognition program, Pension, 401(k) plan, Paid time off (PTO), Holidays, Volunteer Paid Time Off (VPTO), Parental Leave
Benefit plans are subject to change and Xcel Energy has the right to end, suspend, or amend any of its plans, at any time, in whole or in part.
Deadline to Apply: 10/24/24
EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)
ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.",3.3,Xcel Energy,"Denver, CO",10000+ Employees,1909.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,111.0,CO,115.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","As a Data Scientist with a focus on machine learning, you will be responsible for developing and deploying data models that provide critical insights to drive data-driven decision-making across the organization. You'll work with large datasets to build predictive and prescriptive models, evaluate their performance, and collaborate with cross-functional teams to implement these models into business processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection, Cleaning, and Preparation:
Source and collect large datasets from multiple sources, ensuring high data quality.
Perform data preprocessing, including cleaning, normalization, transformation, and feature engineering, to prepare data for machine learning models.
Manage data pipelines and ensure efficient data flow for real-time analysis.
Model Development and Deployment:
Design, develop, and validate machine learning models for classification, regression, clustering, and recommendation systems.
Deploy machine learning models in production environments, ensuring they operate efficiently and scale as needed.
Continuously monitor, test, and update models in production to maintain optimal performance.
Machine Learning Techniques and Analysis:
Apply machine learning algorithms, including supervised and unsupervised learning techniques, to solve complex business problems.
Conduct A/B testing, cross-validation, and hyperparameter tuning to optimize models for accuracy and generalizability.
Leverage advanced techniques such as deep learning, reinforcement learning, or natural language processing when appropriate.
Visualization and Communication:
Visualize complex data and model outcomes using data visualization tools like Matplotlib, Seaborn, and Tableau to effectively communicate insights.
Present findings and actionable insights to non-technical stakeholders through clear, concise reports and presentations.
Collaborate with product managers, engineers, and business analysts to translate data insights into strategic initiatives.
Project Management and Cross-Functional Collaboration:
Lead data science projects from concept to completion, managing timelines, objectives, and deliverables.
Work closely with data engineers to maintain data infrastructure and optimize data processing workflows.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business goals and ensure that data science efforts are aligned with organizational objectives.
Continuous Learning and Development:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in data science and machine learning, and experiment with new tools and techniques.
Share knowledge and best practices with the data science team, contributing to the team's growth and development.
Attend conferences, workshops, and other professional development opportunities to enhance skills and knowledge.
Key Skills and Qualifications:
Technical Skills:
Programming Languages: Proficiency in Python or R, with strong knowledge of libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and Scikit-learn for data manipulation and model building.
Machine Learning Frameworks: Experience with TensorFlow, PyTorch, or Keras for building and deploying machine learning models.
Big Data Technologies: Familiarity with tools like Apache Spark, Hadoop, or Dask for processing and analyzing large datasets.
SQL: Ability to write complex SQL queries to extract, transform, and load data from relational databases.
Machine Learning Knowledge:
Supervised Learning: Experience with classification, regression, and time-series forecasting models.
Unsupervised Learning: Knowledge of clustering, principal component analysis (PCA), and anomaly detection.
Deep Learning: Understanding of neural networks and deep learning architectures for tasks such as image and speech recognition.
NLP: Familiarity with natural language processing techniques, such as topic modeling, sentiment analysis, and text classification.
Data Visualization:
Proficiency in data visualization tools, such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, Plotly, or Power BI, to create compelling visualizations of data and model results.
Experience with dashboarding tools, like Tableau or Power BI, to create interactive reports and dashboards.
Statistical and Mathematical Skills:
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, hypothesis testing, and probability.
Knowledge of linear algebra, calculus, and optimization methods commonly used in machine learning.
Soft Skills:
Problem-Solving: Ability to analyze complex problems and develop data-driven solutions.
Communication: Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to present technical information to non-technical stakeholders.
Collaboration: Experience working in cross-functional teams, with the ability to build strong relationships with team members across the organization.
Education and Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field. A Ph.D. is a plus.
Experience: 2+ years of experience in data science, with a focus on building and deploying machine learning models in a business setting.
Portfolio: A portfolio of completed projects demonstrating experience in machine learning, with examples of model development, deployment, and impact on business outcomes.
Example Projects:
Predictive Analytics: Developed a model to predict customer churn, enabling the company to implement targeted retention strategies.
Recommendation System: Built a recommendation engine for personalized product recommendations, which increased customer engagement.
Sentiment Analysis: Implemented a sentiment analysis model for customer feedback, helping the marketing team to understand customer sentiment and adjust campaigns accordingly.
Anomaly Detection: Created an anomaly detection model for fraud detection, reducing fraudulent transactions by identifying patterns in real-time.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $118,635.00 - $128,216.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Natural language processing: 1 year (Required)
Machine learning: 1 year (Required)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
Regression analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work Location: On the road",1.0,KesarWeb,United States,1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,123.0,United States,,1,0,1,0,1
"Data Scientist I, Lega Lab","$94K
/yr","WHY UT SOUTHWESTERN?
With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. As a world-renowned medical and research center, we strive to provide the best possible care, resources, and benefits for our valued employees. Ranked as the number 1 hospital in Dallas-Fort Worth according to U.S. News & World Report , we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development to align with your future goals. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more. We invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you'll discover a culture of teamwork, professionalism, and a rewarding career!

JOB SUMMARY
Works under specific direction to provide analysis and develops algorithms and software for clinical and/or basic research problems. Impacts data acquisition, management, and analysis in basic, translational, and clinical research, including clinical trials.

A Data Scientist I position is available in the Dr. Bradley Lega laboratory. Dr. Lega is an Associate Professor in the Department of Neurological Surgery at UT Southwestern Medical Center. He has secondary appointments in Neurology and Psychiatry. Dr. Lega's research focuses on how brain conditions affect memory. The research he began at the University of Pennsylvania, and that he continues at UT Southwestern, focuses on preserving memory function and restoring memory to patients with brain injuries or brain tumors.

This candidate will support study efforts studying intercranial Signal and data analysis for a new project. Prefer Master's degree or PHD in computational field. Candidate will need to be organized and have the ability to collaborate with trainees including undergraduate, graduate, medical students, as well as post-doctoral fellows and co-workers.

BENEFITS
UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:

PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage

100% coverage for preventive healthcare-no copay

Paid Time Off, available day one

Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)

Paid Parental Leave Benefit

Wellness programs

Tuition Reimbursement

Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer

Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!

EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATION
Required

Education
Master's Degree M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field or
Bachelor's Degree B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics

Experience

JOB DUTIES

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.

SECURITY AND EEO STATEMENT
Security
This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code 51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information.

EEO Statement
UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. Benefits UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:
PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage
100% coverage for preventive healthcare – no copay
Paid Time Off, available day one
Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)
Paid Parental Leave Benefit
Wellness programs
Tuition Reimbursement
Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer
Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!",3.9,UT Southwestern,"Dallas, TX",10000+ Employees,1943.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,94.0,TX,81.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","The Group:
Morningstar’s Research group provides independent analysis on individual securities, funds, markets, and portfolios. The Research group also provides data on hundreds of thousands of investment offerings, including stocks, mutual funds, and similar vehicles, along with real-time global market data on millions of equities, indexes, futures, options, commodities, and precious metals, in addition to foreign exchange and Treasury markets. Morningstar is one of the largest independent sources of fund, equity, and credit data and research in the world, and our advocacy for investors’ interests is the foundation of our company.

The Role:
As a Data Scientist, you will be a leading contributor in the implementation of Artificial Intelligence (AI) within Data Collections software applications, API’s, and other data products. This role requires significant interaction with both upstream and downstream stakeholders across Technology, Data, Products, Sales/Service, and Research.

The Data Scientist will transition approved Data Collections AI products from a prototype phase to a scalable and consumable service. Often, these services must be integrated into Morningstar’s platform of financial products, so that our clients can use these software tools in the investment decision-making process.

We are looking for an individual who possesses strong technical development skills, an ability to follow analyst requirements and technical specifications for robust code, and a passion for investment research.

This position reports to the Tech Manager of the Data Collections AI team. This position is based in our Chicago office. We follow a hybrid policy of 3 days onsite and 2 days remote work. Candidates must be currently authorized to work Permanently in the United States - this position does not sponsor H-1B Visa.

Responsibilities:
Automate manual data collection processes by applying cutting-edge solutions to tackle NLP problems, e.g., text classification, NER tasks.
Collaborate with upstream data analysts to clarify business needs, define project scope, design ML/AI solutions, and iteratively improve workflows and data storage practices
Implement ML/AI solutions from start to finish and collaborate with peer engineering teams for model deployment
Design innovative ways to improve automation rates for data collection
Research on latest technologies and propose new solutions to existing problems
Participate in team brainstorming sessions, provide guidance to MLDAs (machine learning data analysts), and contribute to the codebase
Introduce and follow good development practices, innovative frameworks and technology solutions
Follow best practices like estimation, planning, reporting and improvement brought to processes in daily work

Requirements:
No minimal industrial experience is required, if you have a Ph.D. degree in engineering, computer science, statistics or related field
Must demonstrate ML/AI knowledge and skills through research and/or side-projects in NLP related fields, if you have no prior industrial experience
Must have 2+ years of industrial experience in a data science role featuring NLP tasks, if you have a master’s degree or below
Fluent with Python and related packages like NumPy, pandas, scikit-learn, NLTK, PyTorch, TensorFlow, etc.
Sound knowledge of common ML/AI algorithms (e.g., linear/logistic regression, random forest, gradient boosting) and Deep Learning algorithms in particular (e.g., transformers, BERT, open-source LLMs)
Experience with SQL
Great communication and presentation skills
Able to work independently and being proactive
Experience with generative AI is preferred
Experience with finetuning LLMs is preferred
Experience with DevOps tools (e.g. Sagemaker, Git, Jenkins) is desirable
Experience developing and deploying solutions using services in the Amazon AWS ecosystem (Lambda, Sagemaker, EC2, RDS, EMR) is desirable
Intermediate knowledge of statistical methods is desirable
Familiarity with common data cleaning and munging techniques
Familiarity with data visualization
Familiarity with statistical methods, e.g., linear/logistic regression, optimization
Familiarity with mutual fund, fixed income, and equity data is a plus

001_MstarInc Morningstar Inc. Legal Entity
Morningstar’s hybrid work environment gives you the opportunity to work remotely and collaborate in-person each week. We’ve found that we’re at our best when we’re purposely together on a regular basis, at least three days each week. A range of other benefits are also available to enhance flexibility as needs change. No matter where you are, you’ll have tools and resources to engage meaningfully with your global colleagues.",3.9,Morningstar,"Chicago, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,IL,40.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$108K
/yr","Feedzai is the world's first RiskOps platform for financial risk management, and the market leader in safeguarding global commerce with today's most advanced cloud-based risk management platform, powered by machine learning and artificial intelligence. Feedzai is securing the transition to a cashless world while enabling digital trust in every transaction and payment type. The world's largest banks, processors, and retailers trust Feedzai to protect trillions of dollars and manage risk while improving the customer experience for everyday users, without compromising privacy. Feedzai is a Series D company and has raised $282M to date. With a valuation of +$1.5B, the company's technology protects 900 million people in 190 countries.
The Data Science Team within Customer Success is highly engaged with our clients making use of their critical thinking skills with a business-focused mentality and customer-facing attitude. They activate, maintain, and support clients, develop models and rules, and train & enable them. In addition, they work cross-functionally with other departments (e.g., Research, Product, Marketing) in a collaborative team spirit spanning the globe to ensure we deliver best in class risk prevention solutions. Being on the frontline of fighting crime and protecting people from financial harm is incredibly inspiring to each of us. Join Us!
Your Day to Day:
Understanding the data which our clients provide to us;
Cleaning that data and validating that it is correct;
Preprocessing the data, usually by using a mixture of shell scripts and a programming language such as Python, Java, Scala, etc
Iteratively computing features and tuning parameters to improve the quality of the model;
Communicating your findings to the project manager and assisting him/her in decision making on the Data Science part of the project;
Work together with key stakeholders (data scientists, engineers, risk managers) from our clients;
Work with other parts of the organization (Product, Research, etc.) to improve processes, best practices and tooling.
You Have & You Know-how:
MSc or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related field;
We welcome candidates with a minimum of 2 years of experience, ranging up to senior-level professionals;
Proficient in Machine Learning (training and testing, avoiding overfit, etc.);
Knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Spark, Hadoop and related;
Proficiency in bash, Python and either Java or Scala;
Knowledge of resource monitoring and runtime optimization (both at JVM and OS level);
Knowledge of statistics or data visualization is a plus;
Knowledge of tree based algorithms (Random Forests, XGBoost, LGBM) is a plus;
Knowledge of Deep Learning algorithms is a plus;
Ability to communicate your findings in a clear way.
The Customer Success Team is responsible for delivering our product to our clients. This includes education, configuration, solution development, and risk strategy to enable our clients to address their pain points. We collaborate with our clients to ensure they have the right solution, build out a strategy and training plan for them, and then support them through each phase of our client lifecycle. We grow at a fast clip and believe no challenge is too big or too small. Therefore, we have an open environment that encourages us to lean in, try new things, and discover our potential. Join Us!
#LI-IP1 #LI-Hybrid
Your First 30-Days at Feedzai:
You will be immersed in our brand with training, connections, and one-on-one time with your manager. You may shadow your colleagues virtually or onsite at an office depending on where you work as you are supported through your Feedzai journey. In addition, you will have access to a ton of information to give you history, context, and all the knowledge you can handle about Feedzai and the team. Finally, you will start working on projects and collaborating on work currently being done. We can't wait to have you join the team!
Life at Feedzai Instagram
Feedzai Culture
Feedzai is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Feedzai does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies.
Feedzai will use the personal data you provide us with by filling out this form for reviewing your application and to potentially negotiate a contract with you. Your personal data will be retained by Feedzai for 24 months following your application. Please see our Privacy Notice available at https://feedzai.com/about-us/privacy/ for more information on how we process your personal data.",3.1,Feedzai,"Atlanta, GA",501 to 1000 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,108.0,GA,13.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$127K
/yr","Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.
Micron Technology is a world leader in innovating memory and storage solutions that accelerate the transformation of information into intelligence, inspiring the world to learn, communicate and advance faster than ever.
As a Data Scientist at Micron Technologies, you will play a crucial role in analyzing and extracting valuable insights from large datasets related to semiconductor manufacturing, process optimization, and quality control. You'll collaborate with multi-functional teams to develop innovative solutions that improve product performance, yield, and reliability.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Data Analysis: Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) on semiconductor manufacturing data, including wafer fabrication, yield, and defect rates.
Model Development: Develop predictive models using machine learning techniques (such as regression, classification, and clustering) to optimize manufacturing processes and improve product quality.
Feature Engineering: Extract relevant features from raw data, considering factors like material properties, process parameters, and environmental conditions.
Anomaly Detection: Identify anomalies and outliers in semiconductor production data, suggesting corrective actions to improve yield.
Collaboration: Work closely with engineers, physicists, and domain experts to understand semiconductor processes and translate business requirements into data-driven solutions.
Visualization: Build clear and informative visualizations to communicate findings and insights to collaborators.
Continuous Improvement: Stay up to date with industry trends, research advancements, and emerging technologies in data science and semiconductor manufacturing.
QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
Master’s or Ph.D. in Data Analytics, Data Science, or related field with practical experience with Virtual Metrology, AI, process control, yield improvement, quality control, semiconductor process engineering, image analytics, or related semiconductor field focus.
EXPERIENCE
Prior experience in semiconductor manufacturing, yield optimization, or process control is highly desirable.
Technical Skills:
Proficiency in Python,
Strong knowledge of machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques.
Familiarity with web application and reporting, Experience with SQL and database management
Technologies:
ML frameworks: Decision trees, Clustering, Regression, Neural Networks, NLP, Pytorch, Big Data, Tensorflow, Pandas, Streamlit
Tools and technologies:
Docker, Containerization, Kubernetes, Jenkins, Ansible, Elasticsearch, SSL, Microservices, data visualization tools (e.g., Streamlit, Tableau, PowerBI, etc.).
Cloud expertise:
Google Cloud Platform, OpenShift Container Platform
AI Skills:
AI specialization and Virtual Metrology/Modeling/Computation:
Python library sklearn, xgboost, pycaret, etc. with the ability to learn any new package.
Knowledgeable with the general process of data science work like data extraction, feature extraction, feature selection and modeling.
Familiar with the skills to deal with time series data (feature extraction, modelling, similarity measure of time series).
Image specialization:
Familiar with deep learning network CNN and package keras.
Frontend:
Languages: HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Typescript
Frameworks/Libraries: Angular, HighCharts, Plotly, AG Grid, BootStrap, Ngx Bootstrap, RxJS
Packaging: npm, Jenkins
Backend/API:
Languages: Python,
Preferred, but not required: Java, C#, PHP, Perl, C++
Frameworks: Flask, FastAPI, Experience with RESTful APIs, Minor experience with WSLs
Databases: MySQL, MSSQL, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, BigQuery SQL, Snowflake SQL, basic understanding of SSL
Tools:
Git, Bitbucket
Soft Skills:
Analytical approach and problem-solving abilities.
Strong communication skills to work effectively with teams from various functions.
Adaptability and willingness to learn new technologies and methodologies.
Project Skills:
AGILE, Waterfall, Scrum, Software Development Lifecycle, JIRA, Change management, Release management, Configuration management
Schedule: Ability to conduct and/or attend meetings when needed in the evening.
As a world leader in the semiconductor industry, Micron is dedicated to your personal wellbeing and professional growth. Micron benefits are designed to help you stay well, provide peace of mind and help you prepare for the future. We offer a choice of medical, dental and vision plans in all locations enabling team members to select the plans that best meet their family healthcare needs and budget. Micron also provides benefit programs that help protect your income if you are unable to work due to illness or injury, and paid family leave. Additionally, Micron benefits include a robust paid time-off program and paid holidays. For additional information regarding the Benefit programs available, please see the Benefits Guide posted on micron.com/careers/benefits.
Micron is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other factor protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws.
To learn about your right to work click here.
To learn more about Micron, please visit micron.com/careers
For US Sites Only: To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact Micron’s People Organization at hrsupport_na@micron.com or 1-800-336-8918 (select option #3)
Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.
Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron.",3.8,Micron,"Manassas, VA",10000+ Employees,1978.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,127.0,VA,46.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The CDC Foundation helps the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) save and improve lives by unleashing the power of collaboration between CDC, philanthropies, corporations, organizations and individuals to protect the health, safety and security of America and the world. The CDC Foundation is the go-to nonprofit authorized by Congress to mobilize philanthropic partners and private-sector resources to support CDC’s critical health protection mission. Since 1995, the CDC Foundation has raised over $1.9 billion and launched more than 1,300 programs impacting a variety of health threats from chronic disease conditions including cardiovascular disease and cancer, to infectious diseases like rotavirus and HIV, to emergency responses, including COVID-19 and Ebola. The CDC Foundation managed hundreds of programs in the United States and in more than 90 countries last year. Visit www.cdcfoundation.org for more information.

Job Highlights
Location: Remote, must be based in the United States
Salary Range: $92,700-$134,275 per year, plus benefits. Individual salary offers will be based on experience and qualifications unique to each candidate.
Position Type: Grant funded, limited-term opportunity
Position End Date: June 30, 2025
Overview
The Data Scientist will play a crucial role in advancing the CDC Foundation's mission by providing informatics expertise and performing health informatics activities for a public health organization, which require specialized knowledge and skills in both health and information technology, including health informatics, scientific analysis, data management, and security standards. This role is aligned to the Workforce Acceleration Initiative (WAI). WAI is a federally funded CDC Foundation program with the goal of helping the nation’s public health agencies by providing them with the technology and data experts they need to accelerate their information system improvements.

Working within North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office, the Data Scientist will plan and manage the development, implementation, and maintenance of data systems and informatics processes needed for data generation, storage, processing, and analysis. The Data Scientist will collaborate with data content experts, analysts, data scientists, data modelers, warehouse architects, IT staff and other organization staff to design and implement proposed solutions that meet the needs of the public health agency.

The Data Scientist will be hired by the CDC Foundation and assigned to the North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office. This position is eligible for a fully remote work arrangement for U.S. based candidates.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, select, test, implement, and evaluate new or modified informatics solutions, data structures, and decision-support mechanisms to support agency information management needs within various contexts.
Create and manage the systems and pipelines that enable efficient and reliable flow of data, including ingestion, processing, and storage.
Create new and update existing health integration engine (Rhapsody) routes to handle new data elements and formats creating the necessary output for upload into surveillance systems and databases as well as reporting to the CDC.
Develop, implement, and improve data analysis and visualization tools for use by organization staff, to provide timely, relevant information that informs decisions affecting the public’s health.
Analyze diverse datasets related to public health issues to identify trends, patterns, and correlations.
Apply statistical methods and machine learning algorithms to extract actionable insights.
Develop predictive models to anticipate disease patterns, assess risk factors, and guide intervention strategies.
Continuously optimize algorithms for enhanced accuracy and performance.
Create compelling visualizations and reports to communicate findings to partners and decision-makers.
Present data-driven insights in a clear and understandable manner to facilitate informed decision-making.
Collaborate with the public health organization and its partners to understand their data needs and objectives.
Provide data-driven support and guidance to inform public health policies and initiatives.
Knowledgeable about industry trends, best practices, and emerging technologies in informatics and data management, and incorporating the trends into the organization's data infrastructure.
Provide technical guidance to other staff.
Prepare and maintain system documentation and architecture diagrams for processes assigned (new and existing).
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Informatics, Computer Science, Information Technology, Data Science, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of relevant professional experience
Proficiency in programming languages commonly used in data engineering, such as Python, Java, Scala, or SQL. Candidate should be able to implement data automations within existing frameworks as opposed to writing one off scripts.
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Scikit-learn).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Strong analytical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to interpret complex datasets and derive meaningful insights.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Expertise with Rhapsody Integration Engine (Rhapsody Certification or ability to obtain certification preferred)
Experience with multiple health data types (i.e. HL7, ELR, eCR, FHIR)
Solid understanding of API-based architectures (including FHIR)
Ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical partners effectively.
Flexibility to adapt to evolving project requirements and priorities.
Professional certifications in data science, machine learning, or public health analytics preferred.
Outstanding interpersonal and teamwork skills; collegial; energetic; and able to develop productive relationships with colleagues, partners, and partners.
Demonstrated ability to work well independently and within teams
Experience working in a virtual environment with remote partners and teams
Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Special Notes
This role is involved in a dynamic public health program. As such, roles and responsibilities are subject to change as situations evolve. Roles and responsibilities listed above may be expanded upon or updated to match priorities and needs, once written approval is received by the CDC Foundation in order to best support the public health programming.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status, and all other characteristics protected by law.

We comply with all applicable laws including E.O. 11246 and the Vietnam Era Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 governing employment practices and do not discriminate on the basis of any unlawful criteria in accordance with 41 C.F.R. §§ 60-300.5(a)(12) and 60-741.5(a)(7). As a federal government contractor, we take affirmative action on behalf of protected veterans.

The CDC Foundation is a smoke-free environment.
Relocation expenses are not included.",4.3,CDC Foundation,North Dakota,1001 to 5000 Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,113.0,North Dakota,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Details
Position Details
Job Title
Data Scientist

Position Number
8150736

Job Category
University Staff

Job Type
Full-Time

FLSA Status
Exempt

Campus
Maywood-Health Sciences Campus

Department Name
PHYSIOLOGY

Location Code
PHYSIOLOGY (06240A)

Is this split and/or fully grant funded?
Yes

Duties and Responsibilities
The Data Scientist will perform detailed analyses of large bodies of heterogeneous omics and clinical data to discover new patterns and insights that impact patient health or augment human capabilities. The Data Scientist should have deep expertise in the methods used to analyze data and deep knowledge of data types, topics, and scientific challenges and approaches that will be used to help inform and define new products, experiences, and technologies. This position works in conjunction with basic and clinical scientists to create intelligence-driven systems to solve complex translational problems.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Participates in multidisciplinary teams to design, develop, and recommend new approaches for data-driven decision-making.
Leads discovery processes on pioneering Artificial Intelligence (“AI"")/Machine Learning (“ML”) based approaches to solve complex data problems across a variety of domains.
Provides strategic direction regarding data science and AI.
Guides and educates basic science and clinical teams to provide unbiased and accurate information, analysis, consultation, and recommendations to support strategic and operational data science initiatives.
Develops analytics tools that can be used by other staff with non-technical expertise.
Supports scientific projects under the supervision of the principal investigator.
Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis.


Minimum Education and/or Work Experience
Bachelor’s degree in related field required

Qualifications
BS, the position would not necessarily require a PhD, as considerable experience in the field would be acceptable.

Certificates/Credentials/Licenses
N/A

Computer Skills
Office Suite skills, AI/Machine Learning based approaches. Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Required operation of university owned vehicles
No

Does this position require direct animal or patient contact?
No

Physical Demands
None

Working Conditions
None

Open Date
10/01/2024

Close Date

Special Instructions to Applicants

Diversity and Inclusion Statement
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion

As one of the nation’s largest Jesuit, Catholic universities, Loyola University Chicago fosters a transformative cultural experience that honors diversity, equity, and inclusion. We are committed to not only recruiting, but also retaining a diverse, mission driven workforce and enabling a culture of inclusiveness in an environment that values service excellence, stewardship, personal well-being, and professional development for all of our employees. Loyola University Chicago supports its staff and faculty with a wide array of affordable, comprehensive and competitive benefits centered on health and wellness, financial security, equity, and work-life balance. We actively seek those who wish to join our faculty, staff, and students in a community of diverse opinions, perspectives, and backgrounds supporting our Jesuit mission and striving toward the same goal of being persons for and with others.


Quick Link for Posting
https://www.careers.luc.edu/postings/29300",3.8,Loyola University Chicago,"Maywood, IL",1001 to 5000 Employees,1870.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,105.0,IL,154.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$175K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 4 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 2 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$145,000/year to $204,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,175.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$93K
/yr","Job Overview:
Graham Tech is seeking a skilled and experienced Data Scientist to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing a set of techniques and analytics applications that transform raw data into meaningful insights, supporting strategic decision-making processes. This role will require proficiency in data-oriented programming languages, visualization software, and a deep understanding of data mining, data modeling, natural language processing, and machine learning.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement data-driven techniques and analytics applications to transform raw data into actionable insights.
Apply advanced data mining, data modeling, natural language processing (NLP), and machine learning (ML) techniques to extract and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets.
Visualize data findings using cutting-edge visualization tools, ensuring that data is presented clearly and effectively to stakeholders.
Interpret and report data analysis results, providing insights to inform decision-making processes.
Create and maintain dynamic data reports that offer real-time insights for business needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and implement strategies that leverage data analysis to solve complex business challenges.
Work independently to perform all functional duties and responsibilities in a fast-paced, results-driven environment.
Requirements:
Experience: 3-10 years of experience in data science, analytics, or a related field.
Education: BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field.
Technical Skills: Proficiency in data-oriented programming languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL) and visualization software (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, D3.js).
Strong expertise in data mining, data modeling, NLP, and ML techniques.
Experience working with large datasets, both structured and unstructured.
Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI (Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information) clearance required.
Additional Qualifications:
Strong analytical, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to present technical findings to non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to work independently and manage multiple projects in a high-pressure environment.
Compensation:
At Graham Technologies, we believe in treating every person the way we want to be treated - fairly. Our compensation package ensures everyone at Graham Technologies is given equal pay for equal work - regardless of race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, disability, religion, age, nationality, or even negotiation skills!
Most IT companies can probably offer many of the same services, but what sets us apart from the others is truly our people! We care about our employees and show it often with sincere appreciation and acknowledgment of not only the final work products but also the little steps taken along the way! In addition, our generous benefits package helps our team members live well and prosper.
Here are just a few highlights:
Four Week's Accrued PTO First Year
Ten Paid Federal Holidays
Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
401(k) Plan with Annual Employer Contributions
Flexible Schedules
Reimbursements for Continued Education and Training

Why Graham Technologies?
Our Core Values say it all!
Value our Customers
Care about our Employees
Passionate about Innovation
Believe in a Strong Work Ethic
Rely on Teamwork
Integrity Matters

Founded in 2007, GTech is a consulting services firm zealous about providing the best solutions to address our client's needs and maximize the value of their investments. One way we do this is by providing exceptional employees for our clients-whose range of expertise expands the entire IT industry! We've cultivated a family of individuals where integrity, commitment, and reliability are etched into the heart of our delivery teams.
In addition, we are equally zealous about caring for our employees - the lifeblood of our business! We've purposefully created a culture that is friendly, family-oriented, and all-inclusive. Our team members are encouraged to ""have a life,"" both in and out of the office, through flexible schedules (where available), continuing education, and support to pursue their passions!",4.4,Graham Technologies,"Tampa, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,93.0,FL,17.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist III, Analytics","$179K
/yr","Expedia Group brands power global travel for everyone, everywhere. We design cutting-edge tech to make travel smoother and more memorable, and we create groundbreaking solutions for our partners. Our diverse, vibrant, and welcoming community is essential in driving our success.
Why Join Us?
To shape the future of travel, people must come first. Guided by our Values and Leadership Agreements, we foster an open culture where everyone belongs, differences are celebrated and know that when one of us wins, we all win.
We provide a full benefits package, including exciting travel perks, generous time-off, parental leave, a global hybrid work setup (with some pretty cool offices), and career development resources, all to fuel our employees' passion for travel and ensure a rewarding career journey. We’re building a more open world. Join us.
Data Scientist III, Analytics
Are you excited by the opportunity to pioneer the future of travel? Do you want to redefine the way people plan, search for, and book their travel? At Expedia Group, we believe that travel brings the world together, and we are passionate about the endless possibilities.
The InsurTech team at Expedia is responsible for managing the InsurTech P&L and driving its strategy and business development efforts across the Expedia Group globally. We deliver millions of dollars of incremental revenue making a direct and meaningful impact to the company's bottom-line. At the same time, we increase customers’ confidence to book travel and make difference in their lives.
Introduction to team
This role is an excellent opportunity to join the InsurTech Analytics Team where we are passionate about delivering outstanding user experience! We power and deliver product analytics, user behavior analysis, experimentation, and visualization services that enable highly tailored and optimized experiences using the scientific methods and applied insights. We’re looking for a highly motivated individual to join our team to help us formulate business strategy and to deliver impactful analytics insights. If you enjoy using data to build business cases, solve business problems, improve ongoing business activities, and to work on a team that functions as the “business owner” you will fit right in. In this role, you will use your analytical and business skills to inspire product, engineering, finance and customer support, and our strategic partners to prioritize, implement and scale our product ideas
In this role, you will:
Provide strategic analysis and insights for the InsurTech business, while actively looking for opportunities to grow the business
Own end to end process in evaluating A/B or multivariate tests to improve learning; proactively uncover opportunities and recommend new features for test and learn; evaluate and apply alternative methods to supplement randomized testing
Performs advanced statistical analyses on experimental data to identify trends and derive actionable insights
Apply your expertise in data modeling, quantitative analysis, data mining, data visualization with a goal of improving customer experience and business results with a religious focus on impactful analytics, steward product team to drive insights
A high performing individual contributor who consistently applies and enhances the analytics capabilities, best practices and processes to solve complex business issues and identify opportunities
Function independently, assessing existing and upcoming business needs
Works with data engineers to ensure best practices are implemented through experimentation platform
Effectively communicates statistical findings and insights to stakeholders and collaborate with product development teams to integrate statistical insights into decision-making
Experience and qualifications:
Bachelor's, Masters or PhD degree in Mathematics, Science, Statistics, Engineering or 5+ years’ data analytics experience in a business context
Strong analytical/modeling skills with ability to convert raw data into measurable insights
Able to structure / work on data exploration problems, with innovative ways and solutions, bringing to bear strong reporting and data visualization skills
Strong hands-on experience in SQL
Proficient in building data visualizations (Tableau, Looker, etc.)
Intermediate (or better) knowledge of Statistics
Experience with R, python, or other coding language a plus
Experience with web analytics tools such as Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics a plus
Experience in modeling selection, building and evaluation
The total cash range for this position in Seattle is $137,500.00 to $192,500.00. Employees in this role have the potential to increase their pay up to $220,000.00, which is the top of the range, based on ongoing, demonstrated, and sustained performance in the role.
Starting pay for this role will vary based on multiple factors, including location, available budget, and an individual’s knowledge, skills, and experience. Pay ranges may be modified in the future.
Accommodation requests
If you need assistance with any part of the application or recruiting process due to a disability, or other physical or mental health conditions, please reach out to our Recruiting Accommodations Team through the Accommodation Request.
We are proud to be named as a Best Place to Work on Glassdoor in 2024 and be recognized for award-winning culture by organizations like Forbes, TIME, Disability:IN, and others.
Expedia Group's family of brands includes: Brand Expedia®, Hotels.com®, Expedia® Partner Solutions, Vrbo®, trivago®, Orbitz®, Travelocity®, Hotwire®, Wotif®, ebookers®, CheapTickets®, Expedia Group™ Media Solutions, Expedia Local Expert®, CarRentals.com™, and Expedia Cruises™. © 2024 Expedia, Inc. All rights reserved. Trademarks and logos are the property of their respective owners. CST: 2029030-50
Employment opportunities and job offers at Expedia Group will always come from Expedia Group’s Talent Acquisition and hiring teams. Never provide sensitive, personal information to someone unless you’re confident who the recipient is. Expedia Group does not extend job offers via email or any other messaging tools to individuals with whom we have not made prior contact. Our email domain is @expediagroup.com. The official website to find and apply for job openings at Expedia Group is careers.expediagroup.com/jobs.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. This employer participates in E-Verify. The employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.8,Expedia Partner Solutions,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1996.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,179.0,WA,28.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist / Data Resource Analyst II,"$78K
/yr","International Studies and Programs (ISP) supports MSU global learning and international engagement under the MSU Strategic Plan 2030 in the areas of research, teaching, and outreach. To fulfill its main objectives, ISP communicates key international data to university leadership and the public and serve as a campus-wide analytical resource. ISP manages MSU’s International Data Portals, which provide visualizations of MSU's Externally Funded International Projects, International Student Enrollment, Education Abroad, International Agreements Data, and International Research Collaboration. These dashboards utilize Tableau, Tableau Prep, and SQL Oracle to draw from MSU’s electronic data warehouse (EDW). International Studies and Programs (ISP) collaborates with units across campus to streamline and upgrade the international data plan.
ISP is seeking a Data Scientist who is curious, creative, and can see both the big picture and work with attention to detail. The successful candidate will have strong technical, interpersonal and communication skills to convey findings to various audiences and positively influence university leadership. The Data Scientist will need to articulate complex issues to a non-technical audience clearly and effectively. Daily activities may include development of data representations and visualizations, advising on predictive models and creating easy to understand reports and dashboards. This will be a full-time (100% FTE) 12-month fixed-term position funded for one year with the possibility of reappointments depending on funding and performance.
ISP is currently operating under a hybrid modality structure, with staff working three days in person and two days remote. ISP values individual and group differences and encourages applicants who will contribute to a culture of inclusion on campus.
Primary responsibilities include:
Data Analysis and Reporting
Analyze, interpret, summarize, and present data and findings in a clear, comprehensive, and effective manner
Conduct internal and external benchmarking analysis for ISP
Develop and design reports and dashboards in Tableau
Support Data-Driven Decision Making
Consult with and support ISP leadership and units by pulling and analyzing data
With ISP leadership, collaborate with other campus units on communicating, building, and evaluating data tools and streamlining data reporting
Provide analysis and decision support for university international initiatives, projects, and planning as needed
Provide training/capacity development support for ISP units in various data-related topics
Represent ISP on university-wide data-related committees
Keep apprised of trends and conversations about data in higher education and international education
Database Management and Development
Build custom SQL to meet reporting requirements and manage ISP International Data Portals
Perform query tuning and root cause analysis to optimize database performance and correct errors
Develop SQL to create database tables, views, and stored procedures to support data storage and report development
Provide targeted training on tools and platforms when necessary
Minimum Requirements
Master’s degree in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field including other degrees with a strong quantitative emphasis
Three to five years of post-graduate work experience in data mining, data warehousing, data science, data management, as well as data analysis and visualization
Experience writing advanced SQL queries; expertise with Oracle PL/SQL, expertise with Tableau
Experience using data retrieval and manipulation, and expertise in statistical tools (such as SAS, SQL, STATA, R, D3, Python) and data visualization tools (such as Tableau and Tableau Prep)
Demonstrated success in managing collaborative projects involving cross-functional and interdisciplinary teams
Excellent communication skills including presenting, editing, and writing, as well as ability to demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy
Desired Qualifications
Doctorate in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field with a strong quantitative emphasis
Proven excellence in program or project management
Experience working in a university setting and in-depth knowledge of university administrative organization, policies, procedures, and practices for institutional research-oriented roles
Experience managing higher education related data (student, research, business support systems)
Understanding of data warehouse technologies (Oracle preferred) and familiarity with data integration processes using enterprise ETL tools (DataStage preferred) and the role of data stewardship
Ability to model and analyze data in statistical tools (SPSS, R, SAS, Python, or similar) combined with experience integrating large datasets from a variety of sources; experience with ETL tools (DataStage, Informatica)
Ability to work closely with clients to build custom dashboards, conduct data analysis to support ISP centers and other units, as well as develop and streamline data reporting
Make data-informed recommendations to administrators to contribute to decision making
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, age, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Application Materials
Resume and cover letter
Work Hours
STANDARD 8-5
Description of End Date
one year from date of hire
Website
https://www.isp.msu.edu/
Bidding eligibility ends October 22, 2024 at 11:55 P.M.",4.3,Michigan State University,"East Lansing, MI",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,78.0,MI,169.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US; Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_113619
ABOUT US
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
OUR TEAM
Zynga’s Applied AI group focuses on developing innovative ways to tackle problems within the game development process, demonstrating directly the ways that AI can improve the creativity and productivity of team members across Zynga. Our team is multi-disciplinary, and includes Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers among others. We build cloud-based tools and technologies to support every aspect of the development process, from concept development through to LiveOps and publishing operations.
To be successful in this role you should have curiosity about the areas of Game Development, Artificial Intelligence and Computational Creativity, be a proactive learner, have good depth in technical skills, and a strong desire to build high quality software that delivers value and efficiency.
KEY ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Write well-crafted, efficient and testable code and algorithms
Design and build AI systems that solve computational creativity challenges
Implement and deploy solutions as part of a larger microservice architecture
Plan and implement tasks of small to medium scale independently
Excellent communication skills and comfort working in a collaborative inter-discipline environment
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Ph.D. or M.S. in Computer Science with specialization in AI, or equivalent experience
Experience building AI systems for games, procedural content generation, or computational creativity
Understanding of principles of AI, including ML
Familiarity with principles of game design and implementation
Familiarity with Python, and at least one of Typescript, C++, or Unity C#
Familiarity with containers and cloud infrastructure principles – AWS preferred
Desire to learn and share knowledge with peers, collaborate in a cross-functional team
WHAT WE OFFER YOU
Competitive salary, bonus plan and ESPP (Employee Stock Purchase Plan)
401K Company Match Contribution (US)
RRSP/DPSP company match contribution (Canada)
Health coverage, dental, disability, critical illness, EAP, and life insurance (Canada)
Medical, dental, vision, EAP, life insurance, and disability benefits (US)
Virtual mental health and neurodiversity support programs
Global Fitness reimbursement program
Global Wellbeing Program
Financial wellness program with unlimited access to certified financial planners
Discretionary Time Off policy for many employees
Family planning support program
Generous paid parental, pregnancy-related disability, caregiver, and compassionate leaves
Zynga happy hours and frequent employee events
Flexible working hours on many teams
Culture of diversity and inclusion including employee resource groups
Work with cool people and impact millions of daily player
This is a fully remote role that may be based anywhere in the United States. Below are the expected salary and wage ranges for applicants based in locations where the pay transparency law is in effect:
Colorado: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
California: $87,400 and $129,340 per year
New York State (inclusive of New York City): $98,400 and $145,620 per year
Washington: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
Base pay offered is based on market location, and may vary further depending on individualized factors for job candidates, such as job-related knowledge, skills, experience, and other objective business considerations. Subject to those same considerations, the total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a bonus and/or equity awards and eligibility to participate in our 401(K) plan, in addition to a full range of medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees will also receive 16 paid holidays per calendar year, unlimited discretionary time off, and will receive up to 6.5 sick days per calendar year. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation or benefit program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.
#LI-RK2
Zynga does not engage in financial exchanges during the recruitment or onboarding process. We do not conduct job interviews over third-party messaging apps such as Telegram, WhatsApp or others. We will never ask you for your personal or financial information over unofficial chat channels. Our in-house recruitment team only contacts individuals via official company email addresses (i.e., via a zynga.com or naturalmotion.com email domain).
If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you may wish to contact the authorities. In the United States, you may file a complaint with the FBI. More information is available here: https://www.ic3.gov.",4.2,Zynga,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,114.0,United States,17.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Type: Description:
Position: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
Duration: 12 months +
Job Description
Minimum Qualifications:
Have image processing background and a good understanding on image quality
Experience in data science and analytics, including statistical data analysis.
Strong programming skills, including python and Linux scripting for data processing and tool development.
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or related areas.
Good communication skill and positive working attitude
Expect to be self-motivated, proactive, and solution-oriented
Preferred Qualifications:
Hands-on experience with data batch processing and handling
Experience with deep learning network model training and inferencing
3 years of relevant work experience
Please send your resumes to gjose@sisinc.com (Max 3-4 pages)
Location San Diego , CA Min Experience (yrs): Required Education: Not Specified Benefits:",4.1,SIS,"San Diego, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1987.0,Company - Private,Film Production,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,CA,37.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$88K
/yr","Position Description:

Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead and support data processing and analysis tasks, such as building data pipelines, monitoring data quality, developing documentation, applying statistical and data science methods, and creating data visualizations. Our junior data scientists underpin our company's core offerings in program improvement and data science, which yield crucial evidence and information for policy and decision makers. This position will either work remotely or flexibly in one of our office locations.
This position focuses on health policy, which includes projects such as:
Enhancing knowledge management and library curation across all VRDC projects by developing Python scripts that leverage large language models for automated document classification.
Monitoring the impacts of an alternative payment model for primary care in terms of care quality, cost, and health outcomes for diverse beneficiaries, using claims from thousands of primary care practices across the country and predicting future hospital costs and behavior.
Developing and testing how claims and survey data from federal and state-level programs could be used to measure patients’ experience of care, quality of life, care coordination, and long-term outcomes for beneficiaries enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid.
Creating an interactive data visualization tool to help local policy and decision makers understand how social determinants of health are related to health outcomes in their county, using open-source data from public agencies and non-profits.
Specifically, this Data Scientist contributes to team-based projects by:
Co-developing analysis plans with a senior data scientist or researcher
Writing and maintaining programming systems in languages such as Python and R to obtain, combine, and transform datasets on cloud, internal, and client servers
Developing and maintaining documentation
Implementing quality assurance practices, such as version control and testing
Conducting analysis and communicating results, both to clients and internal teams, such as descriptive statistics, data visualizations, and model diagnostics
Leading and managing small teams and tasks with oversight from a senior staff member
Position Requirements:

Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree, with an academic record including courses in subjects such as statistics, data science, data analytics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, and/or social science; equivalent years of experience can be substituted
Demonstrated interest and/or experience using programming and data science and/or statistics to contribute to projects with a policy/social impact in academic and/or professional settings
At least three years of experience performing data cleaning and analysis using programming languages such as R, Python, or Julia in the academic, extra-curricular, or professional environment
Experience executing data science and statistics techniques including regression modeling, machine learning algorithms, network analysis, or natural language processing
Ability and desire to work independently as part of an interdisciplinary team that may be geographically dispersed. This includes being able to learn from and apply resources such as self-guided tutorials, package documentation, and academic articles and willingness to constantly learn and contribute to knowledge sharing with team members.
Experience with reproducible research principles, version control, interactive visualizations, and common packages/libraries for supporting data science work in R, Python, and/or Julia (e.g., tidyverse, R Shiny, R Markdown, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, MLJ.jl, DataFrames.jl, and/or Makie.jl).
Desired but not required: experience with healthcare datasets (for example, Medicare or Medicaid claims and enrollment data), production-quality machine learning applications, cloud computing environments, and algorithmic fairness and ethics
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $75,000- $100,000. This position is eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance. To apply, please submit a cover letter (optional), resume, code samples, and salary expectations.
Staff in our Health or Human Services units will eventually work with some of our largest clients, including the Centers for Medicaid & Medicare Services (CMS) and other agencies. Most staff working on these contracts will be required to complete a successful background investigation including the Questionnaire for Public Trust Position SF-85 (https://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/sf85p.pdf). Staff that are unable to successfully undergo the background investigation will need to be able to obtain work outside these contracts. Staff will work with their supervisor to get re-staffed, however if they are unable to do so it may result in employment termination due to lack of work.
STAFFING AGENCIES AND THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS: Mathematica is not accepting candidates for this role or any technical role from staffing agencies or third-party recruiters. Please do not contact technical or senior staff at Mathematica or share unsolicited resumes. All agency inquiries go through the talent acquisition team and will be routed accordingly.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ; Remote
#LI-AR1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1986.0,Company - Private,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,88.0,DC,38.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$192K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modeling project
At least 3 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, be able to work with cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $144000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,192.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","Recipient of the 2023 Exceptional PeopleFirst Workplace Award by IWPL, HelloGov® is an Artificial General Intelligence (AGI) company founded by ex-Machine Learning (ML) Researchers from OpenAI, Google, and the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), united by our shared patriotism and belief of advancing AI in the U.S. public sector to maintain global competitiveness. We conduct AGI research, solution development, and human capital resourcing with the declared intention of Democratizing AI for the Public Sector™.
HelloGov® was founded on the principles of nurturing our employees’ careers and wellness. We take pride in providing a work-life balance that stems from years of building companies in Silicon Valley. Our founders have pioneered some of the best AI technologies in the market and have always operated with humility and ambition. We operate with an award-winning people first mantra of:
Transparency.
Flexibility.
Work life balance.
Culture of sharing credit.
Empowering every employee, from the shop floor to the top floor.
Good company policies.
Investment in people.
Focus on ergonomics.
Fun traditions.
Benefits (Tier I Health/Vision/Dental insurance, 401K, EAP, Equity, Stipends, Investment in your wellness)
Equality in Compensation (i.e. every team member, from Junior to Executive staff, receives a Sign-On Bonus)
We are seeking a team of Data Scientists with 3+ years of experience in multi-intelligence and multi-domain systems, with a strong background in NLP, computer vision, statistical learning theory, and ML model development. Candidates should be proficient in Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++, and have experience communicating technical concepts to business, technical, and non-technical audiences. This role leverages advanced AI technology set to dominate the market for the next decade, supporting national biodefense through integrated biosurveillance (IB).
Major Duties:
Designs, configures, develops, tests, and supports informatics and data science solutions for a wide array of technical use cases;
Applies analytical methodologies to diagnose data-related challenges, implement solutions, and evaluate performance;
Documents and presents requirements, design alternatives, and findings to team members and clients;
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships; and
Experience with integrated development environments, data integration, data visualization, data mining, and analysis tools.
Maintains and guides the development of common libraries and tools used by multiple teams.
Aids in formulating a strategy on how to achieve rapid prototyping
Required Skills/Experience:
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory;
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models;
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility;
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models; and
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations.
LOCATION:
Falls Church, VA (Hybrid)
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATIONS:
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence, or related field required (Master's degree preferred).
CLEARANCE:
Top Secret (SCI eligible)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $138,997.00 - $189,983.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
No weekends
Experience:
Natural language processing: 3 years (Required)
AI models: 3 years (Required)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++: 5 years (Required)
large scale data handling + data mining: 5 years (Required)
GPU Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
DoD: 10 years (Preferred)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Falls Church, VA 22041",Not listed,HelloGov,"Falls Church, VA",-1,-1.0,-1,-1,-1,-1,0,1,164.0,VA,-1.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,1
DATA SCIENTIST,"$112K
/yr","Description
Applies knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to the development and improvement of processes. Identify limitations, or potential issues with datasets and data types that may impact performance from machine learning algorithms. Re-train models as needed to address new challenges, or novel goals. Aid investigators and stakeholders in the validation of results. Generate detailed reports and presentations. May mentor and train junior staff members.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Compile, manipulate, and analyze data using descriptive and inferential statistics to address a broad spectrum of research and administrative questions.
Use statistical software to create data analysis programs/syntax with appropriate documentation.
Understand and interpret data analysis programs/syntax written by others involved in data analysis in the department.
Explain complex statistical concepts in the form of presentations or written project reports/documentation
Write and/or review relevant portions of research study manuscripts and/or abstracts.
Effectively visualize and organize complex datasets for the production of high-quality figures and tables for reports, manuscripts, and presentations
Consult with various researchers or administrators regarding data analytic needs, feasibility of proposed analyses, sequential procedures, and project timelines
Perform other duties as assigned
Salary Range: $85,600 - $139,100

Qualifications
Doctorate degree in a related field OR Master's degree in a related field and two (2) years of related experience OR Bachelor's degree in related field and four (4) years of related experience required. Work experience may NOT substitute for education requirement.
UAB is an Equal Employment/Equal Educational Opportunity Institution dedicated to providing equal opportunities and equal access to all individuals regardless of race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, sex (including pregnancy), genetic information, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and veteran’s status. As required by Title IX, UAB prohibits sex discrimination in any education program or activity that it operates. Individuals may report concerns or questions to UAB’s Assistant Vice President and Senior Title IX Coordinator. The Title IX notice of nondiscrimination is located at uab.edu/titleix.

Primary Location: University
Job Category: Professional & Managerial
Organization: 312000000 Dept of Medical Education
Employee Status: Regular
Shift: Day/1st Shift
Work Arrangement (final schedule to be determined by the department/hiring manager): Onsite",4.0,University of Alabama at Birmingham,"Birmingham, AL",10000+ Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,AL,,0,0,0,0,0
Product Data Scientist,"$124K
/yr","The Company
PayPal has been revolutionizing commerce globally for more than 25 years. Creating innovative experiences that make moving money, selling, and shopping simple, personalized, and secure, PayPal empowers consumers and businesses in approximately 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy.

We operate a global, two-sided network at scale that connects hundreds of millions of merchants and consumers. We help merchants and consumers connect, transact, and complete payments, whether they are online or in person. PayPal is more than a connection to third-party payment networks. We provide proprietary payment solutions accepted by merchants that enable the completion of payments on our platform on behalf of our customers.

We offer our customers the flexibility to use their accounts to purchase and receive payments for goods and services, as well as the ability to transfer and withdraw funds. We enable consumers to exchange funds more safely with merchants using a variety of funding sources, which may include a bank account, a PayPal or Venmo account balance, PayPal and Venmo branded credit products, a credit card, a debit card, certain cryptocurrencies, or other stored value products such as gift cards, and eligible credit card rewards. Our PayPal, Venmo, and Xoom products also make it safer and simpler for friends and family to transfer funds to each other. We offer merchants an end-to-end payments solution that provides authorization and settlement capabilities, as well as instant access to funds and payouts. We also help merchants connect with their customers, process exchanges and returns, and manage risk. We enable consumers to engage in cross-border shopping and merchants to extend their global reach while reducing the complexity and friction involved in enabling cross-border trade.

Our beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We live each day guided by our core values of Inclusion, Innovation, Collaboration, and Wellness. Together, our values ensure that we work together as one global team with our customers at the center of everything we do – and they push us to ensure we take care of ourselves, each other, and our communities.
Job Description Summary: As a Data Scientist, you will spearhead our efforts to measure and enhance developer experience to integrate with PayPal's products. This role is central to our mission, offering you the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technology in a fast-paced environment. You will lead the data science projects for the initiatives that optimize features that are adopted by the external developer community, directly impacting PayPal's ability to offer seamless payment solutions to millions of users worldwide.
Job Description:
The Global Analytics and Data Science team is seeking a Data Scientist of PayPal’s SMB Analytics and ML Team to join us as exceptional problem solver with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus.
We are responsible to find opportunities and gaps in developer experience, product flows using statistical methods to strategize Product roadmap. This team empowers senior leadership with actionable insights for informed, data-driven decisions.
In this role, we are tackling the complex and fascinating challenge of optimizing the developer experience at PayPal. Developers go through a non-linear journey, from onboarding to integration, and it's crucial to understand their pain points at each stage. This includes analyzing what they search for, how they navigate the platform, when they begin integrating our APIs, and their activities during sandbox testing.
We aim to provide deep insights into these areas by applying advanced statistical methods and cutting-edge data science techniques. This allows us to uncover friction points and provide actionable recommendations to enhance the overall developer journey. Additionally, we leverage the latest generative AI tools to assist developers throughout their integration process. A key part of this role is to measure the efficacy and accuracy of these AI-driven solutions, ensuring they deliver value and improve the experience.
This is a unique opportunity to dissect the end-to-end developer journey, identify opportunities for product improvement, and collaborate with our product and engineering partners to drive innovation in developer tools and resources. The role goes beyond simple analytics, offering the chance to shape PayPal’s developer ecosystem and influence the tools that developers rely on to build seamlessly integrated solutions.
Your day to day:
Data Analysis and Decision Making:
Utilize large, complex datasets to drive improvements in developer KPIs.
Employ advanced analytical and statistical techniques to identify trends, issues, and opportunities.
Perform deep-dive analytics including Causal Inference analysis, Pre-Post analysis, Sensitivity analysis, financial projections, and additional ad-hoc exercises to provide holistic recommendations.
Strategic Influence: Develop and present insights and strategic recommendations to Product and Data Science leadership. Influence product direction and strategic decisions through data-driven insights.
Collaboration and Communication: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including product development, engineering, and marketing to implement data-driven improvements. Occasionally collaborate with developers to optimize their experiences. Mentor junior team members .
Innovation and Improvement: Lead initiatives to refine existing analytical processes and develop new approaches to business challenges. Promote a culture of continuous improvement and testing.
What do you need to bring
3+ years of experience in analyzing multi-dimensional datasets and creating actionable business solutions.
Strong educational background with a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Expertise in SQL, Excel, and visualization tools such as Tableau or Qlikview. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python is preferred.
Demonstrable experience with big data technologies such as Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, and BigQuery.
Knowledge of Python, Jupyter Notebooks, and SQL.
Exceptional communication skills to effectively articulate insights and influence cross-functional teams.
Prior experience in performing data science to fuel insights to drive Product within a high-tech environment.
Personal Attributes:
A data-driven decision maker, passionate about solving complex problems using analytical solutions.
A self-starter who is motivated to take initiative and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
A fun-loving team player who brings energy and enthusiasm to the workplace.
Comfortable with ambiguity and uncertainty in a dynamic business landscape.
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000
For the majority of employees, PayPal's balanced hybrid work model offers 3 days in the office for effective in-person collaboration and 2 days at your choice of either the PayPal office or your home workspace, ensuring that you equally have the benefits and conveniences of both locations.

Our Benefits:
At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.
We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:
To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.
Belonging at PayPal:
Our employees are central to advancing our mission, and we strive to create an environment where everyone can do their best work with a sense of purpose and belonging. Belonging at PayPal means creating a workplace with a sense of acceptance and security where all employees feel included and valued. We are proud to have a diverse workforce reflective of the merchants, consumers, and communities that we serve, and we continue to take tangible actions to cultivate inclusivity and belonging at PayPal.

Any general requests for consideration of your skills, please Join our Talent Community.

We know the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can get in the way of meeting spectacular candidates. Please don’t hesitate to apply.",3.7,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",10000+ Employees,1998.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,124.0,CA,26.0,1,0,0,0,1
Research Data Scientist,"$116K
/yr","Job ID
34394667
Category
Research and Development
Organization
University Library
Department
University Library Dept
Location
Main Campus - UCR
Salary
$81,500 - $150,100
Date Posted
October 10, 2024
Application Deadline
Open Until Filled
Schedule
8AM - 5PM
Full/Part Time
Full-time(100%)
Level of Supervision
General Supervision
Other Information
Qualifies for Employee Referral Bonus: No
UC Internal Job: No
Position Information
Reporting to the Director of Research Services, this position will be the driving force of the library's Data Science Initiative to support campus research through interdisciplinary collaboration on cutting-edge projects in STEM, Liberal Arts, and Social Sciences. Seeks opportunities to embed themselves in campus research teams to directly address UCR researchers' data and AI related needs through activities including but are not limited to: designing, developing and implementing infrastructure, systems, software and solutions; directly answering compute- and data- intensive research questions; contributing novel ideas, expertise, and methods to the teams' intellectual discourse and advancement; providing data/AI related consultation and instruction. In partnership with other library colleagues as well as UCR colleges, academic programs, and Research and Economic Development, Information Technology Services, and Research Computing, will continuously develop specialized and sought-after data science and AI expertise synergistic with UCR faculty's research agendas.

Candidates are encouraged to include a CV and/or portfolio link with examples of AI/Data related work, if available.

Finalists will be asked to conduct a presentation (including providing visual representation of work samples) as part of the interview process.

The full salary range for the Research Data Scientist is $81,500 - $150,100 annually. However, the expected pay scale for this position is up to $115,000 annually. We base salary offers on a variety of considerations, such as education, licensure and certifications, experience, and other business and organizational needs.

Applicants must have current work authorization when accepting a UCR staff position. Currently, we are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa for staff.

As a University employee, you will be required to comply with all applicable University policies and/or collective bargaining agreements, as may be amended from time to time. Federal, state, or local government directives may impose additional requirements.",4.2,"University of California, Riverside","Riverside, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,116.0,CA,,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Company Description
At Red Hat, we connect an innovative community of customers, partners, and contributors to deliver an open source stack of trusted, high-performing solutions. We offer cloud, Linux, middleware, and virtualization technologies, together with award-winning global customer support, consulting, and implementation services. Red Hat is a rapidly growing company supporting more than 90% of Fortune 500 companies.
Job Summary
Red Hat’s Global Engineering team is looking for an experienced data scientist to join the InstructLab team. In this role, you’ll contribute directly to Red Hat’s rapidly growing AI/ML (artificial intelligence and machine learning) family of products. You will be responsible for the investigation, evaluation, integration, and development of open source AI/ML systems and functionality to improve the overall development and operations of both Red Hat's downstream AI products and upstream open source AI projects. Qualified data scientists in this role regularly participate in design reviews and productization for major product features and bug fixes, and are experienced and comfortable working with Linux-based operating systems.

The ideal candidate will be a highly collaborative individual with a passion for working on complex projects in an open organization where contributions are valued and expected from all levels. This job role will require engaging in upstream open source communities. As this is a fast-moving area of opportunity for Red Hat, the ability to communicate productively and effectively with team members, stakeholders, and Red Hat leadership is critical.
This position reports directly to a Manager of Software Engineering for InstructLab. This position must have the ability to partner collaboratively in our Boston, MA office at least 3 days per week.
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop innovative capabilities for open source platforms used for building, training, testing, and serving models for AI-enabled applications, carrying your work through all phases of software development and delivery, including: researching and conceptualization, team design review, writing the implementation, authoring a testing strategy and necessary automation, productizing and packaging the code, and supporting its deployment through to end-users.
Monitor and participate in upstream open source AI/ML communities, evaluating new AI/ML-related technologies in the space and considering potential integrations and collaborations upstream.
Regularly reading papers and keeping up with AI/ML developments, particularly in the Generative AI space.
Promote and foster Red Hat’s open-source value proposition as it pertains to AI/ML engineering and product infusion and development.
Contribute to the development of the open-source projects that comprise Red Hat’s AI family of products.
Take part in the shared responsibility of delivering and maintaining assigned products.
Regularly communicate with project stakeholders including other teams of Red Hat engineers, product managers, consultants, management, and senior leadership.
Take on the role of Subject Matter Expert, as needed, per domain and project.
Lead, coach and collaborate with junior engineers as they build AI/ML knowledge and skills.
Coordinate and collaborate with external teams, including IBM Research on key strategic vision and implementation details.
Share our experiments and learnings from an experienced position in the Data Science community through blogs, presentations, new ideas and existing work at various technical outlets and conferences.
Promote upstream acceptance and community building.

Required Skills
Bachelor's degree in computer science, data science, computer engineering or equivalent
5+ years of experience as a data scientist (or similar roles).
Extensive, advanced experience with Python development.
Experience with AI and Machine Learning platforms, tools, and frameworks, such as: Tensorflow, PyTorch, LLaMA.cpp, and Kubeflow.
Experience working with Kubernetes/OpenShift and containers, troubleshooting issues, and working with YAML.
Experience with Cloud Native Technologies and Platforms (e.g. Kubernetes)
Demonstrates knowledge of unit testing frameworks and methodologies
Demonstrates knowledge of machine learning relevant mathematics and statistics.
Strong self-motivation and organizational skills.
Demonstrates ability to context switch between multiple concurrent projects.
Excellent English written and verbal communication skills.
Collaborative attitude and willingness to share ideas openly.
Ability to quickly learn and use new tools and technologies.
Passion for developing open source software.
Nice to Haves
Familiarity with participating in an agile development team
Experience writing Kubernetes controllers and operators.
Experience creating Ansible automation scripts.
Experience with big data storage techniques, such as Parquet, Avro, and S3.
Experience with hardware accelerators, such as GPU, CUDA, and ROCm.
Understanding of DevOps methodology.
The salary range for this position is $127,890.00 - $211,180.00. Actual offer will be based on your qualifications.
Pay Transparency
Red Hat determines compensation based on several factors including but not limited to job location, experience, applicable skills and training, external market value, and internal pay equity. Annual salary is one component of Red Hat’s compensation package. This position may also be eligible for bonus, commission, and/or equity. For positions with Remote-US locations, the actual salary range for the position may differ based on location but will be commensurate with job duties and relevant work experience.
About Red Hat
Red Hat
is the world’s leading provider of enterprise
open source
software solutions, using a community-powered approach to deliver high-performing Linux, cloud, container, and Kubernetes technologies. Spread across 40+ countries, our associates work flexibly across work environments, from in-office, to office-flex, to fully remote, depending on the requirements of their role. Red Hatters are encouraged to bring their best ideas, no matter their title or tenure. We're a leader in open source because of our open and inclusive environment. We hire creative, passionate people ready to contribute their ideas, help solve complex problems, and make an impact.
Benefits
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Flexible Spending Account - healthcare and dependent care
Health Savings Account - high deductible medical plan
Retirement 401(k) with employer match
Paid time off and holidays
Paid parental leave plans for all new parents
Leave benefits including disability, paid family medical leave, and paid military leave
Additional benefits including employee stock purchase plan, family planning reimbursement, tuition reimbursement, transportation expense account, employee assistance program, and more!
Note: These benefits are only applicable to full time, permanent associates at Red Hat located in the United States.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion at Red Hat
Red Hat’s culture is built on the open source principles of transparency, collaboration, and inclusion, where the best ideas can come from anywhere and anyone. When this is realized, it empowers people from diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and experiences to come together to share ideas, challenge the status quo, and drive innovation. Our aspiration is that everyone experiences this culture with equal opportunity and access, and that all voices are not only heard but also celebrated. We hope you will join our celebration, and we welcome and encourage applicants from all the beautiful dimensions of diversity that compose our global village.
Equal Opportunity Policy (EEO)
Red Hat is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer. We review applications for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, veteran status, genetic information, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

Red Hat does not seek or accept unsolicited resumes or CVs from recruitment agencies. We are not responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions, or any other payment related to unsolicited resumes or CVs except as required in a written contract between Red Hat and the recruitment agency or party requesting payment of a fee.
Red Hat supports individuals with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodations to job applicants. If you need assistance completing our online job application, email
application-assistance@redhat.com
. General inquiries, such as those regarding the status of a job application, will not receive a reply.",4.2,"Red Hat, Inc.","Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,1993.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,170.0,MA,31.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$163K
/yr","It's time to transform markets
Existing workflows within syndicated loan and CLO markets are painful for clients: they are outdated, overcomplicated, and time-consuming. It's time for a change.
Octaura is reimagining the way these markets trade, with efficiency, transparency and simplicity at the heart of what we do. We bring trading capabilities, data and analytics together for the first time on a digitized platform–fundamentally transforming the markets and streamlining workflows like never before.
At Octaura, everyone belongs
It's essential that Octaurians are confident in knowing they have the space to use their voice and talents. The world is diverse and we actively want our team to reflect this. We're a values-driven company and by engaging, solving and evolving together, we create a culture that is collaborative, transparent, impactful and innovative. And fun!
The role in a nutshell
As a Senior Data Scientist at Octaura, you'll be a key member of our Product team, playing a critical role in the development and growth of our Data and Analytics products. This is an early-stage opportunity to shape the future of our data science initiatives and make a significant contribution to the company's success.
What You'll Do
Drive the full product lifecycle: From ideation and market research to model development, deployment, and performance monitoring, you'll be involved in every stage of creating impactful data-driven solutions.
Develop advanced models: You'll leverage your expertise in machine learning and statistical modelling to extract valuable insights from large and complex datasets, building predictive models that fuel our product offerings.
Build scalable infrastructure: Design, implement, and maintain cloud-based infrastructure on AWS and/or Azure to support our data processing and model deployment needs.
Collaborate effectively: Work closely with the Go-to-Market team to understand client needs and market trends, and partner with the Technology team to build robust data pipelines.
Communicate insights: Clearly and effectively communicate your findings to stakeholders across the company, translating complex data into actionable insights
The Opportunity
Make a real impact: You'll have a direct and significant impact on the company's growth and success.
Early-stage opportunity: Shape the future of our data science products and be a part of building something truly innovative.
Collaborative environment: Work alongside a talented and passionate cross functional teams in a supportive and collaborative environment.
Growth potential: Ample opportunities for professional development and career advancement within a rapidly growing startup.
The Person
Advanced degree and experience: PhD (or MSc + 5 years of experience) in statistics, physics, mathematics, computer science, or a related field.
Strong programming skills: Proficiency in Python and experience with popular machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Proven modelling experience: A track record of building and deploying predictive models using machine learning algorithms.
Data analysis expertise: Strong analytical skills with the ability to analyse and interpret complex datasets, identify patterns, and draw meaningful conclusions.
Excellent communication: Exceptional written and verbal communication skills with the ability to explain technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Cloud proficiency: Experience with cloud-based architectures (AWS and/or Azure) is highly preferred.
Fintech/Financial Services experience is a plus: Experience in the financial services industry, particularly within the fixed income market, is a valuable asset.
If you are passionate about data science in finance, have a strong background in technical majors, and are excited about building predictive models and cloud-based infrastructure using AWS and Azure, we want to hear from you. As a startup, we offer a dynamic and entrepreneurial work environment, where you will have the opportunity to take ownership of your work and make a real impact on our business.
The base pay range for this position in New York is $150,000 - $175,000 annually. Pay may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Equity and year-end bonus may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and other benefits, dependent on the position offered. Applicants should apply via Octaura's internal or external careers site.

Octaura Work Perks
At Octaura, our people are our most valuable asset, and we are pleased to offer the following benefits to all full-time employees:
Competitive compensation and equity
Unlimited Paid Time Off
Competitive Parental Leave
Daily breakfast, coffee and snacks in the office
90% company-paid healthcare
Onsite gym & discounted membership
We're committed to equal opportunity employment
Octaura is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status.",5.0,Octaura,"New York, NY",1 to 50 Employees,2022.0,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,163.0,NY,2.0,1,0,0,1,1
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$193K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 18, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200573520

Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products, such as Siri and Search. Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products. This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.
Solid foundation in data science, machine learning, and evaluation, with hands-on experience in independently conducting and analyzing experiments. Ability to take ownership of smaller analytical projects and contribute effectively to larger initiatives.
Proficiency in critical thinking, problem-solving, and collaboration with cross-functional teams to address business needs. Strong communication skills for articulating and translating business questions into actionable insights using statistical techniques and available data.
Strong programming skills in Python for data processing, with expertise in SQL or Spark. Proficient in data wrangling, and able to assist in prototyping data quality and evaluation pipelines, working alongside engineering teams to help solve data challenges.
Some relevant internship or work experience for M.S. or Ph.D. candidates, or 3 years of relevant work experiences for people with other degrees in quantitative fields.

Preferred Qualifications
Experience in generative model and application development, with a focus on data, evaluation, and automation. Ability to adopt or implement established methodologies and apply statistical analysis in problem-solving.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $135,400 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,193.0,WA,48.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Monitoring Operations","$270K
/yr","About the Team
OpenAI’s mission is to ensure that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We believe that achieving our goal requires real world deployment and iteratively updating based on what we learn.
The Intelligence and Investigations team supports this by identifying and investigating misuses of our products – especially new types of abuse. This enables our partner teams to develop data-backed product policies and build scaled safety mitigations. Precisely understanding abuse allows us to safely enable users to build useful things with our products.
About the Role
As a Data Scientist on the Monitoring Operations team, you will be responsible for building systems to proactively identify abuse on OpenAI’s products. This includes ensuring we have robust monitoring in place for new products, and can sustain monitoring for existing products. You will also respond to critical escalations, especially those that are not caught by our existing safety systems. This will require expert understanding of our products and data, and involves working cross-functionally with product, policy, and engineering teams.
This role is based in our San Francisco office and includes participation in an on-call rotation that will involve resolving urgent escalations outside of normal work hours. Some investigations may involve sensitive content, including sexual, violent, or otherwise-disturbing material.
In this role, you will:
Scope and implement monitoring requirements for new product launches. This involves working with Product and Policy teams to understand key risks, and working with Engineering teams to ensure we have sufficient data and tooling.
Improve processes to sustain monitoring operations for existing products. This includes developing approaches to automate monitoring subtasks.
You might thrive in this role if you:
Have at least 4 years of experience doing technical analysis, especially in SQL and Python.
Have experience in trust and safety and/or have worked closely with policy, enforcement, and engineering teams
Have experience with basic data engineering, such as building core tables or writing data pipelines (not expected to build infrastructure or write production code)
Have experience scaling and automating processes, especially with language models
About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,270.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II,"$130K
/yr","Want a meaningful career where you can make a difference? Edward Jones sounds perfect for you.

Collaboration. Autonomy. Opportunity. Words our headquarters associates use when talking about working at Edward Jones. Words that describe what it's like being part of a firm where everyone is aligned toward a singular focus: serving the client. And everyone is working to make the firm better together - as they grow as individuals. If these words resonate with you, we should talk.

Job Overview

Position Schedule: Full-Time

Overview:
Come join us in Firm Strategy, where we strive to unleash the full potential of data and AI to address business challenges. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will design, develop and deliver data science solutions requiring advanced mathematical methods, statistical and machine learning models in support of data-driven strategies. You will combine data from multiple sources to develop innovative solutions to business problems and collaborate with business partners and other data scientists to develop tailored analytic solutions that inform and influence decisions across the firm.

Key Responsibilities:
Partner with business partners to design, develop and deploy solutions that enable hyper-personalized interactions.
Use machine learning, numerical optimization, and statistical modeling to discover and explain patterns in data.
Create features and develop models beyond standard toolset libraries to meet unique business challenges.
Proactively interpret and communicate findings and insights from the data to business partners. Clear communication without technical jargon is important to success.
Execute projects from design and data-gathering, through implementation, final delivery, and monitoring.
Define data needs and evaluate data quality for applicability to posed problems.
Rapidly optimize data and model inputs to increase predictiveness and relevance in response to changes in data availability, data quality, or business specifications.


Edward Jones' compensation and benefits package includes medical and prescription drug, dental, vision, voluntary benefits (such as accident, hospital indemnity, and critical illness), short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage. Short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage are provided at no cost to associates. Edward Jones offers a 401k retirement plan, and tax-advantaged accounts: health savings account, and flexible spending account. Edward Jones observes ten paid holidays and provides 15 days of vacation for new associates beginning on January 1 of each year, as well as sick time, personal days, and a paid day for volunteerism. Associates may be eligible for bonuses and profit sharing. All associates are eligible for the firm's Employee Assistance Program. For more information on the Benefits available to Edward Jones associates, please visit our benefits page.

At Edward Jones, we value and respect our associates and their contributions, and we recognize individual efforts through a rewards program that promotes a long-term career, financial security and well-being. Visit our career site to learn more about our total compensation approach, which in addition to base salary, typically includes benefits, bonuses and profit sharing. The salary range for this role is based on national data and actual pay is based on skills, experience, education, and other relevant factors for a potential new associate:

Hiring Minimum: $96471
Hiring Maximum: $164262

Read More About Job Overview

Skills/Requirements
Master of Science Degree in a quantitative field required. PhD degree desired.
5+ years professional experience.
Proficiency with one or more computing languages (Python, SQL).
Ability to deliver capabilities that derive insights or novel ideas from data and mathematical models using best data science practices. Connect insights to desired research or business outcomes.
Demonstrated ability and interest in learning new algorithms and tools, e.g. GenAI, machine learning, and optimization.
Proficiency with cloud computing platforms and distributed systems for large-scale data processing.

Please note: Candidates that live within a commutable distance from our Tempe, AZ and St. Louis, MO home office locations are expected to work in the office three days per week, with preference for Tuesday through Thursday.

Read More About Skills/Requirements

Awards & Accolades

At Edward Jones, we are building a place where everyone feels like they belong. We're proud of our associates' contributions to the firm and the recognitions we have received.

Check out our U.S. awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Check out our Canadian awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Read More About Awards & Accolades

About Us

Join a financial services firm where your contributions are valued. Edward Jones is a Fortune 500¹ company where people come first. With over 8 million clients and 19,000 financial advisors across the U.S. and Canada, we're proud to be privately-owned, placing the focus on our clients rather than shareholder returns.

Behind everything we do is our purpose: We partner for positive impact to improve the lives of our clients and colleagues, and together, better our communities and society. We are an innovative, flexible, and inclusive organization that attracts, develops, and inspires performance excellence and a sense of belonging.

People are at the center of our partnership. Edward Jones associates are seen, heard, respected, and supported. This is what we believe makes us the best place to start or build your career.

View our Purpose, Inclusion and Citizenship Report.

1Fortune 500, published June 2023, data as of December 2022. Compensation provided for using, not obtaining, the rating.

Edward Jones does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, gender, religion, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, pregnancy, veteran status, genetic information or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.",3.7,Edward Jones,United States,10000+ Employees,1922.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,United States,102.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection","$170K
/yr","Proof is the world's first identity-assured transaction management platform and we are on a mission to digitize trust for all of life’s most critical transactions. Developed by the same market leaders and experts who brought notarization online with Notarize℠, Proof offers trust in a digital world by verifying identities and securing transactions to protect businesses and their customers. Since 2015, we’ve completed many of the world’s first digital commerce transactions, including the first online real estate closing, online mortgage closing, online auto sale, and online will and we're still just getting started!

We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our Fraud Tech product engineering team. As a member of this team, you will use your analytical skills to identify and prevent fraud risks. You will work with product and engineering partners, as well as risk and policy teams to build solutions that fit product needs.

Proof is a growing startup. You will get a chance to meaningfully contribute to building new products and services leveraging novel, data driven solutions, wear multiple hats, and closely collaborate within and outside of a small team.
What you’ll do as the Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection at Proof:
Leverage advanced analytics, machine learning, and statistical methods to detect and mitigate fraudulent activities on Proof platform
Contribute to large-scale analytical fraud research and implementation projects through all stages
Partner with product managers, engineers, operational and legal teams to envision and implement best in class data based solutions
Evaluate fraud cases holistically to identify areas of improvement
Analyze and incorporate additional signals that continuously improve fraud detection
Maintain knowledge and understanding of current trends and issues affecting the area of expertise
What we're looking for:
Master’s degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related field
5+ years of experience in data science with a focus on fraud detection or a similar domain
Traditional and advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms
Excellent quantitative and analytical skills; ability to derive patterns, trends and insights, and perform risk/reward tradeoff analysis
Deep understanding of data management such as data pipeline and data quality
Experience in building machine learning powered products
Analytic thought leadership; intellectual curiosity
Effective communication skills and experience presenting findings to stakeholders
$130,000 - $210,000 a year
This is the expected cash compensation range for this position. The salary offered within this range will be determined based on factors including but not limited to skills, qualifications, experience and location. The total compensation package for this role also includes benefits such as medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability coverage, flexible paid time off, Carrot Fertility, participation in a 401(k) with company match and more!
Proof is committed to building an inclusive environment for people of all backgrounds and everyone is encouraged to apply. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We'd love to hear from you.",4.7,Proof.com,United States,1 to 50 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,170.0,United States,3.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II (NLP Required),"$90K
/yr","Job Summary:
The Data Scientist II is responsible for designing and validating predictive models, machine learning models, and artificial intelligence that inform and improve business processes across the organization (operational, clinical, financial, marketing, etc.).
Targeting a candidate fluent in NLP, generalized linear models, LLM, deep learning and predictive modeling.
Essential Functions:
Create, maintain, and communicate an analytical plan for each project
Mine and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets
Employ wide range of data sources to develop algorithms for predicting risk and understanding drivers, detecting outliers, etc.
Develop visualizations that demonstrate the efficacy of developed algorithms
Provide statistical validation and analysis of outcomes associated with clinical programs and interventions
Collaborate with other teams to integrate with existing solutions
Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders
Prepare code for operationalization of end-to-end model pipeline and deliverable for business consumption
Perform any other job duties as requested
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, other related field or equivalent years of relevant work experience is required
Minimum of three (3) years of experience in data analysis and/or analytic programming required
Experience with cloud services (such as Azure, AWS or GCP) and modern data stack (such as Databricks or Snowflakes) is preferred
Healthcare experience is preferred
Competencies, Knowledge, and Skills:
Proficient in SQL and at least one of the following programming languages: Python or R
Preferred beginner level of knowledge of developing reports or dashboards in Power BI or other business intelligence applications
Ability to perform basic statistical analyses and techniques including A/B testing, general significance testing, and sampling methodologies
Working knowledge of predictive modeling and machine learning algorithms such as generalized linear models, non-linear supervised learning models, clustering, decision trees, dimensionality reduction and natural language processing
Proficient in feature engineering techniques and exploratory data analysis
Familiarity with optimization techniques and artificial intelligence methods
Ability to analyze large quantities of information and identify patterns, irregularities, and deficiencies
Proficient with MS office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Access)
Demonstrated critical thinking, verbal communication, presentation and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and within a cross-functional team environment
Licensure and Certification:
None
Working Conditions:
General office environment; may be required to sit or stand for extended periods of time
Compensation Range:
$69,400.00 - $111,000.00
CareSource takes into consideration a combination of a candidate’s education, training, and experience as well as the position’s scope and complexity, the discretion and latitude required for the role, and other external and internal data when establishing a salary level. We are highly invested in every employee’s total well-being and offer a substantial and comprehensive total rewards package.
Compensation Type (hourly/salary):
Salary
Organization Level Competencies
Create an Inclusive Environment
Cultivate Partnerships
Develop Self and Others
Drive Execution
Influence Others
Pursue Personal Excellence
Understand the Business

This job description is not all inclusive. CareSource reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. CareSource is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are dedicated to fostering an inclusive environment that welcomes and supports individuals of all backgrounds.",3.7,CareSource,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,90.0,Remote,35.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","About Us
At Vast.ai, we value creativity, energy, drive and teamwork. We are looking for talented people who share these values to join as we grow our team. Our vision is to widely distribute AI computing to reshape our future for the good of humanity. Come join us. If witnessing the birth of AGI excites you, we can't wait to hear from you!
Vast.ai is a market based cloud computing platform focused on reducing the cost and friction of compute-intensive workloads, enabling anyone to easily leverage large-scale GPU liquidity. Vast.ai is the market leader for low cost GPU rentals. Our GPU marketplace powers AI projects and businesses all over the world.
NOTE: Currently hiring for on-site work in Westwood, Los Angeles.
About the Role
We're looking for a skilled Marketing Data Scientist to join our growing team. In this role, you'll be instrumental in applying advanced analytics to our marketing and sales funnels, driving growth and efficiency through data-driven insights. You'll work closely with our marketing, sales, and product teams to implement measurement tools, design and run A/B tests, and develop predictive models that inform our marketing strategies. This position offers a unique opportunity to apply your data science expertise in a dynamic startup environment at the forefront of AI technology.
Key Responsibilities
Develop and implement predictive analytics models for our marketing and sales funnels.
Design, implement, and analyze A/B tests to optimize marketing campaigns and user experiences.
Create SQL queries and custom analysis for production sales and website tracking data.
Develop innovative approaches using LLMs/AI for customer analysis.
Develop data-driven recommendations to inform marketing strategy and budget allocation.
Stay current with the latest data science techniques and marketing analytics trends.
You Are
A data-driven problem solver with a passion for marketing analytics.
Familiar with SQL and direct database manipulation.
Experienced in designing and implementing A/B tests and experimentation frameworks.
Proficient in statistical analysis and machine learning techniques.
An excellent communicator, able to present technical concepts to diverse audiences.
Proactive and self-motivated, with the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.
Qualifications
Master's degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or a related field.
3+ years of experience applying data science in a marketing context.
Strong programming skills in Python or R, and proficiency with SQL.
Experience with marketing analytics tools (e.g., Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics) and A/B testing platforms.
Proven track record of implementing predictive models in a business setting.
Familiarity with machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Knowledge of digital marketing channels and metrics.
Bonus: Experience in the B2B SaaS or cloud computing industry.
Benefits
Full-Time, Monday - Friday.
Onsite at the Vast.ai HQ in Westwood, Los Angeles.
Health, dental, vision and life insurance coverage.
Matching 401K.
Ambitious, fast-paced startup environment.
Generous equity.",4.5,Vast.ai,"Los Angeles, CA",201 to 500 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,CA,3.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$154K
/yr","The Microsoft AI (Artifical Intelligence) Web Data team is looking for a Data Scientist II to help us build the next generation platform for Bing and Microsoft AI. In Web Data, we are on a mission to build the most vast and accurate model of the Web to power search and AI. We are pushing frontiers of scalability and index quality by creating models and systems for discovering, storing, processing Web content, and operating AI solutions. Our core set of engineering challenges includes:
Discovering diverse content on the Web quickly and efficiently by understanding the structure and dynamics of the Web and optimizing crawl scheduling.
Building Big Data pipelines, creating ML(Machine Learning) and AI models for index selection, and determining document quality.
Designing and implementing models and pipelines for near-real time (NRT) indexing and content freshness.
Designing and implementing methods for leveraging AI in platform and backend solutions.
This is a great opportunity for someone who loves to tackle deep technical challenges and strives for industry-wide impact. At this role, you'd be dealing with and learning how to do data collection, analysis and cleaning, building Big Data pipelines, making decision based on data, doing model training and deployment, and working with LLMs both for prompt engineering and fine-tuning.

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
Acquire the data necessary for your project plan and use querying, visualization, and reporting techniques to describe that data. You’ll also explore data for key attributes and collaborate with others to perform data science experiments using established methodologies.
Understand modeling techniques, select the correct tool and approach to complete objectives, and evaluate the output for statistical and business significance. You’ll also analyze model performance and incorporate customer feedback into its evaluation.
Understand the current state of the industry, including current trends, so that you can contribute to thought leadership best practices.
Write efficient code for a specific feature, and develop a working expertise of proper debugging techniques.
Understand each customer’s business goals and learn best practices for identifying growth opportunities.
Examine projects through a customer-oriented focus, and manage customer expectations regarding project progress.
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 2+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR equivalent experience.
1+ year(s) customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR equivalent experience.
Data Science IC3 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $98,300 - $193,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $127,200 - $208,800 per year.

Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until October 21, 2024.

#Bing
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,"Redmond, WA",10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,154.0,WA,49.0,0,0,0,1,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Overview:
At LMI, we’re reimagining the path from insight to outcome at The New Speed of Possible™. Combining a legacy of over 60 years of federal expertise with our innovation ecosystem, we minimize time to value and accelerate mission success. We energize the brightest minds with emerging technologies to inspire creative solutioning and push the boundaries of capability. LMI advances the pace of progress, enabling our customers to thrive while adapting to evolving mission needs.
Responsibilities:
Frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available visualization and dashboard tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to research questions.
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications:
Pursuit of a bachelor’s degree from a HBCU or MSI in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline
Previous experience or internships at a government consulting or technology consulting firm is required
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
Preferred experience with data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics; additional preferred qualifications include working with unstructured text and natural language processing
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Applicants for this position may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Please note that only US citizens are eligible to obtain security clearances.",4.1,Logistics Management Institute,"Tysons Corner, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1961.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,105.0,VA,63.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","The Data Lab team seeks a talented data scientist - with experience in data engineering, data analysis and documentation, workflow management, and web development - to lead the team’s technical priorities. Following is an overview of key duties:

Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,131.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","ABOUT THIS POSITION
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist. The data scientist role involves solving data-driven Healthcare problems using various machine learning and predictive modeling methods. This person will primarily work as part of the larger Data Science team interacting Product Management and Application teams to conduct analysis and experimentation to maximize the utility of predictive modeling and data driven strategies across Waystar. applying machine learning, predictive modeling, and analytic components to maximize operational outcomes for healthcare providers. The ideal candidate for this position will have exposure to the healthcare revenue cycle, can approach problem-solving challenges independently, has a strong attention to detail, and enjoys working in a fast-paced, collaborative, and team-based environment.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
Must be a quick-learner with the ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Presentation abilities and the ability to communicate with all levels of the Business.
Comfortable working in ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability are key skills.
Competent communication and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Bachelor’s degree in the fields of Computer or Data Science, Statistics, or Mathematics is required. Additional experience and/or education in healthcare, business operations or other areas is preferred.
An aptitude for medical informatics is preferred
ABOUT WAYSTAR
Through a smart platform and better experience, Waystar helps providers simplify healthcare payments and yield powerful results throughout the complete revenue cycle.
Waystar’s healthcare payments platform combines innovative, cloud-based technology, robust data, and unparalleled client support to streamline workflows and improve financials so providers can focus on what matters most: their patients and communities. Waystar is trusted by 1M+ providers, 1K+ hospitals and health systems, and is connected to over 5K commercial and Medicaid/Medicare payers. We are deeply committed to living out our organizational values: honesty; kindness; passion; curiosity; fanatical focus; best work, always; making it happen; and joyful, optimistic & fun.
Waystar products have won multiple Best in KLAS® or Category Leader awards since 2010 and earned multiple #1 rankings from Black Book™ surveys since 2012. The Waystar platform supports more than 500,000 providers, 1,000 health systems and hospitals, and 5,000 payers and health plans. For more information, visit
waystar.com
or follow
@Waystar
on Twitter.
WAYSTAR PERKS
Competitive total rewards (base salary + bonus, if applicable)
Customizable benefits package (3 medical plans with Health Saving Account company match)
Generous paid time off starting at 3 weeks + 13 paid holidays including 2 personal floating holidays
Paid parental leave (including maternity + paternity leave)
Education assistance opportunities and free LinkedIn Learning access
Free mental health and family planning programs, including adoption assistance and fertility support
401(K) program with company match
Pet insurance
Employee resource groups
Waystar is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We celebrate, value, and support diversity and inclusion. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws.
This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",4.2,Waystar,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1999.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,126.0,GA,25.0,0,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Our mission is to open the door to the life-changing impact of education and help make education accessible for all. As a nimble growth stage start-up, we've emerged as the leading online education platform helping over 30 million learners and educators each month. Study.com has earned numerous awards and it has been recognized as one of the most transformational companies in EdTech, living up to our commitment to all learners: Breakthroughs Start Here. From students and educators in over 9,000 school districts that use Study.com, to working adults striving to complete their college degree or gain professional certifications, we empower them to reach their full potential. Our product is our impact! Across our college programs alone we have saved students over $200M in tuition and enabled tens of thousands to become nurses, teachers, accountants and more. Additionally, as part of our mission we've donated over $27 million across social impact programs to learners and educators.
As an education technology leader, Study.com owes much of its success to its data-driven approach. We help over thirty million learners and instructors on Study.com each month, improving their user experience and driving growth by collecting, storing, and presenting massive amounts of data that are crucial to everyday business decisions.
We're looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing team. The ideal candidate is passionate about all aspects of data – digging deep to explain observations or gain business insights, turning complex data into intuitive visualizations, transforming it to simplify future tasks and building machine learning models to provide the business with accurate predictions.
This role is based in our Mountain View, CA office and is hybrid in office Mondays, Wednesdays, and Thursdays.
What You'll Do:
Share ownership and maintenance responsibilities of our entire data warehouse, including 50-100 million events coming through a Kafka queue each day, a 20 node Cassandra cluster, a 15 TB relational database, and an integration with Google BigQuery.
Monitor and analyze the team's A/B tests and proactively communicate key insights within your team and to external stakeholders.
Be the voice of data by supporting the team's product owner in finding business opportunities, defining KPIs, and setting team goals.
Provide leadership with data pulls, analyses and deep dives that significantly influence important company decisions.
Create and update ETLs as our source data and data needs evolve
Build data visualizations and reports using Tableau
Build, maintain, and improve machine learning models (neural networks, logistic regressions, boosted trees, k-means clustering, etc.)
Innovate! We're a team that likes to stay on the cutting edge. Everyone is expected to always be looking for ways to leverage the latest technology to improve our processes and drive better results.
What You'll Bring To The Role:
3-5 years of experience in a Data Science or related role (experience with web analytics is a plus)
BS in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field (master's degree or PhD a plus)
Strong proficiency in SQL (Google BigQuery and MySQL)
Experience writing code (Python and Java/Groovy)
A willingness to work in a face-paced, dynamic environment while juggling multiple projects
A passion for innovation and learning with a driven mindset
Excellent communication skills
Nice To Have:
Experience creating complex data visualizations with Tableau
Hands-on experience with advanced statistical concepts, such as cluster analysis, singular value decomposition, gradient descent, etc.
Knowledge of web analytics software and best practices
Strong ability to use Generative AI (e.g. ChatGPT, copilot, etc.) to assist with technical tasks
The salary range for this position is $120,000 - $150,000 per year. Pay and is dependent upon factors including skills, work experience, business needs, and market demands.
At Study.com, we know that strong communities are built on the power of our diversity, and we respect and strive to understand for the diverse identities, race, ethnicities, backgrounds, and perspectives of our team members. Our work and company culture have been consistently recognized, including:
Inc. Best Place to Work
Fortune Great Places to Work – Best Workplaces in the Bay Area
Golden Bridge Awards – Gold Winner, Corporate Social Responsibility
San Francisco Business Times & Silicon Valley Business Journal – Best Places to Work
Study.com provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran or disability status. In addition to federal law requirements.
Study.com complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. Additionally, qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records will be considered for the position in accordance with applicable state and local laws.",3.0,Study.com,"Mountain View, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2002.0,Company - Private,Education & Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,135.0,CA,22.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","This Opportunity
WSP is currently initiating a search for a Data Scientist for our Baltimore, MD office. Be a member of our Planning Advisory Team a growing organization that meets our client’s objectives and solves their challenges. This position will be working full-time for our client The Maryland Transit Administration, Office of Performance Management/Office of Customer Experience (OPM/OPX) requiring on-site work in the client’s office in Baltimore’s Inner Harbor 2-3 days per week.
As a Data Scientist, you will work on a scrum team with other embedded Data Scientists, the Manager of Data Science, and the Manager of Performance Programs and Data Analytics. Your work will fall into two categories: building and maintaining technical artifacts, and building and refining processes and policies. The Data Science Team is currently working to expand its capacity, and you will contribute to that effort by building data pipelines in our Data Lake to support enterprise intelligence products, building data services that drive institutional goals, and conducting various analyses to answer specific questions for stakeholders. You will also help develop internal processes and policies by writing and updating pages in our team handbook, building Github actions and unit tests, and collaborating with team members to solve recurring technical problems.
Your Impact
Support efficient and effective operations by analyzing data in R and/or Python programming languages and delivering clear answers to specific questions.
Support the data analyst's Power BI products by designing, building, and modifying data models and data
pipelines in a manner consistent with the data science team's data governance policy.
Maintain transparency and minimize technical debt by using Git DevOps platforms to commit code, submit
merge requests, and track your work using issues and epics in a manner consistent with the data science team's DevOps policy.
Prioritize performance management projects by working with the Data Analytics team to define enterprise
objectives, user stories, and data stories.
Promote teamwork by making meaningful contributions to our team handbook, creating and modifying policies and procedures to enhance productivity.
Honor the data science team's warranty on artifacts in production by debugging and solving programming and data problems.
Identify new opportunities to improve MTA customer experience by conducting self-guided exploratory work or as part of assigned tasks.
Who You Are
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Math, Data Analysis, Accounting, Finance or related field.
1 to 3 years of relevant post education experience working as a data scientist/analyst.
A passion for improving public transportation through the effective use of data analytics.
The ability to construct complex queries in SQL involving multiple joins, sub-queries, case when statements, etc.
R and Python programming skills.
Ability to problem-solve independently using Google searches, Stack Overflow, Chat GPT, and other similar
resources.
Ability to communicate clearly and respectfully to technical and non-technical staff of differing backgrounds and experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with version control such as Git, and cloud-based services such as GitHub.
Experience working on a scrum team.
Prior experience within the engineering consulting industry is preferred.
#LI-MH4



About WSP
WSP USA is the U.S. operating company of WSP, one of the world's leading engineering and professional services firms. Dedicated to serving local communities, we are engineers, planners, technical experts, strategic advisors and construction management professionals. WSP USA designs lasting solutions in the buildings, transportation, energy, water and environment markets. With more than 15,000 employees in over 300 offices across the U.S., we partner with our clients to help communities prosper.
www.wsp.com
WSP provides a flexible and agile workplace model while meeting client needs. Employees are also afforded a comprehensive suite of benefits including medical, dental, vision, disability, life, and retirement savings focused on providing health and financial stability throughout the employee’s career.
At WSP, we want to give our employees the challenges they seek to grow their careers and knowledge base. Your daily contributions to your team will be essential in meeting client objectives, goals and challenges. Are you ready to get started?
WSP USA (and all of its U.S. companies) is an Equal Opportunity Employer Race/Age/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disability or Protected Veteran Status.
The selected candidate must be authorized to work in the United States.
NOTICE TO THIRD PARTY AGENCIES:
WSP does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters, employment agencies, or other staffing services. Unsolicited resumes include any resume or hiring document sent to WSP in the absence of a signed Service Agreement where WSP has expressly requested recruitment/staffing services specific to the position at hand. Any unsolicited resumes, including those submitted to hiring managers or other business leaders, will become the property of WSP and WSP will have the right to hire that candidate without reservation – no fee or other compensation will be owed or paid to the recruiter, employment agency, or other staffing service.",3.7,WSP,"Baltimore, MD",10000+ Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,102.0,MD,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$130K
/yr","About the Role

Houzz is looking for a world-class Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.
What You'll Do
Collaborate with leadership, product, data, and engineering teams to identify, define, and launch strategic and operational data science initiatives to improve growth performance
Define key metrics (KPIs) to guide business decision-making across various aspects of our site
Manage the key metrics of the business and product efficiently
Design product experiments, interpret results to draw detailed and impactful conclusions, and conduct root cause analysis
Work with data infrastructure/product engineering teams to define the data collection needs
Provide recommendations to assist quick product ideation and feature launch decisions
Develop and maintain data products to serve real-time business insights or to be used in production environments
Build and maintain dashboards and reports that provide actionable insights for finance, product, and sales
At a Minimum, We'd Like You to Have
Bachelors/Masters Degree with 2+ years of experience working within an analytical role in a high-growth tech company
Proficiency in writing complex SQL queries such as using aggregate functions and all types of joins using Hadoop, Hive and Presto. Strong programming skills in Python or R
Strong in problem-solving and analytical thinking to take an open business question from exploratory data analysis to actionable insights and guided execution recommendations
Proficiency in using Tableau for visualization
Proficiency in advanced experimental designing, testing, and analysis
Strong communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
A passion for analytics and product development
Self-motivated, independent, and eager to learn
Ability to have fun!
Ideally, You'll Also Have
An advanced degree in a technical field such as Statistics, Operations Research, or Engineering
Experience with subscription-based analytics, web/app user engagement, and funnel conversion
Ability to learn and act quickly, making decisions and drawing conclusions in the face of ambiguity
Experience with statistical modeling
Experience working with remote teams with a time zone difference
Compensation, Benefits and Perks

This role has an annual starting salary range of $120,000 - $140,000. In addition to salary, you’re eligible for competitive benefits that support you and your family as part of your total rewards package at Houzz. Also, depending on the role, you could be eligible for an equity award. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors, including, but not limited to, skills, experience, and specific work location.

Benefits and perks include:
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Home internet stipend
Medical, dental, and vision benefits
Maternity/paternity leave program
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Professional Development Reimbursement Program
401(k) retirement savings plans (Pre-Tax and Roth)
- Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA) - Medical & Dependent Care
Health Savings Account (HSA) with company contribution
Healthy at Houzz program

Houzz is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. When applying for a role at Houzz, we guarantee your application will be considered regardless of your sex; race; color; gender; national origin; height or weight; ancestry; physical or mental disability; medical condition; genetic information; marital status; registered domestic partner status; age; sexual orientation; military and veteran status; or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law or ordinance or regulation.

We embrace and celebrate the value that diversity brings to an organization. Diverse backgrounds and different points of view help Houzz provide the best experience for our community. Houzz is committed to fostering an inclusive environment through projects and initiatives, such as employee resource groups, that support Houzzers’ efforts to be themselves and share their lives at work.

If you would like assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please email us at accommodations@houzz.com. This information will be treated as confidential and used only for determining an appropriate accommodation for the interview process.

Houzz is an Equal Opportunity Employer. M/F/Disability/Veterans
__________________

Be Who You Are and Do What You Love at Houzz

About Houzz
When founders Adi and Alon remodeled their home, they were frustrated by the lack of resources and inspiration to help them articulate a vision and select the right pro to make it a reality.

So they built Houzz.

Houzz is now the leading platform for home remodeling and design, providing an all-in-one software solution for industry professionals and tools for homeowners to update their homes from start to finish. Using Houzz, people can find ideas and inspiration, hire professionals, and shop for products. Houzz Pro (houzz.com/pro) provides home industry professionals with a business management and marketing SaaS solution that helps them to win projects, collaborate with clients and teams, and run their business efficiently and profitably.

Our Mission and Core Values
We're proud to say there's no one quite like us. Houzz is a community-centric, innovative tech company that continues to disrupt the home renovation and design industry. Our mission-driven culture is rooted in our core values, and we’re all here for one purpose: make the home remodeling and design process more fun and productive for everyone.

Our Mission
To create the best experience for home renovation and design.

Our Core Values
We’re a Community
We put our community of Houzzers, industry professionals and homeowners first. We approach our work with care, humility and respect. We deliver value to our community through our products and services.

We Build the Future
We are visionaries who challenge the status quo. We are creative, innovative and curious. We embrace change and different ideas to drive our industry forward.

We Make Things Happen
We are solution-seekers and self-starters. We listen, move fast and empower our teams to deliver extraordinary results and products. We play to win.

By applying for a job with us, you acknowledge and agree to the terms of our Job Applicant Privacy Notice.

Roles listing ‘Remote - US’ as a location are not currently available in the following states: Alaska, Hawaii, Louisiana and Montana.

#LI-Remote",3.8,Houzz,United States,501 to 1000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,130.0,United States,15.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","Overview:
The Data Scientist will create data science and data engineering products that include data models, data ingestion/transform, analytics which may include machine learning, and some form of output as either a machine-readable format (e.g. file output, database output, standard/streaming output) or a user interface or dashboard.
Responsibilities:
Demonstrated experience with the following:
Python programming
REST APIs and microservices.
Demonstrated experience performing the extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) of structured and unstructured data
Demonstrated experience modeling, structuring, cleaning, and conditioning data from multiple sources and in multiple different formats, languages, and encodings.
Demonstrated experience with cloud services, such as AWS.preferred",2.3,SilverEdge,"Chantilly, VA",Unknown,,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,0
Associate Data Scientist,"$86K
/yr","Requisition ID: R10174460
Category: Research and Sciences
Location: Chandler, Arizona, United States of America
Clearance Type: None
Telecommute: No- Teleworking not available for this position
Shift: 1st Shift (United States of America)
Travel Required: No
Positions Available: 1
At Northrop Grumman, our employees have incredible opportunities to work on revolutionary systems that impact people's lives around the world today, and for generations to come. Our pioneering and inventive spirit has enabled us to be at the forefront of many technological advancements in our nation's history - from the first flight across the Atlantic Ocean, to stealth bombers, to landing on the moon. We look for people who have bold new ideas, courage and a pioneering spirit to join forces to invent the future, and have fun along the way. Our culture thrives on intellectual curiosity, cognitive diversity and bringing your whole self to work — and we have an insatiable drive to do what others think is impossible. Our employees are not only part of history, they're making history.
Space Systems is looking for an Associate Data Scientist to join the Launch Vehicles business unit within the Mission Assurance team located in Chandler, AZ.
This position requires the incumbent to work on-site at our Chandler campus that features engineering, office and state-of -the-art manufacturing space.
You will be part of a team that supports all of Launch Vehicles, its sibling business units and sector level initiatives. Work may vary with shifting priorities based on business needs.
The Associate Data Scientist will:
Create data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.
Conduct Analysis utilizing many applications to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization. Requires strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Create/maintain documentation of all aspects or work duties, applications, charts, training, etc. related to any tasks within the scope of responsibilities or assignment.
Generate monthly CAB metrics, Supplier Scorecards, support QA Call Board.
Create and maintain digital solutions that support Chandler/Space Sector initiatives for digital transformation.
Able to work/collaborate with a team to develop/maintain existing products/applications and supporting documentation
Able to innovate new solutions and applications from ground up to full implementation.
Must be able to take verbal feedback and determine how to implement it into the tools/applications to provide desired results to requestors
Must be able to analyze data, determine causes for discrepancies or areas of improvement, offer alternative solutions and implement them
Works primarily with immediate supervisor, project leaders, and other professionals in the section or group. May be called in to groups or meetings with high level participants. Communication of applications, skills, supporting documentation and demonstration of tools may be required.
Typical work week is 9/80A schedule. General hours are day shift, core hours of 9:00AM to 3:00PM. Hours for monthly metric generation and review will need to be flexible and could require flex schedule some evenings.
Basic Qualifications:
This position requires a Bachelor's degree with 1 year of related work experience.
Intermediate level experience in Tableau and Excel is required.
Experience using SQL databases and tools to extract necessary information for Tableau charts required.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
No clearance is required to start.
Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science with 2 years of experience is preferred.
Ability to code in Python/SQL a plus.
Salary Range: $68,500 - $102,700
The above salary range represents a general guideline; however, Northrop Grumman considers a number of factors when determining base salary offers such as the scope and responsibilities of the position and the candidate's experience, education, skills and current market conditions.
Employees may be eligible for a discretionary bonus in addition to base pay. Annual bonuses are designed to reward individual contributions as well as allow employees to share in company results. Employees in Vice President or Director positions may be eligible for Long Term Incentives. In addition, Northrop Grumman provides a variety of benefits including health insurance coverage, life and disability insurance, savings plan, Company paid holidays and paid time off (PTO) for vacation and/or personal business.
The application period for the job is estimated to be 20 days from the job posting date. However, this timeline may be shortened or extended depending on business needs and the availability of qualified candidates.
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit. U.S. Citizenship is required for all positions with a government clearance and certain other restricted positions.",4.0,Northrop Grumman,"Chandler, AZ",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,86.0,AZ,85.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","Software Bloc LLC, Plano, TX
Technologies –Proficient in Python and R with experience in SQL, GitHub (not a deal breaker), and AWS/Azure and cloud storage related experience.
Full Time

JOB DESCRIPTION

Your role will work to inform the business on strategic recommendations on data collection, integration, and retention requirements incorporating business needs and knowledge of best practices
Work on improvements to methods and algorithms, developing innovative and effective approaches to solve businesses’ analytical problems and communicate these results and methodologies to our teams
Support recommendations of ongoing improvements that lead to findings, including new information, in collaboration with our Lead Data Scientist
QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field
3+ years in a related field is preferred
Skills to communicate well in a global environment",Not listed,Software Bloc,"Plano, TX",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,102.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","DESCRIPTION:
The Data Scientist may be responsible for any of the following tasks: Analyzing data that is collected in our current and future products and services, Develop statistical and machine learning models using state of the art Machine Learning and AI technologies, Visualize insights for business actions and collaborate with Software Developers to implement into our products and services. The Data Scientist would need to be able to apply the data analysis, models, and software to the markets our products are in for us to better serve our customers. The Data Scientist must have good communication and organization skills, along with a working knowledge of day-to-day operations and priorities within their department and the company. Assume other duties as assigned.
Now offering a 4.5-day workweek!




QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Statistics or Mathematics preferred or any other quantitative discipline
Strong proficiencies in the languages, development tools, and frameworks of Python, R, SQL and Tableau
Ability to gain knowledge of the products and customers of the Auction and Heavy Equipment industries
Technical understanding regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques
General understanding of Machine Learning and AI tools and frameworks
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Knowledge of Data Ops and Data Management tools, such as Docker, Jenkins and Spark.
Adept at generating reports and presenting findings in an understandable manner
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Able to work independently and communicate within a team environment
Results oriented
Flexible and open to change
Stable and progressive work history
Professional appearance and demeanor
Ability to travel by air and ground - valid driver’s license required
Able to work with minimal supervision
In Office Position. 4.5 day regular work week. Ability to commute daily to local office is required.",3.1,"Sandhills Global, Inc.","Lincoln, NE",1001 to 5000 Employees,1978.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,111.0,NE,46.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$109K
/yr","This Data Scientist position at Mimecast is the advanced analytical engine of the Business Intelligence team, focused on solving high-value business problems using cutting-edge AI/ML tools and techniques. This role involves building and enhancing machine learning models, collaborating with stakeholders to develop new Generative AI tools, and transforming the business with actionable insights. We prioritize providing exceptional user experiences and taking on projects with game-changing potential. At Mimecast, we deliver the right data to the right people at the right time, supporting data-driven decisions with self-service dashboards, custom alerts, and executive presentations. As the company grows, so does our appetite for data, analysis, and insights.
What You'll Do:
Work cross-functionally with stakeholders across the business to evaluate, prioritize, and develop new Machine Learning and Generative AI powered solutions to solve business problems.
Own, maintain, and optimize existing Machine Learning models, as required
Work collaboratively with analysts, data engineers, and analytics engineers to bring data science and machine learning powered solutions to life.
Partner directly with functional teams to bring data and analytics expertise to our decision-making processes.
Contribute to the Data Science team’s capabilities as an internal expert on machine learning and advanced analytics.
Foster stakeholder partnerships, and work to create a culture of collaboration and data literacy to increase the company’s analytics maturity.
Present findings and technically challenging topics to a diverse group of technical and non-technical business stakeholders.
What You'll Bring:
A minimum of 3 years of work experience in data science, analytics or directly related area, during which both technical and analytical capabilities have been clearly demonstrated.
Prior success deploying machine learning solutions based on complex datasets at scale in production environments with an emphasis on creating impact to business outcomes.
Proven ability to extract actionable insights from statistical and machine learning powered models.
Strong knowledge of the underlying mathematical foundations of machine learning algorithms including linear regression, classification methods, clustering algorithms, Random Forests, time series analysis, and deep learning.
Demonstrated excellence in using Python and SQL to develop data science workflows usings tools such as scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Snowflake, and dbt.
Strong communication and presentation skills with the ability to explain complex concepts in a simple manner to colleagues & stakeholders.
Demonstrated experience collaborating and working cross-functionally with teams and stakeholders to design and implement machine learning powered solutions.
Strong understanding of best practices and KPIs around e-commerce, transactional and subscription-based products is a plus.
Experience with building solutions and utilizing tools in AWS is a plus.
Familiarity with generative AI techniques (LLMs, GANS, VAEs) and their applications in business operations is highly desirable.
What We Bring:
We’re fast thinking. We go big to reach our cyberattack-disrupting goals. And we do what we need to protect the world of business from getting important (and potentially compromising) data stolen. We never leave anyone behind. We deliver quickly – and outstandingly. We’re big on honesty because it makes us better. We’re empowered by our mission. And if cybercriminals have a good day, we work twice as hard to make the rest of their days a nightmare. That’s The Mimecast Way. And the Mimecast way is also a hybrid-working way. We empower our people to balance their time between home and the office in a way that works best for them, their team, and our stakeholders Become a Mimecaster and put corporate data under your protection. Fill our teams with respect. And bring cybercrime-obstructing energy to your work. Be passionate. Be powerful. Be alive with purpose.
#LI-ND1
DEI Statement
Cybersecurity is a community effort. That’s why we’re committed to building an inclusive, diverse community that celebrates and welcomes everyone – unless they’re a cybercriminal, of course.
We’re proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, and we’d encourage you to join us whatever your background. We particularly welcome applicants from traditionally underrepresented groups.
We consider everyone equally: your race, age, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, ability, marital status, nationality, or any other protected characteristic won’t affect your application.
If you require any adjustments or accommodations due to a disability, or any other reason that may help you in your interview process, please let us know by emailing careers@mimecast.com.
Due to certain obligations to our customers, an offer of employment will be subject to your successful completion of applicable background checks, conducted in accordance with local law.",4.0,Mimecast,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,109.0,MA,21.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","Role: Data Scientist, Senior Consultant/Consultant
Location: Miami/South Florida

Please note: This role is not eligible for 100% remote work. Employees must live within a commutable distance of the Miami Metro Area and must be willing to be onsite at the client and/or Slalom Florida office up to 5 days a week.

Who You’ll Work With
As a modern technology company, we've never met a technical challenge we didn't like. We enable our clients to learn from their data, create incredible digital experiences, and make the most of new technologies. We blend design, engineering, and analytics expertise to build the future. We surround our technologists with interesting challenges, innovative minds, and emerging technologies. Our Florida Data & Analytics practice is looking to add a Data Scientist Consultant to our locally based team.

What You’ll Do
Apply fundamental and advanced quantitative methods, including machine learning and statistical modeling, to solve complex business problems and enable data-driven decision-making (e.g., build statistical and machine learning models for trend analysis and forecasting to predict future business outcomes for a Fortune 100 company)
Collaborate with client data science teams to enhance, scale, and operationalize existing models
Communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Provide thought leadership on the latest ML/AI technologies and applications to client industry and use cases
Lead and participate in solutioning sessions, working hand-in-hand with businesses/clients, translating business objectives into actionable machine learning/data science use cases
What You’ll Bring
Production-level experience with core quantitative analysis techniques (e.g., predictive modeling, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or natural language processing) in a consulting environment
Quantitative background with relevant experience using data to solve problems and answer questions
Strong proficiency in Python, R, SQL, and experience with libraries/frameworks such as PyTorch, TensorFlow, and Scikit-learn
Experience with cloud and modern data science tools and platforms such as Databricks MLFlow, GCP BigQuery, AWS SageMaker, Kubeflow, and Azure ML
Experience using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Qlik, or Power BI
Knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practices
About Us
Slalom is a purpose-led, global business and technology consulting company. From strategy to implementation, our approach is fiercely human. In six countries and 43 markets, we deeply understand our customers—and their customers—to deliver practical, end-to-end solutions that drive meaningful impact. Backed by close partnerships with over 400 leading technology providers, our 11,000+ strong team helps people and organizations dream bigger, move faster, and build better tomorrows for all. We’re honored to be consistently recognized as a great place to work, including being one of Fortune’s 100 Best Companies to Work For seven years running. Learn more at slalom.com.
Compensation and Benefits
Slalom prides itself on helping team members thrive in their work and life. As a result, Slalom is proud to invest in benefits that include meaningful time off and paid holidays, parental leave, 401(k) with a match, a range of choices for highly subsidized health, dental, & vision coverage, adoption and fertility assistance, and short/long-term disability. We also offer additional benefits such as a yearly $350 reimbursement account for any well-being related expenses as well as discounted home, auto, and pet insurance.

Slalom is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices. Actual compensation will depend upon an individual’s skills, experience, qualifications, location, and other relevant factors.

Application Deadline:
The anticipated application deadline for this role is 11/1/2024

EEO and Accommodations
Slalom is an equal-opportunity employer and is committed to inclusion, diversity, and equity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veterans’ status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. Slalom will also consider qualified applications with criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. Slalom welcomes and encourages applications from individuals with disabilities. Reasonable accommodations are available for candidates during all aspects of the selection process. Please advise the talent acquisition team if you require accommodations during the interview process.",3.8,Slalom Consulting,"Miami, FL",10000+ Employees,2001.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,118.0,FL,23.0,1,0,0,1,0
Senior Clinical Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","As the Senior Clinical Data Scientist, you will partner with a broad range of stakeholders across the organization. You will be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data that will drive critical growth decisions and positive outcomes.

What you’ll do
Define and demonstrate clinical, operational and financial excellence of Best Buy Health products and services
Lead collaborative relationships with external partners and conduct analyses to produce peer-reviewed scientific evidence about the economic value and return on investment for care at home programs
Identify data sources, gaps in data, and metrics of value, considerations for preprocessing data, and potential internal improvements
Maintain industry knowledge to support Best Buy Health as a subject matter expert and ensure we are considering the latest trends in data and clinical research (e.g. experimental design, HEOR methodologies)
Contribute and demonstrate knowledge of ‘bread and butter’ data science techniques within, and outside of, the team

Basic qualifications
Master’s Degree in health economics, health service research, data science, epidemiology, public health or a closely related field
5+ years conducting comprehensive data analysis and research studies
3+ years of relevant experience within a healthcare / health technology setting
Publication track record in clinical field
Preferred qualifications
PhD
5+ years of experience leading data science strategy in a healthcare or health technology setting
3+ years of health economics and outcomes research experience
Strong relationship-building skills
Strong communication skills, including executive presence

Best Buy Health is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer dedicated to creating an inclusive environment that values the diversity of our employees and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant. We are committed to equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic under applicable law. Learn more about our Affirmative Action Policy Statement HERE.

Reasonable Accommodation

Best Buy Health will make reasonable accommodations for employees and applicants for their religious beliefs and practices, mental or physical disabilities, and pregnancy, childbirth and related conditions. If you need a reasonable accommodation in the application process - to access job postings, to apply for a job, for a job interview, for pre-employment testing or with the onboarding process - please contact Talent Acquisition at talent.acquisition@bestbuy.com.

To learn more about, view the “Know Your Rights” poster and Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision HERE.
Position Type: Full time",3.6,Best Buy Health,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,131.0,Remote,6.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Data Scientist II at its facility located at 500 N. Morton Ave., Morton, IL 61550. Lead large/complex projects within a systems process area. Serve as subject matter expert for global team for all key metric reporting and tools. Define requirements for system processes for major releases or emergency changes. Test accountability for systems processes for major releases or emergency changes. Manage and coordinate work for team in Bangalore. Provide guidance to other members on the global team. Perform deep-dive analysis. Generate ad-hoc reporting. Execute medium and high complexity data requests. Develop medium and high complexity PowerBI reporting. Develop medium and high complexity SAS programs and reports. Independent contributor to multi-person analytic teams. Work is typically directed by a direct supervisor, project, or team lead through a review of results. Make decisions on routine, medium risk issues that may affect the project team, suppliers, or internal customers. Mentor and develop the capabilities and organizational knowledge of more junior information scientists I & II. REQS: This position requires a Bachelor's, degree, or foreign equivalent, in Civil Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Supply Chain, Business Management or a related field and 4 years Professional experience in supply chain industry or IT. Additionally, the applicant must have employment experience with: (1) SAS; (2) SQL; (3) Datawarehouse applications Snowflake and Microsoft Power BI; (4) Python; (5) Supply Chain experience with a focus on Inventory Management; (6) Project Management; and (7) Microsoft Office tools. Telecommuting: 4 days/week. Applicants who are interested in this position should apply via www.caterpillar.com/careers , search [Data Scientist II / Reference # R0000278409]. #LI-DNI
Posting Dates:
October 14, 2024 - February 10, 2025
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Morton, IL",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,IL,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","CHEP helps move more goods to more people, in more places than any other organization on earth via our 300 million pallets, crates and containers. We employ 11,000 people and operate in more than 55 countries. Through our pioneering and sustainable share-and-reuse business model, the world’s biggest brands trust us to help them transport their goods more efficiently, safely and with less environmental impact.

What does that mean for you? You’ll join an international organization big enough to take you anywhere, and small enough to get you there sooner. You’ll help change how goods get to market and contribute to global sustainability. You’ll be empowered to bring your authentic self to work and be surrounded by diverse and driven professionals. And you can maximize your work-life balance and flexibility through our
Hybrid Work Model
.
Job Description
POSITION PURPOSE
To assist in developing tools and technologies that leverage data from a variety of sources to increase supply chain efficiencies and provide value to our customers.
MAJOR / KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
Responsible for experimenting with and implementing machine learning techniques on internal/external customer projects
Responsible for learning new data science techniques/programming languages and exploring their viability on current projects
Will contribute to data science team discussions, providing insight as needed on current approaches and methods
MEASURES
Successful application of data science principles
Successful completion of projects
AUTHORITY / DECISION MAKING
Data science model selection and implementation
Working autonomously
KEY CONTACTS
Internal: Other data scientists, data science manager, project stakeholders
External: Project stakeholders
QUALIFICATIONS
BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems and/or equivalent formal training
Proficient with machine learning and statistics
Proficient with Python, deep learning frameworks, Spark
Excellent communication skills
Desirable Qualifications:
1-2 years work experience in data science position
Proficient with Go, C/C++, other languages
Proficient with cloud computing environments, Kubernetes, etc.
Software development experience
EXPERIENCE
Participated in numerous data science projects
Utilized several data science methodologies
Have worked autonomously and delivered results on schedule
Have presented results to non-data scientist audience
SKILLS AND KNOWLEDGE
Strong programming skills (Python, R, etc.)
Knowledge of major data science topics, models, and methods (from logistic regression to advanced neural networks)
Strong analytical skills
Preferred Education
Bachelors
Preferred Level of Work Experience
1 - 3 years
Remote Type
Hybrid Remote
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, and we are committed to developing a diverse workforce in which everyone is treated fairly, with respect, and has the opportunity to contribute to business success while realizing his or her potential. This means harnessing the unique skills and experience that each individual brings and we do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state, or local protected class.
Individuals fraudulently misrepresenting themselves as Brambles or CHEP representatives have scheduled interviews and offered fraudulent employment opportunities with the intent to commit identity theft or solicit money. Brambles and CHEP never conduct interviews via online chat or request money as a term of employment. If you have a question as to the legitimacy of an interview or job offer, please contact us at recruitment@brambles.com.",4.4,Brambles Group,"Santa Clara, CA",10000+ Employees,1875.0,Company - Public,Shipping & Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,125.0,CA,149.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist III,"$151K
/yr","Our Opportunity:
Do you want to build a model that impacts the company's bottom line? Do you want to see how your ideas, insights, recommendations, and experiments affect top-level decision-makers? If so, Chewy is looking for a Data Scientist III to join our Merchandising Data Science Team. In this role, you will combine deep understanding of machine learning, advanced data analysis, statistical testing, and the ability to communicate insights effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders. As a Data Scientist III, you will play a crucial part in designing, implementing, and deploying machine learning models to solve complex problems for our Retail Operations business partners.
The ideal candidate will operate as a full stack data scientist who should have expertise in both machine learning and cloud technologies. In this role, they will have the opportunity to develop and implement sophisticated data models and analytics solutions to support strategic decision-making across the organization.
What you'll do:
Design, develop, and implement machine learning models for various applications, including but not limited to predictive analytics, natural language processing, and computer vision.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms to address specific business challenges.
Analyze large, complex data sets to extract actionable insights and identify trends, patterns, and opportunities.
Oversee data collection, cleansing, and validation processes to ensure data integrity and reliability.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data scientists, software engineers, and domain experts, to understand requirements and deliver effective solutions.
Document code, algorithms, and processes to facilitate knowledge sharing and ensure reproducibility.
Provide technical guidance in best practices for model development to the data science team.
Effectively communicate complex technical concepts and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
What you'll need:
Candidate must possess a Graduate Degree (MS/PhD) in Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, Mathematics, or related discipline.
6+ years of experience in developing and deploying advanced machine learning models and algorithms in a production environment.
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, machine learning, and deep learning techniques.
Expertise in programming languages such as Python.
Advanced proficiency with SQL
Proficiency with version control systems (e.g., Git) and collaborative coding practices.
Good understanding of cloud platforms such as AWS.
Strong problem-solving skills and the ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent oral and written communication skills including the ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time
Chewy is committed to equal opportunity. We value and embrace diversity and inclusion of all Team Members. If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or similar law, and you need an accommodation during the application process or to perform these job requirements, or if you need a religious accommodation, please contact CAAR@chewy.com.

If you have a question regarding your application, please contact HR@chewy.com.

To access Chewy's Customer Privacy Policy, please click here. To access Chewy's California CPRA Job Applicant Privacy Policy, please click here.",3.4,Chewy,"Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,2011.0,Company - Public,Pet & Pet Supplies Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,151.0,MA,13.0,1,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist I,"$116K
/yr","JOB DESCRIPTION:
Apply statistical modeling, data transformation, data mining and machine learning to develop predictive models, attributes, alerts and indicators to improve Identity Access Management and Point of Contact processes for insurance carriers. Execute database queries to extract and aggregate LN’s data assets into attributes used for predictive modeling, reporting and analysis. Analyze client data to prepare for analysis. Identifies data quality concerns and opportunities (i.e. performance indicators, scores, approval/declination indicators, etc.) and clearly communicate these concerns to stakeholders. Explore and mine new data sources to help optimize and validate existing models. Review product results and communicate findings to internal and external stakeholders. Ideate, research and design new analytics and data science methodologies on large scale and complex data assets. Store, archive, index, transfer and analyze large and complex datasets (structured and unstructured data). Create and enhance Python/R or GUI-based reporting tools that allow team members to gain insights about LexisNexis data assets. Enforce data quality testing best practices. Perform other duties as needed.
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s or foreign equivalent degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Information Systems, or a related field required.
3 years of experience in job offered or related occupations required.
Also required is: 2 years of experience: in advanced ECL Programming (HPCC Systems); with Record Linking for Insurance Header files; creating product dashboards using PowerBI; and batch LexID assignment for customer records.
Employee reports to LexisNexis Risk Solutions, Inc. office in Alpharetta, GA, but may telecommute from any location within the U.S.
Experience can be concurrent.
#LI-DNI
#ICT
LexisNexis, a division of RELX, is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. We are committed to providing a fair and accessible hiring process. If you have a disability or other need that requires accommodation or adjustment, please let us know by completing our Applicant Request Support Form:
https://forms.office.com/r/eVgFxjLmAK
, or please contact 1-855-833-5120.
Please read our
Candidate Privacy Policy
.",4.2,RELX,"Alpharetta, GA",10000+ Employees,1880.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,116.0,GA,144.0,1,0,0,0,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$91K
/yr","Orbis Operations is seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Junior Data Scientist to support our growing team in the collection, transformation, and analysis of open source data. In this role, you will be responsible for building data pipelines, cleaning and organizing datasets, and providing data-driven insights to support government missions. While experience with AI and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, this role focuses primarily on open source data collection and processing, offering an excellent opportunity for career growth in the data science field.
Key Responsibilities
Duties/Responsibilities
Assist in the collection, preprocessing, and transformation of large-scale open source datasets from various structured and unstructured sources.
Develop and maintain data pipelines to ensure efficient data flow and integration across different platforms.
Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) to uncover patterns and insights in open source data that align with mission objectives.
Collaborate with data engineers, software developers, and mission stakeholders to understand data requirements and deliver tailored solutions.
Write clear, well-documented code to automate data processing tasks and streamline workflows.
Generate reports and visualizations that communicate findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Stay up to date with trends in open-source data tools, technologies, and methodologies to continuously improve data collection and pipelining processes.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This position has no supervisory responsibilities
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, or related field, or equivalent work experience.
1-3 years of experience working in data science, with a focus on open source data collection, cleaning, and pipelining.
Strong programming skills in Python, with familiarity in libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and requests for data manipulation and processing.
Experience working with APIs and web scraping tools to collect and integrate data from open source platforms.
Understanding of data cleaning, transformation, and storage best practices.
Strong problem-solving skills, with an ability to manage multiple tasks and projects simultaneously.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to work effectively in a team and present findings to non-technical audiences.
ACTIVE Security Clearance TS SCI w POLY
Preferred Qualifications
Experience working with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) for data storage and processing.
Familiarity with SQL or NoSQL databases for querying and managing datasets.
Knowledge of data visualization tools such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, or Power BI.
Experience with natural language processing (NLP) and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, but not required.
Prior experience working on government or public sector projects.
Physical Requirements
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer.
Routine video conference and/or in-person meetings.
Ability to attend planned meetings within the Washington Metro Area region.
We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

Location
McLean, VA",3.9,Orbis Operations Management Company,"McLean, VA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,91.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$160K
/yr","Snapshot
We are a highly innovative AI startup that builds products and solutions from the ground up while using cutting-edge technology. We are seeking a data scientist with machine learning and Python experience to work with our team to develop our products for predictive maintenance (PMX) and digital signals processing (DSP).
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in a quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
2+ years of experience in Python data science stack: NumPy, Pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow/PyTorch, PySpark, Dask, Matplotlib, Seaborn, Bokeh, etc.
A strong sense of ownership and accountability; eagerness to learn skills as needed by business focus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable with public speaking and presenting to executives
Responsibilities
Build innovative data analytics and machine learning pipelines.
Become an expert in predictive maintenance (PMX) or signals processing products. Attend conferences and assess competitive products.
Meet with domain experts and present to stakeholders regularly.
Salary range: $140,000-$180,000",4.3,PUTNAM RECRUITING GROUP,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Private,Staffing & Subcontracting,Human Resources & Staffing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,160.0,Remote,,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","At Similarweb, we are revolutionizing the way businesses interact with the digital world by revealing to them everything that happens online.
Our unique data and solutions empower over 4,300 customers globally, including industry giants like Google, eBay, and Adidas, to make game-changing decisions that drive their digital strategies.
In 2021, we went public on the New York Stock Exchange, and we continue to reach new heights! Come work alongside Similarwebbers across the globe who are bright, curious, practical and good people.
We're looking for a Data Analyst / Data Scientist to partner with our consulting team by delivering best-in-class data analysis for research projects for prospective and existing clients, and driving value for clients' strategic business needs.
This role will report to the Research Analytics Manager of Data Labs.
Why is this role so important at Similarweb?
Similarweb is more than just a data provider. We develop long-term and collaborative partnerships with our clients, and are constantly striving to help them make better business decisions using our data. One of the ways we do this is through our advisory services.
As a Data Analyst, you will work with our team of Advisory Services Consultants and Data Engineering team, to create customized data analyses using Similarweb data.
Your data analysis will support our prospective clients' and existing clients' strategic business needs, and help the business increase and retain customers.
So, what will you be doing all day?
Your role as part of the Data Labs Team means your daily responsibilities may include:
Partnering with our in-house consultants and GTM teams to scope out custom data analysis projects for client
Building models and utilizing sophisticated technology such as web scraping and AI to enrich datasets to target client pain points
Collaborating with Data Engineering to ensure the existence of use-case specific data, and estimating the availability and effort required to produce specific custom reports
Preparing and communicating customized data analysis to advisory services consultant, to ensure successful delivery to clients
This is the perfect job for someone who:
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in data analysis (Python, Excel, Tableau, SQL)
Can use their analytical skills to drive business impact
Has a general understanding of digital marketing trends
Has experience in client-facing roles (preferred)
Has experience working collectively with other teams and stakeholders to accomplish business goals
Is able to apply relevant industry knowledge to solve specific client business needs, and demonstrate value within individual client use cases
**At Similarweb, collaborating with our colleagues in-office creates a more connected, unified culture. Our best work is a product of our face-to-face collaboration, with the ability to work partially from home.**
Why you'll love being a Similarwebber:
You'll actually love the product you work with: Our customers aren't our only raving fans. When we asked our employees why they chose to come work at Similarweb, 99% of them said ""the product."" Imagine how exciting your job is when you get to work with the most powerful digital intelligence platform in the world.
You'll find a home for your big ideas: We encourage an open dialogue and empower employees to bring their ideas to the table. You'll find the resources you need to take initiative and create meaningful change within the organization.
We offer competitive perks & benefits: We take your well-being seriously, and offer competitive compensation packages to all employees. We also put a strong emphasis on community, with regular team outings and happy hours.
You can grow your career in any direction you choose: Interested in becoming a VP or want to transition into a different department? Whether it's Career Week, personalized coaching, or our ongoing learning solutions, you'll find all the tools and opportunities you need to develop your career right here.
Diversity isn't just a buzzword: People want to work in a place where they can be themselves. We strive to create a workplace that is reflective of the communities we serve, where everyone is empowered to bring their full, authentic selves to work. We are committed to inclusivity across race, gender, ethnicity, culture, sexual orientation, age, religion, spirituality, identity and experience. Our culture of equality and mutual respect also helps us better understand and serve our customers in a world that is becoming more global, more diverse, and more digital every day.
We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here, as applicable: https://www.similarweb.com/corp/legal/applicant-privacy-policies/
* Please note: We're unable to sponsor employment visas at this time.*
#LI-DC #LI-Hybrid

We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here.",3.9,Similarweb,"Burlington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,118.0,MA,16.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$120K
/yr","Job Overviews
Location:
Salt Lake City, UTAH
Job Title:
Data Engineer
Experience:
9 Years
Employement:
Full Time
Job Code:
998163

Job Details
The Data Scientist will be responsible for utilizing advanced analytics and statistical modeling techniques to extract valuable insights from complex data sets. S/he will play a pivotal role in developing innovative solutions, optimizing business operations, and driving data-driven decision-making processes. S/he will possess a strong background in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling, and exceptional problem-solving and communication skills. The Data Scientist will use various methods to transform raw data into useful data systems. S/he will create algorithms and conduct statistical analysis. Overall, you’ll strive for efficiency by aligning data systems with business goals.
Job Responsibilities
Identify, collect, and analyze large volumes of structured and unstructured data from various sources, including internal databases, external APIs, and third-party vendors.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure its quality, integrity, and suitability for analysis.
Conduct exploratory data analysis to identify patterns, trends, and anomalies that can provide actionable insights.
Develop and implement advanced statistical models and machine learning algorithms to solve complex business problems, such as demand forecasting, customer segmentation, or anomaly detection.
Apply state-of-the-art machine learning techniques, including deep learning, natural language processing, and computer vision, to extract meaningful information from diverse data types.
Evaluate and optimize models for accuracy, performance, and scalability.
Create visually appealing and intuitive data visualizations to effectively communicate findings and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Prepare clear and concise reports, presentations, and dashboards that summarize analytical results and provide actionable recommendations.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to deliver data-driven insights and contribute to evidence-based decision-making processes.
Collaborate with IT teams to identify and implement appropriate data infrastructure and tools, such as data lakes, data warehouses, or cloud-based solutions.
Develop and maintain robust data pipelines and workflows for efficient data ingestion, processing, and storage.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries and manage database performance and scalability.
Job Requirements
Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, including software engineers, data engineers, business analysts, and product managers, to define project requirements and deliverables.
Mentor and provide guidance to junior data scientists and analysts, fostering a culture of learning and growth.
Work with stakeholders, including the Executive, Product, Data, and Design teams, to support their data infrastructure needs and assist with data-related technical issues.
Collect, manage, and convert raw data into information that can be interpreted by data scientists and business analysts.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, assembling large, complex data sets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements.
Implement server-side logic and database integration using programming languages like Python, Java, or Node.js.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries, and manage database performance and scalability.
Conduct unit testing, integration testing, and troubleshooting issues to ensure the overall quality and reliability of software applications.
Identify and resolve performance bottlenecks in both front-end and back-end systems to ensure optimal user experience.
Create and maintain technical documentation, including system architecture, API documentation, and user guides.
Continuously research and evaluate emerging technologies, tools, and frameworks to improve development practices and enhance the software stack.
Skill & Experience
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or Information Systems, or Progressive experience in Computer Science with experience in the development of applications.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or Scala, along with familiarity with data manipulation libraries (e.g., pandas, NumPy) and machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Strong knowledge of statistical analysis, machine learning techniques, and data modeling.
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI) and proficiency in SQL and working with databases.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving abilities, with the capability to interpret complex data sets and derive actionable insights.
Outstanding communication skills, with the ability to effectively present complex ideas and findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.",5.0,CloudBerg Tec,"Salt Lake City, UT",Unknown,,Unknown,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,UT,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$132K
/yr","About Direct To Consumer (DTC)
Disney’s Direct to Consumer team oversees the Hulu and Disney+ streaming businesses within Disney Entertainment helping to bring The Walt Disney Company’s best-in-class storytelling to fans and families everywhere.
The Walt Disney Company Direct to Consumer’s (DTC) Data Science team combines deep data analysis and research of our rich user data to present a compelling vision around user retention and preferences across the vast ecosystem of our product offerings and content. We are the insights and modeling partners for the content, marketing, product, and engineering teams at Disney+, Hulu and ESPN+.
As Data Scientists, we use data to empower decision-makers with information, predictions, and insights that ultimately influence the experiences of millions of users worldwide. If you are someone who loves to work cross-functionally, build models, perform statistical analysis, and create visualizations to provide scalable and iterative capabilities, then this is a fantastic role for you!
What You'll Do
Modeling: Apply state of the art machine learning and statistical analysis to develop models related to opportunity sizing, targeting, and optimization.
Deep analysis: Analyze user behavioral data to identify patterns, uncover opportunities, and create common understanding of how people are interacting with the service and content.
Visualization of Insights: Development of prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, and robust analytics leading to impactful insights communicated clearly and visually.
Partnership: Partner closely with business stakeholders to identify and unlock opportunities, and with other data teams to improve platform capabilities around data modeling, data visualization, experimentation and data architecture.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field
3+ years related experience with developing machine learning models and conducting statistical analysis
Deep understanding of machine learning concepts and statistical methods
Ability to draw insights and conclusions from data to inform model development and business decisions
Desire to collaborate with other data scientists, data analysts, and key business partners
Proficient in analyzing data and developing ML models using Python (with ML frameworks like tensorflow, scikit-learn, etc.)
Capable of reading and writing Object-Oriented code to review and implement modeling pipelines (Airflow, Luigi, etc.)
Understanding of SQL and distributed data technologies (Hive, Spark)
Preferred Qualifications
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Physics or related quantitative field (e.g. Econometrics, Mathematics, Operations Research)
Working knowledge of Bayesian modeling and familiarity with probabilistic programming packages/language such as Stan, PyMC
Experience fully integrating data science solutions into the business and operationalizing ML models
Additional Information
#DISNEYTECH

The hiring range for this position in the Los Angeles, CA area is $112,600-$151,000. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate’s geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",3.9,Disney Direct to Consumer,"Santa Monica, CA",10000+ Employees,1923.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,132.0,CA,101.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$177K
/yr","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the team
The Data Science team of the Tech and Product department at TikTok USDS is responsible for building high-quality and timely data solutions for the business as the single source of truth and for building easy-to-use and scalable data products to support business growth. You will have the exciting opportunity to:
Conduct product analytics to provide product recommendations that drive product growth
Deep dive into data sources, understand their limitations, and communicate complex data insights through exploratory analysis and research to suggest improvement
Design and monitor core metrics; understand root causes of metric movements
Design and build advanced analytical solutions and models to deliver superior business outcomes
In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.
Qualifications
Previous internship(s) or 1-2 years of full-time experience
Experience with SQL, Python, or R
Experience navigating and working with large data sets using SQL
Self-motivated, detail-oriented, learn autonomously, and highly organized
Ability to conduct rigorous analysis and communicate conclusions to both technical and non-technical audiences
BS/MS in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Statistics, or other science and engineering fields
Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States. This position is not eligible for visa sponsorship or support.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at https://shorturl.at/ktJP6

This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $114000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,177.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$185K
/yr","Job ID:
13443

Location:
Newport News, VA

Category:
Computer

Division:
CST Division

Position Type:
Regular

Education:
Masters Degree

Experience Required:
12+ years

Relocation Provided:
Position Description

Come join our team at Jefferson Lab, where great minds matter .

Posting Date: 10/17/24
Salary Range: $133,200 - $236,000 (SSCS)
Work Location Type: Hybrid (combination of on-site and remote work based on business need)

What your job will be like:
The incumbent will be responsible for developing, implementing and leading new data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory's data science capabilities in alignment with the overall mission to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and take leadership roles in future DOE data science initiatives.

In this role you will:
Be responsible for developing, implementing and leading data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory’s data science capabilities in alignment with strategic plans to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and contribute significantly to future DOE data science initiatives.
Provide key contributions to the data sience department program development efforts, including contributing to on-going AI/ML in support of the 12 GeV science program, the Electron Ion Collider (EIC) detector design, and the High Performance Data Facility (HPDF).
Guide and provide ultimate direction as the Lab’s Subject Matter Expert and technical resource for data science program and projects.
Be responsible for developing competences in operational and/or applied mathematics data science core in order to support the program.
Be responsible for attracting external funding in data science projects.

Qualifications We Require:Education:
Master's Degree in Computer Science or other relevant field required.
Ph.D. preferred.

Experience:
12 or more years related experience with considerable work specific to developing scientific computing applications and/or data science.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Recognized technical expertise in data science with recognized expertise in one or more additional areas of scientific computing.
Demonstrated knowledge of computational infrastructure and applications applicable to large scale experimental facilities.
Demonstrated experience with strategic planning and implementation of a data science portfolio aligned with overall institutional objectives.
Ability to interact across organizational levels including senior leadership and effectively form partnerships with external partners.
Must possess exceptional written and oral communication skills.
Successful history in attracting funding.
Prior experience in DOE or National Lab environment is highly desired.

About Jefferson Lab

Join a community with a common purpose of solving the most challenging scientific and engineering problems of our time. The Jefferson Lab campus is located in southeastern Virginia amidst a vibrant and growing technology community.

A career at Jefferson Lab is more than a job. You will be part of “big science” and work alongside top scientists and engineers from around the world unlocking the secrets of our visible universe. Managed by Jefferson Science Associates, LLC; Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility is entering an exciting period of mission growth and is seeking new team members ready to apply their skills and passion to have an impact. You could call it work, or you could call it a mission. We call it a challenge. We do things that will change the world.

Total Rewards at Jefferson Lab

At Jefferson Lab, we believe that a comprehensive employee benefits program is an important and meaningful part of the compensation employees receive. Our benefits program includes, but is not limited to:

Medical, Dental, and Vision Care Plans
Flexible Spending Accounts
Paid Time-off and Leave Programs (Paid Parental, vacation, holidays, and sick leave)
401(k) Plan – 9% Lab Contribution; 100% vested
Flexible Work Arrangements (Remote & Alternate Work Schedules available)
Tuition Assistance, Training and Professional Development Programs
Live near the waterways of the Chesapeake Bay region with access to nearby beaches, mountains, and all major metropolitan centers on the East Coast

Jefferson Science Associates, LLC (JSA) manages and operates the Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility (Jefferson Lab). JSA is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of race, color, religion, ethnicity, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, disability, or veteran status or on any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. As part of the JSA’s equal employment opportunity policy, we also take affirmative action as called for by applicable laws and Executive Orders to ensure that minority group individuals, females, disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, other protected veterans, Armed Forces, and qualified disabled persons are introduced into our workforce and considered for promotional opportunities.

JSA is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities (unless doing so will result in an undue hardship). If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to employment @ jlab.org or call (757) 269-7598 to provide the nature of your request. Reasonable accommodations are considered on a case-by-case basis.

Employment with JSA is conditional upon DOE approval if at any time during your employment you are participating in a Foreign Government Talent Recruitment Program or Affiliated activity. Generally, such programs/activities include any foreign-state-sponsored attempt to acquire U.S.-funded scientific research through programs run or funded by the government that target scientists, engineers, students, academics, researchers, and entrepreneurs of all nationalities working or educated in the United States. This includes positions or appointments, both domestic and foreign, titled academic, professional, or institutional appointments whether or not remuneration is received and whether full-time, part-time or voluntary.",4.2,Jefferson Lab,"Newport News, VA",501 to 1000 Employees,1984.0,Government,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,185.0,VA,40.0,0,0,0,1,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$175K
/yr","AirDNA began with a big dream in a balmy California garage in 2015. Since then, the technology startup has grown into the leading provider of data and business intelligence for the billion-dollar travel and vacation rental industry—with offices in Denver and Barcelona. Our self-serve MarketMinder platform eliminates guesswork and equips Airbnb hosts with smart and competitive insights needed to succeed in the ever-evolving short-term rental landscape. We also arm enterprise clients with customized reports and in-depth dashboards to ensure they can scale and invest strategically. These customers include hundreds of top financial institutions, real estate companies, vacation rental managers, and destination marketing organizations around the world. We track the daily performance of over 14 million Airbnb, Vrbo, & Booking.com properties across 120,000 global markets. We also collect data from over thousands partner properties. This marriage of scraped and source data, enhanced by our proprietary algorithms, makes our solutions the most accurate and comprehensive in the world. We’re firm believers that data isn’t the destination; it’s the starting point. The launchpad. The bedrock for any future-forward business.

The AirDNA Team:
At AirDNA, we’re a team of data nerds on a mission to empower our customers to smartly grow their businesses. And we’re on the hunt for a team leader who can take an agile approach to help us build sophisticated and scalable acquisition strategies. In short: Life is never boring here. And we genuinely live and breathe our company values: Happy, Hungry and Honest. People who are ready to exemplify these values are especially encouraged to apply. We invite you to apply even if you are unsure about whether you meet every single requirement in this posting. We carefully consider every application, not just those that check off all the boxes.

The Role:
As a Senior Data Scientist working on software for short-term rental hosts, you will play a key role in leveraging data-driven insights to design, develop, and maintain software solutions that enable our hosts to effectively invest in short-term rentals, manage their properties, streamline operations, optimize pricing, and deliver exceptional guest experiences. At AirDNA, models are at the heart of all of our systems. A Senior Data Scientist is responsible for setting and implementing strategies to continuously improve our algorithms in a fast-changing industry. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams, including product managers, engineers, and designers, to create user-friendly and impactful tools that empower hosts and maximize their potential.
Here's what you'll get to do:
Guide the strategy for creating or improving ML systems that empower short-term rental hosts to make better decisions, such as estimating revenue potential, pricing optimization, dynamic inventory management, demand forecasting, guest profiling, and review sentiment analysis.
Utilize advanced data analysis, statistical modeling, and machine learning techniques to extract actionable insights from complex and diverse datasets, including host performance data, guest behavior data, and market trends.
Work closely with product managers, engineers, and designers to define product requirements, prioritize features, and ensure the successful delivery of software tools that meet the needs of short-term rental investors and hosts.
Develop predictive models, algorithms, and optimization techniques to empower hosts in making data-driven decisions regarding, comp sets, pricing strategies, occupancy rates, availability management, and revenue maximization.
Drive the implementation and integration of data science models and algorithms within the software infrastructure, ensuring scalability, reliability, and performance.
Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in data science, machine learning, and software development, and apply emerging technologies and methodologies to enhance the capabilities and impact of our software tools.
Create and implement strategies to source and utilize short-term rental training data at scale.
Create processes to continuously monitor and improve the performance of our models.
Here's what you'll need to be successful:
Bachelors, Master's or Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related quantitative field.
Minimum of 5 years of professional experience as a Data Scientist, with a focus on software development and advanced analytics.
Proven track record of designing, developing, and deploying successful software solutions powered by data science and analytics.
Experience in short-term rental investment, revenue management, price optimization, time-series or forecasting is a strong plus.
Strong expertise in programming languages such as Python, with proficiency in data manipulation and analysis libraries (e.g., Pandas, Scikit-learn, XGBoost, PyTorch or TensorFlow).
Proficiency in SQL and database management systems.
Expertise working with large data sets in distributed systems such as pyspark and snowflake.
Experience in ML engineering, cloud-based deployment and model lifecycle management.
Here's what you can expect from us:
Competitive cash compensation and benefits, the salary range for this position is $170,000 - $180,000 per year.
Colorado Salary Statement: The salary range displayed in specifically for those potential hired who will work or reside in the state of Colorado if selected for this role. Any offered salary is determined based on internal equity, internal salary ranges, market data/ranges, applicant’s skills and prior relevant experience, certain degrees and certifications.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, and vision packages to meet your needs
Unlimited vacation policy; take time when you need it
Eligible for Company’s annual discretionary bonus program
401K with employer match up to 4%
Continuing education stipend
16 weeks of paid parental leave
New MacBooks for employees

Benefits for Denver Office employees:
Commuter/RTD benefit
Quarterly team outings
In-Office Lunch 3 Days a Week
We have a great office located just a few blocks away from Union Station in the heart of Denver’s historic LoDo neighborhood–high ceilings, exposed brick, a fully stocked kitchen (snacks, espresso, etc.), and plenty of meeting rooms and brainstorming nooks
Pet-friendly!
AirDNA seeks to attract the best-qualified candidates who support the mission, vision and values of the company and those who respect and promote excellence through diversity. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, age, national origin, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, physical or mental disability, marital, familial or parental status, genetic information, military status, veteran status or any other legally protected classification. The company complies with all applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment and prohibits unlawful harassment based on any of the aforementioned protected classes at every location in which the company operates. This applies to all terms, conditions and privileges of employment including but not limited to: hiring, assessments, probation, placement, benefits, promotion, demotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leave of absence, compensation, training and development, social and recreational programs, education assistance and retirement.

We are committed to making our application process and workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Upon request, AirDNA will reasonably accommodate applicants so they can participate in the application process unless doing so would create an undue hardship to AirDNA or a threat to these individuals, others in the workplace or the company as a whole. To request accommodation, please email compliance@airdna.co. Please allow for 24 hours to process your request.",3.5,AirDNA,Remote,51 to 200 Employees,2015.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,Remote,9.0,1,0,1,1,1
Data Scientist II - Experimentation,"$156K
/yr","Welcome to Warner Bros. Discovery… the stuff dreams are made of.
Who We Are…
When we say, “the stuff dreams are made of,” we’re not just referring to the world of wizards, dragons and superheroes, or even to the wonders of Planet Earth. Behind WBD’s vast portfolio of iconic content and beloved brands, are the storytellers bringing our characters to life, the creators bringing them to your living rooms and the dreamers creating what’s next…
From brilliant creatives, to technology trailblazers, across the globe, WBD offers career defining opportunities, thoughtfully curated benefits, and the tools to explore and grow into your best selves. Here you are supported, here you are celebrated, here you can thrive.
The Job

As a Data Scientist II on the WBD Experimentation Data Science team, this individual will leverage large datasets to extract insights and guide decision-making throughout the full lifecycle of product development for our streaming platform, MAX. You will be responsible for setting up best practices around experiment design and advanced analysis. You will work with product stakeholders from various areas in the video streaming business including search personalization, merchandising and growth, etc. Your work will be essential to drive growth for MAX and come join us if you are passionate about video streaming platform and analytics!

The Daily
Support the design, monitor and deep dive analysis of A/B tests in various business settings. Work end to end with product stakeholders from idea initiation, experiment design/monitoring to sharing results analysis for decision making.
Study and fully understand WBD data sources and develop metrics for measuring platform performance in A/B tests.
Write efficient queries to pull data for KPIs and metrics to diagnose changes observed in experiments and work with engineering and product partners to resolve potential issues.
Perform advanced statistical tests to real world A/B test datasets to measure impacts of new product features.
Apply causal model to investigate cause-effect relationship between KPIs and key product changes.
Perform research to acquire best in class data science techniques and best practices to improve the rigor and efficiency in product experimentation.
Capture business requirements for data science solutions and communicate data science output and recommendations to inform business strategies.
Present analysis to business partners and senior leadership and make product launch recommendations.
How We Get Things Done…
This last bit is probably the most important! Here at WBD, our guiding principles are the core values by which we operate and are central to how we get things done. You can find them at www.wbd.com/guiding-principles/ along with some insights from the team on what they mean and how they show up in their day to day. We hope they resonate with you and look forward to discussing them during your interview.
Championing Inclusion at WBD
Warner Bros. Discovery embraces the opportunity to build a workforce that reflects the diversity of our society and the world around us. Being an equal opportunity employer means that we take seriously our responsibility to consider qualified candidates on the basis of merit, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
If you’re a qualified candidate with a disability and you require adjustments or accommodations during the job application and/or recruitment process, please visit our accessibility page for instructions to submit your request.
In compliance with local law, we are disclosing the compensation, or a range thereof, for roles in locations where legally required. Actual salaries will vary based on several factors, including but not limited to external market data, internal equity, location, skill set, experience, and/or performance. Base pay is just one component of Warner Bros. Discovery’s total compensation package for employees. Pay Range: $109,200.00 - $202,800.00 salary per year. Other rewards may include annual bonuses, short- and long-term incentives, and program-specific awards. In addition, Warner Bros. Discovery provides a variety of benefits to employees, including health insurance coverage, an employee wellness program, life and disability insurance, a retirement savings plan, paid holidays and sick time and vacation.
If you’re a qualified candidate with an arrest or conviction record, please know that your application will be considered in accordance with the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act.",3.5,Warner Bros. Discovery,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,2022.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,156.0,CA,2.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist - Product,"$151K
/yr","Position at Confluent Inc
With Confluent, organizations can harness the full power of continuously flowing data to innovate and win in the modern digital world. We have a purpose that drives us to do better every day – we're creating an entirely new category within data infrastructure - data streaming. This technology will allow every organization to create experiences and use the power of data in ways that profoundly impact the way we all live. This impact is our purpose and drives us to do better every day.
One Confluent. One team. One Data Streaming Platform.
Data Connects Us.
About the Role:
The mission of the Data Science team at Confluent is to serve as the central nervous system of all things data for the company: we build analytics infrastructure, metrics, insights, and models. Our outputs enable data-driven thinking and help optimize every part of the business. There are limitless opportunities for an ambitious data scientist to make an immediate and meaningful impact within a high-growth company.
As a Product Data Scientist at Confluent, you will be a key player in helping define the experiences and driving product strategy at Confluent. You will collaborate with our Product leadership team and cross-functional partners across the Data organization. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s challenges, unlocking growth of our product adoption funnel. This role requires a strong blend of technical skills, strategic thinking and communication skills to influence product strategy and investment decisions.
What You Will Do:
Collaborate with product managers, product engineers, and other stakeholders to define and measure success metrics for product features and initiatives.
Develop and maintain dashboards, reports, and visualizations to communicate key metrics and insights to stakeholders.
Utilize data to uncover trends, identify opportunities for growth, drive strategic product decisions, and shape product roadmaps.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to improve product experience
Share actionable insights and recommendations with leadership at various levels, playing a pivotal role in determining Product strategy
Collaborate with other data scientists across our organization to share best practices, learn new analytical techniques, and champion an organizational culture where data is central to decision making
What You Will Bring:
Strong stakeholder management skills with the ability to influence and build relationships at all levels of the organization.
3+ years of experience in Product Data Science/Analytics
Excellent communication skills, and ability to collaborate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders
Exceptional problem solving skills and analytical skills
Strong proficiency in data manipulation with data querying languages (e.g. SQL). Proficiency in scripting languages (e.g. Python) preferred.
Proficiency in data visualization and building dashboards with tools such as Tableau
Experience and familiarity with A/B testing and experiment best practices
Bachelor or advanced degree in a quantitative discipline: computer science, engineering, statistics, economics, etc.
What Gives You an Edge:
Experience and knowledge of causal inference, machine learning and other advanced analytical methods
Experience in SaaS/Product-led Growth companies

Come As You Are
At Confluent, equality is a core tenet of our culture. We are committed to building an inclusive global team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, beliefs, and experiences. The more diverse we are, the richer our community and the broader our impact. Employment decisions are made on the basis of job-related criteria without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other classification protected by applicable law.
At Confluent, we are committed to providing competitive pay and benefits that are in line with industry standards. We analyze and carefully consider several factors when determining compensation, including work history, education, professional experience, and location. This position has an annual estimated salary of $139,230 - $163,620, an annual bonus, and a competitive equity package. The actual pay may vary depending on your skills, qualifications, experience, and work location. In addition, Confluent offers a wide range of employee benefits.",3.7,Confluent,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,151.0,United States,10.0,1,0,0,0,1
Fraud Risk Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Do the best work of your career as a champion for small and mid-size businesses.
BILL is a leader in financial automation software for small and midsize businesses (SMBs). As a champion of SMBs, we are dedicated to automating the future of finance so businesses can thrive. Hundreds of thousands of businesses trust BILL solutions to manage financial workflows, including payables, receivables, and spend and expense management. With BILL, businesses are connected to a network of millions of members, so they can pay or get paid faster. Through our automated solutions, we help SMBs simplify and control their finances, so they can confidently manage their businesses, and succeed on their terms.
BILL is a trusted partner of leading U.S. financial institutions, accounting firms, and accounting software providers. We have operations in San Jose, CA, Draper, UT, and are continuing to expand into other geographic locations. If you’re looking for a place that helps you do the best work of your career, look no further than BILL.
Make your impact within a rapidly growing Fintech Company
We are looking for a detail oriented, enthusiastic and dedicated Risk Data Scientist to join Bill’s Risk Data Innovation team with a focus on fraud and credit risk. The incumbent will be working on data science projects related to key risk department initiatives. The data scientist will own key projects associated with predictive fraud detection, transaction risk modeling, credit underwriting, portfolio monitoring and loss mitigation (fraud) to support new payment products. This individual will also design experiments to understand the impact of customer experience when leveraging machine learning in complex risk strategy changes. This position requires a person who has experience with developing machine learning models and performing advanced analytics preferably in the risk domain.
We’d love to chat if you have:
Minimum 2 years of industry experience in data science and machine learning, preferably in risk, payments or financial services domain.
It is preferred this person has an advanced degree (M.S., PhD.) with 2+ years of experience or a Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years of experience, preferably in Statistics, Physical Sciences, Computer Science, Economics, Mathematics, or a related technical field
Strong track record of performing data analysis and statistical modeling using Python, SQL or similar tools
Good understanding of a wide range of Machine Learning techniques, tools, and methodologies with a demonstrated capability to apply them to a broad range of business problems and data sources
Machine learning techniques include clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural nets, anomaly detection etc.
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical experts, business partners, and executives
Comfortable with ambiguity and yet able to steer analytics projects toward clear business goals, testable hypotheses and action-oriented outcomes
Experience solving problems related to risk using data science and analytics
Experience working with cross functional teams including product, engineering and operations and leading organization-wide initiatives spanning multiple team
Ability to proactively find the pain points in the current process flows and make business suggestions that are sustainable and able to have long term impact by leveraging strategic thinking, and independently provide solutions to business problems with the solid technical skills and problem solving skills
The estimated salary range for this role is noted below for our San Jose based role. Our ranges for each role and job level are based on a variety of factors including candidate experience, expertise, and geographic location and may vary from the amounts listed above. The role is also eligible for a competitive benefits package that includes: medical, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, 401(k) retirement plan, flexible spending & health savings account, paid holidays, paid time off, and other company benefits.
San Jose pay range
$110,200—$132,100 USD
Let’s talk about benefits
100% paid employee health, dental, and vision plans (choose HMO, PPO, or HDHP)
HSA & FSA accounts
Life Insurance, Long & Short-term disability coverage
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
11+ Observed holidays and wellness days and flexible time off
Employee Stock Purchase Program with employee discounts
Wellness & Fitness initiatives
Employee recognition and referral programs
And much more
For positions that are in office we support a hybrid work environment with on-site and remote work days. Check out our LinkedIn Life Page for each location and discover BILL.
We live our culture and values every day
At BILL, we’re different by design—it's our culture. Our CEO is a trusted entrepreneur who lives our cultural values: Humble, Authentic, Passionate, Accountable, and Fun. People here love being their authentic selves, contributing unique experiences, sharing ideas, perspectives, and intellectual curiosity. We celebrate our diversity as the heart and soul of how we work, grow, and succeed together. Inspiring people with meaningful career experiences they love really does make the dream work and our successes just keep getting better. There’s no limit to what we can build and where we can go from here. We’d love you to join us.

BILL is proudly an Equal Opportunity Employer where everyone is welcome. Our innovation and technology are inspired by an inclusive culture unlike any other. Everyone brings a different personal story and perspective and this diverse mix of minds, backgrounds, and experiences is where our greatest ideas come from. We welcome people of all races, ethnicities, ages, religions, abilities, genders, and sexual orientations to make us an even more vibrant company. We want everyone to bring their authentic selves here, to share our values, shape our vision, drive innovation, and become part of a culture we celebrate every day.
Our promise to our candidates is to be transparent, diligent, and engaging while guiding individuals through each step of our hiring process. At BILL we strive to achieve an inclusive and positive candidate experience that aligns with our core values and focuses on diversity.
If you require a reasonable accommodation for your application, interviews, or another aspect of the hiring process, please contact interviewaccommodations@hq.bill.com.
BILL Culture:
Humble - We check our egos at the door. We are curious. We listen, accept feedback.
Authentic - We earn and show trust by being real—embracing our authentic selves.
Passionate - We care deeply about each other and our customers.
Accountable - We are duty-bound to each other, our customers, and society.
Fun - We wrap it all together by building connections and enjoying time spent together.",3.6,Bill.com,"San Jose, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2006.0,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,121.0,CA,18.0,1,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$133K
/yr","Total Wine & More is seeking a Senior Data Scientist with expertise in all aspects of data science and data analysis, to join our Data Services team. The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for leveraging advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive business value across all of Total Wine & More’s departments. We are looking for an individual who is skilled in all facets of the Analytics Lifecycle, including data gathering, data analysis, variable creation & selection, model building & selection, and visualization. This individual will work closely with the business, software development and support teams, infrastructure, and security staff and will enjoy learning and problem-solving in a fast-paced environment. The Total Wine & More Data Services team is growing, and we are driving business value through technology across all aspects of our business. You will report to the Director of Data Science and Analytics.
You will
Use a wide range of advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive Total Wine & More business
Build and manage machine learning and forecasting models through all phases of development from design, through training, validation, deployment, monitoring and measurement
Scope technical solutions on large amounts of data that leverage data analysis and predictive modeling based off business needs
Integrate scalable solutions into necessary applications and data pipelines
Champion best practices in ML/AI domain across Total Wine & More. Communicate effectively with stakeholders of various tech skillsets about project implementation, results and evolutions of project
Be proactive and take ownership of the projects and tasks assigned
You will come with
Bachelor's degree from four-year College or university in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related field. Master’s or PhD preferred
4+ years of experience in data science, predictive analytics, econometrics or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
4+ years of experience in software engineering, data engineering, or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
Strong background in Applied Mathematics and Statistics
Advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or related field) is a plus
Proven track record in building impactful solutions using predictive & prescriptive modeling
Experience in the use of machine learning, econometrics, predictive modeling
Experience in leveraging the cloud in the application of advanced analytics
Experienced with general programing, statistical languages, and deep learning packages used to manipulate data and build statistical and machine learning models at a large scale, such as Python, Spark, PyTorch, Tensorflow, Keras, SQL, and SQL-like query languages for NoSQL databases
Understanding of data science-related technology landscape, processes and design principles
Familiarity with data architecture, data engineering, data management, and data analysis tools and techniques
Passionate about data, data science, and insight generation
Familiar with retail, wholesale, planning and allocation systems, or supply chain operations, preferred
Strong analytic skills, attention to detail, ability to multi-task, troubleshoot and problem solve along with the ability to make recommendations based on analysis are extremely important
We offer
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Generous store discounts
Health care plans (medical, prescription, dental, vision)
401(k), HSA, FSA, Pre-tax commuter benefits
Disability & life insurance coverage
Paid parental leave
Pet insurance
Critical illness and accident insurance
Discounted home and auto insurance
College tuition assistance
Career development & product training
Consumer classes
& More!
Grow with us
Total Wine & More is the country's largest independent retailer of fine wine, beer and spirits, and we continue to grow our footprint year over year. Total Wine offers exciting and unique career opportunities across the country and in our corporate office. Our strength is our people. We have a commitment to training and career growth, all in an environment that values new ideas and teamwork. If you share our entrepreneurial spirit and a passion for providing best-in-class customer experience, take a moment to apply or learn more at www.TotalWine.com/About-Us/Careers!
The exempt compensation range for this position is $101,900 - $165,000. Compensation may vary based on a number of factors including, but not limited to, market location, job-related knowledge, skills and/or experience. Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation. Estimated salaries determined by third parties have not been validated by Total Wine & More.
Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation
Total Wine & More is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. Total Wine & More makes reasonable accommodations during all aspects of the employment process, including during the interview process. Total Wine & More is a Drug Free Workplace.
The information provided above indicates the general nature and level of work required of the position and is not a comprehensive list of all responsibilities or qualifications. Benefits list is only a highlight of some of the benefits offered to team members; eligibility for certain benefits apply.",3.4,Total Wine & More,"Bethesda, MD",5001 to 10000 Employees,1991.0,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,133.0,MD,33.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior Healthcare Data Scientist,"$152K
/yr","Job Description
Are you passionate about using data to take on business challenges? Do you have experience in healthcare specific data analytics and applied statistics? Are you looking for an opportunity to address interesting business questions in the life sciences and grow your skillset by working on a collaborative team? You might be the person we are looking for.

Our corporate data science, data engineering and product team is looking for a data scientist with experience in Healthcare Real-World Data (RWD), machine learning, statistics, and a real passion for addressing business needs through data analysis and solutions. You will work on a highly collaborative, centralized team of data scientists, engineers, and strategists to deliver analytical insights and data products that drive value and impact for our highest priority business needs. You’ll work side-by-side with internal partners across development, clinical, commercial, and general and administrative areas to develop creative solutions that contribute meaningfully to our business and patients.

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with a centralized team of data scientists/engineers/strategists and cross-functional partners to conceptualize, develop, and deploy data science solutions for highest priority business problems and to design and execute A/B tests to quantify the value of these solutions
Be the primary technical lead focused on creative use of diverse data sources to solve business problems, such as clinical operations data, Electronic Health Record (EHR), insurance claims data, and/or other provider and patient-level data
Build and deliver compelling data visualizations and outputs to communicate findings to technical collaborators, non-technical audiences, and business leaders
Participate in the broader data science community to stay current with methodology, software, and data development and availability
Bring an entrepreneurial and ethical mindset, openness, transparency, and collegiality to your work
Minimum Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Epidemiology, Health Economics, Computer Science, Clinical/Biomedical Informatics or a related computational and quantitative discipline, or a Master’s degree (scientific field of study) and 3+ years of relevant experience.
Domain knowledge in clinical data, Real-World Data (EHR, insurance claims, e.g. Clarivate DRG, MarketScan, IQVIA, TriNetX, Optum, Premier), and/or related data sources
Expertise in programming languages (e.g. Python, R, SQL, JavaScript), version control, and other data science related tools (e.g. D3, AWS, dbt)
Extensive experience with statistical/analytical methodologies and machine learning algorithms (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, feature selection/engineering, deep learning, time-series analysis, network analysis, hypothesis testing)
Comfortable working with both technical and non-technical staff in a fast-paced environment to come up with solutions/algorithms and create working prototypes
Ability to build and manage relationships with various cross-functional collaborators and stakeholders across the company
Exceptional communication skills and ability to present findings to non-technical audiences with effective data visualization approaches
Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge of the biopharma or healthcare industry
Experience with LLM prompt engineering and familiarity with creating LLM-based solutions and architectures such as retrieval-augmented generation
Experience with developing advanced data visualizations and dashboards (e.g. Dash, Streamlit, R Shiny and front-end frameworks such as Flask and Angular) in business settings
Familiarity with data product UX/UI design and testing
Flex Designation:
Hybrid-Eligible Or On-Site Eligible
Flex Eligibility Status:
In this Hybrid-Eligible role, you can choose to be designated as:
1. Hybrid: work remotely up to two days per week; or select
2. On-Site: work five days per week on-site with ad hoc flexibility.
Note: The Flex status for this position is subject to Vertex’s Policy on Flex @ Vertex Program and may be changed at any time.
Company Information
Vertex is a global biotechnology company that invests in scientific innovation.
Vertex is committed to equal employment opportunity and non-discrimination for all employees and qualified applicants without regard to a person's race, color, sex, gender identity or expression, age, religion, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, disability, veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, marital status, or any characteristic protected under applicable law. Vertex is an E-Verify Employer in the United States. Vertex will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.
Any applicant requiring an accommodation in connection with the hiring process and/or to perform the essential functions of the position for which the applicant has applied should make a request to the recruiter or hiring manager, or contact Talent Acquisition at ApplicationAssistance@vrtx.com",4.2,Vertex Pharmaceuticals,"Boston, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1989.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,152.0,MA,35.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Senior Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$253K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Provide guidance to junior analysts and data scientists
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modelling project
At least 5 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, capable of working independently in a dynamic, fast-paced environment, and delivering projects from end to end
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
Experience collaborating with cross-functional teams while managing and prioritizing multiple projects
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $176355 - $329333 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,253.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist II (REMOTE),"$110K
/yr","For more than 170 years, The Hanover has been committed to delivering on our promises and being there when it matters the most. We live our values every day, demonstrating we CARE through our values, ESG initiatives and IDE journey.

Our Data Science team is currently seeking a Data Scientist II in our Worcester, MA location or remote work arrangement.

This is a full time, exempt role.

POSITION OVERVIEW:
The Data Scientist II designs, implements, and evaluates advanced statistical models, machine learning algorithms, and tools for application in the business’s most complex issues. The Data Scientist builds econometric and statistical models for various problems inclusive of projections, classification, clustering, pattern analysis, sampling, simulations, and so forth.

In this capacity, the Data Scientist II researches new ways for predicting and modeling end-user behavior as well as investigating data summarization and visualization techniques for conveying key applied analytics findings.

The Data Scientist II also performs ad-hoc data mining and exploratory statistics tasks on very large data sets related to the business’s strategies. The Data Scientist II will also prepare reports and presentations for senior data scientists and relevant stakeholders that will give insights for departmental as well as business-wide decision making.

IN THIS ROLE, YOU WILL:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Collaborate with product management and the LOB’s to understand company needs and devise possible solutions
Keep up-to-date with the latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision-makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and solution design
Usually works with minimum supervision, conferring with business partners on data/reporting requests
Documents the development and the design of the solutions built
Conducts reviews for the work of less senior team members.
Handle multiple projects simultaneously
Begin to work on more complex projects with minimal supervision.
WHAT YOU NEED TO APPLY:
Minimum of 4+ years of related experience and a bachelor’s degree, Master’s, or Ph.D. degree is preferred.
Must be eligible to work in the US without requiring sponsorship now or in the future (IE: US Citizen or green card required)
Ability to drive larger more complicated projects independently
Insurance experience is preferred
TECHNICAL SKILLS:
Practical (Advanced) experience with R, and/or Python
(Advanced) SQL, Data Management, and Documentation
Experience with ETL (Azure Data Factory, SSIS, etc.)
Experience in various modeling techniques
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience in data mining and complex statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Experience in more complex Machine Learning techniques such as deep learning, neural networks, natural language processing.
Model Governance, Metadata Management
Experience with unstructured data and document-based systems (NoSQL, Data Lakes)
Azure DataBricks experience is preferred.
Experience with Agile data science life cycle management and related concepts like MLOps for Continuous deployment, integration, quality, and delivery is preferred.
CAREER DEVELOPMENT:
It’s not just a job, it’s a career, and we are here to support you every step of the way. We want you to be successful and fulfilled. Through on-the-job experiences, personalized coaching and our robust learning and development programs, we encourage you – at every level – to grow and develop.

BENEFITS:
We offer comprehensive benefits to help you be healthy, build financial security, and balance work and home life. At The Hanover, you’ll enjoy what you do and have the support you need to succeed.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance
401K with a company match
Tuition reimbursement
PTO
Company paid holidays
Flexible work arrangements
Cultural Awareness Day in support of IDE
On-site medical/wellness center (Worcester only)
Click here for the full list of Benefits
EEO statement:
The Hanover values diversity in the workplace and among our customers. The company provides equal opportunity for employment and promotion to all qualified employees and applicants on the basis of experience, training, education, and ability to do the available work without regard to race, religion, color, age, sex/gender, sexual orientation, national origin, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information, ancestry or any other status protected by law.

Furthermore, The Hanover Insurance Group is committed to providing an equal opportunity workplace that is free of discrimination and harassment based on national origin, race, color, religion, gender, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information or any other status protected by law.”

As an equal opportunity employer, Hanover does not discriminate against qualified individuals with disabilities. Individuals with disabilities who wish to request a reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, or to perform essential job functions, should contact us at: HRServices@hanover.com and include the link of the job posting in which you are interested.

Privacy Policy:
To view our privacy policy and online privacy statement, click here.

Applicants who are California residents: To see the types of information we may collect from applicants and employees and how we use it, please click here.",4.1,The Hanover Insurance Group,"Worcester, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1852.0,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,110.0,MA,172.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist - Cybersecurity,"$108K
/yr","Cybersecurity is seeking a Sr Data Scientist to join the Cybersecurity Artificial Intelligence team. This position will use machine learning, data engineering, automation, and Data Science principles to solve enterprise problems and advance our mission. This role is a key contributor to our team and will be directly responsible for design, development, deployment, and automation. The successful candidate will work closely with key stakeholders to rapidly advance the use of traditional and generative AI for cybersecurity. We are seeking candidates with passion to lead the implementation of cutting-edge technology and methodologies while establishing strong partnerships with data owners and stakeholders across Cybersecurity. The Sr Data Scientist will have demonstrated experience as a problem-solver, working alongside IT and business partners, and act as a trusted consultant.

Key Responsibilities and Duties
Structure business problems and drive viable, data-driven hypotheses in collaboration with business partners
Ability to skillfully enumerate a business problem, quantify its impact, size relevant data, and document applicable sources
Devise, develop and disseminate actionable intelligence from disparate data sources using advanced data analytics tools and techniques
Proficiency in evaluating and comparing data science models using a diverse range of metrics to enable informed decision-making and optimal model selection
Ability to perform in depth data analysis including but not limited to -
Machine Learning
Generative AI,
RAG frameworks, & NLP Token and sequence classification
Classification Optimization
Time Series analysis
Pattern Recognition
Able to work proactively and take initiative without being specifically directed Ability to extract & aggregate data from disparate data sources
Ability to communicate complex topics and visualize data in an easy-to-understand manner when presenting to management
Educational Requirements
Bachelor's Degree Required
Work Experience
3+ Years Required; 5+ Years Preferred
Physical Requirements
Physical Requirements: Sedentary Work

Career Level
7IC
Required Skills

3+ years of experience in a Data Science or Data Engineering related role
2+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Professional experience using at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)

Preferred Skills

3+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Experience in building Generative AI solutions for business problems
3+ years of experience developing solutions using SQL
2+ years of experience with at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)
1+ year of experience in Cybersecurity
1+ year of experience in Splunk SPL
Experience with modern data engineering utilizing APIs
Experience applying agile SDLC
M.S. or PhD in a Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM) or Economics related field of study
Related Skills
Business Acumen, Data Preprocessing, Data Science, Innovation, Machine Learning, Market/Industry Dynamics, Predictive Modeling, Programming, Statistics
Anticipated Posting End Date:
2024-11-15
Base Pay Range: $88,400/yr. - $126,800/yr.
Actual base salary may vary based upon, but not limited to, relevant experience, time in role, base salary of internal peers, prior performance, business sector, and geographic location. In addition to base salary, the competitive compensation package may include, depending on the role, participation in an incentive program linked to performance (for example, annual discretionary incentive programs, non-annual sales incentive plans, or other non-annual incentive plans).
_____________________________________________________________________________________________________
Company Overview
TIAA is the leading provider of financial services in the academic, research, medical, cultural and government fields. We offer a wide range of financial solutions, including investing, banking, advice and education, and retirement services.
Benefits and Total Rewards
The organization is committed to making financial well-being possible for its clients, and is equally committed to the well-being of our associates. That’s why we offer a comprehensive Total Rewards package designed to make a positive difference in the lives of our associates and their loved ones. Our benefits include a superior retirement program and highly competitive health, wellness and work life offerings that can help you achieve and maintain your best possible physical, emotional and financial well-being. To learn more about your benefits, please review our
Benefits Summary
.
Equal Opportunity
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment regardless of age, race, color, national origin, sex, religion, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other protected status.

Accessibility Support
TIAA offers support for those who need assistance with our online application process to provide an equal employment opportunity to all job seekers, including individuals with disabilities.
If you are a U.S. applicant and desire a reasonable accommodation to complete a job application please use one of the below options to contact our accessibility support team:
Phone: (800) 842-2755
Email:
accessibility.support@tiaa.org",3.7,TIAA,"Frisco, TX",10000+ Employees,1918.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,108.0,TX,106.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Spatial Omics","$129K
/yr","The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid

The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid",4.2,MD Anderson Cancer Center,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1941.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,83.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$161K
/yr","At Accenture Federal Services, nothing matters more than helping the US federal government make the nation stronger and safer and life better for people. Our 13,000+ people are united in a shared purpose to pursue the limitless potential of technology and ingenuity for clients across defense, national security, public safety, civilian, and military health organizations.
Join Accenture Federal Services to do the work you love in an inclusive, collaborative, and caring community, where you can be empowered to grow, learn and thrive through hands-on experience, certifications, industry training and more.
Join us to drive positive, lasting change that moves missions and the government forward!

Job Description:
Accenture Federal Services is seeking a data scientist who is excited about assessing problems, developing solutions, and solving national security related problems. Our team leverages technological advances for better performance in all mission areas—collection, analysis, and operations—while protecting against technological threats to the security of the customer's information. We are a cadre of information management, data science, and technology experts dedicated to revolutionizing the way we ""do data"", while upholding proper protection, accessibility, and release mandates. The objective of our efforts is to accelerate the development and application of data science capabilities – including artificial intelligence and machine learning – to the customer's core missions.
Here's what you need:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 7 years of experience; or
a Master's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 5 years of experience or equivalent work experience
5+ years experience as a Data Scientist or similar role
5+ years experience with machine learning or statistics
5+ years experience developing briefings, dashboards, reports, and other deliverables using data science tools and techniques
Knowledge of analytic methods and methodological tools such as: applied mathematics, computer programming, and/or visualization
Knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git, Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, and/or Unix commands
Bonus points if you have:
Proficiency in Python and other software/tools such as R, SQL, Git, Tableau
Experience with Python libraries such as Pandas, numpy, scikit-learn
Demonstrated experience working large volumes of data
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information
Experience working directly with customers to identify and develop functional requirements
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph

What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture Federal Services has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture Federal Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.

Los Angeles County Information Only
If you live in or expect to work from Los Angeles County if hired for this position, please review below for important additional information.

Criminal history may have a direct, adverse, and negative relationship with some of the material job duties of this position. These include the duties and responsibilities listed in the job posting, as well as the abilities to adhere to company policies, exercise sound judgment, effectively manage stress and work safely and respectfully with others, exhibit trustworthiness, meet client expectations, standards, and accompanying requirements, and safeguard business operations and company reputation. Pursuant to the California Fair Chance Act, Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers, Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance, and San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture Federal Services is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture Federal Services and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you are being considered for employment opportunities with Accenture Federal Services and need an accommodation for a disability or religious observance during the interview process or for the job you are interviewing for, please speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture Federal Services or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",4.1,Accenture Federal Services,"Chantilly, VA",10000+ Employees,1989.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,161.0,VA,35.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior AI Data Scientist,"$187K
/yr","Empowering players to create is an exciting future for the gaming industry. At Electronic Arts we have many examples of players creating content, whether it be a skateboard park in Skate or fantastical mansions in the Sims 4. The future definitely has our players being more empowered to create with their imagination being the only limit.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to help shape the future of content creation and gameplay with AI. If you have the right expertise and are interested we want to hear from you!
As a Senior AI Data Scientist you will:
Build, fine-tune and implement AI and machine learning models to solve challenging problems
Ensure AI and machine learning production pipelines are scalable, repeatable and cloud agnostic
Apply current and emerging techniques in deep learning, natural language processing and other machine learning areas
Collect, clean, manage, analyze and visualize large sets of data using multiple data platforms, tools and technique
Work in partnership with game teams to integrate AI solutions into products and services.
Optimize and fine-tune AI models for performance and scalability. Analyze and interpret data to extract meaningful insights and improve AI models.
Document and present findings and solutions to stakeholders.
Desired qualifications and experience:
A minimum of 3+ years of experience in data science
PhD or MSc in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related field
Strong expertise in deep learning, fluent in Python and SQL
Expertise in automating machine learning models and building end to end products
Experience with devops tools and principles (Git, CI/CD, Docker)
Effective within Cloud environments (GCP, AWS)
Understanding of containerization and orchestration technologies (Docker, Kubernetes, etc.
Ceci ne s’applique pas au Québec.

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

The base salary ranges listed below are for the defined geographic market pay zones in these locations. If you reside outside of these locations, a recruiter will advise on the range and benefits for your specific location.

EA has listed the base salary ranges it in good faith expects to pay applicants for this role in the locations listed, as of the time of this posting. Pay offered will be determined based on numerous relevant business and candidate factors including, for example, education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, geographic location, and business or organizational needs.



BASE SALARY RANGES

California (depending on location e.g. Los Angeles vs. Sacramento):
º $161,100 - $239,700 USD Annually
New York (depending on location e.g. Manhattan vs. Buffalo):
º $142,900 - $239,700 USD Annually
Jersey City, NJ :
º $187,400 - $239,700 USD Annually
Colorado (depending on location e.g. Denver vs. Colorado Springs):
º $153,100 - $206,200 USD Annually
Washington (depending on location e.g. Seattle vs. Spokane):
º $142,900 - $230,000 USD Annually
British Columbia (depending on location e.g. Vancouver vs. Victoria):
º $133,400 - $193,200 CAN Annually

Base salary is just one part of the overall compensation at EA. In the US, we offer a package of benefits including paid time off (3 weeks per year to start), 80 hours per year of sick time, 16 paid company holidays per year, 10 weeks paid time off to bond with baby, medical/dental/vision insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, and 401(k) to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity. For British Columbia, we offer a package of benefits including vacation (3 weeks per year to start), 10 days per year of sick time, paid top-up to EI/QPIP benefits up to 100% of base salary when you welcome a new child (12 weeks for maternity, and 4 weeks for parental/adoption leave), extended health/dental/vision coverage, life insurance, disability insurance, retirement plan to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity.

Electronic Arts creates next-level entertainment experiences that inspire players and fans around the world. Here, everyone is part of the story. Part of a community that connects across the globe. A place where creativity thrives, new perspectives are invited, and ideas matter. A team where everyone makes play happen.",4.1,Electronic Arts,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1982.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,187.0,WA,42.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,WA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Astronomical Data Scientist II,"$96K
/yr","Astronomical Data Scientist II
The Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is a multi-mission science operations center for finding stars and galaxies in the universe. Our world-class astronomical research center is based on the Johns Hopkins University Homewood campus in Baltimore, Maryland. Learn more about our missions - https://www.stsci.edu/what-we-do.
Description:
The Data Management Division (DMD) at the Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is seeking an astronomical data scientist to support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST). MAST is the public data archive for more than 20 missions spanning more than 30 years. The DMD is responsible for a multi-petabyte astronomical data archive that maintains Hubble Space Telescope (HST), James Webb Space Telescope (JWST), Kepler, GALEX, TESS, and the future Nancy Grace Roman Space Telescope (Roman) Mission data.
Job Summary:
This candidate will lead archive activities and science data exploration related to large scale astronomical dataset, provide scientific guidance on catalog development efforts and support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST) data products, tools, and interfaces.
This position can support hybrid work. This position can support hybrid work. Candidates must reside in or be willing to relocate to our local market. (MD, DE, VA, PA, DC & WV). Relocation assistance provided.
This position requires US Citizenship or Permanent Residence in order to meet ITAR requirements.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Regular:
Participate in the design and development of cloud-based solutions for storing, processing and managing astronomical catalogs and services that support community usage of catalogs
Maintain and support mission source catalogs such as Roman Source Catalog(s) to ensure the integrity, accessibility, and security of astronomical datasets.
Participate in cloud tool development for massive catalog dataset exploration
Support catalog data searching across multiple archive centers
Answer help desk questions from scientific users, especially for those related to astronomical catalogs
Requirements:
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in astronomy or astrophysics
Expertise (minimum of three years or equivalent knowledge level) in the scientific use of catalogs
Experience in Python scripting, including the use of common Python-based astronomy packages
Familiarity with AWS Cloud related tools/services
Effective communication skills and the ability to describe astronomical data to a broad science community
Ability to maintain effective working relationships with other scientific, technical, and administrative staff
Ability to analyze and solve problems independently, as well as work collaboratively and communicate effectively with multi-disciplinary teams and leadership
Preferred Qualifications:
Expertise in one (or both) of the following fields of study:
Extragalactic astrophysics
Time domain and multi-messenger (TDAMM) astrophysics
Experience working with and analyzing/processing massive catalogs
Experience with Git or other similar software version control tools
Experience applying machine learning algorithms/tools to produce/analyze astronomical catalogs
Experience with database SQL scripts
Required Education:
Ph.D. in Astronomy or equivalent field.
NOTE: Substitution of additional relevant education or experience for stated qualifications may be considered.
Salary range is $86,000 - $106,000.
Compensation is commensurate with education and experience. Our excellent benefits include:
Employer retirement contribution – direct STScI contribution of 10% of your salary from your first day
12 days sick leave, up to 24 days’ vacation, and 10 paid holidays
Flexible work schedule with healthy work/life balance
Comprehensive medical/dental/vision/prescription plans, and more!
TO APPLY: Please upload a resume, cover letter and online application using this link: Astronomical Data Scientist II
Applications received by 10/30/2024 will receive full consideration. Applications received after this date will be considered until the position is filled.
Explore all career opportunities at www.stsci.edu/opportunities
STScI offers a flexible and welcoming workspace for all. STScI embraces the diversity of our staff as a strategic priority in creating a first-rate community. We strongly encourage women, ethnic minorities, veterans, and disabled individuals to apply for these opportunities. Veterans, disabled individuals, or wounded warriors needing assistance with the employment process can contact us at careers@stsci.edu EOE/AA/M/F/D/V.
As a leader in the astronomical community, AURA is committed to diversity and inclusion. AURA develops and supports programs that advance our organizational commitment to diversity, broaden participation, and encourage the advancement of diversity throughout the workforce www.aura-astronomy.org/diversity.asp
As a recipient of U.S. Government funding, AURA is considered a government contractor subject to Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action regulations. As an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, AURA and all of the centers do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity/gender identity expression, lawful political affiliations, veteran status, disability, and any other legally protected status under applicable federal, state, and local equal opportunity laws. The statements below, as well as the requests for self-identification, are required under these regulations. We encourage your participation in meeting these federal reporting requirements for protection and assisting us in our record-keeping and reporting. Your responses are kept strictly confidential.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.5,"Assn of Univ for Res in Astronomy, Inc.","Baltimore, MD",1001 to 5000 Employees,1957.0,Company - Private,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,MD,67.0,1,0,0,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$103K
/yr","Overview:
In today’s rapidly evolving technology landscape, an organization’s data has never been a more important aspect in achieving mission and business goals. Our data exploitation experts work with our clients to support their mission and business goals by creating and executing a comprehensive data strategy using the best technology and techniques, given the challenge.

At Steampunk, our goal is to build and execute a data strategy for our clients to coordinate data collection and generation, to align the organization and its data assets in support of the mission, and ultimately to realize mission goals with the strongest effectiveness possible.

For our clients, data is a strategic asset. They are looking to become a facts-based, data-driven, customer-focused organization. To help realize this goal, they are leveraging visual analytics platforms to analyze, visualize, and share information. At steampunk you will design and develop solutions to high-impact, complex data problems, working with the best and data practitioners around.
Contributions:
We are looking for an Associate Data Scientist to work with our existing team of Data Architects and Developers to develop strategies, create ML/AI solutions, and deliver results. We are looking for a more than just an ""Associate Data Scientist"", but a technologist with excellent communication and customer service skills and a passion for data and problem solving.
Experience modeling on structured and unstructured data sets
Experience with exploratory data analysis
Experience in feature engineering
Experience in data visualization
Experience with Deep Learning methodology and state of the art libraries
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information and make decisions
Support an Agile software development lifecycle
Qualifications:
Ability to hold a position of public trust with the US government.
0-5 years industry experience developing ML/AI solutions and a passion for solving complex problems.
0-5 years direct experience in Data Modeling and Data Solution Development
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, engineering, business, or a scientific or technical discipline
Demonstrated experience manipulating structured and unstructured data for analysis
Strong programming skills in SQL, Python, R, Scala, Java, or similar language
Experience using Python to manipulate large data sets
Demonstrated experience with TensorFlow, Keras, or other Deep Learning tools and frameworks
Demonstrated experience in big data systems including Hadoop, Spark, Scala
Data visualization skills in Tableau, Power BI, D3, ArcGIS, or similar
Knowledge of DBOps and MLOps framework is a plus
Experience with Solr, Elasticsearch, or similar tool is a plus
About steampunk:
Steampunk relies on several factors to determine salary, including but not limited to geographic location, contractual requirements, education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience. The projected compensation range for this position is $75,000 to $130,000. The estimate displayed represents a typical annual salary range for this position. Annual salary is just one aspect of Steampunk’s total compensation package for employees. Learn more about additional Steampunk benefits here.

Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.3,Steampunk,"El Paso, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,TX,21.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist II - Operations Analytics,"$107K
/yr","Description

A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions which determine the source of disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety.

In North America we have more than 5,000 team members across 11 sites or subsidiaries, including Salt Lake City-based BioFire Diagnostics and one subsidiary in Montreal, Canada. Come be a part of our team and our mission as a Data Scientist!

bioMérieux - Salt Lake City is looking for a talented and engaged Data Scientist to play an integral role in the support of cutting-edge, life-saving medical devices. You will be joining a team that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and a healthy work life balance.
The candidate will be knowledgeable in various aspects of data analytics, and responsible for building and maintaining analytic dashboards, developing robust data pipelines, and performing complex mathematical and/or statistical analysis for projects to support the BioFire manufacturing departments. The candidate must have strong analytic and programming skills. The candidate will be embedded in the Data Science department but will have close collaboration with the Software Development, Production, and Engineering teams at bioMérieux. Therefore, the candidate must have strong communication skills and desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.

Studies and Experience:
A minimum of a B.S. in a quantitative discipline: Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Computational Biology
2+ years industry experience as a data scientist, mathematician, or statistician, or 0 years industry experience with a M.S. or PhD in a quantitative discipline.
Programming proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, MATLAB, C++, C#, or SQL

Skills and Qualifications:
Good communication, writing, and presentation skills
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Practical experience in any of the following: data visualization, data analytics platforms (e.g., Tableau), data pipelines, data cleaning and processing, probability, statistics, machine learning, image analysis, linear algebra, and optimization methods",4.0,bioMerieux SA,"Salt Lake City, UT",10000+ Employees,1963.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,107.0,UT,61.0,1,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$106K
/yr","Operations Analyst – Data Scientist
Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,106.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,0
Sr Data Scientist,"$129K
/yr","Role : Sr Data Scientist
Location : Dallas TX ( Hybrid role - In office REQIUIRED )
Overview: Blue Yonder is a Leading AI-driven Global Supply Chain Solutions Software Product Company and one of Glassdoor’s “Best Places to Work”
Seeking an expert individual that has a strong technical foundation with the additional ability to be hands-on with the broader engineering team as part of the development/deployment cycle, and deep knowledge of industry best practices, Data Science and Machine Learning experience with the ability to implement them working with both the platform, and the product teams.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Technical Environment
Operate within a sophisticated technical landscape, utilizing Python 3.* and frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, BigQuery, Apache Beam,
Apache Spark, Kubeflow, Dataflow, Kubernetes, Kafka, Pub/Sub, and Flask. Our application architecture follows a scalable, resilient, reactive, event-driven
, and secure multi-tenant Microservices design, hosted on Google and Azure Cloud.
Responsibilities:
As the Sr Data Scientist, you will:
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to execute data enrichment, cleansing routines, and feature selection.
Evaluate candidate models, select the final model, and report on test performance.
Ensure proper runtime deployment of models and implement runtime monitoring for continued model stability.
Drive collaboration with product, sales, and engineering teams to shape the final solution.
Utilize data to understand patterns, formulate and test hypotheses, and iterate as needed.
Play a key role in preparing sales materials and estimating hardware requirements.
Lead client meetings, both online and onsite, to discuss new and current functionality.
If you are a seasoned data scientist with a passion for leadership, ready to guide a team in implementing impactful initiatives, we invite you to lead innovation at Blue Yonder.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or any other related field is required
Min 7 years of experience with strong foundation in data science and deep learning principles.
Proficient in Python programming with a solid understanding of data structures.
Experience with frameworks and libraries like Pandas, NumPy, Keras, TensorFlow, Jupyter, Matplotlib, etc.
Expertise in a database query language, preferably SQL.
Familiarity with Big Data technologies like Snowflake, Apache Beam/Spark/Flink, and Databricks.
Solid experience with major cloud platforms, preferably Azure and/or GCP.
Knowledge of modern software development tools and best practices, including Git, Github Actions, Jenkins, Docker, Jira, etc.
Familiarity with deep learning, time series, NLP, reinforcement learning, and combinatorial optimization.
Proven experience in team leadership, mentoring junior data scientists in an official or unofficial capacity.
Desired knowledge of Kafka, Redis, Cassandra, etc.
LI-LOCAL
LI-SR1
-
The salary range for this position is $114,103.81 - $143,896.18
The salary range information provided, reflects the anticipated base salary range for this position based on current national data. Minimums and maximums may vary based on location. Individual salary will be commensurate with skills, experience, certifications or licenses and other relevant factors. In addition, this role will be eligible to participate in either the annual performance bonus or commission program, determined by the nature of the position.
At Blue Yonder, we care about the wellbeing of our employees and those most important to them. This is reflected in our robust benefits package and options that includes:
Comprehensive Medical, Dental and Vision
401K with Matching
Flexible Time Off
Corporate Fitness Program
A variety of voluntary benefits such as; Legal Plans, Accident and Hospital Indemnity, Pet Insurance and much more
At Blue Yonder, we are committed to a workplace that genuinely fosters inclusion and belonging in which everyone can share their unique voices and talents in a safe space. We continue to be guided by our core values and are proud of our diverse culture as an equal opportunity employer. We understand that your career search may look different than others, and embrace the professional, personal, educational, and volunteer opportunities through which people gain experience.
Our Values

If you want to know the heart of a company, take a look at their values. Ours unite us. They are what drive our success – and the success of our customers. Does your heart beat like ours? Find out here:
Core Values
Diversity, Inclusion, Value & Equity (DIVE)
is our strategy for fostering an inclusive environment we can be proud of. Check out Blue Yonder's inaugural
Diversity Report
which outlines our commitment to change, and our
video
celebrating the differences in all of us in the words of some of our associates from around the world.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.",4.1,Blue Yonder,"Dallas, TX",5001 to 10000 Employees,1985.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,39.0,1,0,1,0,0
Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine,"$128K
/yr","Job Description
Grow your career at Cedars-Sinai!
Data is vital to advance clinical knowledge across a spectrum of medical and surgical fields. Are you ready to transform data discoveries into valuable information, which will empower tomorrow's medicine?
Dr. Jason Moore is looking for a Research Data Scientist to join a diverse team!
To learn more about the department - Computational Biomedicine | Cedars-Sinai
The Research Data Scientist participates in biomedical research projects using programming, data-mining, statistics, machine learning, and visualization techniques to develop, evaluate, and/or apply algorithms and software for data analysis.
Responsibilities include querying databases, data processing, supervised and unsupervised machine learning, deploying production models, and communication of scientific findings via peer-reviewed publications and scientific conferences. Writes clean, performant, reusable code managed on GitHub to perform repeatable analyses and to train and deploy models to multiple environments.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Assists with the development, evaluation, and/or application of computational and statistical methods including artificial intelligence and machine learning algorithms and software for the analysis of biomedical data.
Assists with the presentation and communication of scientific results through laboratory meetings, scientific conferences, and peer-reviewed publications.
Creates database-to-deployment pipelines for models using the necessary programming languages (primarily R, Python, SQL).
Creates sustainable data science infrastructure and adheres to data analysis/machine learning best practices.
Performs exploratory data analysis to gauge the need for or appropriateness of advanced analytical methods.
Works with senior or lead data scientists and principal investigators to identify areas where data science can best be applied to answer biomedical research questions.
Tests and validates code to ensure robustness of data applications with version control through GitHub.
Performs all other duties as assigned.

Qualifications
Educational Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline required.

Master's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline preferred.
Experience:
2 years of professional experience in healthcare or pharmaceutical industries working with biomedical data.
2 years - Experience in programming at an intermediate skill level with a high-level programming language such as R or Python. College projects may be acceptable.
2 years - Experience in programming at a basic to intermediate proficiency level in SQL preferred
Experience in biomedical machine learning is preferred
Physical Demands:
Standing, Walking, Sitting, Lifting 50 lbs. Carrying 50 lbs. Pushing 50 lbs. Pulling 50 lbs. Reaching, Handling, Grasping, Feeling, Talking, Hearing, Repetitive Motions, Eye/Hand/Foot Coordination

Req ID : 5630
Working Title : Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine
Department : Computational Biomedicine
Business Entity : Cedars-Sinai Medical Center
Job Category : Information Technology
Job Specialty : Bus Intelligence/Reporting
Overtime Status : EXEMPT
Primary Shift : Day
Shift Duration : 8 hour
Base Pay : $94,764 - $161,096",3.9,CEDARS-SINAI,California,10000+ Employees,1902.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,128.0,California,122.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","The Bioanalytics Systems & Technologies Group focuses on driving analytics to take advantage of vast and rapidly expanding biological datasets to address national security needs. The Group’s efforts include developing software architectures and systems, bioinformatics tools, and AI algorithms to further the nation’s efforts in chemical and biological defense, biosecurity, public and global health and warfighter performance.

Job Description

Our group is seeking a highly motivated data scientist to join our diverse and multi-functional team. As a Technical Staff member, you may be responsible for contributing to technical solutions as well as working with the sponsor, understanding their needs, translating them to a technical roadmap, and leading multidisciplinary teams to bring that to fruition. We are looking for an individual who has a strong background a technical field and who will further the Group’s mission by developing and applying state-of -the-art data science technologies that can help us address key national stakeholder needs. Example areas of effort include, but are not limited to, assessing the AI data readiness of systems, prototyping reference data science architectures, and leveraging multi-omics, clinical, and imaging data to provide insights for therapeutic suitability for a range of diseases. As a Technical Staff member, you will be a principal investigator for projects, lead teams, define research plans, and provide technical and management oversight.

Requirements

Ph.D. in Data Science, Mathematics, Physics, Computational Biology, Biomedical Engineering, or related scientific field or equivalent experience in technical analysis. In lieu of a Ph.D., a master’s degree with 5+ years of directly related experience will be considered.
Demonstrated ability to derive actionable information from multi-modal data.
Ability to work collaboratively and lead highly interdisciplinary teams.
Demonstrated skills in scientific writing, as well as development and clear presentation of technical materials to a wide spectrum of technical and non-technical audiences.
Occasional travel (<10%) with optional opportunities for travel.

At MIT Lincoln Laboratory, our exceptional career opportunities include many outstanding benefits to help you stay healthy, feel supported, and enjoy a fulfilling work-life balance. Benefits offered to employees include:
Comprehensive health, dental, and vision plans
MIT-funded pension
Matching 401K
Paid leave (including vacation, sick, parental, military, etc.)
Tuition reimbursement and continuing education programs
Mentorship programs
A range of work-life balance options
... and much more!
Please visit our Benefits page for more information. As an employee of MIT, you can also take advantage of other voluntary benefits, discounts and perks.
Selected candidate will be subject to a pre-employment background investigation and must be able to obtain and maintain a Secret level DoD security clearance.
MIT Lincoln Laboratory is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran status, disability status, or genetic information; U.S. citizenship is required.

Requisition ID: 41544",4.4,MIT Lincoln Laboratory,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1951.0,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,MA,73.0,0,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$184K
/yr","We are the Web and Work Experiences team within M365 Core, focused on creating the best AI Copilot Web and Work Experiences for commercial users. Our team develops engaging, modern chat solutions for information workers and enterprise users, delivering exceptional Web and Work Copilot experiences. To help us reach our goals and collaborate with key partners in design, research, product management, and data science, we are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to shape the future of M365 Copilot.

In this role as a Senior Data Scientist you will have the opportunity to work with teams across Microsoft and globally, developing innovative AI solutions for enterprise users across all commercial platforms within Microsoft. You’ll contribute to components integrated into applications across the Microsoft 365 ecosystem, spanning both desktop and mobile platforms. If you are passionate about building scalable, fault-tolerant services and developing components that are accessible and inclusive of all users, we encourage you to apply for this exciting opportunity!

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
We are seeking a talented and motivated Data Scientist with a strong Data Scientist with a passion for analyzing large scale data to identify insights to grow business and improve user experience. In this role, you will have the opportunity to collaborate with teams across Microsoft, leverage state-of-the-art technology and contribute to exciting products like Copilot.
Build a solid understanding of the business and the metrics that drive performance
Process and analyze big data using Statistical, Machine Learning modeling, to identify opportunities, patterns, pain points in users’ journey and provide insights to the leadership teams to help in driving user experience and product growth.
Research, propose and implement innovative solutions to enhance our tools, processes, and analytics capabilities.
Collaborate with PMs, data scientists, developers and partner teams.
Work with Product teams on roadmap, define KPI, forecast and measure product goals.
Embody our Culture and Values
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
o OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results))
o OR equivalent experience.
2+ years customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Other Requirements:

Ability to meet Microsoft, customer and/or government security screening requirements are required for this role. These requirements include but are not limited to the following specialized security screenings:
Microsoft Cloud Background Check: This position will be required to pass the Microsoft Cloud background check upon hire/transfer and every two years thereafter.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proven experience building and deploying machine learning models in real-world scenarios.
Experience working with both structured and unstructured data.
Excellent problem-solving and critical thinking abilities.
Strong communication skills with the ability to convey complex data concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Self-starter with the ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Continuous learning mindset and a passion for staying updated on the latest industry trends.
Ability to mentor and guide data analysts, providing technical oversight and ensuring best practices.
Solid analytical skills with a track record of solving complex problems.
Knowledge of big data tools such as Hadoop, Spark, or similar.
Experience in Chat bot domain, online service, app, or Web site for millions of users.
Data Science IC4 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $117,200 - $229,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $153,600 - $250,200 per year. Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until November 1, 2024

#M365CORE #MSAI
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,United States,10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,184.0,United States,49.0,0,0,1,1,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$150K
/yr","About Us
Capital Bank N.A. is headquartered in Maryland, and has been serving our communities since 1999. We stand as a publicly traded company (NASDAQ: CBNK) with over $2 billion in assets. We offer commercial and consumer banking services to clients in Maryland, DC, and Northern Virginia, alongside two nation-wide lending brands; Capital Bank Home Loans and OpenSky, a credit card division that offers and services credit cards across all states. Our personalized approach to banking, paired with cutting-edge technology solutions and a comprehensive suite of products and services, fuels our growth, and enables us to support our customers at every stage in their financial journey.

OpenSky, a division of Capital Bank, NA, is an issuer of secured credit cards. We provide an entry-level credit product for consumers with a need to build or establish a credit history. The business is going through a phase of investment and rapid growth. OpenSky is a dynamic and entrepreneurial environment where you are limited only by your imagination. Being a data-driven business, OpenSky is building out a robust analytics team.

Come join a bank where our employees thrive and are engaged in meaningful work. For the last 4 out of 5 years, Capital Bank was named one of the ""Best Banks to Work For"" in the U.S. by American Banker.

Position Purpose
The Senior Data Scientist will build and maintain customer valuation models, as well as analyze and optimize customer acquisition and retention strategies. You will be constantly seeking opportunities to improve response rates, lower acquisition costs, reduce process cycle times and optimize revenue. This role will analyze the strategic landscape to find areas where we should be competing, including financial product offerings, service offerings and technologies.

Position Responsibilities
Build and maintain customer valuation models
Analyze customer segments for targeting purposes
Analyze current customer base for retention programs and cross-sell opportunities
Analyze business intelligence data and provide insights that drive potential new tactics and strategies
Partner across the organization and with external vendors to initiate, prioritize, scope, design and deliver new programs
Minimum Education and Experience
4 to 8 years work experience in an analytical environment
High aptitude for problem solving
Ability to connect analysis to business solutions
Proven analytical and critical thinking skills, with extreme attention to detail
Capacity to prioritize and manage multiple tasks simultaneously without sacrificing quality
Must be an entrepreneurial spirit and thinker, capable of working in a highly fluid, fast-paced environment
Technical Knowledge and Skills
“Data Fluent” with exposure or basic skills in SQL and / or other data tools
Advanced Excel user, including Pivot Tables, Lookups, Formulas, Graphs
Experience in building financial and valuation models
Education
Bachelor’s degree
Working Arrangements
This is a hybrid role expected to work in office Monday, Tuesday, Thursday, and Friday. You will be able to work remotely on Wednesday.
Compensation
Base Salary Range: $120,335 - $180,502 annually. Final determination of where you are at in the salary range is based on numerous factors such as relevant experience, skill set, education, and ability to meet qualifications within the job description.
Additional Compensation: This role will include a yearly annual target bonus based on individual performance.

Why Join Us?
Join a growing company with a culture that fosters an entrepreneurial spirit
Comprehensive benefits package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Company Paid Life Insurance, Disability Insurance, and more!
Company Contributions to your 401k - Regardless of your contribution
Employee Perks: Paid Parental Leave, Employee Recognition Program, Leadership Program, Tuition Reimbursement Program, Employee Bank Checking Account, and much more!
Generous Paid Time Off and Paid Holidays – Including Paid Charity Hours to support volunteer opportunities

Supporting Businesses. Helping People. Strengthening Communities.
Capital Bank, N.A. is an Affirmative Action, E-Verify, and Equal Opportunity Employer.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Capital Bank, N.A.","Rockville, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1999.0,Company - Public,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,150.0,MD,25.0,0,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$101K
/yr","Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,101.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist IV,"$151K
/yr","About the company
Albertsons Companies is at the forefront of the revolution in retail. With a fixation on raising the bar with innovation and building belonging through our culture, our team is rallying our company around a unique purpose : to create joy around each table and inspire a healthier tomorrow for every community.
Albertsons Companies is one of the largest food and drug retailers in the United States, with over 2,200 stores in 34 states and the District of Columbia. Our well-known banners include Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen, Carrs, Kings Food Markets, and Balducci's Food Lovers Market. We support our stores with 22 distribution centers and 19 manufacturing plants.
Placing a premium on adaptability, safety and family well-being, our work model, Presence with a Purpose, offers a hybrid work environment between remote work and office time. A one-size-fits-all approach does not apply to everyone, and teams are empowered to make decisions best for them.
Bring your flavor
Building the future of food and well-being starts with you. Join our team and bring your best self to the table.
#bringyourflavor
#LI-ST4
What you will be doing

The Data Science team at Albertsons Companies is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work for the most transformational food and drug retailers in the United States. Albertsons operates over 2,300 stores under 19 well-known banners including Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen and Carrs. The company reported revenue of over $60 billion from over 34 million weekly shoppers and is the third largest private company in the country.
Data Science at Albertsons is inspired to build best in class customer experience and revolutionize the food and drug retail industry. We are looking for people who are excited in re-imagining the grocery experience by harnessing the power of AI and digital technologies. The Data Science team collects and relies on big data from existing stores and customer interactions at the 2300 nationwide stores and beyond. We are a highly driven team that applies data science to delight our customers, to improve store operations, to optimize supply chain and to proactively improve product lifecycle.
You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into business impacts on regular basis. You will work closely with other data scientists and business partners in identifying and defining data science projects, building machine learning algorithms and models on top of existing data platforms. The candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field with experience working with large data sets and applying data-driven decision making. A successful candidate will be both technically strong and business savvy, with a passion to make an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. You are a self-starter, smart yet humble, with a bias for action.
This position is primarily located in Pleasanton, California, but the candidate can work virtually from anywhere in the US. Our other affiliated teams are located in Phoenix, AZ; Boise, ID; Plano, TX; Vancouver, BC. We can offer additional location options upon request.
Main responsibilities

Collaborate with business teams to develop production grade machine learning models on large-scale datasets and improve customers’ overall shopping experience
Use machine learning to solve real problems, power the next generation experience for large scale applications.
Be a thought partner in the area of Experimentation and drive end to end process in designing and running complex experiments (A/B tests, Pre-Post, Interleaving), proactively see new opportunities.
Develop statistical and machine learning projects in experimentation using a wide variety of methodologies, including causal inference techniques, Bayesian framework
Identify key drivers for customer satisfaction and opportunities to delight customers through mining complex data
Apply machine learning to enhance recommendation engines and deliver personalized user experience on ecommerce website and loyalty mobile app
Build models and algorithms to fuel growth initiatives for Digital, Merchandising, Marketing and Loyalty teams
Apply predictive modeling techniques to optimize the forecasts for planning needs
Scale up prototypes and implement reliable automated production workflow for models
Collaborate with software development engineers to integrate models
The salary range is $131,600 to $171,080 annually. Starting salary will vary based on criteria such as location, experience, and qualifications. There may be flexibility for exceptional candidates.

What we are searching for

Master’s or PhD degree in quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, Math, Statistics or related fields
2+ years of industry experience in applying data science and modeling methodologies: regression model, survival model, ensemble modeling, NLP, recommendation algorithm, clustering, deep learning algorithm, experimental design (Multivariate/A-B testing) and nonparametric Bayesian modeling etc.
2+ years of experience and proficiency in SQL, Python and/or Spark-ML
2+ years of SQL development skills writing queries, transforming data, mining structured and unstructured data.
2+ years of hands-on experience in building data science solutions and production-ready systems on big data platforms such as Snowflake, Spark, Hadoop
Strong teamwork and communication skill
Ability to write production-level code in Python
Experience with Snowflake, Azure Databricks is a strong plus
What is it like at Albertsons?
Our 290,000 associates have a passion for great service and building lasting relationships with our customers. Through a companywide focus on innovation, we are continually enhancing our digital and product offerings, making it easy for customers to get what they need, wherever they are.
Albertsons is an Equal Opportunity Employer
This Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ethnicity, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, or on any other basis prohibited by law. Consistent with applicable state and local law, the Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We endeavor to make this site accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact us at 1-888-255-2269(option #4).",3.4,Albertsons Companies,"Pleasanton, CA",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Grocery Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,151.0,CA,85.0,1,0,1,0,0
"NAMS2 - Data Scientist I, II, III","$101K
/yr","Company Description

Crown is a leader in planning and implementing aerospace and advanced transportation services, with a focus on advanced air mobility (AAM). We have more than three decades of experience in developing strategy, exploring concepts, assessing technologies, developing use cases, and projecting economic impacts for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), and State Departments of Transportation. We are looking for an exceptional new team member to join our Crown innovators working with companies and government agencies to safely advance aviation’s newest frontier. Join our team to pioneer a better, more sustainable future

Job Description

Crown is looking for all levels of Data Scientists to work on the NAMS-2 project in Mountain View, CA to:
Identify trends, patterns, and anomalies found in big data sets by performing extensive data analysis to develop insights.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes to prepare data, implement data models, conduct analysis, and develop databases.
Interpret results from multiple structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques and tools.
Collaborate with teams to understand each data analysis projects' underlying purpose, focus, and objectives.
Design, develops, and implements the most valuable data-driven solutions for the
organization

Qualifications

Level I - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 0-2 years of related experience.
Level II - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Exposure to some of the complex tasks within the job function. Requires 2 -4 years of related experience.
Level III - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 5 - 8 years of related experience.

Additional Information

Visit: www.crownci.com for additional information on our company.
Competitive benefits program and matching 401K!
Crown is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, age, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.
Persons unable to complete an online application should contact Crown HR for assistance at (703) 650-0663 ext 3059.
Crown is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor
Crown was voted Best Places to Work in 2021
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Crown Consulting, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1989.0,Company - Private,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,101.0,CA,35.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Title: Data Scientist - Big Data Engineer
Place of Performance: Remote - Austin, TX 77040
Duration: 9 Months Approx.

About Radiant
Radiant is committed to solving complex challenges for our customers by delivering innovative technology solutions. Our client-centric model increases transparency and accountability, which helps promote efficiency and effectiveness. We work and grow together with our customers, and we help empower our clients to achieve success. Our flexible delivery model allows us to provide end-to-end solution delivery, single project execution, and, or strategic resources. CMMI Maturity Level III and ISO 9001 2015 certified.

Required Skills:
4 years of Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 years of Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 years of Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 years of Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 years of Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 years of Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 years Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.

Responsibilities:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
The above job description and requirements are general in nature and may be subject to change based on the specific needs and requirements of the organization and project.

This is a remote position.",3.1,Radiant Digital,"Austin, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2000.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,TX,24.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$57.50
/hr","Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Experience:
Data Scientist: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",Not listed,Tekfocus Minds LLC,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,57.5,Remote,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$55.50
/hr","Job Overview:
The Office of the Attorney General’s Chief Data Office (CDO) is seeking a dynamic and visionary Data Scientist to join our team and support our System Modernization efforts for the Child Support Division.
This individual must be able to work in a heavily technical environment, preparing and optimizing data for Snowflake and utilizing SAS Viya to build comprehensive federal and state reports.
You will play a pivotal role in transforming, analyzing, and leveraging our data assets to drive strategic initiatives and business outcomes.
You must be comfortable analyzing data, developing predictive modeling algorithms, and can communicate your findings through visualizations enabling the discovery of solutions to business problems.
As a Data Scientist your role will be impactful, visible, and rewarding.
Responsibilities will include:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
Required Qualification/Skill Experience:
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 Years: Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 Years: Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Position Details:
The primary work location(s) will be at OAG State Office located at 5500 E. Oltorf St, Austin, TX 78741.
Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.
The working position is Telework.
Services are expected to start 11/12/2024 and are expected to complete by 08/31/2025. Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 1000 hours. This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing. ""work made to hire.""
Pay: $58/hr as W2.
S#: 302CSD2504
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $53.00 - $58.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics and business intelligence tools: 4 years (Required)
Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, R: 4 years (Required)
Data conversion and report building Snowflake and SAS Viya.: 4 years (Required)
Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment: 4 years (Required)
Proficiency in ETL processes & tools as AWS Glue and Lambda: 4 years (Required)
Strong knowledge of database Mangat. & Data warehousing: 4 years (Required)
Ability to Commute:
Austin, TX 78741 (Required)
Ability to Relocate:
Austin, TX 78741: Relocate before starting work (Required)
Work Location: In person",5.0,Advanced Proactive Solutions LLC,"Austin, TX",Unknown,,Company - Private,Security & Protective,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,55.5,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Data Lake","$90K
/yr","For over 90 years, Topcon’s vision has been to solve societal challenges around the globe. In healthcare, we are developing innovations that improve patients’ health and quality of life.
We empower eye care providers with advanced imaging, diagnostic solutions, and intelligent data technology. Our robotic devices deliver simplicity without compromise, by capturing clear images with the push of a button.
By joining Topcon Healthcare, you become part of a growing, diverse, global team. With office locations throughout North America, whether you are on-site, remote, or hybrid, our culture empowers you to contribute to company and personal success each day. At Topcon Healthcare, you can grow your career, gain new perspectives, and help address society’s most pressing challenges. If you have drive, passion, and a desire to be part of a collaborative team, we want to hear from you.
At Topcon Healthcare, we don’t wait for the future. We invent it. Join us.
Learn more about working with us at
topconcareers.com
THI is seeking a mission-driven a Data Scientist, Data Lake specialized in data cleaning, curation, and labeling. This role will play a critical role in ensuring the quality and usability of ophthalmic data for machine learning and other analytics initiatives. This individual will be responsible for developing and implementing data cleaning and preprocessing pipelines, curating datasets for specific use cases, and executing data labeling efforts.
Main Responsibilities:
Data Cleaning and Preprocessing:
Design and implement robust data cleaning processes to identify and address missing values, outliers, inconsistencies, and errors in datasets.
Develop and maintain data preprocessing pipelines to standardize, transform, and normalize data.
Utilize statistical and machine learning techniques to identify and correct data quality issues.
Data Curation and Labelling:
Select, extract, and organize relevant data from diverse sources to create curated datasets tailored to specific use cases.
Ensure data consistency, integrity, and documentation throughout the curation process.
Design and manage data labeling projects to generate high-quality labeled data.
Implement quality control measures to ensure the accuracy and consistency of labeled data.
Develop and maintain tools and scripts for automating data cleaning, curation, and labeling tasks.
Collaboration and Communication:
Collaborate with clinical scientists, data engineers, ML engineers, and domain experts to understand data needs and challenges.
Clearly communicate data quality findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Stay up to date on the latest techniques and tools in data cleaning, curation, and labeling.
Qualifications:
BSc or MSc in Life Sciences, Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computer or Data Science
2 years’ experience doing clinical science or developing data-driven algorithms for medical devices.
Experience in the ophthalmic industry is preferred, and experience with OCT data is highly preferred.
Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, set priorities, and handle multiple tasks and projects with a high degree of efficiency and comfort with ambiguity.
Expertise with statistical packages such as Python or R is highly desirable.
Expertise with Matlab, IDL, or similar packages is highly desirable.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with cloud computing applications (such as AWS or Azure)
A passion for leveraging data to improve patient care and drive innovation
Base Pay:
Expected Base Pay Range: $70,000 to $110,000 Annualized
The base pay range included is a projected hiring range for a position, level and potential work location(s) listed. Topcon provides the compensation range that it in good faith believes it might pay and/or offer for this position. This compensation range is based on a full-time schedule.
Benefits*:
Topcon offers a comprehensive benefit package for this position including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, tax saving spending accounts a 401(k) plan with employer match, tuition reimbursement in addition to other perks and benefits. We also offer time off for our employees to recharge. Our employees are eligible for paid company holidays, paid personal time off, and paid sick time that meets or exceeds state/local requirements.
Topcon reserves the right to ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and offer additional benefits and other compensation; individual candidate compensation may be determined based on individual skills, experience, training, certifications, education, final work location and other factors not related to an applicant’s sex or other status protected by local, state, or federal law. Changes in the position level, location or other factors associated with the role may change the final determined compensation. The recruiter can provide additional information during the hiring process.
Topcon time off policies can vary between roles which are exempt or non-exempt. For hourly (“non-exempt”) employees, we offer personal paid time off which accrues in accordance with local standards. For salaried (“exempt”) employees, we offer a flexible paid time off policy giving you flexibility to take time when needed, while supporting business needs. All paid time off policies are in accordance with or exceeding local law. Employees working at least 30 hours per week are eligible for our Health and Welfare benefit package.
EEO Statement:
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status.",3.2,Topcon Healthcare,"La Jolla, CA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,90.0,CA,,1,0,0,1,0
IT Data Scientist I-IV,"$103K
/yr","IT Data Scientist I-IV
- (2400277)

Founded in 1934, Medical Mutual is the oldest and one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio. We provide peace of mind to more than 1.6 million Ohioans through our high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans.
Medical Mutual’ s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we don’t answer to Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us and help our members achieve their best possible health and quality of life.
IT Data Scientist I
Entry-level data scientist developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist II
Experienced junior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends
IT Data Scientist III
Senior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Senior data scientists are expected to be self-sufficient and able to assist in coaching junior data scientists. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist IV
Expert data science developer responsible for leading team activities for design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
Responsibilities
IT Data Scientist I
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist II
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist III
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist IV
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned

Qualifications
IT Data Scientist I
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
0 to 1-year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
Python programming language
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist II
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
2+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
2+ years of experience with SQL programming language
1+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist III
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
4+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
4+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Advanced programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist IV
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
6+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
6+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Mastery of programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
Medical Mutual is looking to grow our team! We truly value and respect the talents and abilities of all of our employees. That's why we offer an exceptional package that includes:
A Great Place to Work
We will provide the equipment you need for this role, including a laptop, monitors, keyboard, mouse, and headset.
Whether you are working remotely or in the office, employees have access to on-site fitness centers at many locations, or a gym membership reimbursement when there is no Medical Mutual facility available. Enjoy the use of weights, cardio machines, locker rooms, classes and more.
On-site cafeteria, serving hot breakfast and lunch, at our Brooklyn, OH location. Convenience stores at many locations.
Discounts at many places in and around town, just for being a Medical Mutual team member.
The opportunity to earn cash rewards for shopping with our customers.
Business casual attire, including jeans.
Excellent Benefits
Employee bonus program
401(k) with company match up to 4% and an additional company contribution.
Health Savings Account with a company matching contribution.
Excellent medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance — insurance is what we do best, and we make affordable coverage for our team a priority.
Access to an Employee Assistance Program, which includes professional counseling, personal and professional coaching, self-help resources and assistance with work/life benefits.
Company holidays and up to 16 PTO days during the first year of employment with options to carry over unused PTO time.
After one year of service, parental leave for eligible employees who become parents through maternity, paternity, or adoption.

An Investment in You
Career development programs and classes.
Mentoring and coaching to help you advance in your career.
Tuition reimbursement up to $5,250 per year, the IRS maximum.
Diverse, inclusive, and welcoming culture with Business Resource Groups.

About Medical Mutual
Medical Mutual’s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we do not answer Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us.
There is a good chance you already know many of our Medical Mutual customers. As the official insurer of everything you love, we are trusted by businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout Ohio to provide high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans. Our plans provide peace of mind to more than 1.5 million Ohioans.
We are not just one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio, we are also the longest running. Founded in 1934, we aree proud of our rich history with the communities where we live and work.
At Medical Mutual and its family of companies we celebrate differences and are mutually invested in our employees and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse and nicotine testing.

Primary Location US-OH-Brooklyn
Work Locations Brooklyn 100 American Road Brooklyn 44144
Job 7 - General Staff
Organization Enterprise Analytics
Schedule Regular
Shift Standard
Employee Status Individual Contributor
Job Type Full-time
Job Level Day Job
Job Posting Oct 16, 2024, 2:39:10 PM",4.1,Medical Mutual of Ohio,"Brooklyn, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1934.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,OH,90.0,1,0,1,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$77K
/yr","Transport is at the core of modern society. Imagine using your expertise to shape sustainable transport and infrastructure solutions for the future? If you seek to make a difference on a global scale, working with next-gen technologies and the sharpest collaborative teams, then we could be a perfect match.
What you will do
As a Data Scientist, you will apply advanced data analytics techniques to analyze various types of vehicle and test data and provide detailed insights to simulation and engineering teams. The position entails a high level of collaboration with engineering teams working on future products, analyzing different types of logged and/or measured data (high frequency and low frequency) from customer trucks, field trucks and test vehicles to help make data driven engineering decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Utilize advanced analytics and machine learning techniques on customer and test vehicle data to extract meaningful insights and provide actionable recommendations to engineering and simulation teams
Integrate data from multiple sources (Customer vehicles, test vehicles etc.) and automate data flow, ensuring data quality and consistency, to facilitate deployment of advanced analytics techniques within vehicle engineering
Create data visualizations and dashboards to translate technical and customer data to provide actionable insights to stakeholders
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product development, and IT, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Collaborate with global teams on developing and improving analysis & simulation strategies based on actual customer data
Collaborate with engineering, testing and IT teams to drive development of AI/ML models to support and accelerate predictive modeling in engineering
Stay updated with the latest advancements in data science and automotive technologies to continuously improve usage of data analytics within vehicle engineering

Your future team
The Advanced Calculation Team is an important part of the Vehicle Engineering function for Volvo Group Trucks Technology, north America. Our team is a dynamic team of highly competent engineers who specialize in various CAE disciplines. We are responsible for ensuring functional requirements are met for durability & reliability, thermal management, cooling performance and other mechanical systems for heavy duty trucks developed for North America.
Who are you?
Do you dream big? We do too, and we are excited to grow together. In this role, you will bring:
A strong attention to detail with the ability to interpret data and translate information into actionable intelligence.
Capable of networking with individuals and teams across various departments and sites, sharing information and resources as needed, and working towards achieving common group goals.
Effective communication with the ability to listen effectively, transmit information accurately, and actively seek feedback from other experienced engineers, project managers, etc.
Ability to perform a wide range of tasks, respond positively to changing timelines and/or project scope, and open to accepting new challenges, responsibilities, and assignments.
Ease with communicating highly technical information to people of varying technical ability.
A desire and passion to create the very best product, working as an integral part of a highly technical organization.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
1-3 years of experience in data analytics with automotive industry background. Heavy duty vehicle experience is considered a plus
Demonstrated experience with machine learning and advanced analytics for predictive modeling such as regression analysis, neural networks (Deep Learning, RNN, LSTM, DQN etc.), time series forecasting, classification, clustering etc.
Proficiency in statistical analysis methods and programming languages such as Python (including libraries like Numpy, SciPy, Pandas, Tensorflow), SQL, Git, Azure, Hadoop, Matlab/Simulink, pySpark
Experience with building dashboards and help create visualizations from data using PowerBI, QlikView, Tableau etc.
Familiarity with Database Management Systems (BDMS) and proficiency in querying and manipulating data using SQL
Experience with Git and version control methods is a plus

What’s in it for you?
We offer a solid package of compensation and benefits, plus you will enjoy:
An organization the prioritizes employee's health and well-being.
Working in an empowered team solving complex challenges.
Opportunity to work with new technologies such as automation, electromobility, and connectivity.
Modern workspaces that allow agility and collaboration.
Multiple electric charging stations for cars.
Onsite facilities and activities that make everyday life easier including a cafeteria, chair massages, fitness center and fitness classes offered daily.
Ready for the next move?
If you are a Data Analyst / Scientist with an interest in working with a global organization focused on impacting everyday lives, apply today and join our team on this exciting journey!

We value your data privacy and therefore do not accept applications via mail.

Who we are and what we believe in
Our focus on Inclusion, Diversity, and Equity allows each of us the opportunity to bring our full authentic self to work and thrive by providing a safe and supportive environment, free of harassment and discrimination. We are committed to removing the barriers to entry, which is why we ask that even if you feel you may not meet every qualification on the job description, please apply and let us decide. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.”

Applying to this job offers you the opportunity to join Volvo Group. Every day, across the globe, our trucks, buses, engines, construction equipment, financial services, and solutions make modern life possible. We are almost 100,000 people empowered to shape the future landscape of efficient, safe and sustainable transport solutions. Fulfilling our mission creates countless career opportunities for talents with sharp minds and passion across the group’s leading brands and entities.

Group Trucks Technology are seeking talents to help design sustainable transportation solutions for the future. As part of our team, you’ll help us by engineering exciting next-gen technologies and contribute to projects that determine new, sustainable solutions. Bring your love of developing systems, working collaboratively, and your advanced skills to a place where you can make an impact. Join our design shift that leaves society in good shape for the next generation.",4.1,Volvo Group,"Greensboro, NC",10000+ Employees,1927.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,77.0,NC,97.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist (Mid),"$118K
/yr","This job opportunity is part of an RFP process; candidates are invited to submit their resumes detailing relevant experience.
Location: Bethesda, MD (Hybrid)
LCG is a minority-owned technology consulting firm that has been a trusted partner to more than 40 federal agencies, including 21 of the 27 Institutes and Centers (ICs) at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). For over 25 years, LCG has brought digitization and innovation to the Health and Human Services (HHS) and the NIH ecosystems. We support IT organizations by bringing precision technology and operation models that achieve mission capabilities and performance success.
Job Title: Data Scientist (Mid)
Job Summary: We are seeking an intermediate-level Data Scientist to perform extensive data analysis on large datasets to develop insights, identify trends, patterns, and anomalies. The successful candidate will collaborate with various teams to understand project objectives, perform data mining, data cleaning, and aggregation, and implement data models. This role will involve working with structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques. The Data Scientist will also support cloud computing initiatives, including developing automation solutions and enabling scientific cloud workflows.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and interpret large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation to prepare data for analysis and model implementation.
Develop and implement data models, conduct analysis, and interpret results using statistical techniques.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand the objectives and focus of data analysis projects.
Design, develop, and implement data-driven solutions to support organizational objectives.
Contribute to cloud computing initiatives, including automated self-service portals, cloud module development, and integration support for scientific computing.
Assist with cloud security operations by supporting the validation of security vulnerabilities and maintaining necessary security documentation.
Provide data analysis and insights to support decision-making for cloud environments, including usage, cost, and workload rationalization.
Support cloud workload migration projects by performing infrastructure assessments and assisting in business case development.
Collaborate with product management and development teams to support data-driven decisions for cloud platforms and products.
Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in data analysis, statistical modeling, and data mining.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, SQL, and experience with data visualization tools.
Knowledge of cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP) and experience with GitHub API integrations.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with attention to detail.
Familiarity with cloud security best practices and compliance standards such as NIST and FISMA.
Experience in cloud computing, scientific workflows, and automation.
Familiarity with Azure Active Directory (AD) and GitHub automation tools.
Experience in cloud enablement and workload migration for scientific computing environments.
Knowledge of federal security and compliance standards.

The projected compensation range for this position is $98,100 to $135,750 per year benchmarked in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. The target salary is 114,000. The salary range provided is a good faith estimate representative of all experience levels. Salary at LCG is determined by various factors, including but not limited to role, location, the combination of education/training, knowledge, skills, competencies, certifications, and work experience.
LCG offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance options (medical, dental, vision), life and disability insurance, retirement plan contributions, as well as paid leave, federal holidays, professional development, and lifestyle benefits.
Devoted to Fair and Inclusive Practices
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. If you are interested in applying for employment with LCG and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department by email at hr@lcginc.com.
Securing Your Data
Beware of fraudulent job offers using LCG's name. LCG will never request payment-related details or advancement of money during the application process. Legitimate communication will only come from lcginc.com or system@hirebridgemail.com emails, not free commercial services like Gmail or WhatsApp. If you receive suspicious emails asking for payment or personal information, contact us immediately at hr@lcginc.com.
If you believe you are the victim of a scam, contact your local law enforcement and report the incident to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.",3.8,"LCG, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1990.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,118.0,MD,34.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","We are searching for a Data Scientist – someone who works well in a fast-paced setting. In this position, you will harness the largest pediatric healthcare dataset in the nation to deliver analytics, insights, and solutions that help us create a healthier future for our global community.
The individual in this role delivers data analytics and supports the development and implementation of advanced analytic tools to meet the needs of teams throughout the organization. Works with a multidisciplinary team to design, develop, and create analytical solutions through applications of data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), and emerging technologies. Collaborates with clinical, business, and information systems team members to ideate and create new analytic solutions impacting patient care and hospital operations. Partners with subject matter experts to understand the relationship
between workflows and data and uses that data to create innovative solutions that support and advance targeted outcomes.
Exercises knowledge of descriptive, predictive, and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques, to develop strategic insights to drive operational and clinical goals.
Teaches developers, architects and analysts how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Provides data science and statistical support for advanced analytics projects at Texas Children's Hospital. Analyzes and interprets clinical, operational, and other data to provide insight into care delivery and operational initiatives. Responsible for evaluating data quality, preparing data, generating insights, and developing and presenting high-impact data stories. Serves as a subject matter expert associated with data analysis processes, advanced analytics techniques, statistics, and meaningful data visualizations. Provides consultation and support in the development, analysis, interpretation, and management of a
variety of complex data sources. Works on multiple concurrent projects.
Think you’ve got what it takes?
Job Duties & Responsibilities
Creates data models and generates data insights
Generates and communicates business and clinical insights, using various techniques and understanding the strengths and risks of different approaches to data analysis
Analyzes large, noisy datasets and identifies meaningful patterns that provide actionable results. Data sources may include the Enterprise Data Warehouse, various source systems and databases, and data from external sources such as the Census Bureau. Source data may include both structured and unstructured data
Evaluates and communicates data quality within the context of the problem being analyzed, and implements appropriate data cleaning techniques when preparing data
Performs basic and advanced statistical analyses, modeling, interpretation, documentation, and presentation
Builds and tests statistical, optimization, and machine learning models, including regression, classification, clustering, natural language processing, deep learning, and/or statistical modeling. Applies best practices for data preparation, statistical methods, and approaches to data analysis to ensure valid and reliable results
Independently owns descriptive, diagnostic analysis of complex data problems, consulting with data architects and subject matter experts as needed.
Designs, develops, and creates advanced analytical solutions
Communicates data insights and acts as a data storyteller by translating data analyses into easily understandable dialogue and terms to influence business decisions or actions.
Provides statistical consultation
Plans, communicates, and manages risk related to tasks
Participates in overall analytics and application support delivery activities
Skills & Requirements
Required master's degree in mathematics, computer science, statistics, engineering, analytics, life sciences, or a specific healthcare field (such as nursing, pharmacy, respiratory, etc.)
Preferred Ph. D
3 years of experience in experience in data science, data analytics, business analysis, data modeling, statistical analysis, statistical modeling, or machine learning
A Ph. D may substitute for 2 years of experience.",3.7,Texas Children's Hospital,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1954.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,TX,70.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Data Scientist, Growth","$175K
/yr","The Wealthfront Data Science Team utilizes our rich financial and behavioral data to influence key product and marketing decisions, as well as to safeguard our clients’ information and assets. The team draws from backgrounds in Computer Science, Natural Sciences, Statistics, Operations Research and Econometrics.

The Data Scientist in this role will be primarily embedded within Wealthfront’s Growth Team. The Growth Team is focused on acquiring new clients, as well as deepening Wealthfront’s relationship to existing clients. The team addresses this mandate by designing creative initiatives that cut across product lines. These initiatives can include testing new in-app features, discovering new channels of client acquisition, launching email campaigns, or targeted incentives – all based on unique insights about our clients and their interaction with the prevailing economic environment.

A fundamental trait for an effective Growth Data Scientist is curiosity for discovering new insights about client behavior. This person will enjoy going deep into the data to understand what’s driving client actions, proposing ideas for new projects and for driving clarity on the ‘why’ behind experiment results.

Technical tools used in this role include Hypothesis testing (potentially with atypical distributions), mathematical transforms of variables, data mining, natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML). You don't need experience in all of the techniques but must have the ability to pick them up as needed.

Potential project areas for this role include (but are not limited to) analyzing client signup flow, creating client groups according to business rules or automated clustering, creating ML models for estimating incentive revenues or costs and Named Entity Recognition using NLP.
Responsibilities
Demonstrate an owner’s mindset in formulation, execution, communication and timing of your projects.
Analyze and explain A/B test experiment results. Investigate why the experiment was a success or a failure. Discover client segments for whom the experiment worked unusually well or otherwise.
Suggest follow ups for recently concluded initiatives and experiments. Create and present rationales for questions including whether the experiment should be continued, and what should be different in the next iteration.
Work closely with Product, Design, Engineering and User Research members on the Growth Team to craft a long term (quarterly) learning plan and subsequently execute your part in that plan.
Collaborate with cross functional stakeholders to come up with feasibility of an experiment, experiment structure and opportunity sizing/impact of the experiment to guide the team’s roadmap.
Work with Data platform teams to procure required (but unavailable) data.
Enhance overall Data Science team execution through hands-on help, design feedback and peer review.
Requirements
A Master's or a PhD degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, or Natural Sciences with 4+ years of prior experience in a Data Science role. Exceptions to these requirements may be considered on a case-by-case basis.
Prior experience in Growth or Marketing
Prior experience analyzing complex experiments, including developing data insights and data backed recommendations for stakeholders.
Strong communication, storytelling and collaboration skills and a record of partnering across organizations to sharpen project requirements. Sometimes this includes re-framing the original request to solve a more general problem with similar effort.
Hands-on mathematical and software engineering skills to execute on complex projects.
Proficiency in Python and SQL.
Desire and ability to mentor junior Data Scientists within the team by exemplifying math, engineering and technical communication skills.
Estimated annual salary range: $165,000 - $185,000 USD plus equity and a discretionary bonus.

Benefits include medical, vision, dental, 401K plan, generous time off, parental leave, wellness reimbursements, professional development, employee investing discount, and more!

About Wealthfront

Wealthfront started with the ambition to transform the investment advisory business, with the goal to unlock access to high quality investment advice for millions who were underserved by the traditional institutions. We built one of the first automated investment products that allows you to invest in a personalized portfolio of thousands of companies in seconds for a remarkably low fee. We then expanded. We now work with partner banks to offer exceptional banking features through a Wealthfront Brokerage Cash Account, which makes it remarkably easy for people to automate their finances end-to-end and eliminated the hassle of money management, all of which resulted in attracting more than $70 billion of our client’s hard earned money, pioneering the robo-advisor category and transforming the broader industry. And yet, we have a long way to go to achieve our mission to build a financial system that favors people, not institutions.

Wealthfront’s vision is to make it delightfully easy to build long-term wealth on your own terms. This vision is more relevant than ever because millions more people are getting into the market early and investing their hard earned savings in a handful of stocks. While this is a great way to start, it is inconsistent with building long-term wealth. We want to empower young investors to expand their horizon, and easily explore and execute on a wider range of investing strategies, make informed investment decisions that are consistent with their values and beliefs while also making it effortless to grow and compound their savings exponentially in a way that’s transformational to their lives and their long-term future.

For more information please visit www.wealthfront.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Please review our candidate privacy notice.",4.1,Wealthfront,"Palo Alto, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,CA,13.0,1,0,0,1,0
DH Data Scientist,"$173K
/yr","Job Description:
Job Summary
The Data Scientist is responsible for maximizing the value of rich date resources available. This person will independently investigate and derive actionable insights to drive improvement for research and development and for clinical deployment of DeepHealth products.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Utilize statistics, data mining and programming knowledge to analyze clinical data and present insights to key stakeholders.
Identify patterns to drive improvement of research, product development and clinical deployment.
Generate and test hypotheses independently.
Investigate and improve data quality.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze product performance.
Summarize data in concise reports including tables, plots and other visual representations.
Document analysis for the engineering and clinical teams.

PLEASE NOTE: This is not an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities and requirements of the position described above. Other functions may be assigned and management retains the right to add or change duties at any time.

Minimum Qualifications, Education, and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in relevant field such as computer science, math, statistics, engineering (M.S. preferred).
At least two (2) years of experience (five plus (5+) years preferred).
Expertise in Python and scientific libraries such as numpy and pandas.
Expertise with data visualization techniques.
Experience working with medical data.
Experience evaluating machine learning models.
Experience evaluating clinical performance preferred.
Familiarity with machine learning techniques preferred.
Strong individual team contributor and collaborator.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.

Quality Standards
Communicates, cooperates, and consistently functions professionally and harmoniously with all levels of supervision, co-workers, patients, visitors, and vendors.
Demonstrates initiative, personal awareness, professionalism and integrity, and exercise confidentiality in all areas of performance.
Follows all local, state and federal laws concerning employment to include but not limited to: I-9, Harassment, EEOC, Civil rights and ADA.
Follows OSHA regulations, RadNet and site protocols, policies and procedures.
Follows HIPAA, compliance, privacy, safety and confidentiality standards at all times.
Practices universal safety precautions.
Promotes good public relations on the phone and in person.
Adapts and is willing to learn new tasks, methods, and systems.
Reports to work regularly as scheduled; consistently punctual with respect to working hours and lunch schedules, and maintains satisfactory personal attendance in accordance with RadNet guidelines.
Consistently adheres to the time management policies and procedures.
Completes job responsibilities in a quality and timely manner.

Physical Demands
This position often requires sitting, standing, walking, bending, twisting, reaching with hands and arms, using hands and fingers, handling, or feeling, speaking, listening, and high-level cognitive thinking. Must be able to use a computer and other office machinery including copiers, scanners and computer software. Must be able to lift up to 10 pounds occasionally. The position requires the ability to travel (~20% of time), drive a vehicle, and utilize other forms of transportation.

Working Environment
Office setting

Pay Range: USD $165,000.00 - USD $180,000.00 /Yr.",2.6,Deephealth,"Cambridge, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,173.0,MA,40.0,1,0,0,1,1
Wildfire Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills and talents to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.
Position Summary

We are seeking a highly skilled Data Scientist to join our team focused on innovative Wildfire Mitigation strategies. As a Data Scientist specializing in wildfire mitigation, you will play a crucial role in leveraging data-driven insights to develop and implement proactive measures to mitigate the impact of wildfires on communities and utility infrastructure. This position will analyze historical wildfire data, data on wildfire ignitions, data from vegetation management, and other relevant datasets to develop predictive models to assess wildfire risks and behavior to aid in prevention of wildfire events.
This is a hybrid position with 3-days per week (T-W-Th) in office at the Xcel Energy location listed for this position.
Applicants must be authorized to work for ANY employer in the U.S. We are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment visa at this time for this position.

Essential Responsibilities
Follow consistent practices to ensure data integrity and deal with imperfections in data. Champion the acquisition of new data sources to enhance value and fill gaps; automate collection processes; effectively process structured and semi-structured/unstructured data; proficiently integrate varied datasets; collaborate with business stakeholders as needed to ensure solid data understanding and proper data transformation; work cross-functionally with development and engineering teams; analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns; draw conclusions and gain actionable insights.
Build predictive models; propose solutions and strategies for business problems; apply the appropriate machine learning algorithm to data problems (e.g. supervised vs. unsupervised machine learning, clustering, ensemble methods, etc.); validate model results. Work closely with architecture and engineering team to deploy models; communicate results in a clear and non-technical manner.
Interact with senior management and effectively communicate technical information to numerous audiences (e.g. senior management, client community, peers and junior associates);effectively develop relationships with individuals inside and outside of IT; deliver difficult messages and express disagreement with others with confidence and self-control; address challenges to analytic processes and influence others to change their approach and work collectively to implement new tools/techniques; gain support from related stakeholders for analytic solutions and champion data driven business decisions.
Apply appropriate statistical techniques to data exploration and model development/assessment; communicate complex statistical concepts to non-technical audiences; maintain skills through continuing education.
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate results and highlight business impact; utilize various techniques and delivery methods of visualization that are audience appropriate.
Effectively collaborate with others to deliver efficient and high quality code; implement solid validation process to ensure consistency and minimize errors; champion more efficient ways to produce code iteratively; maintain skills through continuing education; stay up to date on new technologies/ tools; seamlessly transition between languages to apply the right approach to the problem.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT or math related field and 7 years of experience in analytics OR Master's degree in IT or math related field and 5 years of experience in an analytics
Problem solving skills, business acumen, and demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills
Expert SQL, Python skills Distributed Computing experience Excellent data visualization skills
Knowledge of data architecture and structure
Experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, predictive modeling are imperative; text mining and topic modeling are plus
Experience with Neural Networks and corresponding technologies
As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com.
Non-Bargaining
The anticipated starting base pay for this position is: $92,300.00 to $130,567.00 per year
This position is eligible for the following benefits: Annual Incentive Program, Medical/Pharmacy Plan, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Dependent Care Reimbursement Account, Health Care Reimbursement Account, Health Savings Account (HSA) (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Limited-Purpose FSA (if enrolled in eligible health plan and HSA), Transportation Reimbursement Account, Short-term disability (STD), Long-term disability (LTD), Employee Assistance Program (EAP), Fitness Center Reimbursement (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Tuition reimbursement, Transit programs, Employee recognition program, Pension, 401(k) plan, Paid time off (PTO), Holidays, Volunteer Paid Time Off (VPTO), Parental Leave
Benefit plans are subject to change and Xcel Energy has the right to end, suspend, or amend any of its plans, at any time, in whole or in part.
Deadline to Apply: 10/24/24
EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)
ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.",3.3,Xcel Energy,"Denver, CO",10000+ Employees,1909.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,111.0,CO,115.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","As a Data Scientist with a focus on machine learning, you will be responsible for developing and deploying data models that provide critical insights to drive data-driven decision-making across the organization. You'll work with large datasets to build predictive and prescriptive models, evaluate their performance, and collaborate with cross-functional teams to implement these models into business processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection, Cleaning, and Preparation:
Source and collect large datasets from multiple sources, ensuring high data quality.
Perform data preprocessing, including cleaning, normalization, transformation, and feature engineering, to prepare data for machine learning models.
Manage data pipelines and ensure efficient data flow for real-time analysis.
Model Development and Deployment:
Design, develop, and validate machine learning models for classification, regression, clustering, and recommendation systems.
Deploy machine learning models in production environments, ensuring they operate efficiently and scale as needed.
Continuously monitor, test, and update models in production to maintain optimal performance.
Machine Learning Techniques and Analysis:
Apply machine learning algorithms, including supervised and unsupervised learning techniques, to solve complex business problems.
Conduct A/B testing, cross-validation, and hyperparameter tuning to optimize models for accuracy and generalizability.
Leverage advanced techniques such as deep learning, reinforcement learning, or natural language processing when appropriate.
Visualization and Communication:
Visualize complex data and model outcomes using data visualization tools like Matplotlib, Seaborn, and Tableau to effectively communicate insights.
Present findings and actionable insights to non-technical stakeholders through clear, concise reports and presentations.
Collaborate with product managers, engineers, and business analysts to translate data insights into strategic initiatives.
Project Management and Cross-Functional Collaboration:
Lead data science projects from concept to completion, managing timelines, objectives, and deliverables.
Work closely with data engineers to maintain data infrastructure and optimize data processing workflows.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business goals and ensure that data science efforts are aligned with organizational objectives.
Continuous Learning and Development:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in data science and machine learning, and experiment with new tools and techniques.
Share knowledge and best practices with the data science team, contributing to the team's growth and development.
Attend conferences, workshops, and other professional development opportunities to enhance skills and knowledge.
Key Skills and Qualifications:
Technical Skills:
Programming Languages: Proficiency in Python or R, with strong knowledge of libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and Scikit-learn for data manipulation and model building.
Machine Learning Frameworks: Experience with TensorFlow, PyTorch, or Keras for building and deploying machine learning models.
Big Data Technologies: Familiarity with tools like Apache Spark, Hadoop, or Dask for processing and analyzing large datasets.
SQL: Ability to write complex SQL queries to extract, transform, and load data from relational databases.
Machine Learning Knowledge:
Supervised Learning: Experience with classification, regression, and time-series forecasting models.
Unsupervised Learning: Knowledge of clustering, principal component analysis (PCA), and anomaly detection.
Deep Learning: Understanding of neural networks and deep learning architectures for tasks such as image and speech recognition.
NLP: Familiarity with natural language processing techniques, such as topic modeling, sentiment analysis, and text classification.
Data Visualization:
Proficiency in data visualization tools, such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, Plotly, or Power BI, to create compelling visualizations of data and model results.
Experience with dashboarding tools, like Tableau or Power BI, to create interactive reports and dashboards.
Statistical and Mathematical Skills:
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, hypothesis testing, and probability.
Knowledge of linear algebra, calculus, and optimization methods commonly used in machine learning.
Soft Skills:
Problem-Solving: Ability to analyze complex problems and develop data-driven solutions.
Communication: Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to present technical information to non-technical stakeholders.
Collaboration: Experience working in cross-functional teams, with the ability to build strong relationships with team members across the organization.
Education and Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field. A Ph.D. is a plus.
Experience: 2+ years of experience in data science, with a focus on building and deploying machine learning models in a business setting.
Portfolio: A portfolio of completed projects demonstrating experience in machine learning, with examples of model development, deployment, and impact on business outcomes.
Example Projects:
Predictive Analytics: Developed a model to predict customer churn, enabling the company to implement targeted retention strategies.
Recommendation System: Built a recommendation engine for personalized product recommendations, which increased customer engagement.
Sentiment Analysis: Implemented a sentiment analysis model for customer feedback, helping the marketing team to understand customer sentiment and adjust campaigns accordingly.
Anomaly Detection: Created an anomaly detection model for fraud detection, reducing fraudulent transactions by identifying patterns in real-time.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $118,635.00 - $128,216.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Natural language processing: 1 year (Required)
Machine learning: 1 year (Required)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
Regression analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work Location: On the road",1.0,KesarWeb,United States,1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,123.0,United States,,1,0,1,0,1
"Data Scientist I, Lega Lab","$94K
/yr","WHY UT SOUTHWESTERN?
With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. As a world-renowned medical and research center, we strive to provide the best possible care, resources, and benefits for our valued employees. Ranked as the number 1 hospital in Dallas-Fort Worth according to U.S. News & World Report , we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development to align with your future goals. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more. We invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you'll discover a culture of teamwork, professionalism, and a rewarding career!

JOB SUMMARY
Works under specific direction to provide analysis and develops algorithms and software for clinical and/or basic research problems. Impacts data acquisition, management, and analysis in basic, translational, and clinical research, including clinical trials.

A Data Scientist I position is available in the Dr. Bradley Lega laboratory. Dr. Lega is an Associate Professor in the Department of Neurological Surgery at UT Southwestern Medical Center. He has secondary appointments in Neurology and Psychiatry. Dr. Lega's research focuses on how brain conditions affect memory. The research he began at the University of Pennsylvania, and that he continues at UT Southwestern, focuses on preserving memory function and restoring memory to patients with brain injuries or brain tumors.

This candidate will support study efforts studying intercranial Signal and data analysis for a new project. Prefer Master's degree or PHD in computational field. Candidate will need to be organized and have the ability to collaborate with trainees including undergraduate, graduate, medical students, as well as post-doctoral fellows and co-workers.

BENEFITS
UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:

PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage

100% coverage for preventive healthcare-no copay

Paid Time Off, available day one

Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)

Paid Parental Leave Benefit

Wellness programs

Tuition Reimbursement

Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer

Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!

EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATION
Required

Education
Master's Degree M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field or
Bachelor's Degree B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics

Experience

JOB DUTIES

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.

SECURITY AND EEO STATEMENT
Security
This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code 51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information.

EEO Statement
UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. Benefits UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:
PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage
100% coverage for preventive healthcare – no copay
Paid Time Off, available day one
Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)
Paid Parental Leave Benefit
Wellness programs
Tuition Reimbursement
Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer
Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!",3.9,UT Southwestern,"Dallas, TX",10000+ Employees,1943.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,94.0,TX,81.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","The Group:
Morningstar’s Research group provides independent analysis on individual securities, funds, markets, and portfolios. The Research group also provides data on hundreds of thousands of investment offerings, including stocks, mutual funds, and similar vehicles, along with real-time global market data on millions of equities, indexes, futures, options, commodities, and precious metals, in addition to foreign exchange and Treasury markets. Morningstar is one of the largest independent sources of fund, equity, and credit data and research in the world, and our advocacy for investors’ interests is the foundation of our company.

The Role:
As a Data Scientist, you will be a leading contributor in the implementation of Artificial Intelligence (AI) within Data Collections software applications, API’s, and other data products. This role requires significant interaction with both upstream and downstream stakeholders across Technology, Data, Products, Sales/Service, and Research.

The Data Scientist will transition approved Data Collections AI products from a prototype phase to a scalable and consumable service. Often, these services must be integrated into Morningstar’s platform of financial products, so that our clients can use these software tools in the investment decision-making process.

We are looking for an individual who possesses strong technical development skills, an ability to follow analyst requirements and technical specifications for robust code, and a passion for investment research.

This position reports to the Tech Manager of the Data Collections AI team. This position is based in our Chicago office. We follow a hybrid policy of 3 days onsite and 2 days remote work. Candidates must be currently authorized to work Permanently in the United States - this position does not sponsor H-1B Visa.

Responsibilities:
Automate manual data collection processes by applying cutting-edge solutions to tackle NLP problems, e.g., text classification, NER tasks.
Collaborate with upstream data analysts to clarify business needs, define project scope, design ML/AI solutions, and iteratively improve workflows and data storage practices
Implement ML/AI solutions from start to finish and collaborate with peer engineering teams for model deployment
Design innovative ways to improve automation rates for data collection
Research on latest technologies and propose new solutions to existing problems
Participate in team brainstorming sessions, provide guidance to MLDAs (machine learning data analysts), and contribute to the codebase
Introduce and follow good development practices, innovative frameworks and technology solutions
Follow best practices like estimation, planning, reporting and improvement brought to processes in daily work

Requirements:
No minimal industrial experience is required, if you have a Ph.D. degree in engineering, computer science, statistics or related field
Must demonstrate ML/AI knowledge and skills through research and/or side-projects in NLP related fields, if you have no prior industrial experience
Must have 2+ years of industrial experience in a data science role featuring NLP tasks, if you have a master’s degree or below
Fluent with Python and related packages like NumPy, pandas, scikit-learn, NLTK, PyTorch, TensorFlow, etc.
Sound knowledge of common ML/AI algorithms (e.g., linear/logistic regression, random forest, gradient boosting) and Deep Learning algorithms in particular (e.g., transformers, BERT, open-source LLMs)
Experience with SQL
Great communication and presentation skills
Able to work independently and being proactive
Experience with generative AI is preferred
Experience with finetuning LLMs is preferred
Experience with DevOps tools (e.g. Sagemaker, Git, Jenkins) is desirable
Experience developing and deploying solutions using services in the Amazon AWS ecosystem (Lambda, Sagemaker, EC2, RDS, EMR) is desirable
Intermediate knowledge of statistical methods is desirable
Familiarity with common data cleaning and munging techniques
Familiarity with data visualization
Familiarity with statistical methods, e.g., linear/logistic regression, optimization
Familiarity with mutual fund, fixed income, and equity data is a plus

001_MstarInc Morningstar Inc. Legal Entity
Morningstar’s hybrid work environment gives you the opportunity to work remotely and collaborate in-person each week. We’ve found that we’re at our best when we’re purposely together on a regular basis, at least three days each week. A range of other benefits are also available to enhance flexibility as needs change. No matter where you are, you’ll have tools and resources to engage meaningfully with your global colleagues.",3.9,Morningstar,"Chicago, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,IL,40.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$108K
/yr","Feedzai is the world's first RiskOps platform for financial risk management, and the market leader in safeguarding global commerce with today's most advanced cloud-based risk management platform, powered by machine learning and artificial intelligence. Feedzai is securing the transition to a cashless world while enabling digital trust in every transaction and payment type. The world's largest banks, processors, and retailers trust Feedzai to protect trillions of dollars and manage risk while improving the customer experience for everyday users, without compromising privacy. Feedzai is a Series D company and has raised $282M to date. With a valuation of +$1.5B, the company's technology protects 900 million people in 190 countries.
The Data Science Team within Customer Success is highly engaged with our clients making use of their critical thinking skills with a business-focused mentality and customer-facing attitude. They activate, maintain, and support clients, develop models and rules, and train & enable them. In addition, they work cross-functionally with other departments (e.g., Research, Product, Marketing) in a collaborative team spirit spanning the globe to ensure we deliver best in class risk prevention solutions. Being on the frontline of fighting crime and protecting people from financial harm is incredibly inspiring to each of us. Join Us!
Your Day to Day:
Understanding the data which our clients provide to us;
Cleaning that data and validating that it is correct;
Preprocessing the data, usually by using a mixture of shell scripts and a programming language such as Python, Java, Scala, etc
Iteratively computing features and tuning parameters to improve the quality of the model;
Communicating your findings to the project manager and assisting him/her in decision making on the Data Science part of the project;
Work together with key stakeholders (data scientists, engineers, risk managers) from our clients;
Work with other parts of the organization (Product, Research, etc.) to improve processes, best practices and tooling.
You Have & You Know-how:
MSc or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related field;
We welcome candidates with a minimum of 2 years of experience, ranging up to senior-level professionals;
Proficient in Machine Learning (training and testing, avoiding overfit, etc.);
Knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Spark, Hadoop and related;
Proficiency in bash, Python and either Java or Scala;
Knowledge of resource monitoring and runtime optimization (both at JVM and OS level);
Knowledge of statistics or data visualization is a plus;
Knowledge of tree based algorithms (Random Forests, XGBoost, LGBM) is a plus;
Knowledge of Deep Learning algorithms is a plus;
Ability to communicate your findings in a clear way.
The Customer Success Team is responsible for delivering our product to our clients. This includes education, configuration, solution development, and risk strategy to enable our clients to address their pain points. We collaborate with our clients to ensure they have the right solution, build out a strategy and training plan for them, and then support them through each phase of our client lifecycle. We grow at a fast clip and believe no challenge is too big or too small. Therefore, we have an open environment that encourages us to lean in, try new things, and discover our potential. Join Us!
#LI-IP1 #LI-Hybrid
Your First 30-Days at Feedzai:
You will be immersed in our brand with training, connections, and one-on-one time with your manager. You may shadow your colleagues virtually or onsite at an office depending on where you work as you are supported through your Feedzai journey. In addition, you will have access to a ton of information to give you history, context, and all the knowledge you can handle about Feedzai and the team. Finally, you will start working on projects and collaborating on work currently being done. We can't wait to have you join the team!
Life at Feedzai Instagram
Feedzai Culture
Feedzai is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Feedzai does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies.
Feedzai will use the personal data you provide us with by filling out this form for reviewing your application and to potentially negotiate a contract with you. Your personal data will be retained by Feedzai for 24 months following your application. Please see our Privacy Notice available at https://feedzai.com/about-us/privacy/ for more information on how we process your personal data.",3.1,Feedzai,"Atlanta, GA",501 to 1000 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,108.0,GA,13.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$127K
/yr","Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.
Micron Technology is a world leader in innovating memory and storage solutions that accelerate the transformation of information into intelligence, inspiring the world to learn, communicate and advance faster than ever.
As a Data Scientist at Micron Technologies, you will play a crucial role in analyzing and extracting valuable insights from large datasets related to semiconductor manufacturing, process optimization, and quality control. You'll collaborate with multi-functional teams to develop innovative solutions that improve product performance, yield, and reliability.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Data Analysis: Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) on semiconductor manufacturing data, including wafer fabrication, yield, and defect rates.
Model Development: Develop predictive models using machine learning techniques (such as regression, classification, and clustering) to optimize manufacturing processes and improve product quality.
Feature Engineering: Extract relevant features from raw data, considering factors like material properties, process parameters, and environmental conditions.
Anomaly Detection: Identify anomalies and outliers in semiconductor production data, suggesting corrective actions to improve yield.
Collaboration: Work closely with engineers, physicists, and domain experts to understand semiconductor processes and translate business requirements into data-driven solutions.
Visualization: Build clear and informative visualizations to communicate findings and insights to collaborators.
Continuous Improvement: Stay up to date with industry trends, research advancements, and emerging technologies in data science and semiconductor manufacturing.
QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
Master’s or Ph.D. in Data Analytics, Data Science, or related field with practical experience with Virtual Metrology, AI, process control, yield improvement, quality control, semiconductor process engineering, image analytics, or related semiconductor field focus.
EXPERIENCE
Prior experience in semiconductor manufacturing, yield optimization, or process control is highly desirable.
Technical Skills:
Proficiency in Python,
Strong knowledge of machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques.
Familiarity with web application and reporting, Experience with SQL and database management
Technologies:
ML frameworks: Decision trees, Clustering, Regression, Neural Networks, NLP, Pytorch, Big Data, Tensorflow, Pandas, Streamlit
Tools and technologies:
Docker, Containerization, Kubernetes, Jenkins, Ansible, Elasticsearch, SSL, Microservices, data visualization tools (e.g., Streamlit, Tableau, PowerBI, etc.).
Cloud expertise:
Google Cloud Platform, OpenShift Container Platform
AI Skills:
AI specialization and Virtual Metrology/Modeling/Computation:
Python library sklearn, xgboost, pycaret, etc. with the ability to learn any new package.
Knowledgeable with the general process of data science work like data extraction, feature extraction, feature selection and modeling.
Familiar with the skills to deal with time series data (feature extraction, modelling, similarity measure of time series).
Image specialization:
Familiar with deep learning network CNN and package keras.
Frontend:
Languages: HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Typescript
Frameworks/Libraries: Angular, HighCharts, Plotly, AG Grid, BootStrap, Ngx Bootstrap, RxJS
Packaging: npm, Jenkins
Backend/API:
Languages: Python,
Preferred, but not required: Java, C#, PHP, Perl, C++
Frameworks: Flask, FastAPI, Experience with RESTful APIs, Minor experience with WSLs
Databases: MySQL, MSSQL, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, BigQuery SQL, Snowflake SQL, basic understanding of SSL
Tools:
Git, Bitbucket
Soft Skills:
Analytical approach and problem-solving abilities.
Strong communication skills to work effectively with teams from various functions.
Adaptability and willingness to learn new technologies and methodologies.
Project Skills:
AGILE, Waterfall, Scrum, Software Development Lifecycle, JIRA, Change management, Release management, Configuration management
Schedule: Ability to conduct and/or attend meetings when needed in the evening.
As a world leader in the semiconductor industry, Micron is dedicated to your personal wellbeing and professional growth. Micron benefits are designed to help you stay well, provide peace of mind and help you prepare for the future. We offer a choice of medical, dental and vision plans in all locations enabling team members to select the plans that best meet their family healthcare needs and budget. Micron also provides benefit programs that help protect your income if you are unable to work due to illness or injury, and paid family leave. Additionally, Micron benefits include a robust paid time-off program and paid holidays. For additional information regarding the Benefit programs available, please see the Benefits Guide posted on micron.com/careers/benefits.
Micron is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other factor protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws.
To learn about your right to work click here.
To learn more about Micron, please visit micron.com/careers
For US Sites Only: To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact Micron’s People Organization at hrsupport_na@micron.com or 1-800-336-8918 (select option #3)
Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.
Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron.",3.8,Micron,"Manassas, VA",10000+ Employees,1978.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,127.0,VA,46.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The CDC Foundation helps the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) save and improve lives by unleashing the power of collaboration between CDC, philanthropies, corporations, organizations and individuals to protect the health, safety and security of America and the world. The CDC Foundation is the go-to nonprofit authorized by Congress to mobilize philanthropic partners and private-sector resources to support CDC’s critical health protection mission. Since 1995, the CDC Foundation has raised over $1.9 billion and launched more than 1,300 programs impacting a variety of health threats from chronic disease conditions including cardiovascular disease and cancer, to infectious diseases like rotavirus and HIV, to emergency responses, including COVID-19 and Ebola. The CDC Foundation managed hundreds of programs in the United States and in more than 90 countries last year. Visit www.cdcfoundation.org for more information.

Job Highlights
Location: Remote, must be based in the United States
Salary Range: $92,700-$134,275 per year, plus benefits. Individual salary offers will be based on experience and qualifications unique to each candidate.
Position Type: Grant funded, limited-term opportunity
Position End Date: June 30, 2025
Overview
The Data Scientist will play a crucial role in advancing the CDC Foundation's mission by providing informatics expertise and performing health informatics activities for a public health organization, which require specialized knowledge and skills in both health and information technology, including health informatics, scientific analysis, data management, and security standards. This role is aligned to the Workforce Acceleration Initiative (WAI). WAI is a federally funded CDC Foundation program with the goal of helping the nation’s public health agencies by providing them with the technology and data experts they need to accelerate their information system improvements.

Working within North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office, the Data Scientist will plan and manage the development, implementation, and maintenance of data systems and informatics processes needed for data generation, storage, processing, and analysis. The Data Scientist will collaborate with data content experts, analysts, data scientists, data modelers, warehouse architects, IT staff and other organization staff to design and implement proposed solutions that meet the needs of the public health agency.

The Data Scientist will be hired by the CDC Foundation and assigned to the North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office. This position is eligible for a fully remote work arrangement for U.S. based candidates.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, select, test, implement, and evaluate new or modified informatics solutions, data structures, and decision-support mechanisms to support agency information management needs within various contexts.
Create and manage the systems and pipelines that enable efficient and reliable flow of data, including ingestion, processing, and storage.
Create new and update existing health integration engine (Rhapsody) routes to handle new data elements and formats creating the necessary output for upload into surveillance systems and databases as well as reporting to the CDC.
Develop, implement, and improve data analysis and visualization tools for use by organization staff, to provide timely, relevant information that informs decisions affecting the public’s health.
Analyze diverse datasets related to public health issues to identify trends, patterns, and correlations.
Apply statistical methods and machine learning algorithms to extract actionable insights.
Develop predictive models to anticipate disease patterns, assess risk factors, and guide intervention strategies.
Continuously optimize algorithms for enhanced accuracy and performance.
Create compelling visualizations and reports to communicate findings to partners and decision-makers.
Present data-driven insights in a clear and understandable manner to facilitate informed decision-making.
Collaborate with the public health organization and its partners to understand their data needs and objectives.
Provide data-driven support and guidance to inform public health policies and initiatives.
Knowledgeable about industry trends, best practices, and emerging technologies in informatics and data management, and incorporating the trends into the organization's data infrastructure.
Provide technical guidance to other staff.
Prepare and maintain system documentation and architecture diagrams for processes assigned (new and existing).
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Informatics, Computer Science, Information Technology, Data Science, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of relevant professional experience
Proficiency in programming languages commonly used in data engineering, such as Python, Java, Scala, or SQL. Candidate should be able to implement data automations within existing frameworks as opposed to writing one off scripts.
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Scikit-learn).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Strong analytical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to interpret complex datasets and derive meaningful insights.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Expertise with Rhapsody Integration Engine (Rhapsody Certification or ability to obtain certification preferred)
Experience with multiple health data types (i.e. HL7, ELR, eCR, FHIR)
Solid understanding of API-based architectures (including FHIR)
Ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical partners effectively.
Flexibility to adapt to evolving project requirements and priorities.
Professional certifications in data science, machine learning, or public health analytics preferred.
Outstanding interpersonal and teamwork skills; collegial; energetic; and able to develop productive relationships with colleagues, partners, and partners.
Demonstrated ability to work well independently and within teams
Experience working in a virtual environment with remote partners and teams
Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Special Notes
This role is involved in a dynamic public health program. As such, roles and responsibilities are subject to change as situations evolve. Roles and responsibilities listed above may be expanded upon or updated to match priorities and needs, once written approval is received by the CDC Foundation in order to best support the public health programming.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status, and all other characteristics protected by law.

We comply with all applicable laws including E.O. 11246 and the Vietnam Era Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 governing employment practices and do not discriminate on the basis of any unlawful criteria in accordance with 41 C.F.R. §§ 60-300.5(a)(12) and 60-741.5(a)(7). As a federal government contractor, we take affirmative action on behalf of protected veterans.

The CDC Foundation is a smoke-free environment.
Relocation expenses are not included.",4.3,CDC Foundation,North Dakota,1001 to 5000 Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,113.0,North Dakota,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Details
Position Details
Job Title
Data Scientist

Position Number
8150736

Job Category
University Staff

Job Type
Full-Time

FLSA Status
Exempt

Campus
Maywood-Health Sciences Campus

Department Name
PHYSIOLOGY

Location Code
PHYSIOLOGY (06240A)

Is this split and/or fully grant funded?
Yes

Duties and Responsibilities
The Data Scientist will perform detailed analyses of large bodies of heterogeneous omics and clinical data to discover new patterns and insights that impact patient health or augment human capabilities. The Data Scientist should have deep expertise in the methods used to analyze data and deep knowledge of data types, topics, and scientific challenges and approaches that will be used to help inform and define new products, experiences, and technologies. This position works in conjunction with basic and clinical scientists to create intelligence-driven systems to solve complex translational problems.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Participates in multidisciplinary teams to design, develop, and recommend new approaches for data-driven decision-making.
Leads discovery processes on pioneering Artificial Intelligence (“AI"")/Machine Learning (“ML”) based approaches to solve complex data problems across a variety of domains.
Provides strategic direction regarding data science and AI.
Guides and educates basic science and clinical teams to provide unbiased and accurate information, analysis, consultation, and recommendations to support strategic and operational data science initiatives.
Develops analytics tools that can be used by other staff with non-technical expertise.
Supports scientific projects under the supervision of the principal investigator.
Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis.


Minimum Education and/or Work Experience
Bachelor’s degree in related field required

Qualifications
BS, the position would not necessarily require a PhD, as considerable experience in the field would be acceptable.

Certificates/Credentials/Licenses
N/A

Computer Skills
Office Suite skills, AI/Machine Learning based approaches. Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Required operation of university owned vehicles
No

Does this position require direct animal or patient contact?
No

Physical Demands
None

Working Conditions
None

Open Date
10/01/2024

Close Date

Special Instructions to Applicants

Diversity and Inclusion Statement
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion

As one of the nation’s largest Jesuit, Catholic universities, Loyola University Chicago fosters a transformative cultural experience that honors diversity, equity, and inclusion. We are committed to not only recruiting, but also retaining a diverse, mission driven workforce and enabling a culture of inclusiveness in an environment that values service excellence, stewardship, personal well-being, and professional development for all of our employees. Loyola University Chicago supports its staff and faculty with a wide array of affordable, comprehensive and competitive benefits centered on health and wellness, financial security, equity, and work-life balance. We actively seek those who wish to join our faculty, staff, and students in a community of diverse opinions, perspectives, and backgrounds supporting our Jesuit mission and striving toward the same goal of being persons for and with others.


Quick Link for Posting
https://www.careers.luc.edu/postings/29300",3.8,Loyola University Chicago,"Maywood, IL",1001 to 5000 Employees,1870.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,105.0,IL,154.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$175K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 4 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 2 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$145,000/year to $204,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,175.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$93K
/yr","Job Overview:
Graham Tech is seeking a skilled and experienced Data Scientist to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing a set of techniques and analytics applications that transform raw data into meaningful insights, supporting strategic decision-making processes. This role will require proficiency in data-oriented programming languages, visualization software, and a deep understanding of data mining, data modeling, natural language processing, and machine learning.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement data-driven techniques and analytics applications to transform raw data into actionable insights.
Apply advanced data mining, data modeling, natural language processing (NLP), and machine learning (ML) techniques to extract and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets.
Visualize data findings using cutting-edge visualization tools, ensuring that data is presented clearly and effectively to stakeholders.
Interpret and report data analysis results, providing insights to inform decision-making processes.
Create and maintain dynamic data reports that offer real-time insights for business needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and implement strategies that leverage data analysis to solve complex business challenges.
Work independently to perform all functional duties and responsibilities in a fast-paced, results-driven environment.
Requirements:
Experience: 3-10 years of experience in data science, analytics, or a related field.
Education: BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field.
Technical Skills: Proficiency in data-oriented programming languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL) and visualization software (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, D3.js).
Strong expertise in data mining, data modeling, NLP, and ML techniques.
Experience working with large datasets, both structured and unstructured.
Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI (Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information) clearance required.
Additional Qualifications:
Strong analytical, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to present technical findings to non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to work independently and manage multiple projects in a high-pressure environment.
Compensation:
At Graham Technologies, we believe in treating every person the way we want to be treated - fairly. Our compensation package ensures everyone at Graham Technologies is given equal pay for equal work - regardless of race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, disability, religion, age, nationality, or even negotiation skills!
Most IT companies can probably offer many of the same services, but what sets us apart from the others is truly our people! We care about our employees and show it often with sincere appreciation and acknowledgment of not only the final work products but also the little steps taken along the way! In addition, our generous benefits package helps our team members live well and prosper.
Here are just a few highlights:
Four Week's Accrued PTO First Year
Ten Paid Federal Holidays
Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
401(k) Plan with Annual Employer Contributions
Flexible Schedules
Reimbursements for Continued Education and Training

Why Graham Technologies?
Our Core Values say it all!
Value our Customers
Care about our Employees
Passionate about Innovation
Believe in a Strong Work Ethic
Rely on Teamwork
Integrity Matters

Founded in 2007, GTech is a consulting services firm zealous about providing the best solutions to address our client's needs and maximize the value of their investments. One way we do this is by providing exceptional employees for our clients-whose range of expertise expands the entire IT industry! We've cultivated a family of individuals where integrity, commitment, and reliability are etched into the heart of our delivery teams.
In addition, we are equally zealous about caring for our employees - the lifeblood of our business! We've purposefully created a culture that is friendly, family-oriented, and all-inclusive. Our team members are encouraged to ""have a life,"" both in and out of the office, through flexible schedules (where available), continuing education, and support to pursue their passions!",4.4,Graham Technologies,"Tampa, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,93.0,FL,17.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist III, Analytics","$179K
/yr","Expedia Group brands power global travel for everyone, everywhere. We design cutting-edge tech to make travel smoother and more memorable, and we create groundbreaking solutions for our partners. Our diverse, vibrant, and welcoming community is essential in driving our success.
Why Join Us?
To shape the future of travel, people must come first. Guided by our Values and Leadership Agreements, we foster an open culture where everyone belongs, differences are celebrated and know that when one of us wins, we all win.
We provide a full benefits package, including exciting travel perks, generous time-off, parental leave, a global hybrid work setup (with some pretty cool offices), and career development resources, all to fuel our employees' passion for travel and ensure a rewarding career journey. We’re building a more open world. Join us.
Data Scientist III, Analytics
Are you excited by the opportunity to pioneer the future of travel? Do you want to redefine the way people plan, search for, and book their travel? At Expedia Group, we believe that travel brings the world together, and we are passionate about the endless possibilities.
The InsurTech team at Expedia is responsible for managing the InsurTech P&L and driving its strategy and business development efforts across the Expedia Group globally. We deliver millions of dollars of incremental revenue making a direct and meaningful impact to the company's bottom-line. At the same time, we increase customers’ confidence to book travel and make difference in their lives.
Introduction to team
This role is an excellent opportunity to join the InsurTech Analytics Team where we are passionate about delivering outstanding user experience! We power and deliver product analytics, user behavior analysis, experimentation, and visualization services that enable highly tailored and optimized experiences using the scientific methods and applied insights. We’re looking for a highly motivated individual to join our team to help us formulate business strategy and to deliver impactful analytics insights. If you enjoy using data to build business cases, solve business problems, improve ongoing business activities, and to work on a team that functions as the “business owner” you will fit right in. In this role, you will use your analytical and business skills to inspire product, engineering, finance and customer support, and our strategic partners to prioritize, implement and scale our product ideas
In this role, you will:
Provide strategic analysis and insights for the InsurTech business, while actively looking for opportunities to grow the business
Own end to end process in evaluating A/B or multivariate tests to improve learning; proactively uncover opportunities and recommend new features for test and learn; evaluate and apply alternative methods to supplement randomized testing
Performs advanced statistical analyses on experimental data to identify trends and derive actionable insights
Apply your expertise in data modeling, quantitative analysis, data mining, data visualization with a goal of improving customer experience and business results with a religious focus on impactful analytics, steward product team to drive insights
A high performing individual contributor who consistently applies and enhances the analytics capabilities, best practices and processes to solve complex business issues and identify opportunities
Function independently, assessing existing and upcoming business needs
Works with data engineers to ensure best practices are implemented through experimentation platform
Effectively communicates statistical findings and insights to stakeholders and collaborate with product development teams to integrate statistical insights into decision-making
Experience and qualifications:
Bachelor's, Masters or PhD degree in Mathematics, Science, Statistics, Engineering or 5+ years’ data analytics experience in a business context
Strong analytical/modeling skills with ability to convert raw data into measurable insights
Able to structure / work on data exploration problems, with innovative ways and solutions, bringing to bear strong reporting and data visualization skills
Strong hands-on experience in SQL
Proficient in building data visualizations (Tableau, Looker, etc.)
Intermediate (or better) knowledge of Statistics
Experience with R, python, or other coding language a plus
Experience with web analytics tools such as Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics a plus
Experience in modeling selection, building and evaluation
The total cash range for this position in Seattle is $137,500.00 to $192,500.00. Employees in this role have the potential to increase their pay up to $220,000.00, which is the top of the range, based on ongoing, demonstrated, and sustained performance in the role.
Starting pay for this role will vary based on multiple factors, including location, available budget, and an individual’s knowledge, skills, and experience. Pay ranges may be modified in the future.
Accommodation requests
If you need assistance with any part of the application or recruiting process due to a disability, or other physical or mental health conditions, please reach out to our Recruiting Accommodations Team through the Accommodation Request.
We are proud to be named as a Best Place to Work on Glassdoor in 2024 and be recognized for award-winning culture by organizations like Forbes, TIME, Disability:IN, and others.
Expedia Group's family of brands includes: Brand Expedia®, Hotels.com®, Expedia® Partner Solutions, Vrbo®, trivago®, Orbitz®, Travelocity®, Hotwire®, Wotif®, ebookers®, CheapTickets®, Expedia Group™ Media Solutions, Expedia Local Expert®, CarRentals.com™, and Expedia Cruises™. © 2024 Expedia, Inc. All rights reserved. Trademarks and logos are the property of their respective owners. CST: 2029030-50
Employment opportunities and job offers at Expedia Group will always come from Expedia Group’s Talent Acquisition and hiring teams. Never provide sensitive, personal information to someone unless you’re confident who the recipient is. Expedia Group does not extend job offers via email or any other messaging tools to individuals with whom we have not made prior contact. Our email domain is @expediagroup.com. The official website to find and apply for job openings at Expedia Group is careers.expediagroup.com/jobs.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. This employer participates in E-Verify. The employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.8,Expedia Partner Solutions,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1996.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,179.0,WA,28.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist / Data Resource Analyst II,"$78K
/yr","International Studies and Programs (ISP) supports MSU global learning and international engagement under the MSU Strategic Plan 2030 in the areas of research, teaching, and outreach. To fulfill its main objectives, ISP communicates key international data to university leadership and the public and serve as a campus-wide analytical resource. ISP manages MSU’s International Data Portals, which provide visualizations of MSU's Externally Funded International Projects, International Student Enrollment, Education Abroad, International Agreements Data, and International Research Collaboration. These dashboards utilize Tableau, Tableau Prep, and SQL Oracle to draw from MSU’s electronic data warehouse (EDW). International Studies and Programs (ISP) collaborates with units across campus to streamline and upgrade the international data plan.
ISP is seeking a Data Scientist who is curious, creative, and can see both the big picture and work with attention to detail. The successful candidate will have strong technical, interpersonal and communication skills to convey findings to various audiences and positively influence university leadership. The Data Scientist will need to articulate complex issues to a non-technical audience clearly and effectively. Daily activities may include development of data representations and visualizations, advising on predictive models and creating easy to understand reports and dashboards. This will be a full-time (100% FTE) 12-month fixed-term position funded for one year with the possibility of reappointments depending on funding and performance.
ISP is currently operating under a hybrid modality structure, with staff working three days in person and two days remote. ISP values individual and group differences and encourages applicants who will contribute to a culture of inclusion on campus.
Primary responsibilities include:
Data Analysis and Reporting
Analyze, interpret, summarize, and present data and findings in a clear, comprehensive, and effective manner
Conduct internal and external benchmarking analysis for ISP
Develop and design reports and dashboards in Tableau
Support Data-Driven Decision Making
Consult with and support ISP leadership and units by pulling and analyzing data
With ISP leadership, collaborate with other campus units on communicating, building, and evaluating data tools and streamlining data reporting
Provide analysis and decision support for university international initiatives, projects, and planning as needed
Provide training/capacity development support for ISP units in various data-related topics
Represent ISP on university-wide data-related committees
Keep apprised of trends and conversations about data in higher education and international education
Database Management and Development
Build custom SQL to meet reporting requirements and manage ISP International Data Portals
Perform query tuning and root cause analysis to optimize database performance and correct errors
Develop SQL to create database tables, views, and stored procedures to support data storage and report development
Provide targeted training on tools and platforms when necessary
Minimum Requirements
Master’s degree in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field including other degrees with a strong quantitative emphasis
Three to five years of post-graduate work experience in data mining, data warehousing, data science, data management, as well as data analysis and visualization
Experience writing advanced SQL queries; expertise with Oracle PL/SQL, expertise with Tableau
Experience using data retrieval and manipulation, and expertise in statistical tools (such as SAS, SQL, STATA, R, D3, Python) and data visualization tools (such as Tableau and Tableau Prep)
Demonstrated success in managing collaborative projects involving cross-functional and interdisciplinary teams
Excellent communication skills including presenting, editing, and writing, as well as ability to demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy
Desired Qualifications
Doctorate in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field with a strong quantitative emphasis
Proven excellence in program or project management
Experience working in a university setting and in-depth knowledge of university administrative organization, policies, procedures, and practices for institutional research-oriented roles
Experience managing higher education related data (student, research, business support systems)
Understanding of data warehouse technologies (Oracle preferred) and familiarity with data integration processes using enterprise ETL tools (DataStage preferred) and the role of data stewardship
Ability to model and analyze data in statistical tools (SPSS, R, SAS, Python, or similar) combined with experience integrating large datasets from a variety of sources; experience with ETL tools (DataStage, Informatica)
Ability to work closely with clients to build custom dashboards, conduct data analysis to support ISP centers and other units, as well as develop and streamline data reporting
Make data-informed recommendations to administrators to contribute to decision making
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, age, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Application Materials
Resume and cover letter
Work Hours
STANDARD 8-5
Description of End Date
one year from date of hire
Website
https://www.isp.msu.edu/
Bidding eligibility ends October 22, 2024 at 11:55 P.M.",4.3,Michigan State University,"East Lansing, MI",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,78.0,MI,169.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US; Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_113619
ABOUT US
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
OUR TEAM
Zynga’s Applied AI group focuses on developing innovative ways to tackle problems within the game development process, demonstrating directly the ways that AI can improve the creativity and productivity of team members across Zynga. Our team is multi-disciplinary, and includes Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers among others. We build cloud-based tools and technologies to support every aspect of the development process, from concept development through to LiveOps and publishing operations.
To be successful in this role you should have curiosity about the areas of Game Development, Artificial Intelligence and Computational Creativity, be a proactive learner, have good depth in technical skills, and a strong desire to build high quality software that delivers value and efficiency.
KEY ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Write well-crafted, efficient and testable code and algorithms
Design and build AI systems that solve computational creativity challenges
Implement and deploy solutions as part of a larger microservice architecture
Plan and implement tasks of small to medium scale independently
Excellent communication skills and comfort working in a collaborative inter-discipline environment
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Ph.D. or M.S. in Computer Science with specialization in AI, or equivalent experience
Experience building AI systems for games, procedural content generation, or computational creativity
Understanding of principles of AI, including ML
Familiarity with principles of game design and implementation
Familiarity with Python, and at least one of Typescript, C++, or Unity C#
Familiarity with containers and cloud infrastructure principles – AWS preferred
Desire to learn and share knowledge with peers, collaborate in a cross-functional team
WHAT WE OFFER YOU
Competitive salary, bonus plan and ESPP (Employee Stock Purchase Plan)
401K Company Match Contribution (US)
RRSP/DPSP company match contribution (Canada)
Health coverage, dental, disability, critical illness, EAP, and life insurance (Canada)
Medical, dental, vision, EAP, life insurance, and disability benefits (US)
Virtual mental health and neurodiversity support programs
Global Fitness reimbursement program
Global Wellbeing Program
Financial wellness program with unlimited access to certified financial planners
Discretionary Time Off policy for many employees
Family planning support program
Generous paid parental, pregnancy-related disability, caregiver, and compassionate leaves
Zynga happy hours and frequent employee events
Flexible working hours on many teams
Culture of diversity and inclusion including employee resource groups
Work with cool people and impact millions of daily player
This is a fully remote role that may be based anywhere in the United States. Below are the expected salary and wage ranges for applicants based in locations where the pay transparency law is in effect:
Colorado: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
California: $87,400 and $129,340 per year
New York State (inclusive of New York City): $98,400 and $145,620 per year
Washington: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
Base pay offered is based on market location, and may vary further depending on individualized factors for job candidates, such as job-related knowledge, skills, experience, and other objective business considerations. Subject to those same considerations, the total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a bonus and/or equity awards and eligibility to participate in our 401(K) plan, in addition to a full range of medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees will also receive 16 paid holidays per calendar year, unlimited discretionary time off, and will receive up to 6.5 sick days per calendar year. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation or benefit program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.
#LI-RK2
Zynga does not engage in financial exchanges during the recruitment or onboarding process. We do not conduct job interviews over third-party messaging apps such as Telegram, WhatsApp or others. We will never ask you for your personal or financial information over unofficial chat channels. Our in-house recruitment team only contacts individuals via official company email addresses (i.e., via a zynga.com or naturalmotion.com email domain).
If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you may wish to contact the authorities. In the United States, you may file a complaint with the FBI. More information is available here: https://www.ic3.gov.",4.2,Zynga,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,114.0,United States,17.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Type: Description:
Position: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
Duration: 12 months +
Job Description
Minimum Qualifications:
Have image processing background and a good understanding on image quality
Experience in data science and analytics, including statistical data analysis.
Strong programming skills, including python and Linux scripting for data processing and tool development.
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or related areas.
Good communication skill and positive working attitude
Expect to be self-motivated, proactive, and solution-oriented
Preferred Qualifications:
Hands-on experience with data batch processing and handling
Experience with deep learning network model training and inferencing
3 years of relevant work experience
Please send your resumes to gjose@sisinc.com (Max 3-4 pages)
Location San Diego , CA Min Experience (yrs): Required Education: Not Specified Benefits:",4.1,SIS,"San Diego, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1987.0,Company - Private,Film Production,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,CA,37.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$88K
/yr","Position Description:

Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead and support data processing and analysis tasks, such as building data pipelines, monitoring data quality, developing documentation, applying statistical and data science methods, and creating data visualizations. Our junior data scientists underpin our company's core offerings in program improvement and data science, which yield crucial evidence and information for policy and decision makers. This position will either work remotely or flexibly in one of our office locations.
This position focuses on health policy, which includes projects such as:
Enhancing knowledge management and library curation across all VRDC projects by developing Python scripts that leverage large language models for automated document classification.
Monitoring the impacts of an alternative payment model for primary care in terms of care quality, cost, and health outcomes for diverse beneficiaries, using claims from thousands of primary care practices across the country and predicting future hospital costs and behavior.
Developing and testing how claims and survey data from federal and state-level programs could be used to measure patients’ experience of care, quality of life, care coordination, and long-term outcomes for beneficiaries enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid.
Creating an interactive data visualization tool to help local policy and decision makers understand how social determinants of health are related to health outcomes in their county, using open-source data from public agencies and non-profits.
Specifically, this Data Scientist contributes to team-based projects by:
Co-developing analysis plans with a senior data scientist or researcher
Writing and maintaining programming systems in languages such as Python and R to obtain, combine, and transform datasets on cloud, internal, and client servers
Developing and maintaining documentation
Implementing quality assurance practices, such as version control and testing
Conducting analysis and communicating results, both to clients and internal teams, such as descriptive statistics, data visualizations, and model diagnostics
Leading and managing small teams and tasks with oversight from a senior staff member
Position Requirements:

Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree, with an academic record including courses in subjects such as statistics, data science, data analytics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, and/or social science; equivalent years of experience can be substituted
Demonstrated interest and/or experience using programming and data science and/or statistics to contribute to projects with a policy/social impact in academic and/or professional settings
At least three years of experience performing data cleaning and analysis using programming languages such as R, Python, or Julia in the academic, extra-curricular, or professional environment
Experience executing data science and statistics techniques including regression modeling, machine learning algorithms, network analysis, or natural language processing
Ability and desire to work independently as part of an interdisciplinary team that may be geographically dispersed. This includes being able to learn from and apply resources such as self-guided tutorials, package documentation, and academic articles and willingness to constantly learn and contribute to knowledge sharing with team members.
Experience with reproducible research principles, version control, interactive visualizations, and common packages/libraries for supporting data science work in R, Python, and/or Julia (e.g., tidyverse, R Shiny, R Markdown, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, MLJ.jl, DataFrames.jl, and/or Makie.jl).
Desired but not required: experience with healthcare datasets (for example, Medicare or Medicaid claims and enrollment data), production-quality machine learning applications, cloud computing environments, and algorithmic fairness and ethics
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $75,000- $100,000. This position is eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance. To apply, please submit a cover letter (optional), resume, code samples, and salary expectations.
Staff in our Health or Human Services units will eventually work with some of our largest clients, including the Centers for Medicaid & Medicare Services (CMS) and other agencies. Most staff working on these contracts will be required to complete a successful background investigation including the Questionnaire for Public Trust Position SF-85 (https://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/sf85p.pdf). Staff that are unable to successfully undergo the background investigation will need to be able to obtain work outside these contracts. Staff will work with their supervisor to get re-staffed, however if they are unable to do so it may result in employment termination due to lack of work.
STAFFING AGENCIES AND THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS: Mathematica is not accepting candidates for this role or any technical role from staffing agencies or third-party recruiters. Please do not contact technical or senior staff at Mathematica or share unsolicited resumes. All agency inquiries go through the talent acquisition team and will be routed accordingly.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ; Remote
#LI-AR1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1986.0,Company - Private,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,88.0,DC,38.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$192K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modeling project
At least 3 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, be able to work with cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $144000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,192.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","Recipient of the 2023 Exceptional PeopleFirst Workplace Award by IWPL, HelloGov® is an Artificial General Intelligence (AGI) company founded by ex-Machine Learning (ML) Researchers from OpenAI, Google, and the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), united by our shared patriotism and belief of advancing AI in the U.S. public sector to maintain global competitiveness. We conduct AGI research, solution development, and human capital resourcing with the declared intention of Democratizing AI for the Public Sector™.
HelloGov® was founded on the principles of nurturing our employees’ careers and wellness. We take pride in providing a work-life balance that stems from years of building companies in Silicon Valley. Our founders have pioneered some of the best AI technologies in the market and have always operated with humility and ambition. We operate with an award-winning people first mantra of:
Transparency.
Flexibility.
Work life balance.
Culture of sharing credit.
Empowering every employee, from the shop floor to the top floor.
Good company policies.
Investment in people.
Focus on ergonomics.
Fun traditions.
Benefits (Tier I Health/Vision/Dental insurance, 401K, EAP, Equity, Stipends, Investment in your wellness)
Equality in Compensation (i.e. every team member, from Junior to Executive staff, receives a Sign-On Bonus)
We are seeking a team of Data Scientists with 3+ years of experience in multi-intelligence and multi-domain systems, with a strong background in NLP, computer vision, statistical learning theory, and ML model development. Candidates should be proficient in Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++, and have experience communicating technical concepts to business, technical, and non-technical audiences. This role leverages advanced AI technology set to dominate the market for the next decade, supporting national biodefense through integrated biosurveillance (IB).
Major Duties:
Designs, configures, develops, tests, and supports informatics and data science solutions for a wide array of technical use cases;
Applies analytical methodologies to diagnose data-related challenges, implement solutions, and evaluate performance;
Documents and presents requirements, design alternatives, and findings to team members and clients;
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships; and
Experience with integrated development environments, data integration, data visualization, data mining, and analysis tools.
Maintains and guides the development of common libraries and tools used by multiple teams.
Aids in formulating a strategy on how to achieve rapid prototyping
Required Skills/Experience:
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory;
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models;
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility;
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models; and
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations.
LOCATION:
Falls Church, VA (Hybrid)
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATIONS:
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence, or related field required (Master's degree preferred).
CLEARANCE:
Top Secret (SCI eligible)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $138,997.00 - $189,983.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
No weekends
Experience:
Natural language processing: 3 years (Required)
AI models: 3 years (Required)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++: 5 years (Required)
large scale data handling + data mining: 5 years (Required)
GPU Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
DoD: 10 years (Preferred)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Falls Church, VA 22041",Not listed,HelloGov,"Falls Church, VA",-1,-1.0,-1,-1,-1,-1,0,1,164.0,VA,-1.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,1
DATA SCIENTIST,"$112K
/yr","Description
Applies knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to the development and improvement of processes. Identify limitations, or potential issues with datasets and data types that may impact performance from machine learning algorithms. Re-train models as needed to address new challenges, or novel goals. Aid investigators and stakeholders in the validation of results. Generate detailed reports and presentations. May mentor and train junior staff members.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Compile, manipulate, and analyze data using descriptive and inferential statistics to address a broad spectrum of research and administrative questions.
Use statistical software to create data analysis programs/syntax with appropriate documentation.
Understand and interpret data analysis programs/syntax written by others involved in data analysis in the department.
Explain complex statistical concepts in the form of presentations or written project reports/documentation
Write and/or review relevant portions of research study manuscripts and/or abstracts.
Effectively visualize and organize complex datasets for the production of high-quality figures and tables for reports, manuscripts, and presentations
Consult with various researchers or administrators regarding data analytic needs, feasibility of proposed analyses, sequential procedures, and project timelines
Perform other duties as assigned
Salary Range: $85,600 - $139,100

Qualifications
Doctorate degree in a related field OR Master's degree in a related field and two (2) years of related experience OR Bachelor's degree in related field and four (4) years of related experience required. Work experience may NOT substitute for education requirement.
UAB is an Equal Employment/Equal Educational Opportunity Institution dedicated to providing equal opportunities and equal access to all individuals regardless of race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, sex (including pregnancy), genetic information, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and veteran’s status. As required by Title IX, UAB prohibits sex discrimination in any education program or activity that it operates. Individuals may report concerns or questions to UAB’s Assistant Vice President and Senior Title IX Coordinator. The Title IX notice of nondiscrimination is located at uab.edu/titleix.

Primary Location: University
Job Category: Professional & Managerial
Organization: 312000000 Dept of Medical Education
Employee Status: Regular
Shift: Day/1st Shift
Work Arrangement (final schedule to be determined by the department/hiring manager): Onsite",4.0,University of Alabama at Birmingham,"Birmingham, AL",10000+ Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,AL,,0,0,0,0,0
Product Data Scientist,"$124K
/yr","The Company
PayPal has been revolutionizing commerce globally for more than 25 years. Creating innovative experiences that make moving money, selling, and shopping simple, personalized, and secure, PayPal empowers consumers and businesses in approximately 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy.

We operate a global, two-sided network at scale that connects hundreds of millions of merchants and consumers. We help merchants and consumers connect, transact, and complete payments, whether they are online or in person. PayPal is more than a connection to third-party payment networks. We provide proprietary payment solutions accepted by merchants that enable the completion of payments on our platform on behalf of our customers.

We offer our customers the flexibility to use their accounts to purchase and receive payments for goods and services, as well as the ability to transfer and withdraw funds. We enable consumers to exchange funds more safely with merchants using a variety of funding sources, which may include a bank account, a PayPal or Venmo account balance, PayPal and Venmo branded credit products, a credit card, a debit card, certain cryptocurrencies, or other stored value products such as gift cards, and eligible credit card rewards. Our PayPal, Venmo, and Xoom products also make it safer and simpler for friends and family to transfer funds to each other. We offer merchants an end-to-end payments solution that provides authorization and settlement capabilities, as well as instant access to funds and payouts. We also help merchants connect with their customers, process exchanges and returns, and manage risk. We enable consumers to engage in cross-border shopping and merchants to extend their global reach while reducing the complexity and friction involved in enabling cross-border trade.

Our beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We live each day guided by our core values of Inclusion, Innovation, Collaboration, and Wellness. Together, our values ensure that we work together as one global team with our customers at the center of everything we do – and they push us to ensure we take care of ourselves, each other, and our communities.
Job Description Summary: As a Data Scientist, you will spearhead our efforts to measure and enhance developer experience to integrate with PayPal's products. This role is central to our mission, offering you the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technology in a fast-paced environment. You will lead the data science projects for the initiatives that optimize features that are adopted by the external developer community, directly impacting PayPal's ability to offer seamless payment solutions to millions of users worldwide.
Job Description:
The Global Analytics and Data Science team is seeking a Data Scientist of PayPal’s SMB Analytics and ML Team to join us as exceptional problem solver with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus.
We are responsible to find opportunities and gaps in developer experience, product flows using statistical methods to strategize Product roadmap. This team empowers senior leadership with actionable insights for informed, data-driven decisions.
In this role, we are tackling the complex and fascinating challenge of optimizing the developer experience at PayPal. Developers go through a non-linear journey, from onboarding to integration, and it's crucial to understand their pain points at each stage. This includes analyzing what they search for, how they navigate the platform, when they begin integrating our APIs, and their activities during sandbox testing.
We aim to provide deep insights into these areas by applying advanced statistical methods and cutting-edge data science techniques. This allows us to uncover friction points and provide actionable recommendations to enhance the overall developer journey. Additionally, we leverage the latest generative AI tools to assist developers throughout their integration process. A key part of this role is to measure the efficacy and accuracy of these AI-driven solutions, ensuring they deliver value and improve the experience.
This is a unique opportunity to dissect the end-to-end developer journey, identify opportunities for product improvement, and collaborate with our product and engineering partners to drive innovation in developer tools and resources. The role goes beyond simple analytics, offering the chance to shape PayPal’s developer ecosystem and influence the tools that developers rely on to build seamlessly integrated solutions.
Your day to day:
Data Analysis and Decision Making:
Utilize large, complex datasets to drive improvements in developer KPIs.
Employ advanced analytical and statistical techniques to identify trends, issues, and opportunities.
Perform deep-dive analytics including Causal Inference analysis, Pre-Post analysis, Sensitivity analysis, financial projections, and additional ad-hoc exercises to provide holistic recommendations.
Strategic Influence: Develop and present insights and strategic recommendations to Product and Data Science leadership. Influence product direction and strategic decisions through data-driven insights.
Collaboration and Communication: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including product development, engineering, and marketing to implement data-driven improvements. Occasionally collaborate with developers to optimize their experiences. Mentor junior team members .
Innovation and Improvement: Lead initiatives to refine existing analytical processes and develop new approaches to business challenges. Promote a culture of continuous improvement and testing.
What do you need to bring
3+ years of experience in analyzing multi-dimensional datasets and creating actionable business solutions.
Strong educational background with a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Expertise in SQL, Excel, and visualization tools such as Tableau or Qlikview. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python is preferred.
Demonstrable experience with big data technologies such as Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, and BigQuery.
Knowledge of Python, Jupyter Notebooks, and SQL.
Exceptional communication skills to effectively articulate insights and influence cross-functional teams.
Prior experience in performing data science to fuel insights to drive Product within a high-tech environment.
Personal Attributes:
A data-driven decision maker, passionate about solving complex problems using analytical solutions.
A self-starter who is motivated to take initiative and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
A fun-loving team player who brings energy and enthusiasm to the workplace.
Comfortable with ambiguity and uncertainty in a dynamic business landscape.
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000
For the majority of employees, PayPal's balanced hybrid work model offers 3 days in the office for effective in-person collaboration and 2 days at your choice of either the PayPal office or your home workspace, ensuring that you equally have the benefits and conveniences of both locations.

Our Benefits:
At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.
We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:
To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.
Belonging at PayPal:
Our employees are central to advancing our mission, and we strive to create an environment where everyone can do their best work with a sense of purpose and belonging. Belonging at PayPal means creating a workplace with a sense of acceptance and security where all employees feel included and valued. We are proud to have a diverse workforce reflective of the merchants, consumers, and communities that we serve, and we continue to take tangible actions to cultivate inclusivity and belonging at PayPal.

Any general requests for consideration of your skills, please Join our Talent Community.

We know the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can get in the way of meeting spectacular candidates. Please don’t hesitate to apply.",3.7,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",10000+ Employees,1998.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,124.0,CA,26.0,1,0,0,0,1
Research Data Scientist,"$116K
/yr","Job ID
34394667
Category
Research and Development
Organization
University Library
Department
University Library Dept
Location
Main Campus - UCR
Salary
$81,500 - $150,100
Date Posted
October 10, 2024
Application Deadline
Open Until Filled
Schedule
8AM - 5PM
Full/Part Time
Full-time(100%)
Level of Supervision
General Supervision
Other Information
Qualifies for Employee Referral Bonus: No
UC Internal Job: No
Position Information
Reporting to the Director of Research Services, this position will be the driving force of the library's Data Science Initiative to support campus research through interdisciplinary collaboration on cutting-edge projects in STEM, Liberal Arts, and Social Sciences. Seeks opportunities to embed themselves in campus research teams to directly address UCR researchers' data and AI related needs through activities including but are not limited to: designing, developing and implementing infrastructure, systems, software and solutions; directly answering compute- and data- intensive research questions; contributing novel ideas, expertise, and methods to the teams' intellectual discourse and advancement; providing data/AI related consultation and instruction. In partnership with other library colleagues as well as UCR colleges, academic programs, and Research and Economic Development, Information Technology Services, and Research Computing, will continuously develop specialized and sought-after data science and AI expertise synergistic with UCR faculty's research agendas.

Candidates are encouraged to include a CV and/or portfolio link with examples of AI/Data related work, if available.

Finalists will be asked to conduct a presentation (including providing visual representation of work samples) as part of the interview process.

The full salary range for the Research Data Scientist is $81,500 - $150,100 annually. However, the expected pay scale for this position is up to $115,000 annually. We base salary offers on a variety of considerations, such as education, licensure and certifications, experience, and other business and organizational needs.

Applicants must have current work authorization when accepting a UCR staff position. Currently, we are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa for staff.

As a University employee, you will be required to comply with all applicable University policies and/or collective bargaining agreements, as may be amended from time to time. Federal, state, or local government directives may impose additional requirements.",4.2,"University of California, Riverside","Riverside, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,116.0,CA,,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Company Description
At Red Hat, we connect an innovative community of customers, partners, and contributors to deliver an open source stack of trusted, high-performing solutions. We offer cloud, Linux, middleware, and virtualization technologies, together with award-winning global customer support, consulting, and implementation services. Red Hat is a rapidly growing company supporting more than 90% of Fortune 500 companies.
Job Summary
Red Hat’s Global Engineering team is looking for an experienced data scientist to join the InstructLab team. In this role, you’ll contribute directly to Red Hat’s rapidly growing AI/ML (artificial intelligence and machine learning) family of products. You will be responsible for the investigation, evaluation, integration, and development of open source AI/ML systems and functionality to improve the overall development and operations of both Red Hat's downstream AI products and upstream open source AI projects. Qualified data scientists in this role regularly participate in design reviews and productization for major product features and bug fixes, and are experienced and comfortable working with Linux-based operating systems.

The ideal candidate will be a highly collaborative individual with a passion for working on complex projects in an open organization where contributions are valued and expected from all levels. This job role will require engaging in upstream open source communities. As this is a fast-moving area of opportunity for Red Hat, the ability to communicate productively and effectively with team members, stakeholders, and Red Hat leadership is critical.
This position reports directly to a Manager of Software Engineering for InstructLab. This position must have the ability to partner collaboratively in our Boston, MA office at least 3 days per week.
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop innovative capabilities for open source platforms used for building, training, testing, and serving models for AI-enabled applications, carrying your work through all phases of software development and delivery, including: researching and conceptualization, team design review, writing the implementation, authoring a testing strategy and necessary automation, productizing and packaging the code, and supporting its deployment through to end-users.
Monitor and participate in upstream open source AI/ML communities, evaluating new AI/ML-related technologies in the space and considering potential integrations and collaborations upstream.
Regularly reading papers and keeping up with AI/ML developments, particularly in the Generative AI space.
Promote and foster Red Hat’s open-source value proposition as it pertains to AI/ML engineering and product infusion and development.
Contribute to the development of the open-source projects that comprise Red Hat’s AI family of products.
Take part in the shared responsibility of delivering and maintaining assigned products.
Regularly communicate with project stakeholders including other teams of Red Hat engineers, product managers, consultants, management, and senior leadership.
Take on the role of Subject Matter Expert, as needed, per domain and project.
Lead, coach and collaborate with junior engineers as they build AI/ML knowledge and skills.
Coordinate and collaborate with external teams, including IBM Research on key strategic vision and implementation details.
Share our experiments and learnings from an experienced position in the Data Science community through blogs, presentations, new ideas and existing work at various technical outlets and conferences.
Promote upstream acceptance and community building.

Required Skills
Bachelor's degree in computer science, data science, computer engineering or equivalent
5+ years of experience as a data scientist (or similar roles).
Extensive, advanced experience with Python development.
Experience with AI and Machine Learning platforms, tools, and frameworks, such as: Tensorflow, PyTorch, LLaMA.cpp, and Kubeflow.
Experience working with Kubernetes/OpenShift and containers, troubleshooting issues, and working with YAML.
Experience with Cloud Native Technologies and Platforms (e.g. Kubernetes)
Demonstrates knowledge of unit testing frameworks and methodologies
Demonstrates knowledge of machine learning relevant mathematics and statistics.
Strong self-motivation and organizational skills.
Demonstrates ability to context switch between multiple concurrent projects.
Excellent English written and verbal communication skills.
Collaborative attitude and willingness to share ideas openly.
Ability to quickly learn and use new tools and technologies.
Passion for developing open source software.
Nice to Haves
Familiarity with participating in an agile development team
Experience writing Kubernetes controllers and operators.
Experience creating Ansible automation scripts.
Experience with big data storage techniques, such as Parquet, Avro, and S3.
Experience with hardware accelerators, such as GPU, CUDA, and ROCm.
Understanding of DevOps methodology.
The salary range for this position is $127,890.00 - $211,180.00. Actual offer will be based on your qualifications.
Pay Transparency
Red Hat determines compensation based on several factors including but not limited to job location, experience, applicable skills and training, external market value, and internal pay equity. Annual salary is one component of Red Hat’s compensation package. This position may also be eligible for bonus, commission, and/or equity. For positions with Remote-US locations, the actual salary range for the position may differ based on location but will be commensurate with job duties and relevant work experience.
About Red Hat
Red Hat
is the world’s leading provider of enterprise
open source
software solutions, using a community-powered approach to deliver high-performing Linux, cloud, container, and Kubernetes technologies. Spread across 40+ countries, our associates work flexibly across work environments, from in-office, to office-flex, to fully remote, depending on the requirements of their role. Red Hatters are encouraged to bring their best ideas, no matter their title or tenure. We're a leader in open source because of our open and inclusive environment. We hire creative, passionate people ready to contribute their ideas, help solve complex problems, and make an impact.
Benefits
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Flexible Spending Account - healthcare and dependent care
Health Savings Account - high deductible medical plan
Retirement 401(k) with employer match
Paid time off and holidays
Paid parental leave plans for all new parents
Leave benefits including disability, paid family medical leave, and paid military leave
Additional benefits including employee stock purchase plan, family planning reimbursement, tuition reimbursement, transportation expense account, employee assistance program, and more!
Note: These benefits are only applicable to full time, permanent associates at Red Hat located in the United States.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion at Red Hat
Red Hat’s culture is built on the open source principles of transparency, collaboration, and inclusion, where the best ideas can come from anywhere and anyone. When this is realized, it empowers people from diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and experiences to come together to share ideas, challenge the status quo, and drive innovation. Our aspiration is that everyone experiences this culture with equal opportunity and access, and that all voices are not only heard but also celebrated. We hope you will join our celebration, and we welcome and encourage applicants from all the beautiful dimensions of diversity that compose our global village.
Equal Opportunity Policy (EEO)
Red Hat is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer. We review applications for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, veteran status, genetic information, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

Red Hat does not seek or accept unsolicited resumes or CVs from recruitment agencies. We are not responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions, or any other payment related to unsolicited resumes or CVs except as required in a written contract between Red Hat and the recruitment agency or party requesting payment of a fee.
Red Hat supports individuals with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodations to job applicants. If you need assistance completing our online job application, email
application-assistance@redhat.com
. General inquiries, such as those regarding the status of a job application, will not receive a reply.",4.2,"Red Hat, Inc.","Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,1993.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,170.0,MA,31.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$163K
/yr","It's time to transform markets
Existing workflows within syndicated loan and CLO markets are painful for clients: they are outdated, overcomplicated, and time-consuming. It's time for a change.
Octaura is reimagining the way these markets trade, with efficiency, transparency and simplicity at the heart of what we do. We bring trading capabilities, data and analytics together for the first time on a digitized platform–fundamentally transforming the markets and streamlining workflows like never before.
At Octaura, everyone belongs
It's essential that Octaurians are confident in knowing they have the space to use their voice and talents. The world is diverse and we actively want our team to reflect this. We're a values-driven company and by engaging, solving and evolving together, we create a culture that is collaborative, transparent, impactful and innovative. And fun!
The role in a nutshell
As a Senior Data Scientist at Octaura, you'll be a key member of our Product team, playing a critical role in the development and growth of our Data and Analytics products. This is an early-stage opportunity to shape the future of our data science initiatives and make a significant contribution to the company's success.
What You'll Do
Drive the full product lifecycle: From ideation and market research to model development, deployment, and performance monitoring, you'll be involved in every stage of creating impactful data-driven solutions.
Develop advanced models: You'll leverage your expertise in machine learning and statistical modelling to extract valuable insights from large and complex datasets, building predictive models that fuel our product offerings.
Build scalable infrastructure: Design, implement, and maintain cloud-based infrastructure on AWS and/or Azure to support our data processing and model deployment needs.
Collaborate effectively: Work closely with the Go-to-Market team to understand client needs and market trends, and partner with the Technology team to build robust data pipelines.
Communicate insights: Clearly and effectively communicate your findings to stakeholders across the company, translating complex data into actionable insights
The Opportunity
Make a real impact: You'll have a direct and significant impact on the company's growth and success.
Early-stage opportunity: Shape the future of our data science products and be a part of building something truly innovative.
Collaborative environment: Work alongside a talented and passionate cross functional teams in a supportive and collaborative environment.
Growth potential: Ample opportunities for professional development and career advancement within a rapidly growing startup.
The Person
Advanced degree and experience: PhD (or MSc + 5 years of experience) in statistics, physics, mathematics, computer science, or a related field.
Strong programming skills: Proficiency in Python and experience with popular machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Proven modelling experience: A track record of building and deploying predictive models using machine learning algorithms.
Data analysis expertise: Strong analytical skills with the ability to analyse and interpret complex datasets, identify patterns, and draw meaningful conclusions.
Excellent communication: Exceptional written and verbal communication skills with the ability to explain technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Cloud proficiency: Experience with cloud-based architectures (AWS and/or Azure) is highly preferred.
Fintech/Financial Services experience is a plus: Experience in the financial services industry, particularly within the fixed income market, is a valuable asset.
If you are passionate about data science in finance, have a strong background in technical majors, and are excited about building predictive models and cloud-based infrastructure using AWS and Azure, we want to hear from you. As a startup, we offer a dynamic and entrepreneurial work environment, where you will have the opportunity to take ownership of your work and make a real impact on our business.
The base pay range for this position in New York is $150,000 - $175,000 annually. Pay may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Equity and year-end bonus may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and other benefits, dependent on the position offered. Applicants should apply via Octaura's internal or external careers site.

Octaura Work Perks
At Octaura, our people are our most valuable asset, and we are pleased to offer the following benefits to all full-time employees:
Competitive compensation and equity
Unlimited Paid Time Off
Competitive Parental Leave
Daily breakfast, coffee and snacks in the office
90% company-paid healthcare
Onsite gym & discounted membership
We're committed to equal opportunity employment
Octaura is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status.",5.0,Octaura,"New York, NY",1 to 50 Employees,2022.0,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,163.0,NY,2.0,1,0,0,1,1
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$193K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 18, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200573520

Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products, such as Siri and Search. Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products. This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.
Solid foundation in data science, machine learning, and evaluation, with hands-on experience in independently conducting and analyzing experiments. Ability to take ownership of smaller analytical projects and contribute effectively to larger initiatives.
Proficiency in critical thinking, problem-solving, and collaboration with cross-functional teams to address business needs. Strong communication skills for articulating and translating business questions into actionable insights using statistical techniques and available data.
Strong programming skills in Python for data processing, with expertise in SQL or Spark. Proficient in data wrangling, and able to assist in prototyping data quality and evaluation pipelines, working alongside engineering teams to help solve data challenges.
Some relevant internship or work experience for M.S. or Ph.D. candidates, or 3 years of relevant work experiences for people with other degrees in quantitative fields.

Preferred Qualifications
Experience in generative model and application development, with a focus on data, evaluation, and automation. Ability to adopt or implement established methodologies and apply statistical analysis in problem-solving.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $135,400 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,193.0,WA,48.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Monitoring Operations","$270K
/yr","About the Team
OpenAI’s mission is to ensure that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We believe that achieving our goal requires real world deployment and iteratively updating based on what we learn.
The Intelligence and Investigations team supports this by identifying and investigating misuses of our products – especially new types of abuse. This enables our partner teams to develop data-backed product policies and build scaled safety mitigations. Precisely understanding abuse allows us to safely enable users to build useful things with our products.
About the Role
As a Data Scientist on the Monitoring Operations team, you will be responsible for building systems to proactively identify abuse on OpenAI’s products. This includes ensuring we have robust monitoring in place for new products, and can sustain monitoring for existing products. You will also respond to critical escalations, especially those that are not caught by our existing safety systems. This will require expert understanding of our products and data, and involves working cross-functionally with product, policy, and engineering teams.
This role is based in our San Francisco office and includes participation in an on-call rotation that will involve resolving urgent escalations outside of normal work hours. Some investigations may involve sensitive content, including sexual, violent, or otherwise-disturbing material.
In this role, you will:
Scope and implement monitoring requirements for new product launches. This involves working with Product and Policy teams to understand key risks, and working with Engineering teams to ensure we have sufficient data and tooling.
Improve processes to sustain monitoring operations for existing products. This includes developing approaches to automate monitoring subtasks.
You might thrive in this role if you:
Have at least 4 years of experience doing technical analysis, especially in SQL and Python.
Have experience in trust and safety and/or have worked closely with policy, enforcement, and engineering teams
Have experience with basic data engineering, such as building core tables or writing data pipelines (not expected to build infrastructure or write production code)
Have experience scaling and automating processes, especially with language models
About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,270.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II,"$130K
/yr","Want a meaningful career where you can make a difference? Edward Jones sounds perfect for you.

Collaboration. Autonomy. Opportunity. Words our headquarters associates use when talking about working at Edward Jones. Words that describe what it's like being part of a firm where everyone is aligned toward a singular focus: serving the client. And everyone is working to make the firm better together - as they grow as individuals. If these words resonate with you, we should talk.

Job Overview

Position Schedule: Full-Time

Overview:
Come join us in Firm Strategy, where we strive to unleash the full potential of data and AI to address business challenges. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will design, develop and deliver data science solutions requiring advanced mathematical methods, statistical and machine learning models in support of data-driven strategies. You will combine data from multiple sources to develop innovative solutions to business problems and collaborate with business partners and other data scientists to develop tailored analytic solutions that inform and influence decisions across the firm.

Key Responsibilities:
Partner with business partners to design, develop and deploy solutions that enable hyper-personalized interactions.
Use machine learning, numerical optimization, and statistical modeling to discover and explain patterns in data.
Create features and develop models beyond standard toolset libraries to meet unique business challenges.
Proactively interpret and communicate findings and insights from the data to business partners. Clear communication without technical jargon is important to success.
Execute projects from design and data-gathering, through implementation, final delivery, and monitoring.
Define data needs and evaluate data quality for applicability to posed problems.
Rapidly optimize data and model inputs to increase predictiveness and relevance in response to changes in data availability, data quality, or business specifications.


Edward Jones' compensation and benefits package includes medical and prescription drug, dental, vision, voluntary benefits (such as accident, hospital indemnity, and critical illness), short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage. Short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage are provided at no cost to associates. Edward Jones offers a 401k retirement plan, and tax-advantaged accounts: health savings account, and flexible spending account. Edward Jones observes ten paid holidays and provides 15 days of vacation for new associates beginning on January 1 of each year, as well as sick time, personal days, and a paid day for volunteerism. Associates may be eligible for bonuses and profit sharing. All associates are eligible for the firm's Employee Assistance Program. For more information on the Benefits available to Edward Jones associates, please visit our benefits page.

At Edward Jones, we value and respect our associates and their contributions, and we recognize individual efforts through a rewards program that promotes a long-term career, financial security and well-being. Visit our career site to learn more about our total compensation approach, which in addition to base salary, typically includes benefits, bonuses and profit sharing. The salary range for this role is based on national data and actual pay is based on skills, experience, education, and other relevant factors for a potential new associate:

Hiring Minimum: $96471
Hiring Maximum: $164262

Read More About Job Overview

Skills/Requirements
Master of Science Degree in a quantitative field required. PhD degree desired.
5+ years professional experience.
Proficiency with one or more computing languages (Python, SQL).
Ability to deliver capabilities that derive insights or novel ideas from data and mathematical models using best data science practices. Connect insights to desired research or business outcomes.
Demonstrated ability and interest in learning new algorithms and tools, e.g. GenAI, machine learning, and optimization.
Proficiency with cloud computing platforms and distributed systems for large-scale data processing.

Please note: Candidates that live within a commutable distance from our Tempe, AZ and St. Louis, MO home office locations are expected to work in the office three days per week, with preference for Tuesday through Thursday.

Read More About Skills/Requirements

Awards & Accolades

At Edward Jones, we are building a place where everyone feels like they belong. We're proud of our associates' contributions to the firm and the recognitions we have received.

Check out our U.S. awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Check out our Canadian awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Read More About Awards & Accolades

About Us

Join a financial services firm where your contributions are valued. Edward Jones is a Fortune 500¹ company where people come first. With over 8 million clients and 19,000 financial advisors across the U.S. and Canada, we're proud to be privately-owned, placing the focus on our clients rather than shareholder returns.

Behind everything we do is our purpose: We partner for positive impact to improve the lives of our clients and colleagues, and together, better our communities and society. We are an innovative, flexible, and inclusive organization that attracts, develops, and inspires performance excellence and a sense of belonging.

People are at the center of our partnership. Edward Jones associates are seen, heard, respected, and supported. This is what we believe makes us the best place to start or build your career.

View our Purpose, Inclusion and Citizenship Report.

1Fortune 500, published June 2023, data as of December 2022. Compensation provided for using, not obtaining, the rating.

Edward Jones does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, gender, religion, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, pregnancy, veteran status, genetic information or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.",3.7,Edward Jones,United States,10000+ Employees,1922.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,United States,102.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection","$170K
/yr","Proof is the world's first identity-assured transaction management platform and we are on a mission to digitize trust for all of life’s most critical transactions. Developed by the same market leaders and experts who brought notarization online with Notarize℠, Proof offers trust in a digital world by verifying identities and securing transactions to protect businesses and their customers. Since 2015, we’ve completed many of the world’s first digital commerce transactions, including the first online real estate closing, online mortgage closing, online auto sale, and online will and we're still just getting started!

We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our Fraud Tech product engineering team. As a member of this team, you will use your analytical skills to identify and prevent fraud risks. You will work with product and engineering partners, as well as risk and policy teams to build solutions that fit product needs.

Proof is a growing startup. You will get a chance to meaningfully contribute to building new products and services leveraging novel, data driven solutions, wear multiple hats, and closely collaborate within and outside of a small team.
What you’ll do as the Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection at Proof:
Leverage advanced analytics, machine learning, and statistical methods to detect and mitigate fraudulent activities on Proof platform
Contribute to large-scale analytical fraud research and implementation projects through all stages
Partner with product managers, engineers, operational and legal teams to envision and implement best in class data based solutions
Evaluate fraud cases holistically to identify areas of improvement
Analyze and incorporate additional signals that continuously improve fraud detection
Maintain knowledge and understanding of current trends and issues affecting the area of expertise
What we're looking for:
Master’s degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related field
5+ years of experience in data science with a focus on fraud detection or a similar domain
Traditional and advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms
Excellent quantitative and analytical skills; ability to derive patterns, trends and insights, and perform risk/reward tradeoff analysis
Deep understanding of data management such as data pipeline and data quality
Experience in building machine learning powered products
Analytic thought leadership; intellectual curiosity
Effective communication skills and experience presenting findings to stakeholders
$130,000 - $210,000 a year
This is the expected cash compensation range for this position. The salary offered within this range will be determined based on factors including but not limited to skills, qualifications, experience and location. The total compensation package for this role also includes benefits such as medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability coverage, flexible paid time off, Carrot Fertility, participation in a 401(k) with company match and more!
Proof is committed to building an inclusive environment for people of all backgrounds and everyone is encouraged to apply. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We'd love to hear from you.",4.7,Proof.com,United States,1 to 50 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,170.0,United States,3.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II (NLP Required),"$90K
/yr","Job Summary:
The Data Scientist II is responsible for designing and validating predictive models, machine learning models, and artificial intelligence that inform and improve business processes across the organization (operational, clinical, financial, marketing, etc.).
Targeting a candidate fluent in NLP, generalized linear models, LLM, deep learning and predictive modeling.
Essential Functions:
Create, maintain, and communicate an analytical plan for each project
Mine and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets
Employ wide range of data sources to develop algorithms for predicting risk and understanding drivers, detecting outliers, etc.
Develop visualizations that demonstrate the efficacy of developed algorithms
Provide statistical validation and analysis of outcomes associated with clinical programs and interventions
Collaborate with other teams to integrate with existing solutions
Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders
Prepare code for operationalization of end-to-end model pipeline and deliverable for business consumption
Perform any other job duties as requested
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, other related field or equivalent years of relevant work experience is required
Minimum of three (3) years of experience in data analysis and/or analytic programming required
Experience with cloud services (such as Azure, AWS or GCP) and modern data stack (such as Databricks or Snowflakes) is preferred
Healthcare experience is preferred
Competencies, Knowledge, and Skills:
Proficient in SQL and at least one of the following programming languages: Python or R
Preferred beginner level of knowledge of developing reports or dashboards in Power BI or other business intelligence applications
Ability to perform basic statistical analyses and techniques including A/B testing, general significance testing, and sampling methodologies
Working knowledge of predictive modeling and machine learning algorithms such as generalized linear models, non-linear supervised learning models, clustering, decision trees, dimensionality reduction and natural language processing
Proficient in feature engineering techniques and exploratory data analysis
Familiarity with optimization techniques and artificial intelligence methods
Ability to analyze large quantities of information and identify patterns, irregularities, and deficiencies
Proficient with MS office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Access)
Demonstrated critical thinking, verbal communication, presentation and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and within a cross-functional team environment
Licensure and Certification:
None
Working Conditions:
General office environment; may be required to sit or stand for extended periods of time
Compensation Range:
$69,400.00 - $111,000.00
CareSource takes into consideration a combination of a candidate’s education, training, and experience as well as the position’s scope and complexity, the discretion and latitude required for the role, and other external and internal data when establishing a salary level. We are highly invested in every employee’s total well-being and offer a substantial and comprehensive total rewards package.
Compensation Type (hourly/salary):
Salary
Organization Level Competencies
Create an Inclusive Environment
Cultivate Partnerships
Develop Self and Others
Drive Execution
Influence Others
Pursue Personal Excellence
Understand the Business

This job description is not all inclusive. CareSource reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. CareSource is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are dedicated to fostering an inclusive environment that welcomes and supports individuals of all backgrounds.",3.7,CareSource,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,90.0,Remote,35.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","About Us
At Vast.ai, we value creativity, energy, drive and teamwork. We are looking for talented people who share these values to join as we grow our team. Our vision is to widely distribute AI computing to reshape our future for the good of humanity. Come join us. If witnessing the birth of AGI excites you, we can't wait to hear from you!
Vast.ai is a market based cloud computing platform focused on reducing the cost and friction of compute-intensive workloads, enabling anyone to easily leverage large-scale GPU liquidity. Vast.ai is the market leader for low cost GPU rentals. Our GPU marketplace powers AI projects and businesses all over the world.
NOTE: Currently hiring for on-site work in Westwood, Los Angeles.
About the Role
We're looking for a skilled Marketing Data Scientist to join our growing team. In this role, you'll be instrumental in applying advanced analytics to our marketing and sales funnels, driving growth and efficiency through data-driven insights. You'll work closely with our marketing, sales, and product teams to implement measurement tools, design and run A/B tests, and develop predictive models that inform our marketing strategies. This position offers a unique opportunity to apply your data science expertise in a dynamic startup environment at the forefront of AI technology.
Key Responsibilities
Develop and implement predictive analytics models for our marketing and sales funnels.
Design, implement, and analyze A/B tests to optimize marketing campaigns and user experiences.
Create SQL queries and custom analysis for production sales and website tracking data.
Develop innovative approaches using LLMs/AI for customer analysis.
Develop data-driven recommendations to inform marketing strategy and budget allocation.
Stay current with the latest data science techniques and marketing analytics trends.
You Are
A data-driven problem solver with a passion for marketing analytics.
Familiar with SQL and direct database manipulation.
Experienced in designing and implementing A/B tests and experimentation frameworks.
Proficient in statistical analysis and machine learning techniques.
An excellent communicator, able to present technical concepts to diverse audiences.
Proactive and self-motivated, with the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.
Qualifications
Master's degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or a related field.
3+ years of experience applying data science in a marketing context.
Strong programming skills in Python or R, and proficiency with SQL.
Experience with marketing analytics tools (e.g., Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics) and A/B testing platforms.
Proven track record of implementing predictive models in a business setting.
Familiarity with machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Knowledge of digital marketing channels and metrics.
Bonus: Experience in the B2B SaaS or cloud computing industry.
Benefits
Full-Time, Monday - Friday.
Onsite at the Vast.ai HQ in Westwood, Los Angeles.
Health, dental, vision and life insurance coverage.
Matching 401K.
Ambitious, fast-paced startup environment.
Generous equity.",4.5,Vast.ai,"Los Angeles, CA",201 to 500 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,CA,3.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$154K
/yr","The Microsoft AI (Artifical Intelligence) Web Data team is looking for a Data Scientist II to help us build the next generation platform for Bing and Microsoft AI. In Web Data, we are on a mission to build the most vast and accurate model of the Web to power search and AI. We are pushing frontiers of scalability and index quality by creating models and systems for discovering, storing, processing Web content, and operating AI solutions. Our core set of engineering challenges includes:
Discovering diverse content on the Web quickly and efficiently by understanding the structure and dynamics of the Web and optimizing crawl scheduling.
Building Big Data pipelines, creating ML(Machine Learning) and AI models for index selection, and determining document quality.
Designing and implementing models and pipelines for near-real time (NRT) indexing and content freshness.
Designing and implementing methods for leveraging AI in platform and backend solutions.
This is a great opportunity for someone who loves to tackle deep technical challenges and strives for industry-wide impact. At this role, you'd be dealing with and learning how to do data collection, analysis and cleaning, building Big Data pipelines, making decision based on data, doing model training and deployment, and working with LLMs both for prompt engineering and fine-tuning.

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
Acquire the data necessary for your project plan and use querying, visualization, and reporting techniques to describe that data. You’ll also explore data for key attributes and collaborate with others to perform data science experiments using established methodologies.
Understand modeling techniques, select the correct tool and approach to complete objectives, and evaluate the output for statistical and business significance. You’ll also analyze model performance and incorporate customer feedback into its evaluation.
Understand the current state of the industry, including current trends, so that you can contribute to thought leadership best practices.
Write efficient code for a specific feature, and develop a working expertise of proper debugging techniques.
Understand each customer’s business goals and learn best practices for identifying growth opportunities.
Examine projects through a customer-oriented focus, and manage customer expectations regarding project progress.
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 2+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR equivalent experience.
1+ year(s) customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR equivalent experience.
Data Science IC3 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $98,300 - $193,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $127,200 - $208,800 per year.

Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until October 21, 2024.

#Bing
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,"Redmond, WA",10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,154.0,WA,49.0,0,0,0,1,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Overview:
At LMI, we’re reimagining the path from insight to outcome at The New Speed of Possible™. Combining a legacy of over 60 years of federal expertise with our innovation ecosystem, we minimize time to value and accelerate mission success. We energize the brightest minds with emerging technologies to inspire creative solutioning and push the boundaries of capability. LMI advances the pace of progress, enabling our customers to thrive while adapting to evolving mission needs.
Responsibilities:
Frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available visualization and dashboard tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to research questions.
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications:
Pursuit of a bachelor’s degree from a HBCU or MSI in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline
Previous experience or internships at a government consulting or technology consulting firm is required
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
Preferred experience with data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics; additional preferred qualifications include working with unstructured text and natural language processing
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Applicants for this position may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Please note that only US citizens are eligible to obtain security clearances.",4.1,Logistics Management Institute,"Tysons Corner, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1961.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,105.0,VA,63.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","The Data Lab team seeks a talented data scientist - with experience in data engineering, data analysis and documentation, workflow management, and web development - to lead the team’s technical priorities. Following is an overview of key duties:

Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,131.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","ABOUT THIS POSITION
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist. The data scientist role involves solving data-driven Healthcare problems using various machine learning and predictive modeling methods. This person will primarily work as part of the larger Data Science team interacting Product Management and Application teams to conduct analysis and experimentation to maximize the utility of predictive modeling and data driven strategies across Waystar. applying machine learning, predictive modeling, and analytic components to maximize operational outcomes for healthcare providers. The ideal candidate for this position will have exposure to the healthcare revenue cycle, can approach problem-solving challenges independently, has a strong attention to detail, and enjoys working in a fast-paced, collaborative, and team-based environment.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
Must be a quick-learner with the ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Presentation abilities and the ability to communicate with all levels of the Business.
Comfortable working in ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability are key skills.
Competent communication and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Bachelor’s degree in the fields of Computer or Data Science, Statistics, or Mathematics is required. Additional experience and/or education in healthcare, business operations or other areas is preferred.
An aptitude for medical informatics is preferred
ABOUT WAYSTAR
Through a smart platform and better experience, Waystar helps providers simplify healthcare payments and yield powerful results throughout the complete revenue cycle.
Waystar’s healthcare payments platform combines innovative, cloud-based technology, robust data, and unparalleled client support to streamline workflows and improve financials so providers can focus on what matters most: their patients and communities. Waystar is trusted by 1M+ providers, 1K+ hospitals and health systems, and is connected to over 5K commercial and Medicaid/Medicare payers. We are deeply committed to living out our organizational values: honesty; kindness; passion; curiosity; fanatical focus; best work, always; making it happen; and joyful, optimistic & fun.
Waystar products have won multiple Best in KLAS® or Category Leader awards since 2010 and earned multiple #1 rankings from Black Book™ surveys since 2012. The Waystar platform supports more than 500,000 providers, 1,000 health systems and hospitals, and 5,000 payers and health plans. For more information, visit
waystar.com
or follow
@Waystar
on Twitter.
WAYSTAR PERKS
Competitive total rewards (base salary + bonus, if applicable)
Customizable benefits package (3 medical plans with Health Saving Account company match)
Generous paid time off starting at 3 weeks + 13 paid holidays including 2 personal floating holidays
Paid parental leave (including maternity + paternity leave)
Education assistance opportunities and free LinkedIn Learning access
Free mental health and family planning programs, including adoption assistance and fertility support
401(K) program with company match
Pet insurance
Employee resource groups
Waystar is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We celebrate, value, and support diversity and inclusion. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws.
This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",4.2,Waystar,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1999.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,126.0,GA,25.0,0,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Our mission is to open the door to the life-changing impact of education and help make education accessible for all. As a nimble growth stage start-up, we've emerged as the leading online education platform helping over 30 million learners and educators each month. Study.com has earned numerous awards and it has been recognized as one of the most transformational companies in EdTech, living up to our commitment to all learners: Breakthroughs Start Here. From students and educators in over 9,000 school districts that use Study.com, to working adults striving to complete their college degree or gain professional certifications, we empower them to reach their full potential. Our product is our impact! Across our college programs alone we have saved students over $200M in tuition and enabled tens of thousands to become nurses, teachers, accountants and more. Additionally, as part of our mission we've donated over $27 million across social impact programs to learners and educators.
As an education technology leader, Study.com owes much of its success to its data-driven approach. We help over thirty million learners and instructors on Study.com each month, improving their user experience and driving growth by collecting, storing, and presenting massive amounts of data that are crucial to everyday business decisions.
We're looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing team. The ideal candidate is passionate about all aspects of data – digging deep to explain observations or gain business insights, turning complex data into intuitive visualizations, transforming it to simplify future tasks and building machine learning models to provide the business with accurate predictions.
This role is based in our Mountain View, CA office and is hybrid in office Mondays, Wednesdays, and Thursdays.
What You'll Do:
Share ownership and maintenance responsibilities of our entire data warehouse, including 50-100 million events coming through a Kafka queue each day, a 20 node Cassandra cluster, a 15 TB relational database, and an integration with Google BigQuery.
Monitor and analyze the team's A/B tests and proactively communicate key insights within your team and to external stakeholders.
Be the voice of data by supporting the team's product owner in finding business opportunities, defining KPIs, and setting team goals.
Provide leadership with data pulls, analyses and deep dives that significantly influence important company decisions.
Create and update ETLs as our source data and data needs evolve
Build data visualizations and reports using Tableau
Build, maintain, and improve machine learning models (neural networks, logistic regressions, boosted trees, k-means clustering, etc.)
Innovate! We're a team that likes to stay on the cutting edge. Everyone is expected to always be looking for ways to leverage the latest technology to improve our processes and drive better results.
What You'll Bring To The Role:
3-5 years of experience in a Data Science or related role (experience with web analytics is a plus)
BS in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field (master's degree or PhD a plus)
Strong proficiency in SQL (Google BigQuery and MySQL)
Experience writing code (Python and Java/Groovy)
A willingness to work in a face-paced, dynamic environment while juggling multiple projects
A passion for innovation and learning with a driven mindset
Excellent communication skills
Nice To Have:
Experience creating complex data visualizations with Tableau
Hands-on experience with advanced statistical concepts, such as cluster analysis, singular value decomposition, gradient descent, etc.
Knowledge of web analytics software and best practices
Strong ability to use Generative AI (e.g. ChatGPT, copilot, etc.) to assist with technical tasks
The salary range for this position is $120,000 - $150,000 per year. Pay and is dependent upon factors including skills, work experience, business needs, and market demands.
At Study.com, we know that strong communities are built on the power of our diversity, and we respect and strive to understand for the diverse identities, race, ethnicities, backgrounds, and perspectives of our team members. Our work and company culture have been consistently recognized, including:
Inc. Best Place to Work
Fortune Great Places to Work – Best Workplaces in the Bay Area
Golden Bridge Awards – Gold Winner, Corporate Social Responsibility
San Francisco Business Times & Silicon Valley Business Journal – Best Places to Work
Study.com provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran or disability status. In addition to federal law requirements.
Study.com complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. Additionally, qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records will be considered for the position in accordance with applicable state and local laws.",3.0,Study.com,"Mountain View, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2002.0,Company - Private,Education & Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,135.0,CA,22.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","This Opportunity
WSP is currently initiating a search for a Data Scientist for our Baltimore, MD office. Be a member of our Planning Advisory Team a growing organization that meets our client’s objectives and solves their challenges. This position will be working full-time for our client The Maryland Transit Administration, Office of Performance Management/Office of Customer Experience (OPM/OPX) requiring on-site work in the client’s office in Baltimore’s Inner Harbor 2-3 days per week.
As a Data Scientist, you will work on a scrum team with other embedded Data Scientists, the Manager of Data Science, and the Manager of Performance Programs and Data Analytics. Your work will fall into two categories: building and maintaining technical artifacts, and building and refining processes and policies. The Data Science Team is currently working to expand its capacity, and you will contribute to that effort by building data pipelines in our Data Lake to support enterprise intelligence products, building data services that drive institutional goals, and conducting various analyses to answer specific questions for stakeholders. You will also help develop internal processes and policies by writing and updating pages in our team handbook, building Github actions and unit tests, and collaborating with team members to solve recurring technical problems.
Your Impact
Support efficient and effective operations by analyzing data in R and/or Python programming languages and delivering clear answers to specific questions.
Support the data analyst's Power BI products by designing, building, and modifying data models and data
pipelines in a manner consistent with the data science team's data governance policy.
Maintain transparency and minimize technical debt by using Git DevOps platforms to commit code, submit
merge requests, and track your work using issues and epics in a manner consistent with the data science team's DevOps policy.
Prioritize performance management projects by working with the Data Analytics team to define enterprise
objectives, user stories, and data stories.
Promote teamwork by making meaningful contributions to our team handbook, creating and modifying policies and procedures to enhance productivity.
Honor the data science team's warranty on artifacts in production by debugging and solving programming and data problems.
Identify new opportunities to improve MTA customer experience by conducting self-guided exploratory work or as part of assigned tasks.
Who You Are
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Math, Data Analysis, Accounting, Finance or related field.
1 to 3 years of relevant post education experience working as a data scientist/analyst.
A passion for improving public transportation through the effective use of data analytics.
The ability to construct complex queries in SQL involving multiple joins, sub-queries, case when statements, etc.
R and Python programming skills.
Ability to problem-solve independently using Google searches, Stack Overflow, Chat GPT, and other similar
resources.
Ability to communicate clearly and respectfully to technical and non-technical staff of differing backgrounds and experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with version control such as Git, and cloud-based services such as GitHub.
Experience working on a scrum team.
Prior experience within the engineering consulting industry is preferred.
#LI-MH4



About WSP
WSP USA is the U.S. operating company of WSP, one of the world's leading engineering and professional services firms. Dedicated to serving local communities, we are engineers, planners, technical experts, strategic advisors and construction management professionals. WSP USA designs lasting solutions in the buildings, transportation, energy, water and environment markets. With more than 15,000 employees in over 300 offices across the U.S., we partner with our clients to help communities prosper.
www.wsp.com
WSP provides a flexible and agile workplace model while meeting client needs. Employees are also afforded a comprehensive suite of benefits including medical, dental, vision, disability, life, and retirement savings focused on providing health and financial stability throughout the employee’s career.
At WSP, we want to give our employees the challenges they seek to grow their careers and knowledge base. Your daily contributions to your team will be essential in meeting client objectives, goals and challenges. Are you ready to get started?
WSP USA (and all of its U.S. companies) is an Equal Opportunity Employer Race/Age/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disability or Protected Veteran Status.
The selected candidate must be authorized to work in the United States.
NOTICE TO THIRD PARTY AGENCIES:
WSP does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters, employment agencies, or other staffing services. Unsolicited resumes include any resume or hiring document sent to WSP in the absence of a signed Service Agreement where WSP has expressly requested recruitment/staffing services specific to the position at hand. Any unsolicited resumes, including those submitted to hiring managers or other business leaders, will become the property of WSP and WSP will have the right to hire that candidate without reservation – no fee or other compensation will be owed or paid to the recruiter, employment agency, or other staffing service.",3.7,WSP,"Baltimore, MD",10000+ Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,102.0,MD,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$130K
/yr","About the Role

Houzz is looking for a world-class Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.
What You'll Do
Collaborate with leadership, product, data, and engineering teams to identify, define, and launch strategic and operational data science initiatives to improve growth performance
Define key metrics (KPIs) to guide business decision-making across various aspects of our site
Manage the key metrics of the business and product efficiently
Design product experiments, interpret results to draw detailed and impactful conclusions, and conduct root cause analysis
Work with data infrastructure/product engineering teams to define the data collection needs
Provide recommendations to assist quick product ideation and feature launch decisions
Develop and maintain data products to serve real-time business insights or to be used in production environments
Build and maintain dashboards and reports that provide actionable insights for finance, product, and sales
At a Minimum, We'd Like You to Have
Bachelors/Masters Degree with 2+ years of experience working within an analytical role in a high-growth tech company
Proficiency in writing complex SQL queries such as using aggregate functions and all types of joins using Hadoop, Hive and Presto. Strong programming skills in Python or R
Strong in problem-solving and analytical thinking to take an open business question from exploratory data analysis to actionable insights and guided execution recommendations
Proficiency in using Tableau for visualization
Proficiency in advanced experimental designing, testing, and analysis
Strong communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
A passion for analytics and product development
Self-motivated, independent, and eager to learn
Ability to have fun!
Ideally, You'll Also Have
An advanced degree in a technical field such as Statistics, Operations Research, or Engineering
Experience with subscription-based analytics, web/app user engagement, and funnel conversion
Ability to learn and act quickly, making decisions and drawing conclusions in the face of ambiguity
Experience with statistical modeling
Experience working with remote teams with a time zone difference
Compensation, Benefits and Perks

This role has an annual starting salary range of $120,000 - $140,000. In addition to salary, you’re eligible for competitive benefits that support you and your family as part of your total rewards package at Houzz. Also, depending on the role, you could be eligible for an equity award. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors, including, but not limited to, skills, experience, and specific work location.

Benefits and perks include:
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Home internet stipend
Medical, dental, and vision benefits
Maternity/paternity leave program
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Professional Development Reimbursement Program
401(k) retirement savings plans (Pre-Tax and Roth)
- Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA) - Medical & Dependent Care
Health Savings Account (HSA) with company contribution
Healthy at Houzz program

Houzz is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. When applying for a role at Houzz, we guarantee your application will be considered regardless of your sex; race; color; gender; national origin; height or weight; ancestry; physical or mental disability; medical condition; genetic information; marital status; registered domestic partner status; age; sexual orientation; military and veteran status; or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law or ordinance or regulation.

We embrace and celebrate the value that diversity brings to an organization. Diverse backgrounds and different points of view help Houzz provide the best experience for our community. Houzz is committed to fostering an inclusive environment through projects and initiatives, such as employee resource groups, that support Houzzers’ efforts to be themselves and share their lives at work.

If you would like assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please email us at accommodations@houzz.com. This information will be treated as confidential and used only for determining an appropriate accommodation for the interview process.

Houzz is an Equal Opportunity Employer. M/F/Disability/Veterans
__________________

Be Who You Are and Do What You Love at Houzz

About Houzz
When founders Adi and Alon remodeled their home, they were frustrated by the lack of resources and inspiration to help them articulate a vision and select the right pro to make it a reality.

So they built Houzz.

Houzz is now the leading platform for home remodeling and design, providing an all-in-one software solution for industry professionals and tools for homeowners to update their homes from start to finish. Using Houzz, people can find ideas and inspiration, hire professionals, and shop for products. Houzz Pro (houzz.com/pro) provides home industry professionals with a business management and marketing SaaS solution that helps them to win projects, collaborate with clients and teams, and run their business efficiently and profitably.

Our Mission and Core Values
We're proud to say there's no one quite like us. Houzz is a community-centric, innovative tech company that continues to disrupt the home renovation and design industry. Our mission-driven culture is rooted in our core values, and we’re all here for one purpose: make the home remodeling and design process more fun and productive for everyone.

Our Mission
To create the best experience for home renovation and design.

Our Core Values
We’re a Community
We put our community of Houzzers, industry professionals and homeowners first. We approach our work with care, humility and respect. We deliver value to our community through our products and services.

We Build the Future
We are visionaries who challenge the status quo. We are creative, innovative and curious. We embrace change and different ideas to drive our industry forward.

We Make Things Happen
We are solution-seekers and self-starters. We listen, move fast and empower our teams to deliver extraordinary results and products. We play to win.

By applying for a job with us, you acknowledge and agree to the terms of our Job Applicant Privacy Notice.

Roles listing ‘Remote - US’ as a location are not currently available in the following states: Alaska, Hawaii, Louisiana and Montana.

#LI-Remote",3.8,Houzz,United States,501 to 1000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,130.0,United States,15.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","Overview:
The Data Scientist will create data science and data engineering products that include data models, data ingestion/transform, analytics which may include machine learning, and some form of output as either a machine-readable format (e.g. file output, database output, standard/streaming output) or a user interface or dashboard.
Responsibilities:
Demonstrated experience with the following:
Python programming
REST APIs and microservices.
Demonstrated experience performing the extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) of structured and unstructured data
Demonstrated experience modeling, structuring, cleaning, and conditioning data from multiple sources and in multiple different formats, languages, and encodings.
Demonstrated experience with cloud services, such as AWS.preferred",2.3,SilverEdge,"Chantilly, VA",Unknown,,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,0
Associate Data Scientist,"$86K
/yr","Requisition ID: R10174460
Category: Research and Sciences
Location: Chandler, Arizona, United States of America
Clearance Type: None
Telecommute: No- Teleworking not available for this position
Shift: 1st Shift (United States of America)
Travel Required: No
Positions Available: 1
At Northrop Grumman, our employees have incredible opportunities to work on revolutionary systems that impact people's lives around the world today, and for generations to come. Our pioneering and inventive spirit has enabled us to be at the forefront of many technological advancements in our nation's history - from the first flight across the Atlantic Ocean, to stealth bombers, to landing on the moon. We look for people who have bold new ideas, courage and a pioneering spirit to join forces to invent the future, and have fun along the way. Our culture thrives on intellectual curiosity, cognitive diversity and bringing your whole self to work — and we have an insatiable drive to do what others think is impossible. Our employees are not only part of history, they're making history.
Space Systems is looking for an Associate Data Scientist to join the Launch Vehicles business unit within the Mission Assurance team located in Chandler, AZ.
This position requires the incumbent to work on-site at our Chandler campus that features engineering, office and state-of -the-art manufacturing space.
You will be part of a team that supports all of Launch Vehicles, its sibling business units and sector level initiatives. Work may vary with shifting priorities based on business needs.
The Associate Data Scientist will:
Create data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.
Conduct Analysis utilizing many applications to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization. Requires strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Create/maintain documentation of all aspects or work duties, applications, charts, training, etc. related to any tasks within the scope of responsibilities or assignment.
Generate monthly CAB metrics, Supplier Scorecards, support QA Call Board.
Create and maintain digital solutions that support Chandler/Space Sector initiatives for digital transformation.
Able to work/collaborate with a team to develop/maintain existing products/applications and supporting documentation
Able to innovate new solutions and applications from ground up to full implementation.
Must be able to take verbal feedback and determine how to implement it into the tools/applications to provide desired results to requestors
Must be able to analyze data, determine causes for discrepancies or areas of improvement, offer alternative solutions and implement them
Works primarily with immediate supervisor, project leaders, and other professionals in the section or group. May be called in to groups or meetings with high level participants. Communication of applications, skills, supporting documentation and demonstration of tools may be required.
Typical work week is 9/80A schedule. General hours are day shift, core hours of 9:00AM to 3:00PM. Hours for monthly metric generation and review will need to be flexible and could require flex schedule some evenings.
Basic Qualifications:
This position requires a Bachelor's degree with 1 year of related work experience.
Intermediate level experience in Tableau and Excel is required.
Experience using SQL databases and tools to extract necessary information for Tableau charts required.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
No clearance is required to start.
Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science with 2 years of experience is preferred.
Ability to code in Python/SQL a plus.
Salary Range: $68,500 - $102,700
The above salary range represents a general guideline; however, Northrop Grumman considers a number of factors when determining base salary offers such as the scope and responsibilities of the position and the candidate's experience, education, skills and current market conditions.
Employees may be eligible for a discretionary bonus in addition to base pay. Annual bonuses are designed to reward individual contributions as well as allow employees to share in company results. Employees in Vice President or Director positions may be eligible for Long Term Incentives. In addition, Northrop Grumman provides a variety of benefits including health insurance coverage, life and disability insurance, savings plan, Company paid holidays and paid time off (PTO) for vacation and/or personal business.
The application period for the job is estimated to be 20 days from the job posting date. However, this timeline may be shortened or extended depending on business needs and the availability of qualified candidates.
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit. U.S. Citizenship is required for all positions with a government clearance and certain other restricted positions.",4.0,Northrop Grumman,"Chandler, AZ",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,86.0,AZ,85.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","Software Bloc LLC, Plano, TX
Technologies –Proficient in Python and R with experience in SQL, GitHub (not a deal breaker), and AWS/Azure and cloud storage related experience.
Full Time

JOB DESCRIPTION

Your role will work to inform the business on strategic recommendations on data collection, integration, and retention requirements incorporating business needs and knowledge of best practices
Work on improvements to methods and algorithms, developing innovative and effective approaches to solve businesses’ analytical problems and communicate these results and methodologies to our teams
Support recommendations of ongoing improvements that lead to findings, including new information, in collaboration with our Lead Data Scientist
QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field
3+ years in a related field is preferred
Skills to communicate well in a global environment",Not listed,Software Bloc,"Plano, TX",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,102.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","DESCRIPTION:
The Data Scientist may be responsible for any of the following tasks: Analyzing data that is collected in our current and future products and services, Develop statistical and machine learning models using state of the art Machine Learning and AI technologies, Visualize insights for business actions and collaborate with Software Developers to implement into our products and services. The Data Scientist would need to be able to apply the data analysis, models, and software to the markets our products are in for us to better serve our customers. The Data Scientist must have good communication and organization skills, along with a working knowledge of day-to-day operations and priorities within their department and the company. Assume other duties as assigned.
Now offering a 4.5-day workweek!




QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Statistics or Mathematics preferred or any other quantitative discipline
Strong proficiencies in the languages, development tools, and frameworks of Python, R, SQL and Tableau
Ability to gain knowledge of the products and customers of the Auction and Heavy Equipment industries
Technical understanding regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques
General understanding of Machine Learning and AI tools and frameworks
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Knowledge of Data Ops and Data Management tools, such as Docker, Jenkins and Spark.
Adept at generating reports and presenting findings in an understandable manner
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Able to work independently and communicate within a team environment
Results oriented
Flexible and open to change
Stable and progressive work history
Professional appearance and demeanor
Ability to travel by air and ground - valid driver’s license required
Able to work with minimal supervision
In Office Position. 4.5 day regular work week. Ability to commute daily to local office is required.",3.1,"Sandhills Global, Inc.","Lincoln, NE",1001 to 5000 Employees,1978.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,111.0,NE,46.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$109K
/yr","This Data Scientist position at Mimecast is the advanced analytical engine of the Business Intelligence team, focused on solving high-value business problems using cutting-edge AI/ML tools and techniques. This role involves building and enhancing machine learning models, collaborating with stakeholders to develop new Generative AI tools, and transforming the business with actionable insights. We prioritize providing exceptional user experiences and taking on projects with game-changing potential. At Mimecast, we deliver the right data to the right people at the right time, supporting data-driven decisions with self-service dashboards, custom alerts, and executive presentations. As the company grows, so does our appetite for data, analysis, and insights.
What You'll Do:
Work cross-functionally with stakeholders across the business to evaluate, prioritize, and develop new Machine Learning and Generative AI powered solutions to solve business problems.
Own, maintain, and optimize existing Machine Learning models, as required
Work collaboratively with analysts, data engineers, and analytics engineers to bring data science and machine learning powered solutions to life.
Partner directly with functional teams to bring data and analytics expertise to our decision-making processes.
Contribute to the Data Science team’s capabilities as an internal expert on machine learning and advanced analytics.
Foster stakeholder partnerships, and work to create a culture of collaboration and data literacy to increase the company’s analytics maturity.
Present findings and technically challenging topics to a diverse group of technical and non-technical business stakeholders.
What You'll Bring:
A minimum of 3 years of work experience in data science, analytics or directly related area, during which both technical and analytical capabilities have been clearly demonstrated.
Prior success deploying machine learning solutions based on complex datasets at scale in production environments with an emphasis on creating impact to business outcomes.
Proven ability to extract actionable insights from statistical and machine learning powered models.
Strong knowledge of the underlying mathematical foundations of machine learning algorithms including linear regression, classification methods, clustering algorithms, Random Forests, time series analysis, and deep learning.
Demonstrated excellence in using Python and SQL to develop data science workflows usings tools such as scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Snowflake, and dbt.
Strong communication and presentation skills with the ability to explain complex concepts in a simple manner to colleagues & stakeholders.
Demonstrated experience collaborating and working cross-functionally with teams and stakeholders to design and implement machine learning powered solutions.
Strong understanding of best practices and KPIs around e-commerce, transactional and subscription-based products is a plus.
Experience with building solutions and utilizing tools in AWS is a plus.
Familiarity with generative AI techniques (LLMs, GANS, VAEs) and their applications in business operations is highly desirable.
What We Bring:
We’re fast thinking. We go big to reach our cyberattack-disrupting goals. And we do what we need to protect the world of business from getting important (and potentially compromising) data stolen. We never leave anyone behind. We deliver quickly – and outstandingly. We’re big on honesty because it makes us better. We’re empowered by our mission. And if cybercriminals have a good day, we work twice as hard to make the rest of their days a nightmare. That’s The Mimecast Way. And the Mimecast way is also a hybrid-working way. We empower our people to balance their time between home and the office in a way that works best for them, their team, and our stakeholders Become a Mimecaster and put corporate data under your protection. Fill our teams with respect. And bring cybercrime-obstructing energy to your work. Be passionate. Be powerful. Be alive with purpose.
#LI-ND1
DEI Statement
Cybersecurity is a community effort. That’s why we’re committed to building an inclusive, diverse community that celebrates and welcomes everyone – unless they’re a cybercriminal, of course.
We’re proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, and we’d encourage you to join us whatever your background. We particularly welcome applicants from traditionally underrepresented groups.
We consider everyone equally: your race, age, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, ability, marital status, nationality, or any other protected characteristic won’t affect your application.
If you require any adjustments or accommodations due to a disability, or any other reason that may help you in your interview process, please let us know by emailing careers@mimecast.com.
Due to certain obligations to our customers, an offer of employment will be subject to your successful completion of applicable background checks, conducted in accordance with local law.",4.0,Mimecast,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,109.0,MA,21.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","Role: Data Scientist, Senior Consultant/Consultant
Location: Miami/South Florida

Please note: This role is not eligible for 100% remote work. Employees must live within a commutable distance of the Miami Metro Area and must be willing to be onsite at the client and/or Slalom Florida office up to 5 days a week.

Who You’ll Work With
As a modern technology company, we've never met a technical challenge we didn't like. We enable our clients to learn from their data, create incredible digital experiences, and make the most of new technologies. We blend design, engineering, and analytics expertise to build the future. We surround our technologists with interesting challenges, innovative minds, and emerging technologies. Our Florida Data & Analytics practice is looking to add a Data Scientist Consultant to our locally based team.

What You’ll Do
Apply fundamental and advanced quantitative methods, including machine learning and statistical modeling, to solve complex business problems and enable data-driven decision-making (e.g., build statistical and machine learning models for trend analysis and forecasting to predict future business outcomes for a Fortune 100 company)
Collaborate with client data science teams to enhance, scale, and operationalize existing models
Communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Provide thought leadership on the latest ML/AI technologies and applications to client industry and use cases
Lead and participate in solutioning sessions, working hand-in-hand with businesses/clients, translating business objectives into actionable machine learning/data science use cases
What You’ll Bring
Production-level experience with core quantitative analysis techniques (e.g., predictive modeling, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or natural language processing) in a consulting environment
Quantitative background with relevant experience using data to solve problems and answer questions
Strong proficiency in Python, R, SQL, and experience with libraries/frameworks such as PyTorch, TensorFlow, and Scikit-learn
Experience with cloud and modern data science tools and platforms such as Databricks MLFlow, GCP BigQuery, AWS SageMaker, Kubeflow, and Azure ML
Experience using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Qlik, or Power BI
Knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practices
About Us
Slalom is a purpose-led, global business and technology consulting company. From strategy to implementation, our approach is fiercely human. In six countries and 43 markets, we deeply understand our customers—and their customers—to deliver practical, end-to-end solutions that drive meaningful impact. Backed by close partnerships with over 400 leading technology providers, our 11,000+ strong team helps people and organizations dream bigger, move faster, and build better tomorrows for all. We’re honored to be consistently recognized as a great place to work, including being one of Fortune’s 100 Best Companies to Work For seven years running. Learn more at slalom.com.
Compensation and Benefits
Slalom prides itself on helping team members thrive in their work and life. As a result, Slalom is proud to invest in benefits that include meaningful time off and paid holidays, parental leave, 401(k) with a match, a range of choices for highly subsidized health, dental, & vision coverage, adoption and fertility assistance, and short/long-term disability. We also offer additional benefits such as a yearly $350 reimbursement account for any well-being related expenses as well as discounted home, auto, and pet insurance.

Slalom is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices. Actual compensation will depend upon an individual’s skills, experience, qualifications, location, and other relevant factors.

Application Deadline:
The anticipated application deadline for this role is 11/1/2024

EEO and Accommodations
Slalom is an equal-opportunity employer and is committed to inclusion, diversity, and equity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veterans’ status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. Slalom will also consider qualified applications with criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. Slalom welcomes and encourages applications from individuals with disabilities. Reasonable accommodations are available for candidates during all aspects of the selection process. Please advise the talent acquisition team if you require accommodations during the interview process.",3.8,Slalom Consulting,"Miami, FL",10000+ Employees,2001.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,118.0,FL,23.0,1,0,0,1,0
Senior Clinical Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","As the Senior Clinical Data Scientist, you will partner with a broad range of stakeholders across the organization. You will be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data that will drive critical growth decisions and positive outcomes.

What you’ll do
Define and demonstrate clinical, operational and financial excellence of Best Buy Health products and services
Lead collaborative relationships with external partners and conduct analyses to produce peer-reviewed scientific evidence about the economic value and return on investment for care at home programs
Identify data sources, gaps in data, and metrics of value, considerations for preprocessing data, and potential internal improvements
Maintain industry knowledge to support Best Buy Health as a subject matter expert and ensure we are considering the latest trends in data and clinical research (e.g. experimental design, HEOR methodologies)
Contribute and demonstrate knowledge of ‘bread and butter’ data science techniques within, and outside of, the team

Basic qualifications
Master’s Degree in health economics, health service research, data science, epidemiology, public health or a closely related field
5+ years conducting comprehensive data analysis and research studies
3+ years of relevant experience within a healthcare / health technology setting
Publication track record in clinical field
Preferred qualifications
PhD
5+ years of experience leading data science strategy in a healthcare or health technology setting
3+ years of health economics and outcomes research experience
Strong relationship-building skills
Strong communication skills, including executive presence

Best Buy Health is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer dedicated to creating an inclusive environment that values the diversity of our employees and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant. We are committed to equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic under applicable law. Learn more about our Affirmative Action Policy Statement HERE.

Reasonable Accommodation

Best Buy Health will make reasonable accommodations for employees and applicants for their religious beliefs and practices, mental or physical disabilities, and pregnancy, childbirth and related conditions. If you need a reasonable accommodation in the application process - to access job postings, to apply for a job, for a job interview, for pre-employment testing or with the onboarding process - please contact Talent Acquisition at talent.acquisition@bestbuy.com.

To learn more about, view the “Know Your Rights” poster and Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision HERE.
Position Type: Full time",3.6,Best Buy Health,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,131.0,Remote,6.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Data Scientist II at its facility located at 500 N. Morton Ave., Morton, IL 61550. Lead large/complex projects within a systems process area. Serve as subject matter expert for global team for all key metric reporting and tools. Define requirements for system processes for major releases or emergency changes. Test accountability for systems processes for major releases or emergency changes. Manage and coordinate work for team in Bangalore. Provide guidance to other members on the global team. Perform deep-dive analysis. Generate ad-hoc reporting. Execute medium and high complexity data requests. Develop medium and high complexity PowerBI reporting. Develop medium and high complexity SAS programs and reports. Independent contributor to multi-person analytic teams. Work is typically directed by a direct supervisor, project, or team lead through a review of results. Make decisions on routine, medium risk issues that may affect the project team, suppliers, or internal customers. Mentor and develop the capabilities and organizational knowledge of more junior information scientists I & II. REQS: This position requires a Bachelor's, degree, or foreign equivalent, in Civil Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Supply Chain, Business Management or a related field and 4 years Professional experience in supply chain industry or IT. Additionally, the applicant must have employment experience with: (1) SAS; (2) SQL; (3) Datawarehouse applications Snowflake and Microsoft Power BI; (4) Python; (5) Supply Chain experience with a focus on Inventory Management; (6) Project Management; and (7) Microsoft Office tools. Telecommuting: 4 days/week. Applicants who are interested in this position should apply via www.caterpillar.com/careers , search [Data Scientist II / Reference # R0000278409]. #LI-DNI
Posting Dates:
October 14, 2024 - February 10, 2025
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Morton, IL",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,IL,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","CHEP helps move more goods to more people, in more places than any other organization on earth via our 300 million pallets, crates and containers. We employ 11,000 people and operate in more than 55 countries. Through our pioneering and sustainable share-and-reuse business model, the world’s biggest brands trust us to help them transport their goods more efficiently, safely and with less environmental impact.

What does that mean for you? You’ll join an international organization big enough to take you anywhere, and small enough to get you there sooner. You’ll help change how goods get to market and contribute to global sustainability. You’ll be empowered to bring your authentic self to work and be surrounded by diverse and driven professionals. And you can maximize your work-life balance and flexibility through our
Hybrid Work Model
.
Job Description
POSITION PURPOSE
To assist in developing tools and technologies that leverage data from a variety of sources to increase supply chain efficiencies and provide value to our customers.
MAJOR / KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
Responsible for experimenting with and implementing machine learning techniques on internal/external customer projects
Responsible for learning new data science techniques/programming languages and exploring their viability on current projects
Will contribute to data science team discussions, providing insight as needed on current approaches and methods
MEASURES
Successful application of data science principles
Successful completion of projects
AUTHORITY / DECISION MAKING
Data science model selection and implementation
Working autonomously
KEY CONTACTS
Internal: Other data scientists, data science manager, project stakeholders
External: Project stakeholders
QUALIFICATIONS
BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems and/or equivalent formal training
Proficient with machine learning and statistics
Proficient with Python, deep learning frameworks, Spark
Excellent communication skills
Desirable Qualifications:
1-2 years work experience in data science position
Proficient with Go, C/C++, other languages
Proficient with cloud computing environments, Kubernetes, etc.
Software development experience
EXPERIENCE
Participated in numerous data science projects
Utilized several data science methodologies
Have worked autonomously and delivered results on schedule
Have presented results to non-data scientist audience
SKILLS AND KNOWLEDGE
Strong programming skills (Python, R, etc.)
Knowledge of major data science topics, models, and methods (from logistic regression to advanced neural networks)
Strong analytical skills
Preferred Education
Bachelors
Preferred Level of Work Experience
1 - 3 years
Remote Type
Hybrid Remote
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, and we are committed to developing a diverse workforce in which everyone is treated fairly, with respect, and has the opportunity to contribute to business success while realizing his or her potential. This means harnessing the unique skills and experience that each individual brings and we do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state, or local protected class.
Individuals fraudulently misrepresenting themselves as Brambles or CHEP representatives have scheduled interviews and offered fraudulent employment opportunities with the intent to commit identity theft or solicit money. Brambles and CHEP never conduct interviews via online chat or request money as a term of employment. If you have a question as to the legitimacy of an interview or job offer, please contact us at recruitment@brambles.com.",4.4,Brambles Group,"Santa Clara, CA",10000+ Employees,1875.0,Company - Public,Shipping & Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,125.0,CA,149.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist III,"$151K
/yr","Our Opportunity:
Do you want to build a model that impacts the company's bottom line? Do you want to see how your ideas, insights, recommendations, and experiments affect top-level decision-makers? If so, Chewy is looking for a Data Scientist III to join our Merchandising Data Science Team. In this role, you will combine deep understanding of machine learning, advanced data analysis, statistical testing, and the ability to communicate insights effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders. As a Data Scientist III, you will play a crucial part in designing, implementing, and deploying machine learning models to solve complex problems for our Retail Operations business partners.
The ideal candidate will operate as a full stack data scientist who should have expertise in both machine learning and cloud technologies. In this role, they will have the opportunity to develop and implement sophisticated data models and analytics solutions to support strategic decision-making across the organization.
What you'll do:
Design, develop, and implement machine learning models for various applications, including but not limited to predictive analytics, natural language processing, and computer vision.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms to address specific business challenges.
Analyze large, complex data sets to extract actionable insights and identify trends, patterns, and opportunities.
Oversee data collection, cleansing, and validation processes to ensure data integrity and reliability.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data scientists, software engineers, and domain experts, to understand requirements and deliver effective solutions.
Document code, algorithms, and processes to facilitate knowledge sharing and ensure reproducibility.
Provide technical guidance in best practices for model development to the data science team.
Effectively communicate complex technical concepts and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
What you'll need:
Candidate must possess a Graduate Degree (MS/PhD) in Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, Mathematics, or related discipline.
6+ years of experience in developing and deploying advanced machine learning models and algorithms in a production environment.
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, machine learning, and deep learning techniques.
Expertise in programming languages such as Python.
Advanced proficiency with SQL
Proficiency with version control systems (e.g., Git) and collaborative coding practices.
Good understanding of cloud platforms such as AWS.
Strong problem-solving skills and the ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent oral and written communication skills including the ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time
Chewy is committed to equal opportunity. We value and embrace diversity and inclusion of all Team Members. If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or similar law, and you need an accommodation during the application process or to perform these job requirements, or if you need a religious accommodation, please contact CAAR@chewy.com.

If you have a question regarding your application, please contact HR@chewy.com.

To access Chewy's Customer Privacy Policy, please click here. To access Chewy's California CPRA Job Applicant Privacy Policy, please click here.",3.4,Chewy,"Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,2011.0,Company - Public,Pet & Pet Supplies Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,151.0,MA,13.0,1,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist I,"$116K
/yr","JOB DESCRIPTION:
Apply statistical modeling, data transformation, data mining and machine learning to develop predictive models, attributes, alerts and indicators to improve Identity Access Management and Point of Contact processes for insurance carriers. Execute database queries to extract and aggregate LN’s data assets into attributes used for predictive modeling, reporting and analysis. Analyze client data to prepare for analysis. Identifies data quality concerns and opportunities (i.e. performance indicators, scores, approval/declination indicators, etc.) and clearly communicate these concerns to stakeholders. Explore and mine new data sources to help optimize and validate existing models. Review product results and communicate findings to internal and external stakeholders. Ideate, research and design new analytics and data science methodologies on large scale and complex data assets. Store, archive, index, transfer and analyze large and complex datasets (structured and unstructured data). Create and enhance Python/R or GUI-based reporting tools that allow team members to gain insights about LexisNexis data assets. Enforce data quality testing best practices. Perform other duties as needed.
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s or foreign equivalent degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Information Systems, or a related field required.
3 years of experience in job offered or related occupations required.
Also required is: 2 years of experience: in advanced ECL Programming (HPCC Systems); with Record Linking for Insurance Header files; creating product dashboards using PowerBI; and batch LexID assignment for customer records.
Employee reports to LexisNexis Risk Solutions, Inc. office in Alpharetta, GA, but may telecommute from any location within the U.S.
Experience can be concurrent.
#LI-DNI
#ICT
LexisNexis, a division of RELX, is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. We are committed to providing a fair and accessible hiring process. If you have a disability or other need that requires accommodation or adjustment, please let us know by completing our Applicant Request Support Form:
https://forms.office.com/r/eVgFxjLmAK
, or please contact 1-855-833-5120.
Please read our
Candidate Privacy Policy
.",4.2,RELX,"Alpharetta, GA",10000+ Employees,1880.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,116.0,GA,144.0,1,0,0,0,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$91K
/yr","Orbis Operations is seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Junior Data Scientist to support our growing team in the collection, transformation, and analysis of open source data. In this role, you will be responsible for building data pipelines, cleaning and organizing datasets, and providing data-driven insights to support government missions. While experience with AI and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, this role focuses primarily on open source data collection and processing, offering an excellent opportunity for career growth in the data science field.
Key Responsibilities
Duties/Responsibilities
Assist in the collection, preprocessing, and transformation of large-scale open source datasets from various structured and unstructured sources.
Develop and maintain data pipelines to ensure efficient data flow and integration across different platforms.
Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) to uncover patterns and insights in open source data that align with mission objectives.
Collaborate with data engineers, software developers, and mission stakeholders to understand data requirements and deliver tailored solutions.
Write clear, well-documented code to automate data processing tasks and streamline workflows.
Generate reports and visualizations that communicate findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Stay up to date with trends in open-source data tools, technologies, and methodologies to continuously improve data collection and pipelining processes.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This position has no supervisory responsibilities
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, or related field, or equivalent work experience.
1-3 years of experience working in data science, with a focus on open source data collection, cleaning, and pipelining.
Strong programming skills in Python, with familiarity in libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and requests for data manipulation and processing.
Experience working with APIs and web scraping tools to collect and integrate data from open source platforms.
Understanding of data cleaning, transformation, and storage best practices.
Strong problem-solving skills, with an ability to manage multiple tasks and projects simultaneously.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to work effectively in a team and present findings to non-technical audiences.
ACTIVE Security Clearance TS SCI w POLY
Preferred Qualifications
Experience working with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) for data storage and processing.
Familiarity with SQL or NoSQL databases for querying and managing datasets.
Knowledge of data visualization tools such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, or Power BI.
Experience with natural language processing (NLP) and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, but not required.
Prior experience working on government or public sector projects.
Physical Requirements
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer.
Routine video conference and/or in-person meetings.
Ability to attend planned meetings within the Washington Metro Area region.
We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

Location
McLean, VA",3.9,Orbis Operations Management Company,"McLean, VA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,91.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$160K
/yr","Snapshot
We are a highly innovative AI startup that builds products and solutions from the ground up while using cutting-edge technology. We are seeking a data scientist with machine learning and Python experience to work with our team to develop our products for predictive maintenance (PMX) and digital signals processing (DSP).
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in a quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
2+ years of experience in Python data science stack: NumPy, Pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow/PyTorch, PySpark, Dask, Matplotlib, Seaborn, Bokeh, etc.
A strong sense of ownership and accountability; eagerness to learn skills as needed by business focus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable with public speaking and presenting to executives
Responsibilities
Build innovative data analytics and machine learning pipelines.
Become an expert in predictive maintenance (PMX) or signals processing products. Attend conferences and assess competitive products.
Meet with domain experts and present to stakeholders regularly.
Salary range: $140,000-$180,000",4.3,PUTNAM RECRUITING GROUP,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Private,Staffing & Subcontracting,Human Resources & Staffing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,160.0,Remote,,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","At Similarweb, we are revolutionizing the way businesses interact with the digital world by revealing to them everything that happens online.
Our unique data and solutions empower over 4,300 customers globally, including industry giants like Google, eBay, and Adidas, to make game-changing decisions that drive their digital strategies.
In 2021, we went public on the New York Stock Exchange, and we continue to reach new heights! Come work alongside Similarwebbers across the globe who are bright, curious, practical and good people.
We're looking for a Data Analyst / Data Scientist to partner with our consulting team by delivering best-in-class data analysis for research projects for prospective and existing clients, and driving value for clients' strategic business needs.
This role will report to the Research Analytics Manager of Data Labs.
Why is this role so important at Similarweb?
Similarweb is more than just a data provider. We develop long-term and collaborative partnerships with our clients, and are constantly striving to help them make better business decisions using our data. One of the ways we do this is through our advisory services.
As a Data Analyst, you will work with our team of Advisory Services Consultants and Data Engineering team, to create customized data analyses using Similarweb data.
Your data analysis will support our prospective clients' and existing clients' strategic business needs, and help the business increase and retain customers.
So, what will you be doing all day?
Your role as part of the Data Labs Team means your daily responsibilities may include:
Partnering with our in-house consultants and GTM teams to scope out custom data analysis projects for client
Building models and utilizing sophisticated technology such as web scraping and AI to enrich datasets to target client pain points
Collaborating with Data Engineering to ensure the existence of use-case specific data, and estimating the availability and effort required to produce specific custom reports
Preparing and communicating customized data analysis to advisory services consultant, to ensure successful delivery to clients
This is the perfect job for someone who:
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in data analysis (Python, Excel, Tableau, SQL)
Can use their analytical skills to drive business impact
Has a general understanding of digital marketing trends
Has experience in client-facing roles (preferred)
Has experience working collectively with other teams and stakeholders to accomplish business goals
Is able to apply relevant industry knowledge to solve specific client business needs, and demonstrate value within individual client use cases
**At Similarweb, collaborating with our colleagues in-office creates a more connected, unified culture. Our best work is a product of our face-to-face collaboration, with the ability to work partially from home.**
Why you'll love being a Similarwebber:
You'll actually love the product you work with: Our customers aren't our only raving fans. When we asked our employees why they chose to come work at Similarweb, 99% of them said ""the product."" Imagine how exciting your job is when you get to work with the most powerful digital intelligence platform in the world.
You'll find a home for your big ideas: We encourage an open dialogue and empower employees to bring their ideas to the table. You'll find the resources you need to take initiative and create meaningful change within the organization.
We offer competitive perks & benefits: We take your well-being seriously, and offer competitive compensation packages to all employees. We also put a strong emphasis on community, with regular team outings and happy hours.
You can grow your career in any direction you choose: Interested in becoming a VP or want to transition into a different department? Whether it's Career Week, personalized coaching, or our ongoing learning solutions, you'll find all the tools and opportunities you need to develop your career right here.
Diversity isn't just a buzzword: People want to work in a place where they can be themselves. We strive to create a workplace that is reflective of the communities we serve, where everyone is empowered to bring their full, authentic selves to work. We are committed to inclusivity across race, gender, ethnicity, culture, sexual orientation, age, religion, spirituality, identity and experience. Our culture of equality and mutual respect also helps us better understand and serve our customers in a world that is becoming more global, more diverse, and more digital every day.
We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here, as applicable: https://www.similarweb.com/corp/legal/applicant-privacy-policies/
* Please note: We're unable to sponsor employment visas at this time.*
#LI-DC #LI-Hybrid

We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here.",3.9,Similarweb,"Burlington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,118.0,MA,16.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$120K
/yr","Job Overviews
Location:
Salt Lake City, UTAH
Job Title:
Data Engineer
Experience:
9 Years
Employement:
Full Time
Job Code:
998163

Job Details
The Data Scientist will be responsible for utilizing advanced analytics and statistical modeling techniques to extract valuable insights from complex data sets. S/he will play a pivotal role in developing innovative solutions, optimizing business operations, and driving data-driven decision-making processes. S/he will possess a strong background in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling, and exceptional problem-solving and communication skills. The Data Scientist will use various methods to transform raw data into useful data systems. S/he will create algorithms and conduct statistical analysis. Overall, you’ll strive for efficiency by aligning data systems with business goals.
Job Responsibilities
Identify, collect, and analyze large volumes of structured and unstructured data from various sources, including internal databases, external APIs, and third-party vendors.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure its quality, integrity, and suitability for analysis.
Conduct exploratory data analysis to identify patterns, trends, and anomalies that can provide actionable insights.
Develop and implement advanced statistical models and machine learning algorithms to solve complex business problems, such as demand forecasting, customer segmentation, or anomaly detection.
Apply state-of-the-art machine learning techniques, including deep learning, natural language processing, and computer vision, to extract meaningful information from diverse data types.
Evaluate and optimize models for accuracy, performance, and scalability.
Create visually appealing and intuitive data visualizations to effectively communicate findings and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Prepare clear and concise reports, presentations, and dashboards that summarize analytical results and provide actionable recommendations.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to deliver data-driven insights and contribute to evidence-based decision-making processes.
Collaborate with IT teams to identify and implement appropriate data infrastructure and tools, such as data lakes, data warehouses, or cloud-based solutions.
Develop and maintain robust data pipelines and workflows for efficient data ingestion, processing, and storage.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries and manage database performance and scalability.
Job Requirements
Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, including software engineers, data engineers, business analysts, and product managers, to define project requirements and deliverables.
Mentor and provide guidance to junior data scientists and analysts, fostering a culture of learning and growth.
Work with stakeholders, including the Executive, Product, Data, and Design teams, to support their data infrastructure needs and assist with data-related technical issues.
Collect, manage, and convert raw data into information that can be interpreted by data scientists and business analysts.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, assembling large, complex data sets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements.
Implement server-side logic and database integration using programming languages like Python, Java, or Node.js.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries, and manage database performance and scalability.
Conduct unit testing, integration testing, and troubleshooting issues to ensure the overall quality and reliability of software applications.
Identify and resolve performance bottlenecks in both front-end and back-end systems to ensure optimal user experience.
Create and maintain technical documentation, including system architecture, API documentation, and user guides.
Continuously research and evaluate emerging technologies, tools, and frameworks to improve development practices and enhance the software stack.
Skill & Experience
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or Information Systems, or Progressive experience in Computer Science with experience in the development of applications.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or Scala, along with familiarity with data manipulation libraries (e.g., pandas, NumPy) and machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Strong knowledge of statistical analysis, machine learning techniques, and data modeling.
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI) and proficiency in SQL and working with databases.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving abilities, with the capability to interpret complex data sets and derive actionable insights.
Outstanding communication skills, with the ability to effectively present complex ideas and findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.",5.0,CloudBerg Tec,"Salt Lake City, UT",Unknown,,Unknown,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,UT,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$132K
/yr","About Direct To Consumer (DTC)
Disney’s Direct to Consumer team oversees the Hulu and Disney+ streaming businesses within Disney Entertainment helping to bring The Walt Disney Company’s best-in-class storytelling to fans and families everywhere.
The Walt Disney Company Direct to Consumer’s (DTC) Data Science team combines deep data analysis and research of our rich user data to present a compelling vision around user retention and preferences across the vast ecosystem of our product offerings and content. We are the insights and modeling partners for the content, marketing, product, and engineering teams at Disney+, Hulu and ESPN+.
As Data Scientists, we use data to empower decision-makers with information, predictions, and insights that ultimately influence the experiences of millions of users worldwide. If you are someone who loves to work cross-functionally, build models, perform statistical analysis, and create visualizations to provide scalable and iterative capabilities, then this is a fantastic role for you!
What You'll Do
Modeling: Apply state of the art machine learning and statistical analysis to develop models related to opportunity sizing, targeting, and optimization.
Deep analysis: Analyze user behavioral data to identify patterns, uncover opportunities, and create common understanding of how people are interacting with the service and content.
Visualization of Insights: Development of prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, and robust analytics leading to impactful insights communicated clearly and visually.
Partnership: Partner closely with business stakeholders to identify and unlock opportunities, and with other data teams to improve platform capabilities around data modeling, data visualization, experimentation and data architecture.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field
3+ years related experience with developing machine learning models and conducting statistical analysis
Deep understanding of machine learning concepts and statistical methods
Ability to draw insights and conclusions from data to inform model development and business decisions
Desire to collaborate with other data scientists, data analysts, and key business partners
Proficient in analyzing data and developing ML models using Python (with ML frameworks like tensorflow, scikit-learn, etc.)
Capable of reading and writing Object-Oriented code to review and implement modeling pipelines (Airflow, Luigi, etc.)
Understanding of SQL and distributed data technologies (Hive, Spark)
Preferred Qualifications
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Physics or related quantitative field (e.g. Econometrics, Mathematics, Operations Research)
Working knowledge of Bayesian modeling and familiarity with probabilistic programming packages/language such as Stan, PyMC
Experience fully integrating data science solutions into the business and operationalizing ML models
Additional Information
#DISNEYTECH

The hiring range for this position in the Los Angeles, CA area is $112,600-$151,000. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate’s geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",3.9,Disney Direct to Consumer,"Santa Monica, CA",10000+ Employees,1923.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,132.0,CA,101.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$177K
/yr","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the team
The Data Science team of the Tech and Product department at TikTok USDS is responsible for building high-quality and timely data solutions for the business as the single source of truth and for building easy-to-use and scalable data products to support business growth. You will have the exciting opportunity to:
Conduct product analytics to provide product recommendations that drive product growth
Deep dive into data sources, understand their limitations, and communicate complex data insights through exploratory analysis and research to suggest improvement
Design and monitor core metrics; understand root causes of metric movements
Design and build advanced analytical solutions and models to deliver superior business outcomes
In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.
Qualifications
Previous internship(s) or 1-2 years of full-time experience
Experience with SQL, Python, or R
Experience navigating and working with large data sets using SQL
Self-motivated, detail-oriented, learn autonomously, and highly organized
Ability to conduct rigorous analysis and communicate conclusions to both technical and non-technical audiences
BS/MS in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Statistics, or other science and engineering fields
Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States. This position is not eligible for visa sponsorship or support.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at https://shorturl.at/ktJP6

This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $114000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,177.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$185K
/yr","Job ID:
13443

Location:
Newport News, VA

Category:
Computer

Division:
CST Division

Position Type:
Regular

Education:
Masters Degree

Experience Required:
12+ years

Relocation Provided:
Position Description

Come join our team at Jefferson Lab, where great minds matter .

Posting Date: 10/17/24
Salary Range: $133,200 - $236,000 (SSCS)
Work Location Type: Hybrid (combination of on-site and remote work based on business need)

What your job will be like:
The incumbent will be responsible for developing, implementing and leading new data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory's data science capabilities in alignment with the overall mission to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and take leadership roles in future DOE data science initiatives.

In this role you will:
Be responsible for developing, implementing and leading data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory’s data science capabilities in alignment with strategic plans to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and contribute significantly to future DOE data science initiatives.
Provide key contributions to the data sience department program development efforts, including contributing to on-going AI/ML in support of the 12 GeV science program, the Electron Ion Collider (EIC) detector design, and the High Performance Data Facility (HPDF).
Guide and provide ultimate direction as the Lab’s Subject Matter Expert and technical resource for data science program and projects.
Be responsible for developing competences in operational and/or applied mathematics data science core in order to support the program.
Be responsible for attracting external funding in data science projects.

Qualifications We Require:Education:
Master's Degree in Computer Science or other relevant field required.
Ph.D. preferred.

Experience:
12 or more years related experience with considerable work specific to developing scientific computing applications and/or data science.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Recognized technical expertise in data science with recognized expertise in one or more additional areas of scientific computing.
Demonstrated knowledge of computational infrastructure and applications applicable to large scale experimental facilities.
Demonstrated experience with strategic planning and implementation of a data science portfolio aligned with overall institutional objectives.
Ability to interact across organizational levels including senior leadership and effectively form partnerships with external partners.
Must possess exceptional written and oral communication skills.
Successful history in attracting funding.
Prior experience in DOE or National Lab environment is highly desired.

About Jefferson Lab

Join a community with a common purpose of solving the most challenging scientific and engineering problems of our time. The Jefferson Lab campus is located in southeastern Virginia amidst a vibrant and growing technology community.

A career at Jefferson Lab is more than a job. You will be part of “big science” and work alongside top scientists and engineers from around the world unlocking the secrets of our visible universe. Managed by Jefferson Science Associates, LLC; Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility is entering an exciting period of mission growth and is seeking new team members ready to apply their skills and passion to have an impact. You could call it work, or you could call it a mission. We call it a challenge. We do things that will change the world.

Total Rewards at Jefferson Lab

At Jefferson Lab, we believe that a comprehensive employee benefits program is an important and meaningful part of the compensation employees receive. Our benefits program includes, but is not limited to:

Medical, Dental, and Vision Care Plans
Flexible Spending Accounts
Paid Time-off and Leave Programs (Paid Parental, vacation, holidays, and sick leave)
401(k) Plan – 9% Lab Contribution; 100% vested
Flexible Work Arrangements (Remote & Alternate Work Schedules available)
Tuition Assistance, Training and Professional Development Programs
Live near the waterways of the Chesapeake Bay region with access to nearby beaches, mountains, and all major metropolitan centers on the East Coast

Jefferson Science Associates, LLC (JSA) manages and operates the Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility (Jefferson Lab). JSA is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of race, color, religion, ethnicity, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, disability, or veteran status or on any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. As part of the JSA’s equal employment opportunity policy, we also take affirmative action as called for by applicable laws and Executive Orders to ensure that minority group individuals, females, disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, other protected veterans, Armed Forces, and qualified disabled persons are introduced into our workforce and considered for promotional opportunities.

JSA is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities (unless doing so will result in an undue hardship). If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to employment @ jlab.org or call (757) 269-7598 to provide the nature of your request. Reasonable accommodations are considered on a case-by-case basis.

Employment with JSA is conditional upon DOE approval if at any time during your employment you are participating in a Foreign Government Talent Recruitment Program or Affiliated activity. Generally, such programs/activities include any foreign-state-sponsored attempt to acquire U.S.-funded scientific research through programs run or funded by the government that target scientists, engineers, students, academics, researchers, and entrepreneurs of all nationalities working or educated in the United States. This includes positions or appointments, both domestic and foreign, titled academic, professional, or institutional appointments whether or not remuneration is received and whether full-time, part-time or voluntary.",4.2,Jefferson Lab,"Newport News, VA",501 to 1000 Employees,1984.0,Government,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,185.0,VA,40.0,0,0,0,1,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$175K
/yr","AirDNA began with a big dream in a balmy California garage in 2015. Since then, the technology startup has grown into the leading provider of data and business intelligence for the billion-dollar travel and vacation rental industry—with offices in Denver and Barcelona. Our self-serve MarketMinder platform eliminates guesswork and equips Airbnb hosts with smart and competitive insights needed to succeed in the ever-evolving short-term rental landscape. We also arm enterprise clients with customized reports and in-depth dashboards to ensure they can scale and invest strategically. These customers include hundreds of top financial institutions, real estate companies, vacation rental managers, and destination marketing organizations around the world. We track the daily performance of over 14 million Airbnb, Vrbo, & Booking.com properties across 120,000 global markets. We also collect data from over thousands partner properties. This marriage of scraped and source data, enhanced by our proprietary algorithms, makes our solutions the most accurate and comprehensive in the world. We’re firm believers that data isn’t the destination; it’s the starting point. The launchpad. The bedrock for any future-forward business.

The AirDNA Team:
At AirDNA, we’re a team of data nerds on a mission to empower our customers to smartly grow their businesses. And we’re on the hunt for a team leader who can take an agile approach to help us build sophisticated and scalable acquisition strategies. In short: Life is never boring here. And we genuinely live and breathe our company values: Happy, Hungry and Honest. People who are ready to exemplify these values are especially encouraged to apply. We invite you to apply even if you are unsure about whether you meet every single requirement in this posting. We carefully consider every application, not just those that check off all the boxes.

The Role:
As a Senior Data Scientist working on software for short-term rental hosts, you will play a key role in leveraging data-driven insights to design, develop, and maintain software solutions that enable our hosts to effectively invest in short-term rentals, manage their properties, streamline operations, optimize pricing, and deliver exceptional guest experiences. At AirDNA, models are at the heart of all of our systems. A Senior Data Scientist is responsible for setting and implementing strategies to continuously improve our algorithms in a fast-changing industry. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams, including product managers, engineers, and designers, to create user-friendly and impactful tools that empower hosts and maximize their potential.
Here's what you'll get to do:
Guide the strategy for creating or improving ML systems that empower short-term rental hosts to make better decisions, such as estimating revenue potential, pricing optimization, dynamic inventory management, demand forecasting, guest profiling, and review sentiment analysis.
Utilize advanced data analysis, statistical modeling, and machine learning techniques to extract actionable insights from complex and diverse datasets, including host performance data, guest behavior data, and market trends.
Work closely with product managers, engineers, and designers to define product requirements, prioritize features, and ensure the successful delivery of software tools that meet the needs of short-term rental investors and hosts.
Develop predictive models, algorithms, and optimization techniques to empower hosts in making data-driven decisions regarding, comp sets, pricing strategies, occupancy rates, availability management, and revenue maximization.
Drive the implementation and integration of data science models and algorithms within the software infrastructure, ensuring scalability, reliability, and performance.
Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in data science, machine learning, and software development, and apply emerging technologies and methodologies to enhance the capabilities and impact of our software tools.
Create and implement strategies to source and utilize short-term rental training data at scale.
Create processes to continuously monitor and improve the performance of our models.
Here's what you'll need to be successful:
Bachelors, Master's or Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related quantitative field.
Minimum of 5 years of professional experience as a Data Scientist, with a focus on software development and advanced analytics.
Proven track record of designing, developing, and deploying successful software solutions powered by data science and analytics.
Experience in short-term rental investment, revenue management, price optimization, time-series or forecasting is a strong plus.
Strong expertise in programming languages such as Python, with proficiency in data manipulation and analysis libraries (e.g., Pandas, Scikit-learn, XGBoost, PyTorch or TensorFlow).
Proficiency in SQL and database management systems.
Expertise working with large data sets in distributed systems such as pyspark and snowflake.
Experience in ML engineering, cloud-based deployment and model lifecycle management.
Here's what you can expect from us:
Competitive cash compensation and benefits, the salary range for this position is $170,000 - $180,000 per year.
Colorado Salary Statement: The salary range displayed in specifically for those potential hired who will work or reside in the state of Colorado if selected for this role. Any offered salary is determined based on internal equity, internal salary ranges, market data/ranges, applicant’s skills and prior relevant experience, certain degrees and certifications.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, and vision packages to meet your needs
Unlimited vacation policy; take time when you need it
Eligible for Company’s annual discretionary bonus program
401K with employer match up to 4%
Continuing education stipend
16 weeks of paid parental leave
New MacBooks for employees

Benefits for Denver Office employees:
Commuter/RTD benefit
Quarterly team outings
In-Office Lunch 3 Days a Week
We have a great office located just a few blocks away from Union Station in the heart of Denver’s historic LoDo neighborhood–high ceilings, exposed brick, a fully stocked kitchen (snacks, espresso, etc.), and plenty of meeting rooms and brainstorming nooks
Pet-friendly!
AirDNA seeks to attract the best-qualified candidates who support the mission, vision and values of the company and those who respect and promote excellence through diversity. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, age, national origin, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, physical or mental disability, marital, familial or parental status, genetic information, military status, veteran status or any other legally protected classification. The company complies with all applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment and prohibits unlawful harassment based on any of the aforementioned protected classes at every location in which the company operates. This applies to all terms, conditions and privileges of employment including but not limited to: hiring, assessments, probation, placement, benefits, promotion, demotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leave of absence, compensation, training and development, social and recreational programs, education assistance and retirement.

We are committed to making our application process and workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Upon request, AirDNA will reasonably accommodate applicants so they can participate in the application process unless doing so would create an undue hardship to AirDNA or a threat to these individuals, others in the workplace or the company as a whole. To request accommodation, please email compliance@airdna.co. Please allow for 24 hours to process your request.",3.5,AirDNA,Remote,51 to 200 Employees,2015.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,Remote,9.0,1,0,1,1,1
Data Scientist II - Experimentation,"$156K
/yr","Welcome to Warner Bros. Discovery… the stuff dreams are made of.
Who We Are…
When we say, “the stuff dreams are made of,” we’re not just referring to the world of wizards, dragons and superheroes, or even to the wonders of Planet Earth. Behind WBD’s vast portfolio of iconic content and beloved brands, are the storytellers bringing our characters to life, the creators bringing them to your living rooms and the dreamers creating what’s next…
From brilliant creatives, to technology trailblazers, across the globe, WBD offers career defining opportunities, thoughtfully curated benefits, and the tools to explore and grow into your best selves. Here you are supported, here you are celebrated, here you can thrive.
The Job

As a Data Scientist II on the WBD Experimentation Data Science team, this individual will leverage large datasets to extract insights and guide decision-making throughout the full lifecycle of product development for our streaming platform, MAX. You will be responsible for setting up best practices around experiment design and advanced analysis. You will work with product stakeholders from various areas in the video streaming business including search personalization, merchandising and growth, etc. Your work will be essential to drive growth for MAX and come join us if you are passionate about video streaming platform and analytics!

The Daily
Support the design, monitor and deep dive analysis of A/B tests in various business settings. Work end to end with product stakeholders from idea initiation, experiment design/monitoring to sharing results analysis for decision making.
Study and fully understand WBD data sources and develop metrics for measuring platform performance in A/B tests.
Write efficient queries to pull data for KPIs and metrics to diagnose changes observed in experiments and work with engineering and product partners to resolve potential issues.
Perform advanced statistical tests to real world A/B test datasets to measure impacts of new product features.
Apply causal model to investigate cause-effect relationship between KPIs and key product changes.
Perform research to acquire best in class data science techniques and best practices to improve the rigor and efficiency in product experimentation.
Capture business requirements for data science solutions and communicate data science output and recommendations to inform business strategies.
Present analysis to business partners and senior leadership and make product launch recommendations.
How We Get Things Done…
This last bit is probably the most important! Here at WBD, our guiding principles are the core values by which we operate and are central to how we get things done. You can find them at www.wbd.com/guiding-principles/ along with some insights from the team on what they mean and how they show up in their day to day. We hope they resonate with you and look forward to discussing them during your interview.
Championing Inclusion at WBD
Warner Bros. Discovery embraces the opportunity to build a workforce that reflects the diversity of our society and the world around us. Being an equal opportunity employer means that we take seriously our responsibility to consider qualified candidates on the basis of merit, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
If you’re a qualified candidate with a disability and you require adjustments or accommodations during the job application and/or recruitment process, please visit our accessibility page for instructions to submit your request.
In compliance with local law, we are disclosing the compensation, or a range thereof, for roles in locations where legally required. Actual salaries will vary based on several factors, including but not limited to external market data, internal equity, location, skill set, experience, and/or performance. Base pay is just one component of Warner Bros. Discovery’s total compensation package for employees. Pay Range: $109,200.00 - $202,800.00 salary per year. Other rewards may include annual bonuses, short- and long-term incentives, and program-specific awards. In addition, Warner Bros. Discovery provides a variety of benefits to employees, including health insurance coverage, an employee wellness program, life and disability insurance, a retirement savings plan, paid holidays and sick time and vacation.
If you’re a qualified candidate with an arrest or conviction record, please know that your application will be considered in accordance with the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act.",3.5,Warner Bros. Discovery,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,2022.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,156.0,CA,2.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist - Product,"$151K
/yr","Position at Confluent Inc
With Confluent, organizations can harness the full power of continuously flowing data to innovate and win in the modern digital world. We have a purpose that drives us to do better every day – we're creating an entirely new category within data infrastructure - data streaming. This technology will allow every organization to create experiences and use the power of data in ways that profoundly impact the way we all live. This impact is our purpose and drives us to do better every day.
One Confluent. One team. One Data Streaming Platform.
Data Connects Us.
About the Role:
The mission of the Data Science team at Confluent is to serve as the central nervous system of all things data for the company: we build analytics infrastructure, metrics, insights, and models. Our outputs enable data-driven thinking and help optimize every part of the business. There are limitless opportunities for an ambitious data scientist to make an immediate and meaningful impact within a high-growth company.
As a Product Data Scientist at Confluent, you will be a key player in helping define the experiences and driving product strategy at Confluent. You will collaborate with our Product leadership team and cross-functional partners across the Data organization. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s challenges, unlocking growth of our product adoption funnel. This role requires a strong blend of technical skills, strategic thinking and communication skills to influence product strategy and investment decisions.
What You Will Do:
Collaborate with product managers, product engineers, and other stakeholders to define and measure success metrics for product features and initiatives.
Develop and maintain dashboards, reports, and visualizations to communicate key metrics and insights to stakeholders.
Utilize data to uncover trends, identify opportunities for growth, drive strategic product decisions, and shape product roadmaps.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to improve product experience
Share actionable insights and recommendations with leadership at various levels, playing a pivotal role in determining Product strategy
Collaborate with other data scientists across our organization to share best practices, learn new analytical techniques, and champion an organizational culture where data is central to decision making
What You Will Bring:
Strong stakeholder management skills with the ability to influence and build relationships at all levels of the organization.
3+ years of experience in Product Data Science/Analytics
Excellent communication skills, and ability to collaborate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders
Exceptional problem solving skills and analytical skills
Strong proficiency in data manipulation with data querying languages (e.g. SQL). Proficiency in scripting languages (e.g. Python) preferred.
Proficiency in data visualization and building dashboards with tools such as Tableau
Experience and familiarity with A/B testing and experiment best practices
Bachelor or advanced degree in a quantitative discipline: computer science, engineering, statistics, economics, etc.
What Gives You an Edge:
Experience and knowledge of causal inference, machine learning and other advanced analytical methods
Experience in SaaS/Product-led Growth companies

Come As You Are
At Confluent, equality is a core tenet of our culture. We are committed to building an inclusive global team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, beliefs, and experiences. The more diverse we are, the richer our community and the broader our impact. Employment decisions are made on the basis of job-related criteria without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other classification protected by applicable law.
At Confluent, we are committed to providing competitive pay and benefits that are in line with industry standards. We analyze and carefully consider several factors when determining compensation, including work history, education, professional experience, and location. This position has an annual estimated salary of $139,230 - $163,620, an annual bonus, and a competitive equity package. The actual pay may vary depending on your skills, qualifications, experience, and work location. In addition, Confluent offers a wide range of employee benefits.",3.7,Confluent,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,151.0,United States,10.0,1,0,0,0,1
Fraud Risk Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Do the best work of your career as a champion for small and mid-size businesses.
BILL is a leader in financial automation software for small and midsize businesses (SMBs). As a champion of SMBs, we are dedicated to automating the future of finance so businesses can thrive. Hundreds of thousands of businesses trust BILL solutions to manage financial workflows, including payables, receivables, and spend and expense management. With BILL, businesses are connected to a network of millions of members, so they can pay or get paid faster. Through our automated solutions, we help SMBs simplify and control their finances, so they can confidently manage their businesses, and succeed on their terms.
BILL is a trusted partner of leading U.S. financial institutions, accounting firms, and accounting software providers. We have operations in San Jose, CA, Draper, UT, and are continuing to expand into other geographic locations. If you’re looking for a place that helps you do the best work of your career, look no further than BILL.
Make your impact within a rapidly growing Fintech Company
We are looking for a detail oriented, enthusiastic and dedicated Risk Data Scientist to join Bill’s Risk Data Innovation team with a focus on fraud and credit risk. The incumbent will be working on data science projects related to key risk department initiatives. The data scientist will own key projects associated with predictive fraud detection, transaction risk modeling, credit underwriting, portfolio monitoring and loss mitigation (fraud) to support new payment products. This individual will also design experiments to understand the impact of customer experience when leveraging machine learning in complex risk strategy changes. This position requires a person who has experience with developing machine learning models and performing advanced analytics preferably in the risk domain.
We’d love to chat if you have:
Minimum 2 years of industry experience in data science and machine learning, preferably in risk, payments or financial services domain.
It is preferred this person has an advanced degree (M.S., PhD.) with 2+ years of experience or a Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years of experience, preferably in Statistics, Physical Sciences, Computer Science, Economics, Mathematics, or a related technical field
Strong track record of performing data analysis and statistical modeling using Python, SQL or similar tools
Good understanding of a wide range of Machine Learning techniques, tools, and methodologies with a demonstrated capability to apply them to a broad range of business problems and data sources
Machine learning techniques include clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural nets, anomaly detection etc.
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical experts, business partners, and executives
Comfortable with ambiguity and yet able to steer analytics projects toward clear business goals, testable hypotheses and action-oriented outcomes
Experience solving problems related to risk using data science and analytics
Experience working with cross functional teams including product, engineering and operations and leading organization-wide initiatives spanning multiple team
Ability to proactively find the pain points in the current process flows and make business suggestions that are sustainable and able to have long term impact by leveraging strategic thinking, and independently provide solutions to business problems with the solid technical skills and problem solving skills
The estimated salary range for this role is noted below for our San Jose based role. Our ranges for each role and job level are based on a variety of factors including candidate experience, expertise, and geographic location and may vary from the amounts listed above. The role is also eligible for a competitive benefits package that includes: medical, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, 401(k) retirement plan, flexible spending & health savings account, paid holidays, paid time off, and other company benefits.
San Jose pay range
$110,200—$132,100 USD
Let’s talk about benefits
100% paid employee health, dental, and vision plans (choose HMO, PPO, or HDHP)
HSA & FSA accounts
Life Insurance, Long & Short-term disability coverage
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
11+ Observed holidays and wellness days and flexible time off
Employee Stock Purchase Program with employee discounts
Wellness & Fitness initiatives
Employee recognition and referral programs
And much more
For positions that are in office we support a hybrid work environment with on-site and remote work days. Check out our LinkedIn Life Page for each location and discover BILL.
We live our culture and values every day
At BILL, we’re different by design—it's our culture. Our CEO is a trusted entrepreneur who lives our cultural values: Humble, Authentic, Passionate, Accountable, and Fun. People here love being their authentic selves, contributing unique experiences, sharing ideas, perspectives, and intellectual curiosity. We celebrate our diversity as the heart and soul of how we work, grow, and succeed together. Inspiring people with meaningful career experiences they love really does make the dream work and our successes just keep getting better. There’s no limit to what we can build and where we can go from here. We’d love you to join us.

BILL is proudly an Equal Opportunity Employer where everyone is welcome. Our innovation and technology are inspired by an inclusive culture unlike any other. Everyone brings a different personal story and perspective and this diverse mix of minds, backgrounds, and experiences is where our greatest ideas come from. We welcome people of all races, ethnicities, ages, religions, abilities, genders, and sexual orientations to make us an even more vibrant company. We want everyone to bring their authentic selves here, to share our values, shape our vision, drive innovation, and become part of a culture we celebrate every day.
Our promise to our candidates is to be transparent, diligent, and engaging while guiding individuals through each step of our hiring process. At BILL we strive to achieve an inclusive and positive candidate experience that aligns with our core values and focuses on diversity.
If you require a reasonable accommodation for your application, interviews, or another aspect of the hiring process, please contact interviewaccommodations@hq.bill.com.
BILL Culture:
Humble - We check our egos at the door. We are curious. We listen, accept feedback.
Authentic - We earn and show trust by being real—embracing our authentic selves.
Passionate - We care deeply about each other and our customers.
Accountable - We are duty-bound to each other, our customers, and society.
Fun - We wrap it all together by building connections and enjoying time spent together.",3.6,Bill.com,"San Jose, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2006.0,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,121.0,CA,18.0,1,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$133K
/yr","Total Wine & More is seeking a Senior Data Scientist with expertise in all aspects of data science and data analysis, to join our Data Services team. The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for leveraging advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive business value across all of Total Wine & More’s departments. We are looking for an individual who is skilled in all facets of the Analytics Lifecycle, including data gathering, data analysis, variable creation & selection, model building & selection, and visualization. This individual will work closely with the business, software development and support teams, infrastructure, and security staff and will enjoy learning and problem-solving in a fast-paced environment. The Total Wine & More Data Services team is growing, and we are driving business value through technology across all aspects of our business. You will report to the Director of Data Science and Analytics.
You will
Use a wide range of advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive Total Wine & More business
Build and manage machine learning and forecasting models through all phases of development from design, through training, validation, deployment, monitoring and measurement
Scope technical solutions on large amounts of data that leverage data analysis and predictive modeling based off business needs
Integrate scalable solutions into necessary applications and data pipelines
Champion best practices in ML/AI domain across Total Wine & More. Communicate effectively with stakeholders of various tech skillsets about project implementation, results and evolutions of project
Be proactive and take ownership of the projects and tasks assigned
You will come with
Bachelor's degree from four-year College or university in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related field. Master’s or PhD preferred
4+ years of experience in data science, predictive analytics, econometrics or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
4+ years of experience in software engineering, data engineering, or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
Strong background in Applied Mathematics and Statistics
Advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or related field) is a plus
Proven track record in building impactful solutions using predictive & prescriptive modeling
Experience in the use of machine learning, econometrics, predictive modeling
Experience in leveraging the cloud in the application of advanced analytics
Experienced with general programing, statistical languages, and deep learning packages used to manipulate data and build statistical and machine learning models at a large scale, such as Python, Spark, PyTorch, Tensorflow, Keras, SQL, and SQL-like query languages for NoSQL databases
Understanding of data science-related technology landscape, processes and design principles
Familiarity with data architecture, data engineering, data management, and data analysis tools and techniques
Passionate about data, data science, and insight generation
Familiar with retail, wholesale, planning and allocation systems, or supply chain operations, preferred
Strong analytic skills, attention to detail, ability to multi-task, troubleshoot and problem solve along with the ability to make recommendations based on analysis are extremely important
We offer
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Generous store discounts
Health care plans (medical, prescription, dental, vision)
401(k), HSA, FSA, Pre-tax commuter benefits
Disability & life insurance coverage
Paid parental leave
Pet insurance
Critical illness and accident insurance
Discounted home and auto insurance
College tuition assistance
Career development & product training
Consumer classes
& More!
Grow with us
Total Wine & More is the country's largest independent retailer of fine wine, beer and spirits, and we continue to grow our footprint year over year. Total Wine offers exciting and unique career opportunities across the country and in our corporate office. Our strength is our people. We have a commitment to training and career growth, all in an environment that values new ideas and teamwork. If you share our entrepreneurial spirit and a passion for providing best-in-class customer experience, take a moment to apply or learn more at www.TotalWine.com/About-Us/Careers!
The exempt compensation range for this position is $101,900 - $165,000. Compensation may vary based on a number of factors including, but not limited to, market location, job-related knowledge, skills and/or experience. Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation. Estimated salaries determined by third parties have not been validated by Total Wine & More.
Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation
Total Wine & More is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. Total Wine & More makes reasonable accommodations during all aspects of the employment process, including during the interview process. Total Wine & More is a Drug Free Workplace.
The information provided above indicates the general nature and level of work required of the position and is not a comprehensive list of all responsibilities or qualifications. Benefits list is only a highlight of some of the benefits offered to team members; eligibility for certain benefits apply.",3.4,Total Wine & More,"Bethesda, MD",5001 to 10000 Employees,1991.0,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,133.0,MD,33.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior Healthcare Data Scientist,"$152K
/yr","Job Description
Are you passionate about using data to take on business challenges? Do you have experience in healthcare specific data analytics and applied statistics? Are you looking for an opportunity to address interesting business questions in the life sciences and grow your skillset by working on a collaborative team? You might be the person we are looking for.

Our corporate data science, data engineering and product team is looking for a data scientist with experience in Healthcare Real-World Data (RWD), machine learning, statistics, and a real passion for addressing business needs through data analysis and solutions. You will work on a highly collaborative, centralized team of data scientists, engineers, and strategists to deliver analytical insights and data products that drive value and impact for our highest priority business needs. You’ll work side-by-side with internal partners across development, clinical, commercial, and general and administrative areas to develop creative solutions that contribute meaningfully to our business and patients.

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with a centralized team of data scientists/engineers/strategists and cross-functional partners to conceptualize, develop, and deploy data science solutions for highest priority business problems and to design and execute A/B tests to quantify the value of these solutions
Be the primary technical lead focused on creative use of diverse data sources to solve business problems, such as clinical operations data, Electronic Health Record (EHR), insurance claims data, and/or other provider and patient-level data
Build and deliver compelling data visualizations and outputs to communicate findings to technical collaborators, non-technical audiences, and business leaders
Participate in the broader data science community to stay current with methodology, software, and data development and availability
Bring an entrepreneurial and ethical mindset, openness, transparency, and collegiality to your work
Minimum Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Epidemiology, Health Economics, Computer Science, Clinical/Biomedical Informatics or a related computational and quantitative discipline, or a Master’s degree (scientific field of study) and 3+ years of relevant experience.
Domain knowledge in clinical data, Real-World Data (EHR, insurance claims, e.g. Clarivate DRG, MarketScan, IQVIA, TriNetX, Optum, Premier), and/or related data sources
Expertise in programming languages (e.g. Python, R, SQL, JavaScript), version control, and other data science related tools (e.g. D3, AWS, dbt)
Extensive experience with statistical/analytical methodologies and machine learning algorithms (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, feature selection/engineering, deep learning, time-series analysis, network analysis, hypothesis testing)
Comfortable working with both technical and non-technical staff in a fast-paced environment to come up with solutions/algorithms and create working prototypes
Ability to build and manage relationships with various cross-functional collaborators and stakeholders across the company
Exceptional communication skills and ability to present findings to non-technical audiences with effective data visualization approaches
Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge of the biopharma or healthcare industry
Experience with LLM prompt engineering and familiarity with creating LLM-based solutions and architectures such as retrieval-augmented generation
Experience with developing advanced data visualizations and dashboards (e.g. Dash, Streamlit, R Shiny and front-end frameworks such as Flask and Angular) in business settings
Familiarity with data product UX/UI design and testing
Flex Designation:
Hybrid-Eligible Or On-Site Eligible
Flex Eligibility Status:
In this Hybrid-Eligible role, you can choose to be designated as:
1. Hybrid: work remotely up to two days per week; or select
2. On-Site: work five days per week on-site with ad hoc flexibility.
Note: The Flex status for this position is subject to Vertex’s Policy on Flex @ Vertex Program and may be changed at any time.
Company Information
Vertex is a global biotechnology company that invests in scientific innovation.
Vertex is committed to equal employment opportunity and non-discrimination for all employees and qualified applicants without regard to a person's race, color, sex, gender identity or expression, age, religion, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, disability, veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, marital status, or any characteristic protected under applicable law. Vertex is an E-Verify Employer in the United States. Vertex will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.
Any applicant requiring an accommodation in connection with the hiring process and/or to perform the essential functions of the position for which the applicant has applied should make a request to the recruiter or hiring manager, or contact Talent Acquisition at ApplicationAssistance@vrtx.com",4.2,Vertex Pharmaceuticals,"Boston, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1989.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,152.0,MA,35.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Senior Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$253K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Provide guidance to junior analysts and data scientists
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modelling project
At least 5 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, capable of working independently in a dynamic, fast-paced environment, and delivering projects from end to end
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
Experience collaborating with cross-functional teams while managing and prioritizing multiple projects
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $176355 - $329333 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,253.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist II (REMOTE),"$110K
/yr","For more than 170 years, The Hanover has been committed to delivering on our promises and being there when it matters the most. We live our values every day, demonstrating we CARE through our values, ESG initiatives and IDE journey.

Our Data Science team is currently seeking a Data Scientist II in our Worcester, MA location or remote work arrangement.

This is a full time, exempt role.

POSITION OVERVIEW:
The Data Scientist II designs, implements, and evaluates advanced statistical models, machine learning algorithms, and tools for application in the business’s most complex issues. The Data Scientist builds econometric and statistical models for various problems inclusive of projections, classification, clustering, pattern analysis, sampling, simulations, and so forth.

In this capacity, the Data Scientist II researches new ways for predicting and modeling end-user behavior as well as investigating data summarization and visualization techniques for conveying key applied analytics findings.

The Data Scientist II also performs ad-hoc data mining and exploratory statistics tasks on very large data sets related to the business’s strategies. The Data Scientist II will also prepare reports and presentations for senior data scientists and relevant stakeholders that will give insights for departmental as well as business-wide decision making.

IN THIS ROLE, YOU WILL:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Collaborate with product management and the LOB’s to understand company needs and devise possible solutions
Keep up-to-date with the latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision-makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and solution design
Usually works with minimum supervision, conferring with business partners on data/reporting requests
Documents the development and the design of the solutions built
Conducts reviews for the work of less senior team members.
Handle multiple projects simultaneously
Begin to work on more complex projects with minimal supervision.
WHAT YOU NEED TO APPLY:
Minimum of 4+ years of related experience and a bachelor’s degree, Master’s, or Ph.D. degree is preferred.
Must be eligible to work in the US without requiring sponsorship now or in the future (IE: US Citizen or green card required)
Ability to drive larger more complicated projects independently
Insurance experience is preferred
TECHNICAL SKILLS:
Practical (Advanced) experience with R, and/or Python
(Advanced) SQL, Data Management, and Documentation
Experience with ETL (Azure Data Factory, SSIS, etc.)
Experience in various modeling techniques
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience in data mining and complex statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Experience in more complex Machine Learning techniques such as deep learning, neural networks, natural language processing.
Model Governance, Metadata Management
Experience with unstructured data and document-based systems (NoSQL, Data Lakes)
Azure DataBricks experience is preferred.
Experience with Agile data science life cycle management and related concepts like MLOps for Continuous deployment, integration, quality, and delivery is preferred.
CAREER DEVELOPMENT:
It’s not just a job, it’s a career, and we are here to support you every step of the way. We want you to be successful and fulfilled. Through on-the-job experiences, personalized coaching and our robust learning and development programs, we encourage you – at every level – to grow and develop.

BENEFITS:
We offer comprehensive benefits to help you be healthy, build financial security, and balance work and home life. At The Hanover, you’ll enjoy what you do and have the support you need to succeed.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance
401K with a company match
Tuition reimbursement
PTO
Company paid holidays
Flexible work arrangements
Cultural Awareness Day in support of IDE
On-site medical/wellness center (Worcester only)
Click here for the full list of Benefits
EEO statement:
The Hanover values diversity in the workplace and among our customers. The company provides equal opportunity for employment and promotion to all qualified employees and applicants on the basis of experience, training, education, and ability to do the available work without regard to race, religion, color, age, sex/gender, sexual orientation, national origin, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information, ancestry or any other status protected by law.

Furthermore, The Hanover Insurance Group is committed to providing an equal opportunity workplace that is free of discrimination and harassment based on national origin, race, color, religion, gender, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information or any other status protected by law.”

As an equal opportunity employer, Hanover does not discriminate against qualified individuals with disabilities. Individuals with disabilities who wish to request a reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, or to perform essential job functions, should contact us at: HRServices@hanover.com and include the link of the job posting in which you are interested.

Privacy Policy:
To view our privacy policy and online privacy statement, click here.

Applicants who are California residents: To see the types of information we may collect from applicants and employees and how we use it, please click here.",4.1,The Hanover Insurance Group,"Worcester, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1852.0,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,110.0,MA,172.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist - Cybersecurity,"$108K
/yr","Cybersecurity is seeking a Sr Data Scientist to join the Cybersecurity Artificial Intelligence team. This position will use machine learning, data engineering, automation, and Data Science principles to solve enterprise problems and advance our mission. This role is a key contributor to our team and will be directly responsible for design, development, deployment, and automation. The successful candidate will work closely with key stakeholders to rapidly advance the use of traditional and generative AI for cybersecurity. We are seeking candidates with passion to lead the implementation of cutting-edge technology and methodologies while establishing strong partnerships with data owners and stakeholders across Cybersecurity. The Sr Data Scientist will have demonstrated experience as a problem-solver, working alongside IT and business partners, and act as a trusted consultant.

Key Responsibilities and Duties
Structure business problems and drive viable, data-driven hypotheses in collaboration with business partners
Ability to skillfully enumerate a business problem, quantify its impact, size relevant data, and document applicable sources
Devise, develop and disseminate actionable intelligence from disparate data sources using advanced data analytics tools and techniques
Proficiency in evaluating and comparing data science models using a diverse range of metrics to enable informed decision-making and optimal model selection
Ability to perform in depth data analysis including but not limited to -
Machine Learning
Generative AI,
RAG frameworks, & NLP Token and sequence classification
Classification Optimization
Time Series analysis
Pattern Recognition
Able to work proactively and take initiative without being specifically directed Ability to extract & aggregate data from disparate data sources
Ability to communicate complex topics and visualize data in an easy-to-understand manner when presenting to management
Educational Requirements
Bachelor's Degree Required
Work Experience
3+ Years Required; 5+ Years Preferred
Physical Requirements
Physical Requirements: Sedentary Work

Career Level
7IC
Required Skills

3+ years of experience in a Data Science or Data Engineering related role
2+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Professional experience using at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)

Preferred Skills

3+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Experience in building Generative AI solutions for business problems
3+ years of experience developing solutions using SQL
2+ years of experience with at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)
1+ year of experience in Cybersecurity
1+ year of experience in Splunk SPL
Experience with modern data engineering utilizing APIs
Experience applying agile SDLC
M.S. or PhD in a Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM) or Economics related field of study
Related Skills
Business Acumen, Data Preprocessing, Data Science, Innovation, Machine Learning, Market/Industry Dynamics, Predictive Modeling, Programming, Statistics
Anticipated Posting End Date:
2024-11-15
Base Pay Range: $88,400/yr. - $126,800/yr.
Actual base salary may vary based upon, but not limited to, relevant experience, time in role, base salary of internal peers, prior performance, business sector, and geographic location. In addition to base salary, the competitive compensation package may include, depending on the role, participation in an incentive program linked to performance (for example, annual discretionary incentive programs, non-annual sales incentive plans, or other non-annual incentive plans).
_____________________________________________________________________________________________________
Company Overview
TIAA is the leading provider of financial services in the academic, research, medical, cultural and government fields. We offer a wide range of financial solutions, including investing, banking, advice and education, and retirement services.
Benefits and Total Rewards
The organization is committed to making financial well-being possible for its clients, and is equally committed to the well-being of our associates. That’s why we offer a comprehensive Total Rewards package designed to make a positive difference in the lives of our associates and their loved ones. Our benefits include a superior retirement program and highly competitive health, wellness and work life offerings that can help you achieve and maintain your best possible physical, emotional and financial well-being. To learn more about your benefits, please review our
Benefits Summary
.
Equal Opportunity
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment regardless of age, race, color, national origin, sex, religion, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other protected status.

Accessibility Support
TIAA offers support for those who need assistance with our online application process to provide an equal employment opportunity to all job seekers, including individuals with disabilities.
If you are a U.S. applicant and desire a reasonable accommodation to complete a job application please use one of the below options to contact our accessibility support team:
Phone: (800) 842-2755
Email:
accessibility.support@tiaa.org",3.7,TIAA,"Frisco, TX",10000+ Employees,1918.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,108.0,TX,106.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Spatial Omics","$129K
/yr","The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid

The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid",4.2,MD Anderson Cancer Center,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1941.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,83.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$161K
/yr","At Accenture Federal Services, nothing matters more than helping the US federal government make the nation stronger and safer and life better for people. Our 13,000+ people are united in a shared purpose to pursue the limitless potential of technology and ingenuity for clients across defense, national security, public safety, civilian, and military health organizations.
Join Accenture Federal Services to do the work you love in an inclusive, collaborative, and caring community, where you can be empowered to grow, learn and thrive through hands-on experience, certifications, industry training and more.
Join us to drive positive, lasting change that moves missions and the government forward!

Job Description:
Accenture Federal Services is seeking a data scientist who is excited about assessing problems, developing solutions, and solving national security related problems. Our team leverages technological advances for better performance in all mission areas—collection, analysis, and operations—while protecting against technological threats to the security of the customer's information. We are a cadre of information management, data science, and technology experts dedicated to revolutionizing the way we ""do data"", while upholding proper protection, accessibility, and release mandates. The objective of our efforts is to accelerate the development and application of data science capabilities – including artificial intelligence and machine learning – to the customer's core missions.
Here's what you need:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 7 years of experience; or
a Master's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 5 years of experience or equivalent work experience
5+ years experience as a Data Scientist or similar role
5+ years experience with machine learning or statistics
5+ years experience developing briefings, dashboards, reports, and other deliverables using data science tools and techniques
Knowledge of analytic methods and methodological tools such as: applied mathematics, computer programming, and/or visualization
Knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git, Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, and/or Unix commands
Bonus points if you have:
Proficiency in Python and other software/tools such as R, SQL, Git, Tableau
Experience with Python libraries such as Pandas, numpy, scikit-learn
Demonstrated experience working large volumes of data
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information
Experience working directly with customers to identify and develop functional requirements
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph

What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture Federal Services has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture Federal Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.

Los Angeles County Information Only
If you live in or expect to work from Los Angeles County if hired for this position, please review below for important additional information.

Criminal history may have a direct, adverse, and negative relationship with some of the material job duties of this position. These include the duties and responsibilities listed in the job posting, as well as the abilities to adhere to company policies, exercise sound judgment, effectively manage stress and work safely and respectfully with others, exhibit trustworthiness, meet client expectations, standards, and accompanying requirements, and safeguard business operations and company reputation. Pursuant to the California Fair Chance Act, Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers, Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance, and San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture Federal Services is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture Federal Services and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you are being considered for employment opportunities with Accenture Federal Services and need an accommodation for a disability or religious observance during the interview process or for the job you are interviewing for, please speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture Federal Services or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",4.1,Accenture Federal Services,"Chantilly, VA",10000+ Employees,1989.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,161.0,VA,35.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior AI Data Scientist,"$187K
/yr","Empowering players to create is an exciting future for the gaming industry. At Electronic Arts we have many examples of players creating content, whether it be a skateboard park in Skate or fantastical mansions in the Sims 4. The future definitely has our players being more empowered to create with their imagination being the only limit.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to help shape the future of content creation and gameplay with AI. If you have the right expertise and are interested we want to hear from you!
As a Senior AI Data Scientist you will:
Build, fine-tune and implement AI and machine learning models to solve challenging problems
Ensure AI and machine learning production pipelines are scalable, repeatable and cloud agnostic
Apply current and emerging techniques in deep learning, natural language processing and other machine learning areas
Collect, clean, manage, analyze and visualize large sets of data using multiple data platforms, tools and technique
Work in partnership with game teams to integrate AI solutions into products and services.
Optimize and fine-tune AI models for performance and scalability. Analyze and interpret data to extract meaningful insights and improve AI models.
Document and present findings and solutions to stakeholders.
Desired qualifications and experience:
A minimum of 3+ years of experience in data science
PhD or MSc in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related field
Strong expertise in deep learning, fluent in Python and SQL
Expertise in automating machine learning models and building end to end products
Experience with devops tools and principles (Git, CI/CD, Docker)
Effective within Cloud environments (GCP, AWS)
Understanding of containerization and orchestration technologies (Docker, Kubernetes, etc.
Ceci ne s’applique pas au Québec.

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

The base salary ranges listed below are for the defined geographic market pay zones in these locations. If you reside outside of these locations, a recruiter will advise on the range and benefits for your specific location.

EA has listed the base salary ranges it in good faith expects to pay applicants for this role in the locations listed, as of the time of this posting. Pay offered will be determined based on numerous relevant business and candidate factors including, for example, education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, geographic location, and business or organizational needs.



BASE SALARY RANGES

California (depending on location e.g. Los Angeles vs. Sacramento):
º $161,100 - $239,700 USD Annually
New York (depending on location e.g. Manhattan vs. Buffalo):
º $142,900 - $239,700 USD Annually
Jersey City, NJ :
º $187,400 - $239,700 USD Annually
Colorado (depending on location e.g. Denver vs. Colorado Springs):
º $153,100 - $206,200 USD Annually
Washington (depending on location e.g. Seattle vs. Spokane):
º $142,900 - $230,000 USD Annually
British Columbia (depending on location e.g. Vancouver vs. Victoria):
º $133,400 - $193,200 CAN Annually

Base salary is just one part of the overall compensation at EA. In the US, we offer a package of benefits including paid time off (3 weeks per year to start), 80 hours per year of sick time, 16 paid company holidays per year, 10 weeks paid time off to bond with baby, medical/dental/vision insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, and 401(k) to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity. For British Columbia, we offer a package of benefits including vacation (3 weeks per year to start), 10 days per year of sick time, paid top-up to EI/QPIP benefits up to 100% of base salary when you welcome a new child (12 weeks for maternity, and 4 weeks for parental/adoption leave), extended health/dental/vision coverage, life insurance, disability insurance, retirement plan to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity.

Electronic Arts creates next-level entertainment experiences that inspire players and fans around the world. Here, everyone is part of the story. Part of a community that connects across the globe. A place where creativity thrives, new perspectives are invited, and ideas matter. A team where everyone makes play happen.",4.1,Electronic Arts,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1982.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,187.0,WA,42.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,WA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Astronomical Data Scientist II,"$96K
/yr","Astronomical Data Scientist II
The Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is a multi-mission science operations center for finding stars and galaxies in the universe. Our world-class astronomical research center is based on the Johns Hopkins University Homewood campus in Baltimore, Maryland. Learn more about our missions - https://www.stsci.edu/what-we-do.
Description:
The Data Management Division (DMD) at the Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is seeking an astronomical data scientist to support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST). MAST is the public data archive for more than 20 missions spanning more than 30 years. The DMD is responsible for a multi-petabyte astronomical data archive that maintains Hubble Space Telescope (HST), James Webb Space Telescope (JWST), Kepler, GALEX, TESS, and the future Nancy Grace Roman Space Telescope (Roman) Mission data.
Job Summary:
This candidate will lead archive activities and science data exploration related to large scale astronomical dataset, provide scientific guidance on catalog development efforts and support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST) data products, tools, and interfaces.
This position can support hybrid work. This position can support hybrid work. Candidates must reside in or be willing to relocate to our local market. (MD, DE, VA, PA, DC & WV). Relocation assistance provided.
This position requires US Citizenship or Permanent Residence in order to meet ITAR requirements.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Regular:
Participate in the design and development of cloud-based solutions for storing, processing and managing astronomical catalogs and services that support community usage of catalogs
Maintain and support mission source catalogs such as Roman Source Catalog(s) to ensure the integrity, accessibility, and security of astronomical datasets.
Participate in cloud tool development for massive catalog dataset exploration
Support catalog data searching across multiple archive centers
Answer help desk questions from scientific users, especially for those related to astronomical catalogs
Requirements:
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in astronomy or astrophysics
Expertise (minimum of three years or equivalent knowledge level) in the scientific use of catalogs
Experience in Python scripting, including the use of common Python-based astronomy packages
Familiarity with AWS Cloud related tools/services
Effective communication skills and the ability to describe astronomical data to a broad science community
Ability to maintain effective working relationships with other scientific, technical, and administrative staff
Ability to analyze and solve problems independently, as well as work collaboratively and communicate effectively with multi-disciplinary teams and leadership
Preferred Qualifications:
Expertise in one (or both) of the following fields of study:
Extragalactic astrophysics
Time domain and multi-messenger (TDAMM) astrophysics
Experience working with and analyzing/processing massive catalogs
Experience with Git or other similar software version control tools
Experience applying machine learning algorithms/tools to produce/analyze astronomical catalogs
Experience with database SQL scripts
Required Education:
Ph.D. in Astronomy or equivalent field.
NOTE: Substitution of additional relevant education or experience for stated qualifications may be considered.
Salary range is $86,000 - $106,000.
Compensation is commensurate with education and experience. Our excellent benefits include:
Employer retirement contribution – direct STScI contribution of 10% of your salary from your first day
12 days sick leave, up to 24 days’ vacation, and 10 paid holidays
Flexible work schedule with healthy work/life balance
Comprehensive medical/dental/vision/prescription plans, and more!
TO APPLY: Please upload a resume, cover letter and online application using this link: Astronomical Data Scientist II
Applications received by 10/30/2024 will receive full consideration. Applications received after this date will be considered until the position is filled.
Explore all career opportunities at www.stsci.edu/opportunities
STScI offers a flexible and welcoming workspace for all. STScI embraces the diversity of our staff as a strategic priority in creating a first-rate community. We strongly encourage women, ethnic minorities, veterans, and disabled individuals to apply for these opportunities. Veterans, disabled individuals, or wounded warriors needing assistance with the employment process can contact us at careers@stsci.edu EOE/AA/M/F/D/V.
As a leader in the astronomical community, AURA is committed to diversity and inclusion. AURA develops and supports programs that advance our organizational commitment to diversity, broaden participation, and encourage the advancement of diversity throughout the workforce www.aura-astronomy.org/diversity.asp
As a recipient of U.S. Government funding, AURA is considered a government contractor subject to Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action regulations. As an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, AURA and all of the centers do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity/gender identity expression, lawful political affiliations, veteran status, disability, and any other legally protected status under applicable federal, state, and local equal opportunity laws. The statements below, as well as the requests for self-identification, are required under these regulations. We encourage your participation in meeting these federal reporting requirements for protection and assisting us in our record-keeping and reporting. Your responses are kept strictly confidential.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.5,"Assn of Univ for Res in Astronomy, Inc.","Baltimore, MD",1001 to 5000 Employees,1957.0,Company - Private,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,MD,67.0,1,0,0,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$103K
/yr","Overview:
In today’s rapidly evolving technology landscape, an organization’s data has never been a more important aspect in achieving mission and business goals. Our data exploitation experts work with our clients to support their mission and business goals by creating and executing a comprehensive data strategy using the best technology and techniques, given the challenge.

At Steampunk, our goal is to build and execute a data strategy for our clients to coordinate data collection and generation, to align the organization and its data assets in support of the mission, and ultimately to realize mission goals with the strongest effectiveness possible.

For our clients, data is a strategic asset. They are looking to become a facts-based, data-driven, customer-focused organization. To help realize this goal, they are leveraging visual analytics platforms to analyze, visualize, and share information. At steampunk you will design and develop solutions to high-impact, complex data problems, working with the best and data practitioners around.
Contributions:
We are looking for an Associate Data Scientist to work with our existing team of Data Architects and Developers to develop strategies, create ML/AI solutions, and deliver results. We are looking for a more than just an ""Associate Data Scientist"", but a technologist with excellent communication and customer service skills and a passion for data and problem solving.
Experience modeling on structured and unstructured data sets
Experience with exploratory data analysis
Experience in feature engineering
Experience in data visualization
Experience with Deep Learning methodology and state of the art libraries
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information and make decisions
Support an Agile software development lifecycle
Qualifications:
Ability to hold a position of public trust with the US government.
0-5 years industry experience developing ML/AI solutions and a passion for solving complex problems.
0-5 years direct experience in Data Modeling and Data Solution Development
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, engineering, business, or a scientific or technical discipline
Demonstrated experience manipulating structured and unstructured data for analysis
Strong programming skills in SQL, Python, R, Scala, Java, or similar language
Experience using Python to manipulate large data sets
Demonstrated experience with TensorFlow, Keras, or other Deep Learning tools and frameworks
Demonstrated experience in big data systems including Hadoop, Spark, Scala
Data visualization skills in Tableau, Power BI, D3, ArcGIS, or similar
Knowledge of DBOps and MLOps framework is a plus
Experience with Solr, Elasticsearch, or similar tool is a plus
About steampunk:
Steampunk relies on several factors to determine salary, including but not limited to geographic location, contractual requirements, education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience. The projected compensation range for this position is $75,000 to $130,000. The estimate displayed represents a typical annual salary range for this position. Annual salary is just one aspect of Steampunk’s total compensation package for employees. Learn more about additional Steampunk benefits here.

Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.3,Steampunk,"El Paso, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,TX,21.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist II - Operations Analytics,"$107K
/yr","Description

A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions which determine the source of disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety.

In North America we have more than 5,000 team members across 11 sites or subsidiaries, including Salt Lake City-based BioFire Diagnostics and one subsidiary in Montreal, Canada. Come be a part of our team and our mission as a Data Scientist!

bioMérieux - Salt Lake City is looking for a talented and engaged Data Scientist to play an integral role in the support of cutting-edge, life-saving medical devices. You will be joining a team that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and a healthy work life balance.
The candidate will be knowledgeable in various aspects of data analytics, and responsible for building and maintaining analytic dashboards, developing robust data pipelines, and performing complex mathematical and/or statistical analysis for projects to support the BioFire manufacturing departments. The candidate must have strong analytic and programming skills. The candidate will be embedded in the Data Science department but will have close collaboration with the Software Development, Production, and Engineering teams at bioMérieux. Therefore, the candidate must have strong communication skills and desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.

Studies and Experience:
A minimum of a B.S. in a quantitative discipline: Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Computational Biology
2+ years industry experience as a data scientist, mathematician, or statistician, or 0 years industry experience with a M.S. or PhD in a quantitative discipline.
Programming proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, MATLAB, C++, C#, or SQL

Skills and Qualifications:
Good communication, writing, and presentation skills
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Practical experience in any of the following: data visualization, data analytics platforms (e.g., Tableau), data pipelines, data cleaning and processing, probability, statistics, machine learning, image analysis, linear algebra, and optimization methods",4.0,bioMerieux SA,"Salt Lake City, UT",10000+ Employees,1963.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,107.0,UT,61.0,1,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$106K
/yr","Operations Analyst – Data Scientist
Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,106.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,0
Sr Data Scientist,"$129K
/yr","Role : Sr Data Scientist
Location : Dallas TX ( Hybrid role - In office REQIUIRED )
Overview: Blue Yonder is a Leading AI-driven Global Supply Chain Solutions Software Product Company and one of Glassdoor’s “Best Places to Work”
Seeking an expert individual that has a strong technical foundation with the additional ability to be hands-on with the broader engineering team as part of the development/deployment cycle, and deep knowledge of industry best practices, Data Science and Machine Learning experience with the ability to implement them working with both the platform, and the product teams.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Technical Environment
Operate within a sophisticated technical landscape, utilizing Python 3.* and frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, BigQuery, Apache Beam,
Apache Spark, Kubeflow, Dataflow, Kubernetes, Kafka, Pub/Sub, and Flask. Our application architecture follows a scalable, resilient, reactive, event-driven
, and secure multi-tenant Microservices design, hosted on Google and Azure Cloud.
Responsibilities:
As the Sr Data Scientist, you will:
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to execute data enrichment, cleansing routines, and feature selection.
Evaluate candidate models, select the final model, and report on test performance.
Ensure proper runtime deployment of models and implement runtime monitoring for continued model stability.
Drive collaboration with product, sales, and engineering teams to shape the final solution.
Utilize data to understand patterns, formulate and test hypotheses, and iterate as needed.
Play a key role in preparing sales materials and estimating hardware requirements.
Lead client meetings, both online and onsite, to discuss new and current functionality.
If you are a seasoned data scientist with a passion for leadership, ready to guide a team in implementing impactful initiatives, we invite you to lead innovation at Blue Yonder.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or any other related field is required
Min 7 years of experience with strong foundation in data science and deep learning principles.
Proficient in Python programming with a solid understanding of data structures.
Experience with frameworks and libraries like Pandas, NumPy, Keras, TensorFlow, Jupyter, Matplotlib, etc.
Expertise in a database query language, preferably SQL.
Familiarity with Big Data technologies like Snowflake, Apache Beam/Spark/Flink, and Databricks.
Solid experience with major cloud platforms, preferably Azure and/or GCP.
Knowledge of modern software development tools and best practices, including Git, Github Actions, Jenkins, Docker, Jira, etc.
Familiarity with deep learning, time series, NLP, reinforcement learning, and combinatorial optimization.
Proven experience in team leadership, mentoring junior data scientists in an official or unofficial capacity.
Desired knowledge of Kafka, Redis, Cassandra, etc.
LI-LOCAL
LI-SR1
-
The salary range for this position is $114,103.81 - $143,896.18
The salary range information provided, reflects the anticipated base salary range for this position based on current national data. Minimums and maximums may vary based on location. Individual salary will be commensurate with skills, experience, certifications or licenses and other relevant factors. In addition, this role will be eligible to participate in either the annual performance bonus or commission program, determined by the nature of the position.
At Blue Yonder, we care about the wellbeing of our employees and those most important to them. This is reflected in our robust benefits package and options that includes:
Comprehensive Medical, Dental and Vision
401K with Matching
Flexible Time Off
Corporate Fitness Program
A variety of voluntary benefits such as; Legal Plans, Accident and Hospital Indemnity, Pet Insurance and much more
At Blue Yonder, we are committed to a workplace that genuinely fosters inclusion and belonging in which everyone can share their unique voices and talents in a safe space. We continue to be guided by our core values and are proud of our diverse culture as an equal opportunity employer. We understand that your career search may look different than others, and embrace the professional, personal, educational, and volunteer opportunities through which people gain experience.
Our Values

If you want to know the heart of a company, take a look at their values. Ours unite us. They are what drive our success – and the success of our customers. Does your heart beat like ours? Find out here:
Core Values
Diversity, Inclusion, Value & Equity (DIVE)
is our strategy for fostering an inclusive environment we can be proud of. Check out Blue Yonder's inaugural
Diversity Report
which outlines our commitment to change, and our
video
celebrating the differences in all of us in the words of some of our associates from around the world.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.",4.1,Blue Yonder,"Dallas, TX",5001 to 10000 Employees,1985.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,39.0,1,0,1,0,0
Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine,"$128K
/yr","Job Description
Grow your career at Cedars-Sinai!
Data is vital to advance clinical knowledge across a spectrum of medical and surgical fields. Are you ready to transform data discoveries into valuable information, which will empower tomorrow's medicine?
Dr. Jason Moore is looking for a Research Data Scientist to join a diverse team!
To learn more about the department - Computational Biomedicine | Cedars-Sinai
The Research Data Scientist participates in biomedical research projects using programming, data-mining, statistics, machine learning, and visualization techniques to develop, evaluate, and/or apply algorithms and software for data analysis.
Responsibilities include querying databases, data processing, supervised and unsupervised machine learning, deploying production models, and communication of scientific findings via peer-reviewed publications and scientific conferences. Writes clean, performant, reusable code managed on GitHub to perform repeatable analyses and to train and deploy models to multiple environments.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Assists with the development, evaluation, and/or application of computational and statistical methods including artificial intelligence and machine learning algorithms and software for the analysis of biomedical data.
Assists with the presentation and communication of scientific results through laboratory meetings, scientific conferences, and peer-reviewed publications.
Creates database-to-deployment pipelines for models using the necessary programming languages (primarily R, Python, SQL).
Creates sustainable data science infrastructure and adheres to data analysis/machine learning best practices.
Performs exploratory data analysis to gauge the need for or appropriateness of advanced analytical methods.
Works with senior or lead data scientists and principal investigators to identify areas where data science can best be applied to answer biomedical research questions.
Tests and validates code to ensure robustness of data applications with version control through GitHub.
Performs all other duties as assigned.

Qualifications
Educational Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline required.

Master's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline preferred.
Experience:
2 years of professional experience in healthcare or pharmaceutical industries working with biomedical data.
2 years - Experience in programming at an intermediate skill level with a high-level programming language such as R or Python. College projects may be acceptable.
2 years - Experience in programming at a basic to intermediate proficiency level in SQL preferred
Experience in biomedical machine learning is preferred
Physical Demands:
Standing, Walking, Sitting, Lifting 50 lbs. Carrying 50 lbs. Pushing 50 lbs. Pulling 50 lbs. Reaching, Handling, Grasping, Feeling, Talking, Hearing, Repetitive Motions, Eye/Hand/Foot Coordination

Req ID : 5630
Working Title : Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine
Department : Computational Biomedicine
Business Entity : Cedars-Sinai Medical Center
Job Category : Information Technology
Job Specialty : Bus Intelligence/Reporting
Overtime Status : EXEMPT
Primary Shift : Day
Shift Duration : 8 hour
Base Pay : $94,764 - $161,096",3.9,CEDARS-SINAI,California,10000+ Employees,1902.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,128.0,California,122.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","The Bioanalytics Systems & Technologies Group focuses on driving analytics to take advantage of vast and rapidly expanding biological datasets to address national security needs. The Group’s efforts include developing software architectures and systems, bioinformatics tools, and AI algorithms to further the nation’s efforts in chemical and biological defense, biosecurity, public and global health and warfighter performance.

Job Description

Our group is seeking a highly motivated data scientist to join our diverse and multi-functional team. As a Technical Staff member, you may be responsible for contributing to technical solutions as well as working with the sponsor, understanding their needs, translating them to a technical roadmap, and leading multidisciplinary teams to bring that to fruition. We are looking for an individual who has a strong background a technical field and who will further the Group’s mission by developing and applying state-of -the-art data science technologies that can help us address key national stakeholder needs. Example areas of effort include, but are not limited to, assessing the AI data readiness of systems, prototyping reference data science architectures, and leveraging multi-omics, clinical, and imaging data to provide insights for therapeutic suitability for a range of diseases. As a Technical Staff member, you will be a principal investigator for projects, lead teams, define research plans, and provide technical and management oversight.

Requirements

Ph.D. in Data Science, Mathematics, Physics, Computational Biology, Biomedical Engineering, or related scientific field or equivalent experience in technical analysis. In lieu of a Ph.D., a master’s degree with 5+ years of directly related experience will be considered.
Demonstrated ability to derive actionable information from multi-modal data.
Ability to work collaboratively and lead highly interdisciplinary teams.
Demonstrated skills in scientific writing, as well as development and clear presentation of technical materials to a wide spectrum of technical and non-technical audiences.
Occasional travel (<10%) with optional opportunities for travel.

At MIT Lincoln Laboratory, our exceptional career opportunities include many outstanding benefits to help you stay healthy, feel supported, and enjoy a fulfilling work-life balance. Benefits offered to employees include:
Comprehensive health, dental, and vision plans
MIT-funded pension
Matching 401K
Paid leave (including vacation, sick, parental, military, etc.)
Tuition reimbursement and continuing education programs
Mentorship programs
A range of work-life balance options
... and much more!
Please visit our Benefits page for more information. As an employee of MIT, you can also take advantage of other voluntary benefits, discounts and perks.
Selected candidate will be subject to a pre-employment background investigation and must be able to obtain and maintain a Secret level DoD security clearance.
MIT Lincoln Laboratory is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran status, disability status, or genetic information; U.S. citizenship is required.

Requisition ID: 41544",4.4,MIT Lincoln Laboratory,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1951.0,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,MA,73.0,0,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$184K
/yr","We are the Web and Work Experiences team within M365 Core, focused on creating the best AI Copilot Web and Work Experiences for commercial users. Our team develops engaging, modern chat solutions for information workers and enterprise users, delivering exceptional Web and Work Copilot experiences. To help us reach our goals and collaborate with key partners in design, research, product management, and data science, we are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to shape the future of M365 Copilot.

In this role as a Senior Data Scientist you will have the opportunity to work with teams across Microsoft and globally, developing innovative AI solutions for enterprise users across all commercial platforms within Microsoft. You’ll contribute to components integrated into applications across the Microsoft 365 ecosystem, spanning both desktop and mobile platforms. If you are passionate about building scalable, fault-tolerant services and developing components that are accessible and inclusive of all users, we encourage you to apply for this exciting opportunity!

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
We are seeking a talented and motivated Data Scientist with a strong Data Scientist with a passion for analyzing large scale data to identify insights to grow business and improve user experience. In this role, you will have the opportunity to collaborate with teams across Microsoft, leverage state-of-the-art technology and contribute to exciting products like Copilot.
Build a solid understanding of the business and the metrics that drive performance
Process and analyze big data using Statistical, Machine Learning modeling, to identify opportunities, patterns, pain points in users’ journey and provide insights to the leadership teams to help in driving user experience and product growth.
Research, propose and implement innovative solutions to enhance our tools, processes, and analytics capabilities.
Collaborate with PMs, data scientists, developers and partner teams.
Work with Product teams on roadmap, define KPI, forecast and measure product goals.
Embody our Culture and Values
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
o OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results))
o OR equivalent experience.
2+ years customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Other Requirements:

Ability to meet Microsoft, customer and/or government security screening requirements are required for this role. These requirements include but are not limited to the following specialized security screenings:
Microsoft Cloud Background Check: This position will be required to pass the Microsoft Cloud background check upon hire/transfer and every two years thereafter.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proven experience building and deploying machine learning models in real-world scenarios.
Experience working with both structured and unstructured data.
Excellent problem-solving and critical thinking abilities.
Strong communication skills with the ability to convey complex data concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Self-starter with the ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Continuous learning mindset and a passion for staying updated on the latest industry trends.
Ability to mentor and guide data analysts, providing technical oversight and ensuring best practices.
Solid analytical skills with a track record of solving complex problems.
Knowledge of big data tools such as Hadoop, Spark, or similar.
Experience in Chat bot domain, online service, app, or Web site for millions of users.
Data Science IC4 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $117,200 - $229,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $153,600 - $250,200 per year. Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until November 1, 2024

#M365CORE #MSAI
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,United States,10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,184.0,United States,49.0,0,0,1,1,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$150K
/yr","About Us
Capital Bank N.A. is headquartered in Maryland, and has been serving our communities since 1999. We stand as a publicly traded company (NASDAQ: CBNK) with over $2 billion in assets. We offer commercial and consumer banking services to clients in Maryland, DC, and Northern Virginia, alongside two nation-wide lending brands; Capital Bank Home Loans and OpenSky, a credit card division that offers and services credit cards across all states. Our personalized approach to banking, paired with cutting-edge technology solutions and a comprehensive suite of products and services, fuels our growth, and enables us to support our customers at every stage in their financial journey.

OpenSky, a division of Capital Bank, NA, is an issuer of secured credit cards. We provide an entry-level credit product for consumers with a need to build or establish a credit history. The business is going through a phase of investment and rapid growth. OpenSky is a dynamic and entrepreneurial environment where you are limited only by your imagination. Being a data-driven business, OpenSky is building out a robust analytics team.

Come join a bank where our employees thrive and are engaged in meaningful work. For the last 4 out of 5 years, Capital Bank was named one of the ""Best Banks to Work For"" in the U.S. by American Banker.

Position Purpose
The Senior Data Scientist will build and maintain customer valuation models, as well as analyze and optimize customer acquisition and retention strategies. You will be constantly seeking opportunities to improve response rates, lower acquisition costs, reduce process cycle times and optimize revenue. This role will analyze the strategic landscape to find areas where we should be competing, including financial product offerings, service offerings and technologies.

Position Responsibilities
Build and maintain customer valuation models
Analyze customer segments for targeting purposes
Analyze current customer base for retention programs and cross-sell opportunities
Analyze business intelligence data and provide insights that drive potential new tactics and strategies
Partner across the organization and with external vendors to initiate, prioritize, scope, design and deliver new programs
Minimum Education and Experience
4 to 8 years work experience in an analytical environment
High aptitude for problem solving
Ability to connect analysis to business solutions
Proven analytical and critical thinking skills, with extreme attention to detail
Capacity to prioritize and manage multiple tasks simultaneously without sacrificing quality
Must be an entrepreneurial spirit and thinker, capable of working in a highly fluid, fast-paced environment
Technical Knowledge and Skills
“Data Fluent” with exposure or basic skills in SQL and / or other data tools
Advanced Excel user, including Pivot Tables, Lookups, Formulas, Graphs
Experience in building financial and valuation models
Education
Bachelor’s degree
Working Arrangements
This is a hybrid role expected to work in office Monday, Tuesday, Thursday, and Friday. You will be able to work remotely on Wednesday.
Compensation
Base Salary Range: $120,335 - $180,502 annually. Final determination of where you are at in the salary range is based on numerous factors such as relevant experience, skill set, education, and ability to meet qualifications within the job description.
Additional Compensation: This role will include a yearly annual target bonus based on individual performance.

Why Join Us?
Join a growing company with a culture that fosters an entrepreneurial spirit
Comprehensive benefits package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Company Paid Life Insurance, Disability Insurance, and more!
Company Contributions to your 401k - Regardless of your contribution
Employee Perks: Paid Parental Leave, Employee Recognition Program, Leadership Program, Tuition Reimbursement Program, Employee Bank Checking Account, and much more!
Generous Paid Time Off and Paid Holidays – Including Paid Charity Hours to support volunteer opportunities

Supporting Businesses. Helping People. Strengthening Communities.
Capital Bank, N.A. is an Affirmative Action, E-Verify, and Equal Opportunity Employer.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Capital Bank, N.A.","Rockville, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1999.0,Company - Public,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,150.0,MD,25.0,0,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$101K
/yr","Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,101.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist IV,"$151K
/yr","About the company
Albertsons Companies is at the forefront of the revolution in retail. With a fixation on raising the bar with innovation and building belonging through our culture, our team is rallying our company around a unique purpose : to create joy around each table and inspire a healthier tomorrow for every community.
Albertsons Companies is one of the largest food and drug retailers in the United States, with over 2,200 stores in 34 states and the District of Columbia. Our well-known banners include Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen, Carrs, Kings Food Markets, and Balducci's Food Lovers Market. We support our stores with 22 distribution centers and 19 manufacturing plants.
Placing a premium on adaptability, safety and family well-being, our work model, Presence with a Purpose, offers a hybrid work environment between remote work and office time. A one-size-fits-all approach does not apply to everyone, and teams are empowered to make decisions best for them.
Bring your flavor
Building the future of food and well-being starts with you. Join our team and bring your best self to the table.
#bringyourflavor
#LI-ST4
What you will be doing

The Data Science team at Albertsons Companies is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work for the most transformational food and drug retailers in the United States. Albertsons operates over 2,300 stores under 19 well-known banners including Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen and Carrs. The company reported revenue of over $60 billion from over 34 million weekly shoppers and is the third largest private company in the country.
Data Science at Albertsons is inspired to build best in class customer experience and revolutionize the food and drug retail industry. We are looking for people who are excited in re-imagining the grocery experience by harnessing the power of AI and digital technologies. The Data Science team collects and relies on big data from existing stores and customer interactions at the 2300 nationwide stores and beyond. We are a highly driven team that applies data science to delight our customers, to improve store operations, to optimize supply chain and to proactively improve product lifecycle.
You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into business impacts on regular basis. You will work closely with other data scientists and business partners in identifying and defining data science projects, building machine learning algorithms and models on top of existing data platforms. The candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field with experience working with large data sets and applying data-driven decision making. A successful candidate will be both technically strong and business savvy, with a passion to make an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. You are a self-starter, smart yet humble, with a bias for action.
This position is primarily located in Pleasanton, California, but the candidate can work virtually from anywhere in the US. Our other affiliated teams are located in Phoenix, AZ; Boise, ID; Plano, TX; Vancouver, BC. We can offer additional location options upon request.
Main responsibilities

Collaborate with business teams to develop production grade machine learning models on large-scale datasets and improve customers’ overall shopping experience
Use machine learning to solve real problems, power the next generation experience for large scale applications.
Be a thought partner in the area of Experimentation and drive end to end process in designing and running complex experiments (A/B tests, Pre-Post, Interleaving), proactively see new opportunities.
Develop statistical and machine learning projects in experimentation using a wide variety of methodologies, including causal inference techniques, Bayesian framework
Identify key drivers for customer satisfaction and opportunities to delight customers through mining complex data
Apply machine learning to enhance recommendation engines and deliver personalized user experience on ecommerce website and loyalty mobile app
Build models and algorithms to fuel growth initiatives for Digital, Merchandising, Marketing and Loyalty teams
Apply predictive modeling techniques to optimize the forecasts for planning needs
Scale up prototypes and implement reliable automated production workflow for models
Collaborate with software development engineers to integrate models
The salary range is $131,600 to $171,080 annually. Starting salary will vary based on criteria such as location, experience, and qualifications. There may be flexibility for exceptional candidates.

What we are searching for

Master’s or PhD degree in quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, Math, Statistics or related fields
2+ years of industry experience in applying data science and modeling methodologies: regression model, survival model, ensemble modeling, NLP, recommendation algorithm, clustering, deep learning algorithm, experimental design (Multivariate/A-B testing) and nonparametric Bayesian modeling etc.
2+ years of experience and proficiency in SQL, Python and/or Spark-ML
2+ years of SQL development skills writing queries, transforming data, mining structured and unstructured data.
2+ years of hands-on experience in building data science solutions and production-ready systems on big data platforms such as Snowflake, Spark, Hadoop
Strong teamwork and communication skill
Ability to write production-level code in Python
Experience with Snowflake, Azure Databricks is a strong plus
What is it like at Albertsons?
Our 290,000 associates have a passion for great service and building lasting relationships with our customers. Through a companywide focus on innovation, we are continually enhancing our digital and product offerings, making it easy for customers to get what they need, wherever they are.
Albertsons is an Equal Opportunity Employer
This Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ethnicity, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, or on any other basis prohibited by law. Consistent with applicable state and local law, the Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We endeavor to make this site accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact us at 1-888-255-2269(option #4).",3.4,Albertsons Companies,"Pleasanton, CA",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Grocery Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,151.0,CA,85.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
Our common values and focus on inclusion and respect drive the decisions made by our company, teams and people. This is why we are committed to hiring and building diverse teams representative of the customers we serve globally. When you join our team, you can apply your unique life and job experiences and work in an environment where your ideas are heard, your contributions are celebrated, and your whole-self matters.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
About Cat Financial
Cat Financial is a subsidiary of Caterpillar Inc., the world’s leading manufacturer of construction and mining equipment, off-highway diesel and natural gas engines, industrial gas turbines and diesel-electric locomotives. For more than 40 years, Cat Financial has provided a wide range of financing solutions to customers and Cat® dealers for machines, engines, Solar® gas turbines, genuine Cat parts and services. Headquartered in Nashville, Tennessee, Cat Financial serves customers globally with offices and subsidiaries located throughout North and South America, Asia, Australia, Europe and Africa. Visit cat.com to learn more about Cat Financial.
Role Definition
Performs analytical tasks and initiatives on large datasets to support data-driven business decisions, with focus on modeling of credit risk for loan origination and credit allowance.
Responsibilities
Support the team’s development, implementation and management of scoring, probability of default and loss given default data, models and methodologies utilized for the Allowance Process, as well as for Auto Decisioning processes globally.
Collect and curate data from various systems for use in model development, validation, and inference.
Use various data visualization technologies to produce reports and dashboards for management.
Conduct literature research on models and methodologies, capturing industry best practices and market and regulatory trends
Provide analytics expertise and promote innovation and process automation.
D e g r e e Requirement
A 4-year college or university degree in a business or quantitative discipline, preferably in Data Science, Statistics or Computer Science. A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience and an advanced degree in a quantitative discipline are strongly preferred
S k il l Descriptors
B us i n e s s Statistics: Knowledge of the statistical tools, processes, and practices to describe business results in measurable scales; ability to use statistical tools and processes to assist in making business decisions.
Understands basic statistical concepts such as sample size, various statistical distributions, joint and conditional probabilities, hypothesis testing, and goodness of fit tests.
Works with various statistical software tools.
Explains reasons for common statistical errors, misinterpretations, and misrepresentations.
A cc u racy and Attention to Detail: Understanding the necessity and value of accuracy; ability to complete tasks with high levels of precision.
Evaluates and makes contributions to best practices.
Processes large quantities of detailed information with high levels of accuracy.
Productively balances speed and accuracy.
Implements a variety of cross-checking approaches and mechanisms.
Demonstrates expertise in quality assurance tools, techniques, and standards.
A n a l y t i c a l Thinking: Knowledge of techniques and tools that promote effective analysis; ability to determine the root cause of organizational problems and create alternative solutions that resolve these problems.
Approaches a situation or problem by defining the problem or issue and determining its significance.
Makes a systematic comparison of two or more alternative solutions.
Uses logic and intuition to make inferences about the meaning of the data and arrive at conclusions.
M a c h i n e Learning: Knowledge of principles, technologies and algorithms of machine learning; ability to develop, implement and deliver related systems, products and services.
Completed specific tasks and initiates utilizing machine learning technologies.
Utilizes specific tools and techniques to process descriptive and inferential statistics.
Applies specific computing languages and tools in machine learning, such as R and Python.
Explores to use machine learning to make business improvements.
Conducts data mining and cleaning initiatives.
P rogramming Languages: Knowledge of concepts and capabilities of programming; ability to use tools, techniques and platforms in order to write and modify programming languages.
Works with low-code/no-code tools, e.g. Alteryx, PowerApps, etc.
Participates in the implementation and support of specialized programming languages.
Conducts basic reviews on writing a specific programming language within a specific platform.
Follows an organization's standards, policies and guidelines for structured programming specifications.
Diagnoses and reports minor or routine programming language problems.
Q u e ry and Database Access Tools: Knowledge of data management systems; ability to use, support and access facilities for searching, extracting and formatting data for further use.
Defines, creates and tests queries by using associated command language in a specific environment.
Applies appropriate query tools used to connect to the data warehouse.
Obtains and analyzes query results.
Employs tested query statements to retrieve, insert, update and delete information.
Works with advanced features and functions.
#LI-Hybrid
Relocation is available for this position.Visa Sponsorship is not available for this position. This employer is not currently hiring foreign national applicants that require or will require sponsorship tied to a specific employer, such as, H, L, TN, F, J, E, O. As a global company, Caterpillar offers many job opportunities outside of the U.S which can be found through our employment website at www.caterpillar.com/careers.
Posting Dates:
October 15, 2024 - October 22, 2024
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Nashville, TN",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,TN,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$209K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 12, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200571863

Would you like a chance to be part of a diverse team driving product impact using meticulous measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to create innovative technologies, methodologies, and research to enable amazing user experiences and advance the frontier of machine learning. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product and methodology evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with various engineering teams to improve product quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Use data from multiple types of sources including human annotation data. Build and prototype analysis pipelines and visualizations iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products using rigorous and innovative ways with the data at hand. You are determined to making and sharing impactful work through methodological development and articulate and persuasive communication.
Experience in data science, machine learning, and analytics, including statistical data analysis and A/B testing.
Using Foundation Models for data science: prompt engineering and fine-tune foundational models for specific tasks.
Strong communication skills and the ability to naturally explain difficult technical topics to everyone from data scientists to engineers to business partners.
Strong programming skills, including data-querying skills (SQL) and experience with Python scripting language for data processing and development. Be able to translate ideas/methods into code and dashboards without hesitation.
M.S in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Operations Research or related areas.

Preferred Qualifications
Ph.D. in machine learning, computer science, statistics, operations research or related areas.
Experience with large language models, leveraging LLM for evaluation and product improvement.
Worked in areas intersecting Responsible AI and Generative AI
Worked with methods that account for variability in human annotation data
Some comfort in the use of JavaScript frameworks to design UI mock ups.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $166,600 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,209.0,WA,48.0,1,0,0,0,0
Health Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) has an immediate need for a ealth Data Scientist t provide mid-level support related to the surveillance of arboviral diseases for our government customer located in Fot Collins, Colorado. o
tion may include periodic travel and need for flexible work schedule to accommodate alternate time zones. DE
IPTION OF RESPONSIBILITIES: Pro
mid-level support related to the surveillance of arboviral diseases. Support
e Surveillance and Epidemiology Team Lead (or designee). Data mana
ent of ADB surveillance system. Ensure that
propriate state partners maintain access to the surveillance system. Perform routi
data downloads to the central database. Run SAS program
identify any abnormal findings in the data (e.g., clinical symptoms do not match reported clinical syndrome; arbovirus in new area not previously documented, pregnant male, etc.). Will communicate with appropriate partner at state health department to resolve and/or investigate issues. Generate surveill
e reports using data management and visualization software. Generate routine re
ts during the transmission season using statistical data and visualization tools such as SAS, R, MS Excel, ArcGIS, and Tableau. Analyses are primarily descriptive. Surveillance reports
include: 1) PDF reports are emailed to all state partners and state epidemiologists; 2) updating CDC websites and dashboards with preliminary and final year data; and 3) internal surveillance data reports used for presentations and publications. Responding to internal
external surveillance data requests. Reconciling surveillance
a with state and local health partners. Participate in regular conf
nce calls; provide subject matter expertise related to the ArboNET surveillance system; confirmation of message transmissions; run diagnostics to confirm that messages are correctly transmitted; help jurisdictions and other CDC staff troubleshoot when problems are identified. Participating in meetings and
nference calls by preparing and presenting data and data and answering technical questions. Support public health response
research activities related to viral vector-borne pathogens and related diseases. CDC Emergency Response: Support p
ic health emergency response, including remote and field- based deployments to assist with responding to pandemics and other emerging threats. Provide administrative and logistical support for CDC Emergency Operations Center activities. This may occur through Incident Management Structure teams or direct support to state and local health departments. Will be expected to maintain high d
quality standards and will be responsible for maintaining standard operational procedures for all data management activities. Will work closely with SET staff and
ormatics staff to address technical issues related to reporting and assist with activities related to CDC’s ongoing efforts to strengthen and modernize the national disease surveillance system. REQUIRED DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATI
Must have a Bachelors in Biologics, Mi
ology, or related discipline. Preferred a MS in Statistics, Applied Anal
cs, Data Science, Business Analytics REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE: Strong SA
kills/experience - writing SAS
and debugging SAS code. Experience with large data sets; experience spe
ically with public health surveillance data a plus. DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE: Strong data visu
zatn skills desired. Competent
ing with Tableau or PowerBI a major plus. REQUIRED CITIZENSHIP AND CLEARANCE: Must be a US Citi
. Must be able to pass a NACI backg
check. The Alaka`ia
ndation Family of Companies (FOCs) is a fast-
owing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries. Eligible full-time employees enjoy a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 11 paid holidays. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We ar
roud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees. The Ak`ina oundation Family of Companies (FOCs) is comprised of
dustry-recognized government service firms designated as Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO)-owned and 8(a) certified businesses. The Family of Companies (FOCs) includes Ke`aki Technologies, Laulima Government Solutions, Kūpono Government Services, and Kāpili Services, Po`okela Solutions, Kīkaha Solutions, LLC, and Pololei Solutions, LLC. Alaka`ina Foundation activities principally benefit the youth of Hawaii through charitable efforts which includes providing innovative educational programs that combine leadership, science & technology, and environmental stewardship. For additional information, please visit www.alakainafoundation.com",3.8,Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies,"Fort Collins, CO",1001 to 5000 Employees,,Government,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,113.0,CO,,0,0,0,0,1
Advanced Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Advance Data Scientist
Advance Data Scientist for Honeywell International, Inc. in Atlanta, GA

Responsibilities:
Develop data modeling, mining, pattern analysis, data visualization and machine learning solutions to address customer needs.
Provide technical leadership by guiding the team to drive optimization and efficiency across scalable solutions.
Foster relationships with business team members by being proactive, displaying a thorough understanding of the business processes and by recommending innovative solutions.
Communicate project output in terms of customer value, business objectives, and product opportunity.
Promote data science methods and processes across functions.
Work with our businesses and infrastructure teams to develop a strategy that will clearly outline how our enterprise platforms can enable business growth & productivity.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Location: Atlanta, GA
40 hours/week
Employee Referral Fee: $1500
If offered employment must have legal right to work in U.S. EOE.
YOU MUST HAVE:
Qualified applicants must have a Master’s degree or foreign equivalent in Computer Science, Information Science, Operation Research, Engineering, Mathemetics, Statistics, or a related field, and over 2 years of experience in Data Science. Full term of experience must include: Data Science and Analytics; Machine learning engineering, Microsoft Azure; Databricks; Natural Language Processing (NLP); and coding in Python, Jupyter Notebooks. Telecommuting permitted up to two (2) times per week.
Additional Information
JOB ID: req467879
Category: Engineering
Location: 715 Peachtree Street, N.E.,Atlanta,Georgia,30308,United States
Exempt
Honeywell is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, religion, or veteran status.",4.0,Honeywell,"Atlanta, GA",10000+ Employees,1885.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,123.0,GA,139.0,1,0,0,0,0
Sr. Data Analyst,"$108K
/yr","Take a leap and join our team!
At Gesa, we believe in the power of our people. Coming from all walks of life, our team members individual stories and unique experiences are our most valuable asset. But its how we come together, igniting our collective compassion and commitment to empowering our communities, that makes us succeed. Because we know we go further when we go together.
Here you can join a team who is passionate about serving others, has a desire to do good, and shares a deep love of people. You can engage in meaningful work that impacts your community. You can challenge yourself and grow in your career. And, you can rest assured that your wellbeing and prosperity are our priority.
Get to know us:About - Gesa Credit Union
Role Summary:
Under the general supervision of the Data Integrity & Business Intelligence Manager/Team Leader, a Senior Data Analyst is responsible for supporting the business intelligence and data governance needs of the Credit Union. Primary duties shall include the maintenance and validation of the Credit Unions data governance system, development of business intelligence tools, and creation of business intelligence reporting to meet the needs of stakeholders within the Credit Union to further their ability to make quality, data driven decisions. As a member of the Risk and Performance Team, a Senior Data Analyst will be an integral part of the ongoing strategic planning and monitoring process for the Credit Union.
What You Will Be Doing:
Act as a team lead within the Risk and Performance Department. Represent Risk and Performance in projects and committees as assigned.
Lead the development, maintenance, and support of accurate analytical models, Business Intelligence/reporting systems, and data warehouse solutions to meet the business intelligence needs of the Credit Union and its stakeholders.
Work with internal stakeholders to identify new reporting, dash boarding, and analytical opportunities in furtherance of the Credit Unions business and strategic goals. Lead the implementation of identified opportunities and work with stakeholders to drive adoption.
Support the ongoing validation and maintenance of the Credit Unions data sources in support of the Credit Unions data governance framework.
Design, develop, and maintain the Credit Unions Data Warehouse and other databases in furtherance of the business intelligence goals of the Credit Union.
Assist with various data validation, balancing, and business intelligence projects.
Develop and maintain business intelligence systems and capabilities that support the needs of a diverse group of Credit Union stakeholders. Lead the training of stakeholders throughout the organization on the Credit Unions business intelligence systems.
Monitor indicators of performance and quality metrics and ensure compliance with data related policies, standards, roles and responsibilities, and adoption requirements. Provide suggestions for improved performance and adherence when appropriate.
Lead evaluations of the Credit Unions quality control systems and report findings along with recommendations for improvements as needed.
Lead the training of new team members within the Credit Unions Business Intelligence team with a focus on the tools and methods utilized by the team to accomplish their essential job functions.
Develop and maintain an expert level of knowledge regarding the Credit Unions core operating systems, data warehouse solutions, and business intelligence systems and software solutions.
Identify and troubleshoot data-related problems and make maintenance or modification suggestions.
Assist with the Credit Unions annual budgeting and forecasting processes along with other major Risk & Performance Team initiatives as assigned.
Must understand and perform Bank Secrecy Act (BSA) functions as applicable to job responsibilities.
Attend Credit Union training sessions, conferences, or seminars as approved by Management.Maintain awareness of policies and regulations related to duties and responsibilities.
Maintain and protect all sensitive data utilizing the highest standard of confidentiality and professionalism. Consistently display respect for all areas of diversity and levels of knowledge.
Display mutual respect, trust and dignity. Act in the best interest of the Credit Union; lead by example by displaying solid ethics and integrity at all times. Control risk and manage duties and tasks in a safe and sound manner.
Maintain a general knowledge of all Credit Union products and services, as well as the activities of departments.
About You:
Ability to maintain thorough knowledge of Credit Union business lines, processes, and products.
Strong analytical, quantitative, and modeling skills.
Ability to quickly grasp and adapt to changes in business models and new technologies.
Strong knowledge of relational databases, data mining techniques, and business intelligence tools.
Ability to write complex queries using tools such as SQL for reporting, analytics, and business intelligence.
Excellent interpersonal and listening skills.
Demonstrate commitment to continual process improvement.
Ability to work jointly and successfully in a team environment.
Able to successfully and professionally communicate both orally and in writing.
Able to prioritize tasks and projects with varying deadlines and priorities.
What You Will Need:
Four-year degree in Mathematics, Economics, Accounting, Finance, Data Analysis, Statistics; or equivalent training, coursework, and experience.
A minimum of eight years of similar or related experience; financial institution environment experience preferred.
High level of proficiency with business intelligence tools and large-scale data management.
Ability to interpret, validate, and balance large amounts of financial data with relative ease.
Proficient with standard office equipment, word processing and reporting.
Our Team Member Value Proposition:
In exchange for bringing your talent to Gesa, here are a just a few of the benefits and perks we offer:
Competitive Pay
Medical, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
20 days/year of Paid Time Off Plus 10 Paid Holidays!
401(k) Match
Incentive Program
Tuition Assistance and Student Loan Repayment
Commuter Benefits
Paid Time Off to Volunteer in the Community
Product discounts
Engaging Work Environment
Rewards and Recognition Programs
Salary Range:
$86,586.54 - $129,879.81
Get wise to whats possible with a career at Gesa. Join us!
We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact the HR Department at (509) 378-3100 or hrmail@gesa.com to request an accommodation.
Gesa Credit Union reserves the right to revise or change the job description as the need arises. This job description is not all inclusive of total job responsibilities nor does it constitute a written or implied contract of employment.
Selected candidate(s) must be able to pass a pre-employment credit/background check.
Gesa Credit Union is an Equal Opportunity Employer and strong advocate of workforce diversity. Race/Color/Gender/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Religion/National Origin/Disability/Veteran.
Equal Employment Opportunity (gesa.com)",4.7,Gesa Credit Union,"Richland, WA",501 to 1000 Employees,1953.0,Nonprofit Organization,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,108.0,WA,71.0,0,0,0,0,1
Homeless & Community Development Data & Research Scientist,"$110K
/yr","Description:
The Cloudburst Group is a unique small business working at the intersection of domestic and international development to strengthen government programs that benefit low-income and vulnerable populations.
As part of its compensation package, The Cloudburst Group offers a robust benefits program to full-time, part-time, and intermittent employees based on their eligibility, which includes paid time off, health insurance, life insurance, retirement savings, flexible spending accounts, and voluntary supplemental benefits.
The expected compensation range for this position is: $100,000 to $120,000, yearly
The Cloudburst Group is seeking a Senior Data and Research Scientist to join its Homeless Assistance Team and support other domestic research projects. Cloudburst has a growing portfolio of data analysis, research, and evaluation projects with state, local, and federal government clients, including funding from HUD’s Office of Special Needs Assistance Programs to support local communities to effectively use data to drive strategic decision-making.
We’re looking for someone to provide leadership in the execution of current projects, liaise with clients to scope and manage work, and drive strategic growth through organic and new business development. Cloudburst is looking for someone who:
Is passionate about finding solutions to homelessness and reducing disparities in housing outcomes.
Is grounded in the data, evidence, and research on solutions to prevent and end homelessness.
Is a collaborative problem solver and analytic thinker with experience harnessing the power of data and/or evaluation to measure program effectiveness.
Homelessness disproportionately impacts Black, Indigenous, and People of Color as a result of structural and institutional racism. Cloudburst believes that effective solutions to homelessness are created with communities historically impacted by the systems we are attempting to transform. We strongly encourage applications from people who are representative of the culturally and ethnically diverse communities we work with, as well as from those with lived experience of homelessness.
RESPONSIBILITIES
This position will lead a variety of data analysis, evaluation, and applied research projects. It will require flexibility, self-motivation, and the willingness to work and collaborate in remote settings.
Specific responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Designing data-driven improvement strategies for homeless continuums of care (CoCs), leveraging community Homeless Management Information System (HMIS) and other data to help guide community planning
Assisting in collecting, managing, and analyzing data from homelessness or other social service programs for a variety of research and evaluation projects.
Supporting research and other initiatives on issues of concern to Cloudburst at the intersection of housing, homelessness, gender-based violence, disaster resilience and response, community, and economic development that center persons with lived experience.
Designing collaborative research, theories of change, and key research questions to address client’s needs; including presenting results and findings in easy-to-understand presentations with actionable recommendations.
Providing leadership, coaching, staff, and contractor supervision as well as quality assurance oversight of projects.
Establishing and maintaining positive client relationships that foster organic growth and inform new business pursuits.
Identifying strategic growth opportunities and contributing to new business pursuits, especially in the areas of program evaluation.
Requirements:
Master's degree or higher (PhD preferred) in a related field and a minimum of 15 years of relevant work experience, or significant life experience in the field of homelessness or housing.
Experience with impact and performance evaluations; data collection and analysis, including both qualitative and quantitative research. Academic experience is acceptable, on-the-job experience is preferred.
Proficiency with Excel (e.g., pivot tables, VLOOKUP) and GIS analysis is required. Experience with NVIVO, Stata, or other data analysis software is preferred.
Strong writing and analysis skills.
Familiarity with Google G-Suite products.
Experience with data visualization software (e.g., PowerBI) is preferred.
Knowledge of HUD homelessness programs and Homeless Management Information Systems is preferred.
COMPANY INFORMATION
The Cloudburst Group (Cloudburst) is a mission-driven Women-Owned Small Business whose staff strives to create impact, empower communities, and build resiliency. Cloudburst works at the intersection of domestic and international development with the goal of improving the effectiveness of programs and investments targeted to build social, economic, and environmental resilience in the U.S. and abroad.
Cloudburst’s work is guided by a mission to improve economic, social, and environmental resilience. To this end, many of the populations and communities we work with focus on addressing structural and institutional racism that disproportionately impacts Black, Indigenous, and other people of color. Cloudburst believes that effective services and solutions are created with communities historically impacted by the systems we are attempting to transform. We strongly encourage applications from people who are representative of the culturally and ethnically diverse communities we work with.
The Cloudburst Group is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. Cloudburst will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.",4.3,The Cloudburst Group,Maryland,Unknown,,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,110.0,Maryland,,0,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Analytics & Data","$138K
/yr","About the Team:
At Williams Sonoma, our brand promise is to nourish people's lives. This mission inspires us, informs our strategy, and makes us special. You will engage our customers as part of the Marketing Strategy, Data Science, & Analytics team through insights, analysis, data reporting, modeling, machine learning and AI development. Our team ensures that we are engaging with our customers at the right time and in the right place by always measuring and improving upon our success. You will love working with incredible marketers and strategists across the company.
About the Role:
This role works closely with the other senior data scientists on the team to enhance our products, develop new tools, and create actionable recommendations. You will also collaborate with cross-functional teams in an omnichannel marketing organization and be exposed to various technology stacks (MarTech, AdTech, FinTech, etc.). The day-to-day work will include data modeling, developing machine learning/AI algorithms, data mining, analysis and presentation of your work to the team(s). This role requires an individual to have a healthy amount of intellectual curiosity, creativity, and an innovative mindset.
You're excited about this opportunity because you will…
Take ownership of data models, datasets, manage data integrity, preparation, cleansing, and final delivery of your work for senior leadership
Own data quality assurance and management protocols/processes
Develop ML/AI applications, maintain dashboards, documentation, and reporting
Stay updated with current ML/AI trends to improve and advance existing processes with more automation
Support production models and enrich existing ML/AI framework to improve performance accuracy and reduce costs of ML/AI systems
Test, learn, and run machine learning/AI experiments comparing different techniques and algorithms
Scale and automate analyses for marketing across 8 brands
Support adhoc and recurring requests for multiple cross-functional teams
We're excited about you because you have...
Bachelors’ Degree or higher education in Applied ML/AI, Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Analytics, Economics, or related technical field
Excel, SQL, R, Python Required; Other programming/scripting languages a plus
3+ years of professional experience or equivalent academic course work in Machine Learning/AI, statistical modeling, data analytics, market research, or other data centric role
Understanding, knowledge, and experience or equivalent academic work in Long Short Term Memory with Attention (LSTM-a), Markov Chain Monte Carlo (MCMC) algorithms, Deep Learning Neural Network, Prophet/NeuralProphet, Regression (Bayesian, SARIMA, ARIMA), A/B testing, and other methodologies or algorithms
Proficient using Databricks, TensorFlow, Keras, Jupyter Notebook, Ubuntu and/or other data science tools
Experience with Marketing Mix Modeling and/or Multi-Touch Attribution a huge plus
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills are a must
Strong attention to details and problem-solving abilities
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
About Williams-Sonoma, Inc.:
Founded in 1956, Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is the premier specialty retailer of high-quality products for the kitchen and home in the United States. Our family of brands are Williams-Sonoma, Pottery Barn, Pottery Barn Kids, PBteen, West Elm, Williams-Sonoma Home, Rejuvenation, and Mark and Graham. These brands are among the best known and most respected in the industry. We offer beautifully designed, stylish and functional products for every area of the home, including the kitchen, living room, bedroom, home office, closet, laundry room and even outdoor spaces. We've seen some big changes since our first brick-and-mortar store opened more than half of a century ago. What hasn't changed is our passion for high-quality products, functional design, outstanding customer service, and enhancing the lives of our customers and the communities where we operate. Today, we're a multi-brand, multi-channel, global enterprise supported by state-of-the-art technology and some of the most talented teams in retailing - and we're always looking for new energy and ideas.
WSI will not now or in the future commence an immigration case or ""sponsor"" an individual for this position (for example, H-1B or other employment-based immigration. This role is not eligible for relocation assistance.
Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Williams-Sonoma, Inc. will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, or other applicable state or local laws and ordinances.
The expected starting pay range for this position is $130,000 - $145,000 annually. Applicable pay ranges may differ across markets. Actual pay will be determined based on experience and other job-related factors permitted by law. In addition to competitive pay, compensation may include a variety of other components like benefits, paid time off, merit, and bonus opportunities.

Our Company

Founded in 1956, Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is the premier specialty retailer of high-quality products for the kitchen and home in the United States. Our family of brands are Williams Sonoma, Williams Sonoma Home, Pottery Barn, Pottery Barn teen, pottery barn kids, Rejuvenation, Mark & Graham, west elm, or Outward. These brands are among the best known and most respected in the industry. We offer beautifully-designed, stylish and functional products for every area of the home, including the kitchen, living room, bedroom, home office, closet, laundry room and even outdoor spaces. We've seen some big changes since our first brick-and-mortar store opened more than half of a century ago. What hasn't changed is our passion for high-quality products, functional design, outstanding customer service, and enhancing the lives of our customers and the communities where we operate. Today, we're a multi-brand, multi-channel, global enterprise supported by state-of-the-art technology and some of the most talented teams in retailing - and we're always looking for new energy and ideas.",3.3,Williams Sonoma,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,1956.0,Company - Public,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail & Wholesale,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,138.0,CA,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Purpose:
The successful candidate will be based in our Austin, TX facility and will support numerous research & development and test & evaluation projects related to defense, forensics, and national security. The candidate will be based in our Austin, TX headquarters within the Quality Assurance & Data Science Business Area. The candidate must be motivated to contribute in a team environment, collaborate across multiple scientific and technical disciplines, and be excited to develop new skills. The candidate must have the flexibility to balance multiple on-going tasks while operating efficiently with minimal supervision. As needed, the candidate should be able to direct others to accomplish project tasks. The candidate must be detail oriented and be able to appropriately document their work. Job functions will include performing data analytics and statistical analyses, training and optimizing machine learning and predictive models, generating visualizations, and developing automated data processing pipelines on chemical, biological, radio frequency (RF), visual (imagery), and text-based data.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities:
Performs data analytics, specifically data clean-up, data processing, machine learning modeling, statistical analysis, multivariate data analysis, and/or data visualization, as related to scientific data.
Applies technical skills to plan and execute assigned project work including development of data pre-processing routines, data summarizations, data visualizations and plotting, development and application of machine learning and artificial intelligence models, development of detection algorithms, and development and deployment automated processing pipelines.
Maintains operational capabilities of computational assets as needed by project requirements.
Leads meetings with company clients by preparing and presenting materials in meetings.
Appropriately annotates developed computer code/scripts with comments and through user guides/manuals.
Performs maintenance and updates of scripts/code for routine data analysis.
Presents technical results through the drafting of technical reports and presentation materials.
Presents experimental results and recommended actions at internal project meetings.
Supports business development efforts as needed by drafting technical sections of proposals, providing proposal review, assessing levels of effort required to complete proposed work, and brainstorming technical solutions to client problems.
Other duties as assigned.
Performance of all job duties is intended to be completed under limited direct supervision of their supervisor.

Required Knowledge,Skills,& Abilities:
Required
Proficiency in performing data analytics, predictive analytics, machine learning, multivariate data analysis, and data mining as it relates to scientific data
Software programming/scripting proficiency in R, Python, Java, and/or MATLAB
Experience and proficiency with Microsoft Excel, Word, and Powerpoint
Strong analytical, organizational, and problem-solving abilities are required
Ability to lead group of co-workers in execution of a task
Working knowledge of statistics, experimental error, and quantification as it applies to scientific data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to communicate technical information to non-technical audiences
Competent in using Linux/Unix operating system command line interface
Ability to work independently and to interact effectively with individuals on multi-disciplinary teams
Team player with a positive attitude

Preferred
Experience in analytical chemistry or biochemistry including chromatography, mass spectrometry, spectroscopy, hyperspectral imaging, proteomics, metabolomics, RF signal processing, genomics, or other biochemical analysis methods
Experience in developing proteomics or metabolomics data analysis pipelines
Experience with NextFlow, SnakeMake, or similar workflow/pipeline management systems
Experience in developing natural language processing (NLP) and/or machine vision models
Previous research and development experience related to chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, and/or explosive (CBRNE) threats
Working knowledge of good software development practices such as version control systems (e.g., Git) and Agile development (e.g., workflows, sprints)
Ability to develop and query relational databases (MySQL or similar)
Familiarity with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Google Cloud Platform, or Microsoft Azure cloud computing
Ability to think creatively, demonstrate curiosity, and lead research teams
Sufficient business knowledge to support marketing, and bids and proposal efforts

Education/Experience:
Successful candidate must have a Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Chemistry, Biochemistry, Biology, or a related scientific discipline with at least 3-5 years of professional experience; or a Ph.D. or Master's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Chemistry, Biochemistry, Biology, or a related scientific discipline. Successful candidate must have significant experience in software programming/scripting for scientific data analysis and machine learning modeling.

Clearance:
Candidate must be willing to seek and maintain government security clearance at the SECRET level following hire. Candidates with current DoD SECRET or other clearance will be given preference.

Working Conditions/Equipment:
Ability to sit for long periods of time at desk/computer.",3.5,"Signature Science, LLC","Austin, TX",51 to 200 Employees,,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,105.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,1
"Data Scientist, Stanford Law School","$69K
/yr","ONE-YEAR FIXED TERM POSITION
JOB PURPOSE:
The Deborah L. Rhode Center on the Legal Profession at Stanford Law School is looking for a Data Scientist to work across our research programs. This role will collaborate closely with teams of research fellows and students on projects the civil court system, access to justice, and transparency in state and federal courts. Under the direction of Rhode Center associated faculty and research affiliates, the role manage and analyze data critical to the Center’s data-science research agenda focused on expanding access to justice and transparency in U.S. Courts. This position will report to Professor David Engstrom.
CORE DUTIES*:
In collaboration and under the direction of Rhode Center research team members, lead the Center’s ongoing efforts to collect, manage, and structure large datasets from public sources.
Use cutting-edge natural language processing and machine learning tools to label high volumes of unstructured data and prepare for empirical analysis.
Conceptualize suitable empirical methodologies and models.
Develop algorithms to convert PDFs to analyzable data at scale. Conduct statistical analyses of complex datasets and interpretation of results.
Contribute original writing explaining data sources, analyses, and interpretation.
Where appropriate, have the opportunity to receive co-authorship on research papers.
Use reports and analyses to identify conflicting interpretations, make corrections/suggest solutions and determine root cause for data problems.
Collaborate with faculty and research staff on data collection and analysis methods.
Provide documentation based on audit and reporting criteria to faculty and research staff.
Communicate with government officials, grant agencies and industry representatives.
- Other duties may also be assigned
Education & Experience:
Bachelor's degree or a combination of education and relevant experience. Experience in a quantitative discipline (e.g., computer science, data science, statistics, engineering, mathematics, economics, or a related field).
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Substantial experience with MS Office and analytical programs.
Strong writing and analytical skills.
Ability to prioritize workload.
Programming experience in Python, R, SQL, and/or other languages
Prior experience working with large datasets on remote servers or cloud services is preferred
Prior experience working with machine learning, especially involving classifiers, is preferred
Outstanding academic credentials and intellectual creativity
Eagerness to take initiative and solve intricate problems
Excellent time-management skills and ability to work effectively with minimal supervision
Exceptional research, analytical writing, and communication skills
Prior research experience and coursework in the empirical social sciences is preferred, but not required
- Consistent with its obligations under the law, the University will provide reasonable accommodation to any employee with a disability who requires accommodation to perform the essential functions of the job.
WORK STANDARDS:
Interpersonal Skills: Demonstrates the ability to work well with Stanford colleagues and clients and with external organizations.
Promote Culture of Safety: Demonstrates commitment to personal responsibility and value for safety; communicates safety concerns; uses and promotes safe behaviors based on training and lessons learned.
The expected pay range for this position is $82,468 to $106,256 per annum (Stanford Region).
The expected pay range for this position is $54,763 to $83,636 per annum (Remote Region).
Stanford University provides pay ranges representing its good faith estimate of what the university reasonably expects to pay for a position. The pay offered to a selected candidate will be determined based on factors such as (but not limited to) the scope and responsibilities of the position, the qualifications of the selected candidate, departmental budget availability, internal equity, geographic location and external market pay for comparable jobs.
At Stanford University, base pay represents only one aspect of the comprehensive rewards package. The Cardinal at Work website (https://cardinalatwork.stanford.edu/benefits-rewards) provides detailed information on Stanford’s extensive range of benefits and rewards offered to employees. Specifics about the rewards package for this position may be discussed during the hiring process.
Stanford is an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
The job duties listed are typical examples of work performed by positions in this job classification and are not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, tasks, and responsibilities. Specific duties and responsibilities may vary depending on department or program needs without changing the general nature and scope of the job or level of responsibility. Employees may also perform other duties as assigned.
Stanford Law School seeks to hire the best talent and to promote a safe and secure environment for all members of the university community and its property. To that end, new staff hires must successfully pass a background check prior to starting work at Stanford University.",4.3,Stanford University,"Stanford, CA",10000+ Employees,1891.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,69.0,CA,133.0,1,0,0,0,1
IS Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Description
Overview
Identifies and integrates new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities, and work closely with the engineering team in the development of data products. Drives business results through data-based insights by leveraging variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations.
The successful applicant will work within a commutable radius of our Voorhees, NJ and report to the office on a hybrid basis (monthly, as needed). The annual salary range for this position is based on location with an annual discretionary incentive opportunity targeting up to 20% of salary.
Voorhees, NJ - $130,000 - $140,000
Philadelphia, PA - $130,000 - $140,000
New York City, NY - $145,000 - $155,000
Piscataway, NJ - $135,000 - $145,000
Named one of the 50 best non-profits to work for by the Non-Profit Times, our employees enjoy rewarding careers in a fast-paced, results-driven environment. We offer a competitive compensation package, including incentives. Eligible employees also participate in a comprehensive benefits program that includes medical, dental, orthodontia, vision coverage, student loan repayment, 403(b) retirement plan with substantial company match, discounted pet insurance, and generous paid-time-off benefits.
Responsibilities
Execute analytical experiments to help solve problems across various domains and divisions.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for business needs, collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables. Clean and transform data to eliminate irrelevant, incomplete, or inaccurate information.
Analyze raw data to identify patterns, trends, and insights. Develop statistical and predictive models to run against the data sets. Correlate similar data to find actionable results.
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes as well as to make predictions or automate decision-making.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes, analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Create data-driven products and features that can be incorporated into business processes and workflows.
Communicate findings and insights to stakeholders, providing recommendations on business strategies, and aiding in data-driven decision-making by creating data visualizations, dashboards and reports.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including engineering, IT, and business units, to understand needs and devise possible solutions.
Ensure data quality and integrity. Uphold privacy and data protection standards, considering ethical implications of data usage.
Stay updated with the latest technology trends, learning about new tools and technologies, and developing new skills. Research new techniques and best practices within the field of data science.
Demonstrates regular, reliable, and predictable job attendance.
Attends on-site and in-person meetings and training sessions.
Qualifications

Education & Experience: Master’s, PHD, or Bachelor’s Degree required in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field; and 7 or more years of professional experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, Proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis. Advanced experience in pattern recognition and predictive modeling; or an equivalent combination of education and work experience.
Communications Abilities: (Verbal) Expresses oneself clearly in conversations and interactions with others; tailors speech to the level and experience of the audience; uses appropriate grammar and choice of words; expresses ideas in a concise, organized manner; maintains eye contact when speaking with others; (Written) Expresses oneself clearly and concisely in writing; tailors written communications to effectively reach an audience; uses graphics and other aids to clarify complex or technical information; spells correctly; writes using concrete, specific language; uses punctuation correctly; writes grammatically.
Mathematical Skills: Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals; ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs; ability to understand and interpret statistical reports, data charts and graphs.
Technology Skills: Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc. Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc. Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc. Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using Tableau. Experience with machine learning and AI.
The American Arbitration Association is an equal opportunity employer (EEO) and considers all employees and applicants for positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, marital status, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.9,American Arbitration Association Inc.,"New York, NY",501 to 1000 Employees,1926.0,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,135.0,NY,98.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$208K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
A minimum of 6 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 4 years with a Ph.D.)
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$173,000/year to $242,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,208.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","In a world of possibilities, pursue one with endless opportunities. Imagine Next!
When it comes to what you want in your career, if you can imagine it, you can do it at Parsons. Imagine a career working with intelligent, diverse people sharing a common quest. Imagine a workplace where you can be yourself. Where you can thrive. Where you can find your next, right now. We’ve got what you’re looking for.
Job Description:
Parsons is looking for an amazingly talented Data Scientist to join our team! In this role you will be collaborating with headquarters and local customers to develop analytic capabilities. You will be a critical member on a small team, responsible for bringing your high-level analytic and data science skills to bear on a critical national security mission.
What You'll Be Doing:
Evaluate statistical models and other AI/ML products to determine the validity of analyses, implement evaluated models into production by collaborating with software developers, periodically re-evaluate and refine machine learning models being used in production
Perform/use statistics, machine learning and analytic approaches to answer key intelligence questions, producing results and re-usable products that provide real value to USCYBERCOM.
Apply machine learning techniques to identify and transform data features, find hidden patterns and trends, build and optimize classifiers, create automated anomaly detection systems, and automate steps of a process
Curate and collect the data from a variety of traditional and non-traditional sources: extract data from sources, transform and integrate data in line with existing data, and load data into data stores for access by others
Collaborate with other Data Scientists and other customer organizations to develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Effectively communicate ideas, design, and results to key decision makers, and other stakeholders
Develop and implement a configuration management plans for data sets and analyses to ensure thorough documentation of all processes, models, and activities
Research latest data science, AI tradecraft and technology
What Required Skills You'll Bring:
TS/SCI w/ Polygraph
Python or other relevant programming language
Minimum 5 years of experience with data science, AI, and/or analytics
Bachelor's Degree (or higher) in related field

What Desired Skills You'll Bring:
Deep understanding of the customer mission and established relationships that would enable effective cross-functional collaboration
Experience working with customer data
Experience with data extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) processes within cloud-based environments (AWS, Azure)
Minimum Clearance Required to Start:
Top Secret SCI w/Polygraph
This position is part of our Federal Solutions team.
Our Federal Solutions segment delivers resources to our US government customers that ensure the success of missions around the globe. Our diverse, intelligent employees drive the state of the art as they provide services and solutions in the areas of defense, security, intelligence, infrastructure, and environmental. We promote a culture of excellence and close-knit teams that take pride in delivering, protecting, and sustaining our nation's most critical assets, from Earth to cyberspace. Throughout the company, our people are anticipating what’s next to deliver the solutions our customers need now.
Salary Range:
$117,000.00 - $210,600.00
We value our employees and want our employees to take care of their overall wellbeing, which is why we offer best-in-class benefits such as medical, dental, vision, paid time off, 401(k), life insurance, flexible work schedules, and holidays to fit your busy lifestyle!
Parsons is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity, equity, inclusion, and accessibility in the workplace. Diversity is ingrained in who we are, how we do business, and is one of our company’s core values. Parsons equally employs representation at all job levels for minority, female, disabled, protected veteran and LGBTQ+.
We truly invest and care about our employee’s wellbeing and provide endless growth opportunities as the sky is the limit, so aim for the stars! Imagine next and join the Parsons quest—APPLY TODAY!",4.0,Parsons,Maryland,10000+ Employees,1944.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,164.0,Maryland,80.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$175K
/yr","Company Description

ATPCO is the foundation of flight shopping, providing pricing and retailing data, tools, and services to 500+ airlines, global distribution systems, sales channels, and technology companies. In addition, ATPCO links the entire airline community together, collaborating to develop industry standards for airline distribution and end-to-end technology solutions. As a result, ATPCO solutions work seamlessly across existing, new, and evolving technologies and methods from shopping to settlement. Airline-owned and reliably supporting air travel for more than 55 years, ATPCO is everywhere people buy flights.
We consider qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, gender, age, color, religion, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, disability, sexual orientation, protected military/veteran status, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, or any other legally protected factor.

Job Description

The Research Data Scientist will drive understanding, evaluation, and adoption of AI innovations relevant to ATPCO's data products and solutions. This role will provide strategic guidance, research, and domain expertise to shape ATPCO's AI strategy and airline industry engagement.
Responsibilities
Advise product teams on the models and tools our airline customers' will need to power their AI-driven dynamic offer creation, including airfare, pricing, ancillary pricing, and product selection.
Provide data science leadership in product-led engagements with airlines and tech vendors to identify customers’ problems that can be solved by models trained on ATPCO data
Lead in evaluation and design of potential AI-based ATPCO products, including around customer segmentation and impacts of external shocks (e.g., political, environmental, economic) on airline offer creation
Advise data engineers on AI tools to create efficiency in data ingestion and synthetic data creation
Collaborate with data engineering and infrastructure teams on how to optimize data for AI/ML
Monitor and research AI innovations, techniques, and use cases relevant to airline industry and ATPCO product portfolio
Promote AI adoption by presenting at industry events and creating content (or supporting presentations and created content)
Requirements
PhD / MA in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or closely-related field with specialization in AI/ML, or 10+ years professional experience
3+ years experience developing AI/ML solutions and prototypes
Strong verbal and written communication skills; ability to distill complex topics
Self-directed and curious, able to explore innovations on the frontier of AI.
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
Salary Range: $165,000 - $185,000
*The disclosed range estimate has not been adjusted for applicable geographic differential associated with the location*",3.8,ATPCO,"Herndon, VA",201 to 500 Employees,1965.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,175.0,VA,59.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Sr Data Scientist, Spatial Omics","$150K
/yr","The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Senior Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop computational tools as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up to date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal Candidate will have:

Background

Ph.D. degree in computer science, quantitative science, data science, bioinformatics, biostatistics, or a related field.

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Proficiency in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Proficiency in containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments are a plus.

Onsite Presence: Is Not Required

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-




PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-




COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's or PhD in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Five years of experience in scientific software or industry programming with a concentration in scientific computing. With Master's degree, three years experience required. With PhD, one year of experience required.

Preferred: Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170806
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 119,500
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 149,500
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 179,500
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid

The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Senior Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop computational tools as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up to date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal Candidate will have:

Background

Ph.D. degree in computer science, quantitative science, data science, bioinformatics, biostatistics, or a related field.

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Proficiency in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Proficiency in containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments are a plus.

Onsite Presence: Is Not Required

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-




PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-




COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's or PhD in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Five years of experience in scientific software or industry programming with a concentration in scientific computing. With Master's degree, three years experience required. With PhD, one year of experience required.

Preferred: Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170806
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 119,500
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 149,500
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 179,500
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid",4.2,MD Anderson Cancer Center,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1941.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,150.0,TX,83.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","Security Clearance required:
Able to obtain Public Trust
Do you want to make a difference?
Cognosante employees are passionate about improving people’s lives. With an innovative mindset and an unwavering commitment to those we serve, we partner with healthcare, civilian and defense agencies to deliver exceptional public services and programs. Our multi-faceted technology and customer experience (CX) solutions achieve program outcomes, solve critical challenges and create meaningful change. Whether we are helping Veterans access healthcare faster, ensuring that members of the military complete their missions safely, or helping people obtain health insurance, our work touches millions of people. Are you ready to make a difference?


What is the position?
Cognosante is seeking a Data Scientist with a proven track record of leveraging data to drive actionable insights and optimize business outcomes. The Data Scientist will apply expertise in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling to design and implement solutions that tackle complex challenges and uncover opportunities for improvement across diverse IT projects. This role is 100% remote.

What will I get to do?
Meet with clients or management to understand data requirements and needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data engineers and business analysts, to define data requirements and ensure data-driven decision-making.
Develop and refine data collection strategies to ensure the availability of high-quality, relevant data for analysis.
Employ advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify patterns, and develop predictive models that support data-driven decision-making.
Design and implement rigorous evaluation frameworks to assess the effectiveness of operating programs and business processes, utilizing both qualitative and quantitative data.
Transform complex data into clear and compelling visualizations that effectively communicate insights and recommendations to stakeholders at all levels.
Identify opportunities to enhance business processes through data-driven analysis, proposing and implementing solutions that improve efficiency and effectiveness.
Maintain detailed documentation for data engineering processes and best practices.
Develop best practice, processes, and standards for effectively carrying out data strategy activities.


What qualifications do I need?
A minimum of 3-5 years of IT experience
A Bachelor's degree a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or a related discipline (or 8 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education)
Proficiency in Python, R, or other relevant programming languages for data analysis and machine learning.
Strong understanding of various machine learning algorithms and techniques, with hands-on experience in their application.
Proficiency in utilizing data visualization tools and techniques to communicate complex information in a clear and impactful manner.
Demonstrated ability to approach complex problems with a structured and analytical mindset.
Experience with AWS cloud offerings (S3, Redshift, etc.)
Strong knowledge of SQL and database management systems (e.g., PostgreSQL, MySQL, or NoSQL databases).
Must be able to achieve a moderate (Tier 2) VA position of trust.


What additional characteristics will help me thrive?
Familiarity with healthcare and supply chain inventory data and supply chain industry-specific challenges.
Familiarity with client specific solution components, such as Databricks, Talend, etc.
Automated Engineering Management System/Medical Equipment Reporting System (AEMS/MERS), Equipment/Turn-In Request (EQUIP), Maximo Enterprise Asset and Work Management System (EAWM), Point of Use Family of Systems (PoU FoS), Real Time Location Systems (RTLS), and Strategic Equipment Planning Guide (SEPG)/Enterprise Equipment Request (EER) experience a plus
Experience working in the Federal Government, Veteran's Administration (VA) experience a plus
Active clearance for Public Trust Position
What We Offer
Our mission is to provide comprehensive and competitive pay, benefits, services, and programs to eligible employees and their dependents that:
Ensure optimal health and productivity of our employees
Support employee retention and attraction
Provide work/life balance to ensure our employees succeed inside and outside of the office
Compensation
$96,760.98 - $154,817.56
The pay range for this job is determined by various factors, including but not necessarily limited to location, responsibilities of the job, and alignment with market data. When determining a salary for this role, the following factors may be taken into consideration - contract-specific affordability, education, knowledge, skills, competencies and experience. The estimate displayed represents the salary range for this position and is just one component of Cognosante’s total compensation package for employees. It is not necessarily reflective of actual compensation that may be earned, nor a promise of any specific pay for any specific employee.
Cognosante will not provide sponsorship for employment-based immigration benefits for this position.
What We Promise
Cognosante employees are inspired by our bold mission to improve lives. To achieve this mission, we put our people first. No matter where they're located around the nation, our innovative workplaces enable individuals to apply their skills and experience to work toward a greater good.
We foster a winning culture of solution creators built on innovation, collaboration, flexibility, and work-life balance. And we invest in the next generation of diverse talent to foster an inclusive, progressive, adaptable workplace that prioritizes advancement for all. As an affirmative action employer, we are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.

Your safety during your job search is important. Recruiting communications will always be sent through one of the following corporate domain emails (@cognosante.com or @accurate.com).
We will never send communications through any other domain, including @cognosantecareers.com, @gmail.com or @yahoo.com). We will never request payment from you, nor will we send payment to you, prior to your start date. If you have been asked to send or receive any payment, or if you have any doubt about whether you have been contacted by a Cognosante employee, please contact us at
jobs@cognosante.com",3.5,"Cognosante, LLC",United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,126.0,United States,16.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist - Mid,"$120K
/yr","Join the Nalley Consulting team as a Data Scientist at Reston, VA.

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACTIVE TOP SECRET SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIRED FOR CONSIDERATION.
Positions: Data Scientist - Scientific Support (DCP 1) and Data Scientist - DSS (DCP 2)
LCAT: Mid
Location: Reston, VA
Clearance: TS/SCI and CI poly required

Desired experience: At least 8 years of experience relevant to the specific labor category, with at least a portion of the experience within the last 2 years.

Desired Education: Bachelor’s degree in an area related to the labor category
Qualifications:

Conducts data analytics, data engineering, data mining, exploratory analysis, predictive analysis, and statistical analysis, and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products, enabling more informed analytic decisions.

Proactively retrieves information from various sources, analyzes it for better understanding about the data set, and builds AI tools that automate certain processes.

Duties typically include: creating various ML-based tools or processes, such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems.

Performs statistical analysis, applies data mining techniques, and builds high quality prediction systems.

Should have prior experience with large data Multi-INT analytics, ML, and automated predictive analytics.

Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications, including:
Microsoft Office (Power BI) and Tableau.
Major data science languages, such as R and Python.
Managing and merging of disparate data sources, preferably through R, Python, or SQL.
Statistical analysis.
Data mining algorithms.
Other qualifications:
Understanding of chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, or missile programs.
Demonstrated ability to produce and comply with IC tradecraft standards.
Demonstrate ability to define comprehensive, new, or unique research approaches that enable rigorous assessments to address and contribute to high-level tasks.
Demonstrate in-depth analysis of analytic operations and knowledge management issues across organizational and intra-IC boundaries and clearly articulates key findings.
ABOUT NALLEY CONSULTING
Nalley Consulting is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business working with prime partners to staff Department of Defense and Intelligence Community positions. Created by a U.S. Navy intelligence veteran, Nalley Consulting has grown to include multiple IDIQ vehicles in several states.
Nalley Consulting fringe benefits include:
Excellent medical, dental, and vision benefits
PTO
11 paid federal holidays
Tuition assistance
Paid military-reserve leave
Paid parental leave for birth or adoption
401k matching up to 5 percent of the base salary
Flex time
Company-paid short-term disability, long-term disability, and life insurance.
ZIUW8NSJ7V",5.0,Nalley Consulting,"Reston, VA",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,VA,,1,0,0,0,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$179K
/yr","Vimeo AI team is actively seeking a talented and experienced Data Scientist to join our AI applications team. The AI applications team is working as an end to end unit, delivering product solutions from the very beginning of an idea towards the final user experience, where the main expertise is around products that require AI abilities.
You will work alongside a team of passionate engineers and researchers dedicated to transforming the way video is accessed, visualized, and shared.
What you'll do:
Design and develop advanced AI-based video analysis that incorporates multimodal content (audio, visual, and text), tailored specifically for video applications.
Conduct algorithmic research and prototyping, from conceptualizing and evaluating various AI methods to implementing production-ready solutions.
Optimize algorithms and solutions for real-time, large-scale inference capabilities, ensuring peak performance and efficiency.
Stay ahead of the latest advancements in AI/ML technologies and integrate relevant innovations into the development process.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including product management and design, to define and prioritize the AI-related product roadmap. Ensure alignment of AI development goals with broader business objectives.
Skills and knowledge you should possess:
Academic degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or a related field.
4+ years of experience in machine learning, AI, or related fields.
Expertise in natural language processing, deep learning, LLMs and generative models.
Familiarity with engineering operation tools, such as Docker, Jenkins, cloud platforms and services (e.g., AWS, GCP, Azure).
Strong programming skills in Python, ability to write and review production-level code and experience with ML/AI frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, or similar)
Outstanding analytical and problem-solving skills. Ability to understand and work with weakly defined problems, refine definitions and come up with actionable solutions.
Good communication skills and ability to work in a cross-functional team.
Bonus points (nice skills to have, but not needed):
Experience with video analysis.
Targeted Base Salary Range: $142,200 to $216,500
The base salary range listed above is for candidates located in the U.S., including the New York City metro area.
At Vimeo, we strive to hire and nurture amazing talent across the globe. Actual salaries will vary depending on factors including but not limited to experience, specialized skills, internal alignment and a candidate's home base.
Base salary is just one component of Vimeo's total rewards philosophy. We offer a wide range of benefits and perks that appeal to the variety of needs across our diverse employee base! Other rewards may include bonus or commission, Restricted Stock Units (RSUs), paid time off, generous 401k match, wellbeing resources, and more.
#LI-MM1
About Us:
Vimeo (NASDAQ: VMEO) is the world's most innovative video experience platform. We enable anyone to create high-quality video experiences to better connect and bring ideas to life. We proudly serve our community of millions of users – from creative storytellers to globally distributed teams at the world's largest companies – whose videos receive billions of views each month. Learn more at www.vimeo.com.
Vimeo is headquartered in New York City with offices around the world. At Vimeo, we believe our impact is greatest when our workforce of passionate, dedicated people, represents our diverse and global community. We're proud to be an equal opportunity employer where diversity, equity, and inclusion is championed in how we build our products, develop our leaders, and strengthen our culture.",3.7,Vimeo,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,179.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,CA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II – Engineering R&D Support,"$97K
/yr","Description

A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions which determine the source of disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety.

In North America we have more than 5,000 team members across 11 sites or subsidiaries, including Salt Lake City-based BioFire Diagnostics and one subsidiary in Montreal, Canada. Come be a part of our team and our mission as a Data Scientist!

bioMérieux - Salt Lake City is looking for a talented and engaged Data Scientist to play an integral role in the support of cutting-edge, life-saving medical devices. You will be joining a team that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and a healthy work life balance.
The candidate will be knowledgeable in various aspects of data science, and responsible for performing complex mathematical and/or statistical analysis for projects to support the BioFire Engineering departments. The candidate must have strong analytic and programming skills. The candidate will be embedded in the Data Science department but will have close collaboration with the Software Development and Engineering departments at bioMérieux. Therefore, the candidate must have strong communication skills and a desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.

Studies and Experience:
A minimum of a B.S. in a quantitative discipline: Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Computational Biology
2+ years industry experience as a data scientist, mathematician, or statistician, or 0 years industry experience with a M.S. or PhD in a quantitative discipline.
Programming proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, MATLAB, C++, C#, or SQL

Skills and Qualifications:
Good communication, writing, and presentation skills
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Practical experience in any of the following: data visualization, data analytics platforms (e.g., Tableau), data pipelines, data cleaning and processing, probability, statistics, machine learning, image analysis, linear algebra, and optimization methods.",4.0,bioMerieux SA,"Salt Lake City, UT",10000+ Employees,1963.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,97.0,UT,61.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Description
Looking for the opportunity to work on problems that matter, with colleagues that share your interest and expertise in AI and Machine Learning?
The Leidos Corporate Financial Planning & Analysis (FP&A) team is looking for an experienced Data Scientist with an entrepreneur’s mindset to support a new team working on projects to improve our Enterprise financial analytics and forecasting. The position will report to, and collaborate with, the SVP and VP of FP&A in building a Data & Analytics Team within Finance. The position is funded and an immediate fill opportunity.
You should be strongly experienced in Python coding and visualization building skills and have knowledge of commonly used ML libraries (SciKit-learn). Data engineering and ML Ops experience is a plus. We are looking for someone who is intellectually adaptive, likes to collaborate, inquisitive, and capable of conducting original science.
The FP&A Data & Analytics team will collaborate closely with Leidos’ AI Accelerator team which includes junior and senior research/data scientists and data engineers with expertise in information retrieval, UI development, information science, machine learning and artificial intelligence, and statistics.
The Data Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings. The Scientist will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations. The data scientist will partner with business and operational leaders to provide an impact by leveraging data and analytical tools, strategic thinking, and hypothesis-based analysis on machine learning (ML)-based projects. The data scientist is responsible for modeling complex business problems through statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques. Further, they will support senior leadership by creating business insights, reports, and analyses to aid in the decision-making process.
Additional Responsibilities:
Translates business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Performs large-scale experimentation and builds data-driven models to answer business questions
Proactively mines data warehouses to identify trends and patterns and generates insights for business units and senior leadership
Performs large-scale experimentation to identify hidden relationships between variables in large datasets
Researches and implements cutting-edge techniques and tools in machine learning/deep learning/artificial intelligence to make data analysis more efficient
Designs and conducts data analyses with the highest standard of rigor and scientific accuracy; this includes study design, methodology, algorithms, and statistical modeling
Analyzes data provided to identify trends, inform decisions
Supports developmental plans based on data findings related to program, personnel, training needs
Supports development and maintenance of primary program database and run interval reporting
Implements appropriate modeling and data science strategies required to address customer needs
Communicates results and methods for solutions to internal and external stakeholders
Designs, builds, trains, and evaluates machine learning models
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science or related field and over 6 years of relevant experience, Masters with 4 years of experience, or PhD with 2 years of experience.
Strong experience with Python as well as fluency in multiple programming languages and statistical analysis tools such as C++, JavaScript, R, SAS, Excel, SQL, MATLAB, SPSS
Experience /familiarity with frequentist statistics and probability including predicative modeling
Experience with data repositories and reporting tools
Good understanding of machine learning algorithms, tools and platforms
Experience with AI/ML tools, such as common Python packages (e.g., scikit-learn, NumPy, Pandas) and Jupyter notebooks
Experience with time series modeling, causal inference, or probabilistic forecasting models.
Experience with tabular data analysis using languages such as SQL, R, and/or Python
Experience with statistical modeling and data analysis
Understanding of transformers and foundation models
Self-starter with high intellectual curiosity
Great communication skills, able to explain model results to a non-technical audience
Proficient in data exploration techniques and tools
Ability to work in a cross functional team as this position will be under the Finance function but have opportunity to collaborate with the AI Accelerator team
US citizenship is required and able to obtain security clearance if needed
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with data visualization libraries such as Plotly, Streamlit, and matplotlib
Experience with building LLM and other Generative AI applications
Willing to learn new skills and platforms to support data analytics
Candidates will ideally have a specialization in ML or AI
Original Posting Date:
2024-10-04
While subject to change based on business needs, Leidos reasonably anticipates that this job requisition will remain open for at least 3 days with an anticipated close date of no earlier than 3 days after the original posting date as listed above.
Pay Range:
Pay Range $81,250.00 - $146,875.00
The Leidos pay range for this job level is a general guideline only and not a guarantee of compensation or salary. Additional factors considered in extending an offer include (but are not limited to) responsibilities of the job, education, experience, knowledge, skills, and abilities, as well as internal equity, alignment with market data, applicable bargaining agreement (if any), or other law.",3.9,Leidos,Virginia,10000+ Employees,1969.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,114.0,Virginia,55.0,1,0,0,0,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$119K
/yr","Sr Data Scientist
Job Description:
***Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. ; Sponsorship is not available for this position.***
Senior Data Scientist, Supply Chain (Technical Demand Planning)
WE CREATE EMPOWERED LEADERS!
Milwaukee Tool is seeking an experienced Senior Data Scientist to join our growing Business Analytics team in Milwaukee, WI. Milwaukee Tool is known for its strong business culture, which is centered around several core values. One of the most important of these values is a focus on innovation and technology. Milwaukee Tool is constantly pushing the boundaries of what is possible with business insights, and the company encourages its employees to think outside the box and come up with new and creative solutions to problems.
Your Role on Our Team
The Senior Data Scientist of Supply Chain is a pivotal role that combines technical expertise in data science to enhance the demand planning process. This role focuses on designing and implementing advanced demand planning tools, leveraging internal and external data to improve forecast models, and automating processes to enhance the overall efficiency and accuracy of the supply chain.
Key Responsibilities:
Enabling and Automating Demand Planning (40%)
Design, develop, and maintain advanced demand planning tools to enable the demand planning team to create accurate forecasts over a rolling 24-month horizon.
Perform ongoing analysis and monitoring of the performance of these tools, identifying significant variances, taking corrective actions, and documenting key assumptions.
Collaborate with sales, marketing, supply chain planning, and other stakeholders to ensure the tools meet their needs and achieve a consensus demand plan.
Support strategic initiatives to improve forecast quality and close identified gaps by enhancing the tools and methodologies used.
Implement and share best practices in demand planning tool development and usage.
System & Data Management (30%)
Implement data-driven solutions using Python (or other tools) and deploy them into production environments.
Perform data cleansing, exploratory data analysis, and data visualization to ensure high-quality inputs for forecasting models.
S&OP Process (20%)
Support the S&OP cycle by providing critical forecasting tools and distributing relevant forecast information to sales and supply chain planning for review.
Publish the consensus demand plan with clear explanations of forecast changes, key business drivers, risks, opportunities, and assumptions.
Develop solutions to connect the demand plan to the supply plan and optimize inventory
Analysis & Reporting (10%)
Provide timely and accurate responses to demand and forecast-related inquiries across the organization.
Develop critical planning tools, key reports, and provide analytical support to Senior Leadership for decision-making.
Complete special projects and ad-hoc requests as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s Degree in Business, Supply Chain Management, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field.
5+ years of experience in planning/forecasting, data science, or a combination thereof.
Demonstrated proficiency in statistical modeling, forecasting methods, and machine learning algorithms.
Strong programming skills in Python, with experience in training and deploying models into production.
Familiarity with Spark and parallel cloud computation.
Proficient in Microsoft Office, especially Excel.
Strong communication and collaboration skills, with the ability to explain complex analyses to technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Experience with data intelligence solutions including reports, dashboards, scorecards, and data visualizations.
Excellent problem-solving skills with a data-driven approach to decision-making.
Experience in manufacturing or similar industries is a plus.
Understanding of DevOps for CI/CD is a plus.
Personal Attributes:
Persuasive communication and interpersonal skills to effectively interact with cross-functional teams.
Strong leadership and facilitation skills to drive consensus and actionable items.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and adapt to changing business needs.
High level of analytical thinking and critical decision-making skills.
Passion for continuous improvement and innovation in demand planning and data science.
This role offers a unique opportunity to blend supply chain expertise with advanced data science techniques to drive significant improvements in forecast accuracy and supply chain efficiency. If you are a proactive and technically skilled professional looking to make a substantial impact, we encourage you to apply.",4.1,Milwaukee Electric Tool Corporation,"Milwaukee, WI",10000+ Employees,1924.0,Company - Public,Consumer Product Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,119.0,WI,100.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist - PECNA,"$96K
/yr","Overview: We are proud to announce the establishment of a state-of-the-art Li-ion battery factory, set amidst the beautiful Kansas City Metro. This groundbreaking green-field factory will serve as a pioneering hub for innovation in sustainable energy solutions. Responsibilities:
Summary: We are proud to announce the establishment of a state-of-the-art Li-ion battery factory, set amidst the beautiful Kansas City Metro. This groundbreaking green-field factory will serve as a pioneering hub for innovation in sustainable energy solutions.
If you are enthusiastic about contributing to a sustainable future and being part of a dynamic team shaping the electric vehicle revolution, this opportunity is tailor-made for you. We are seeking dedicated individuals to join us as full-time, on-site team members at our new, ultramodern factory located in the thriving city of DeSoto, Kansas.
Job Summary: The Data Scientist acts as the data analytical expert at the company, creating processes for data modeling and identifying business problems based on highly technical use of all datasets. The Data Scientist will apply advanced statistical methods and modeling to proactively explore key datasets based on business need. This role will define the statistical modeling standards and assist with educating other analyst team members on best practices. Additionally, the Data Scientist will identify gaps in existing data that would lead to further meaningful data insights for business use.
Essential Duties:
Collaborate with other internal and external team members to identify business cases for new analytical model creation.
Create and implement strategy for analytical modeling from start to end based on business need (data access, processing and aggregation and model creation, deployment, and verification)
Develop and implement machine learning models to solve business problems and improve processes.
Apply advanced statistical methods and data modeling processes to create algorithms based on business cases.
Translate ontology-based data contextualization into business benefits.
Verify data models with subject matter experts and monitor the model’s efficacy in production.
Define standard processes for modeling data and train fellow scientists and analysts on best practices for data model creation.
Function as subject matter expert for advanced analytical techniques (statistical analytics, machine learning, deep learning, etc.)
Explore areas of gaps in existing datasets for kickstarting new data acquisition projects based on business case.
Research and monitor new related technologies and systems and develop strategies for implementing advanced analytical modeling for business use.
Ensure data analysis and reporting processes comply with industry standards and regulations related to battery manufacturing and safety.
Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) Requirements:
To ensure the health and safety in the workplace and for the protection of our employee’s, wearing PPE is a possibility and may include equipment such as a full Tyvek suit, safety shoes, gloves, safety glasses, face mask, bump cap, and a full hazmat suit that includes a respirator.
The foregoing description is not intended and should not be construed to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, skills and efforts or work conditions associated with the job. It is intended to be an accurate reflection of the general nature and level of the job.
Qualifications: Requirements - Required and/or Preferred
Education:
Basic/Required: Bachelor’s Degree in quantitative field (Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Information Systems, etc.).
Preferred: Masters degree
Essential Qualifications:
Minimum of 5+ years of professional experience in Data science, Machine Learning, or related field
Experience working with big datasets in the following stages: acquisition, aggregation, analysis, and visualization at semiconductor/manufacturing industry.
Expert understanding and knowledge in algorithms and advanced statistics
Experience with advanced analytical techniques (statistical analytics, machine learning, deep learning, etc.)
Experience with Big Data technologies: Hadoop, Spark, or similar.
Programming skills for data science required (SQL, Python, R, Java, etc.)
Familiarity with machine learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, or scikit-learn.
Knowledge of cloud platforms: AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud.
Experience with developing data modeling processes and critical thinking mindset
Must be able to learn and understand equipment capabilities, operation flow, and data flow logics.
Excellent oral and written communication skills required, ability to describe technical theory to technical and non-technical audience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Able to work independently and in a team environment, as well as with cross-functional groups.
Resilient, self-motived and able to work well under pressure.
Alignment to Panasonic’s seven (7) core principles (contribution to society, fairness and honesty, cooperation and team spirit, untiring effort for improvement, courtesy and humility, adaptability, gratitude)
Knowledge of manufacturing, smart factories.
Preferred License(s):
None
Preferred Certification(s):
None
Physical Demands:
Physical Activities: (Percentage of time (equaling 100%) during the normal workday the employee is required to)
Sit: 20%
Walk: 50%
Stand: 20%
Lift: 10%
Required Lifting and Carrying: (Required frequency is: Not required (0%), Occasional (1-33%), Frequent (34-66%, Continuous (67-100%)
Up to 10 lbs.: Occasional
Up to 20 lbs.: Occasional
Up to 35 lbs.: Occasional
Team-lift only (over 35 lbs.): Occasional
About Us: At the heart of this visionary project, Panasonic is committed to manufacturing innovative cylindrical lithium-ion cells that will power the future of electric mobility. These cells will be meticulously crafted to meet the growing demands of the automotive industry, supporting various electric vehicle manufacturers in their quest for eco-friendly transportation solutions.
This role presents a unique chance to be at the forefront of innovation, working within a forward-thinking organization that is committed to environmental responsibility and the advancement of green technology. Be a part of our mission to power the future and make a difference in the world of electric mobility with Panasonic!
Supplemental Information: Pre-employment drug testing is required. Due to the high volume of responses, we will only be able to respond to candidates of interest. All candidates must have valid authorization to work in the U.S. without restriction.
Panasonic is an Equal Opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by law. All qualified individuals are required to perform the essential functions of the job with or without reasonable accommodation.
Thank you for your interest in Panasonic Energy Corporation of North America.",3.7,PECNA Panasonic Energy Corporation of North America,"De Soto, KS",1001 to 5000 Employees,1918.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,96.0,KS,106.0,1,0,1,1,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","About Rivian:
Rivian is on a mission to keep the world adventurous forever. This goes for the emissions-free Electric Adventure Vehicles we build, and the curious, courageous souls we seek to attract.

As a company, we constantly challenge what’s possible, never simply accepting what has always been done. We reframe old problems, seek new solutions and operate comfortably in areas that are unknown. Our backgrounds are diverse, but our team shares a love of the outdoors and a desire to protect it for future generations.
Role Summary:
The Sr. Data Scientist will be responsible for designing and developing dashboards to monitor and analyze factory quality metrics. This role will involve collecting, processing, and interpreting data to identify trends, issues, and opportunities for improvement. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in data engineering, experience with data visualization tools, and a passion for driving quality improvements in a manufacturing environment.
Responsibilities:
Dashboard Design and Development:
Design, develop, and maintain interactive and visually appealing dashboards to monitor factory quality metrics.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand their requirements and translate them into effective data visualizations.
Ensure dashboards provide actionable insights for decision-makers at various levels of the organization.
Data Collection and Processing:
Gather data from various sources, including factory equipment, ERP systems, and quality control processes.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure accuracy and reliability.
Develop and maintain ELT (Extract, Load, Transform) pipelines to streamline data integration.
Analysis and Reporting:
Analyze quality metrics to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Generate reports and presentations to communicate findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Provide ongoing support and updates to dashboards based on user feedback and changing requirements.
Collaboration and Change Management:
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including production, quality control, and software teams, to drive improvements based on data insights.
Advocate for data-driven decision making and foster a culture of continuous improvement.
Provide training and support to users to maximize the effectiveness of dashboards and reports.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Engineering, or a related field.
5+ years proven experience as a Data Engineer or similar role, with a focus on data visualization and dashboard development.
Proficiency in data visualization tools such as Hex, Tableau, Power BI, or similar platforms.
Familiarity with ELT tools and processes.
Strong SQL skills; Knowledge of programming languages such as Python or R is a plus.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong communication and collaboration abilities.
Experience with vehicle software, connected systems and/or manufacturing environments is preferred but not required.
Company Statements:
Equal Opportunity
Rivian is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information or characteristics, physical or mental disability, marital/domestic partner status, age, military/veteran status, medical condition, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Rivian is committed to ensuring that our hiring process is accessible for persons with disabilities. If you have a disability or limitation, such as those covered by the Americans with Disabilities Act, that requires accommodations to assist you in the search and application process, please email us at candidateaccommodations@rivian.com.
Candidate Data Privacy
Rivian may collect, use and disclose your personal information or personal data (within the meaning of the applicable data protection laws) when you apply for employment and/or participate in our recruitment processes (“Candidate Personal Data”). This data includes contact, demographic, communications, educational, professional, employment, social media/website, network/device, recruiting system usage/interaction, security and preference information. Rivian may use your Candidate Personal Data for the purposes of (i) tracking interactions with our recruiting system; (ii) carrying out, analyzing and improving our application and recruitment process, including assessing you and your application and conducting employment, background and reference checks; (iii) establishing an employment relationship or entering into an employment contract with you; (iv) complying with our legal, regulatory and corporate governance obligations; (v) recordkeeping; (vi) ensuring network and information security and preventing fraud; and (vii) as otherwise required or permitted by applicable law.

Rivian may share your Candidate Personal Data with (i) internal personnel who have a need to know such information in order to perform their duties, including individuals on our People Team, Finance, Legal, and the team(s) with the position(s) for which you are applying; (ii) Rivian affiliates; and (iii) Rivian’s service providers, including providers of background checks, staffing services, and cloud services.

Rivian may transfer or store internationally your Candidate Personal Data, including to or in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, and the European Union and in the cloud, and this data may be subject to the laws and accessible to the courts, law enforcement and national security authorities of such jurisdictions.

Please see our Candidate Data Privacy Notice for more information.

Please note that we are currently not accepting applications from third party application services.

To any candidates interested in a position with Rivian, please be aware of recruiting phishing scams impersonating Rivian. As a general practice, Rivian recruiting does not conduct interviews or communicate with candidates over Microsoft Teams.

Please visit Rivian’s Careers page for career opportunities at Rivian. If you believe you may have been a victim of identity theft because of the phishing scam impersonating Rivian, please go to www.IdentityTheft.gov where you can report and recover from identity theft. For more information about recommended computer security practices, please go to resources on the FTC’s consumer information site where you can learn how to protect yourselves online and avoid phishing attacks.",3.4,Rivian,"Normal, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,125.0,IL,15.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Science / AI Engineer,"$133K
/yr","Introduction
ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market, and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.
Job Mission
The EUV Source team in San Diego operates in a fast-paced, uniquely innovative, and challenging environment to deliver new-to-industry products supporting the commercialization of EUV technology by ASML. The Data Science/AI Engineer will be part of the EUV Source Performance team within ASML San Diego. Due to high complexity of the EUV light source, we, as Source Performance, are a dedicated team with the mission to validate and ensure that EUV sources meet or exceed customer performance requirements and expectations. In order to execute this mission, EUV Source Performance acts as the critical enabler of knowledge acquisition and transfer throughout the products development process, via:
Substantive participation in the technology development and system definition process for products in definition and early development stage.
Ensuring quality of the module to sub-system to system-level performance testing and validation for the products in integration phase.
Driving technology improvements enabling new products field release and refinement of system specifications based upon deep understanding of factory and field performance.
The creation and delivery of analytic tooling, action plans and procedures to drive maximum solving power of our customer support organizations for sustaining products.
The Data Science/AI Engineer will be an individual contributor on a team responsible for extracting the highest business value possible from the data available. This person will also refine requirements towards the data engineering team to ensure a rich and complete dataset is available for consumption and may be required to execute some data engineering work themselves. This role is part of a team aiming to further develop the site’s data science and AI competence. The person in this role will be responsible for executing the data science and AI work needed to further advance ASML’s capability to learn quickly and advise product changes that benefit the overall performance of the EUV light source. These projects include physics based model development, machine learning, Gen-AI, reduced order models, and the development of digital twins representing the EUV source, its sub-components, and the factory.
The role requires a willingness to develop a deep understanding across multiple engineering disciplines beyond data science in order to be effective. To be successful, the candidate must combine strong technical skills, problem solving and numerical analysis skills, and desire for life-long learning. In addition, to be effective in the role, candidates must possess interpersonal skills to cross functional boundaries and to build constructive and effective relationships across the organization and promote cross-functional and cross-sector collaboration.
Duties and Responsibilities
Contribute towards the technical roadmap representing the data science and AI activities of the site that supports the product roadmap and aligns with business objectives
Participate in the end-to-end AI and data science lifecycle, from data collection and preprocessing to model deployment and monitoring. Collaborate with other engineers in the best applications of data science solutions for various complex problems we are trying to resolve.
Apply theoretical models, concepts, methods, and novel experimental techniques to quantitatively interpret performance of EUV source systems across a wide range of issues and multiple technical disciplines.
Produce clear, concise technical documentation in defined company formats, present results and align with cross-functional teams.
Work closely with cross-functional groups (systems engineering, development engineering, scientists, IT, global customer support personnel, manufacturing personnel, senior management, marketing, external customers) to set clear technical direction and achievable milestones.
Travel as required to both customer sites and other ASML sites for the purposes of reporting, alignment, and collaboration.
Complete service, expense reports, and other administrative responsibilities in accordance with ASML’s procedures and with supervisor’s approval.
Other duties as assigned.
Education and experience
MS in Computer Science, Data Science, or Machine Learning. PhD preferred. Candidates with a degree in Physics that have specialized their careers in data science will also be considered.
Must have a minimum of 3 years’ experience in a similar role.
Experience in the semiconductor industry a plus.
Skills
Must have significant experience working in the following cloud and development environments: Azure Kubernetes Service (AKS), Google Distributed Cloud Edge (GDCE), Apache Spark, Azure Databricks, Python, MATLAB, and related technologies. Additionally, proficiency with MLFlow for managing the end-to-end machine learning lifecycle, including experimentation, reproducibility, and deployment, is required.
The ideal candidate will have extensive experience in designing and implementing machine learning and deep learning architectures. This includes:
Developing and optimizing neural network architectures using frameworks such as TensorFlow and PyTorch.
Implementing scalable machine learning models and algorithms in a cloud-based environment.
Experience with Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision, and other AI domains.
Knowledge of model deployment and serving strategies, including the use of containerization technologies such as Docker and Kubernetes.
Proficiency in using GPU and TPU hardware accelerators for deep learning training and inference.
Experience in monitoring and maintaining the performance of deployed models to ensure they meet business and technical requirements.”
Understanding of the concept of large complex system integration and practices.
Understanding of the concepts of optics and lasers, plasma generation, and control systems.
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills.
Excellent inter-personal and customer service skills, with an advanced understanding of customer relationship building.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to reduce large amounts of data, create a concise summary, and effectively report results through written and/or graphical formats.
Ability to define and execute tasks based on project descriptions with minimum or no supervision.
Other Information
This position is located in San Diego, CA. It works on a hybrid schedule of 3 days onsite/2 days remote. It requires onsite presence to attend in-person work-related events, trainings and meetings and to further ensure teamwork, collaboration and innovation.
Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability
Potential candidates will meet the education and experience requirements provided on the above job description and excel in completing the listed responsibilities for this role. All candidates receiving an offer of employment must successfully complete a background check band any other tests that may be required.
The current base annual salary range for this role is currently:
$0-0
Pay scales are determined by role, level, location and alignment with market data. Individual pay is determined through interviews and an assessment of several factors that that are unique to each candidate, including but not limited to job-related skills, relevant education and experience, certifications, abilities of the candidate and pay relative to other team members.
The Company offers employees and their families, medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees are able to participate in the Company’s 401k plan. Employees will also receive eight (8) hours of vacation leave every month and (13) paid holidays throughout the calendar year. For more information, please contact the Recruiter or click on this link Compensation & Benefits in the US.
All new ASML jobs have a minimum application deadline of 10 days.
This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the United States Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
Diversity and inclusion
ASML is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values and respects the importance of a diverse and inclusive workforce. It is the policy of the company to recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job titles without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, or gender identity. We recognize that diversity and inclusion is a driving force in the success of our company.
Need to know more about applying for a job at ASML? Read our frequently asked questions.
Request an Accommodation
ASML provides reasonable accommodations to applicants for ASML employment and ASML employees with disabilities. An accommodation is a change in work rules, facilities, or conditions which enable an individual with a disability to apply for a job, perform the essential functions of a job, and/or enjoy equal access to the benefits and privileges of employment. If you are in need of an accommodation to complete an application, participate in an interview, or otherwise participate in the employee pre-selection process, please send an email to USHR_Accommodation@asml.com to initiate the company’s reasonable accommodation process.
Please note: This email address is solely intended to provide a method for applicants to initiate ASML’s process to request accommodation(s). Any recruitment questions should be directed to the designated Talent Acquisition member for the position.",4.1,ASML,"San Diego, CA",10000+ Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,133.0,CA,40.0,1,0,1,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","Become a part of our caring community and help us put health first
Growth Analytics & AI within Humana is dedicated to transforming members’ journeys and Humana’s services using technology and analytics. We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist who will utilize cutting-edge AI, NLP, GenAI techniques, build predictive modeling, test rigorous hypotheses, design studies, and turn data into actionable insights. Being part of a talented team of Data Scientists with broad skills and applications, the Senior Data Scientist will work cross-functionally and collaboratively with teams across the enterprise through innovative AI, machine learning, and R&D platforms. The scope of our work includes forecasting, predictive modeling, designing business experiments, and ROI studies. The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience with healthcare data, demonstrated innovative, and creative methods for overcoming testing constraints, as well as successfully applying AI, NLP, GenAI, and machine learning techniques to address business needs.
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The Senior Data Scientist’s work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
The Senior Data Scientist develops, maintains, and collects structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting. Creates reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics. Exercises considerable latitude in determining objectives and approaches to assignments.

Use your skills to make an impact
This is a unique opportunity for a motivated individual to influence Humana’s vision to provide coordinated, integrated member journey via multiple innovative solutions. The Senior Data Scientist creates reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics. This role influences department’s strategy, contributes to the decision making on complex issues regarding technical approach for project components, and works on model building use cases with minimal supervision. Exercises considerable latitude in determining objectives and approaches to assignments. As a Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Develop and validate machine learning and statistical models, predictions, reports, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
Develop, maintain, and collect structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
Research and evaluate innovative analytical methodologies, approaches, and solutions
Collaborate with analytics and data teams to set objectives, approaches, and work plans
Interpret and communicate analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners
Understand department, segment, and organizational strategy and operating objectives, including their linkages to related areas
Compile and present regular and ad-hoc project status reports
Follow established guidelines/procedures
Required Qualifications
Master’s Degree in a quantitative discipline, such as Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related quantitative field
3+ years of experience in advanced data analytics
Demonstrated experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors with Python, R, SAS, SQL, DataRobot or similar statistical and scripting tools
Experience developing and validating machine learning and statistical forecasting models or predictive models, including Random Forest, Gradient Boosting, Neural Networks, cluster analysis, regression analysis, time series, and forecasting
Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
Experience interpreting and communicating analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners
Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
Naturally curious and comfortable with ambiguity and demonstrate critical thinking
Clear and concise verbal and written communication skills, with a proven ability to translate complex methodologies and analytical results to non-technical business insights
Strong interpersonal and consulting skills
Preferred Qualifications
PhD in a quantitative discipline, such as Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics or Statistics and/or related quantitative field
Healthcare or managed care experience
Experience in Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Experience developing and tuning LLM applications, utilizing GPT, LLAMA, or other models
Experience in health economics, test & learn, and/or experiment design
Experience building large-scale predictive models
Experience building visualization and reports using Tableau or Power BI
Experience in Big Data environment specifically PySpark and/or Databricks
Experience in cloud computing, Azure or AWS
Experience in deep learning and recommendation
Experience in cost of care and trend analysis
Actuarial background or experience
Work-At-Home Requirements
To ensure Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees’ ability to work effectively, the self-provided internet service of Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees must meet the following criteria:
At minimum, a download speed of 25 Mbps and an upload speed of 10 Mbps is recommended; wireless, wired cable or DSL connection is suggested
Satellite, cellular and microwave connection can be used only if approved by leadership
Employees who live and work from Home in the state of California, Illinois, Montana, or South Dakota will be provided a bi-weekly payment for their internet expense.
Humana will provide Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees with telephone equipment appropriate to meet the business requirements for their position/job.
Work from a dedicated space lacking ongoing interruptions to protect member PHI / HIPAA information
#LI-WG1
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Pay Range
The compensation range below reflects a good faith estimate of starting base pay for full time (40 hours per week) employment at the time of posting. The pay range may be higher or lower based on geographic location and individual pay will vary based on demonstrated job related skills, knowledge, experience, education, certifications, etc.
$104,800 - $144,300 per year
This job is eligible for a bonus incentive plan. This incentive opportunity is based upon company and/or individual performance.
Description of Benefits
Humana, Inc. and its affiliated subsidiaries (collectively, “Humana”) offers competitive benefits that support whole-person well-being. Associate benefits are designed to encourage personal wellness and smart healthcare decisions for you and your family while also knowing your life extends outside of work. Among our benefits, Humana provides medical, dental and vision benefits, 401(k) retirement savings plan, time off (including paid time off, company and personal holidays, volunteer time off, paid parental and caregiver leave), short-term and long-term disability, life insurance and many other opportunities.

About us
Humana Inc. (NYSE: HUM) is committed to putting health first – for our teammates, our customers and our company. Through our Humana insurance services and CenterWell healthcare services, we make it easier for the millions of people we serve to achieve their best health – delivering the care and service they need, when they need it. These efforts are leading to a better quality of life for people with Medicare, Medicaid, families, individuals, military service personnel, and communities at large.

Equal Opportunity Employer
It is the policy of Humana not to discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability or veteran status. It is also the policy of Humana to take affirmative action to employ and to advance in employment, all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability or protected veteran status, and to base all employment decisions only on valid job requirements. This policy shall apply to all employment actions, including but not limited to recruitment, hiring, upgrading, promotion, transfer, demotion, layoff, recall, termination, rates of pay or other forms of compensation and selection for training, including apprenticeship, at all levels of employment.

Not Specified
0",3.8,Humana,Remote,10000+ Employees,1961.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,125.0,Remote,63.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Duties
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Develop and oversee computational algorithms and statistical methods to analyze data and find relationships and patterns in large volumes of data.
Analyze unique and highly specialized datasets using a variety of data analytic tools.
Ensure software architecture and data pipeline usage is in compliance with Federal requirements and regulations.
Recommend algorithms or tools to support the design and build of scalable data pipelines.
Develop, modify, and provide recommendations on data visualization, scientific and technical Artificial Intelligence (AI), and other data science tools (e.g., machine learning
Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen or National.
This employer participates in the e-Verify program.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. See www.sss.gov.
If selected, your appointment may be subject to a suitability or fitness determination, as determined by a completed background investigation.
If selected, you may be required to complete a one year probationary period.
These positions are to be filled under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Inflation Reduction Act or Scientific, Technical, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) direct hire authority.
A preliminary background check must be completed before a new employee can begin work. Current Federal employees or other individuals with an existing completed background investigation may not be required to undergo another background check.
This position is included in a Bargaining Unit.
Qualifications
BASIC REQUIREMENT:
Degree: Mathematics, statistics, computer science, data science or field directly related to the position. The degree must be in a major field of study (at least at the baccalaureate level) that is appropriate for the position.
OR
Combination of education and experience: Courses equivalent to a major field of study (30 semester hours) as shown in paragraph A above, plus additional education or appropriate experience.


GS-12 SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level GS-11 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as meeting 2out of 3 of the following:
Identifying and analyzing advancements in application development concepts, techniques, and tools;
Utilizing data tools and techniques to process large, datasets into structured formats for matching, analysis, or estimation;
Assisting with coding in various programming languages (such as Python or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
GS-13 SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level GS-12 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as meeting 2out of 3 of the following:
Designing and developing data analytics/science related products using techniques such as machine learning, natural language processing, robotics process automation, and artificial intelligence;
Conducting analysis using software and/or programming languages such as Python or Java to test hypotheses and predict outcomes;
Using data tools and techniques to process large datasets into structured formats for matching, analysis, or estimation

""Experience"" refers to paid and unpaid experience. Examples of qualifying unpaid experience may include: volunteer work done through National Service programs (such as Peace Corps and AmeriCorps); as well as work for other community-based philanthropic and social organizations. Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills; and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

CTAP/ICTAP candidates: To be considered ""well qualified"" you must meet all of the requirements as described in this section.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This vacancy has a positive education requirement. In order to be rated as qualified, you must provide copies of your college transcripts. Failure to provide copies of your college transcripts may result in a rating of ""Ineligible"". Education must be obtained from an accredited institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. Foreign education must be reviewed by an organization recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For special instructions pertaining to foreign education and a list of organizations that can evaluate foreign education, see the Department of Education website.
Additional information
The U.S. Department of Energy fosters a diverse and inclusive workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
This job opportunity announcement may be used to fill additional similar vacancies across DOE.
For general information on government-wide Telework polices visit: www.telework.gov
Hiring incentives may be authorized in accordance with agency policy and if funding is available.
EEO Policy: https://www.energy.gov/justice/eeo-complaint-process
Reasonable Accommodation Policy: https://www.energy.gov/hc/department-energy-reasonable-accommodation-program
Veterans Information: https://www.energy.gov/careers/veterans-military-spouses
Selective Service Registration: http://www.sss.gov/
The Fair Chance Act prohibits specific inquiries concerning an applicant's criminal or credit background unless the hiring agency has made a conditional offer of employment to the applicant. An applicant may submit a complaint to the agency within 30 calendar days of the date of alleged noncompliance by completing the Fair Chance Act Intake Form and submitting it to the Administrative Investigations Program at AdministrativeInvestigations@hq.doe.gov.

Benefits
A career with the U.S. government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
This position is announced under a government-wide Direct-Hire Authority (DHA) for Data Scientist positions in the 1560 series. Under the DHA, applicants who meet the Education and Qualification requirements listed in this announcement will be referred for consideration. Veteran's Preference, category rating, and traditional rating and ranking of applicants do not apply under the DHA process.
Appointments made under the DHA are processed as ""new"" appointments. Current Federal employees may be required to serve a new probationary period (5 CFR 315.802(b).
Successful candidates will possess the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):
Data Management
Database Administration
Reasoning
Research
Technology Application


Career Transition Assistance Programs: If you are eligible for career transition assistance, such as ICTAP or CTAP, you must meet the Education and Qualification requirements to be referred for consideration.

Shared Certificates: The Department of Energy shares lists of applicants among its internal Departmental Elements and organizations. You may be referred for consideration to other DOE Hiring Managers throughout the Department for more than one position based on this application. By applying to this announcement, you understand your application materials may be shared with multiple Hiring Mangers throughout DOE. If additional positions are filled from this announcement conditions of employment may differ. You will be notified if you are referred for additional positions.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date (11/07/2024) of this announcement.

To preview the Assessment Questionnaire, click https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/12576965
Benefits
A career with the U.S. government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Required Documents
As a new or existing federal employee, you and your family may have access to a range of benefits. Your benefits depend on the type of position you have - whether you're a permanent, part-time, temporary or an intermittent employee. You may be eligible for the following benefits, however, check with your agency to make sure you're eligible under their policies.
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:
Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement.Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted. Do not provide photos or list a Social Security Number or date of birth on any attachment.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
How to Apply
Please read the entire announcement and all the instructions before you begin an application. To apply for this position, you must complete the initial online application, to include submission of the required documentation specified in the Required Documents section. A complete application package must be submitted by 11:59 PM (EST) on the announcement closing date to receive consideration. The application process is as follows:
Click the Apply Online button.
Answer the questions presented in the application and attach all required and supporting documentation.
Click the Submit Application button prior to 11:59 pm (ET) on 11/07/2024.
To update your application, including supporting documentation: During the announcement open period, return to your USAJOBS account, find your application record, and click Edit my application. This option will no longer be available once the announcement has closed.


To verify the status of your application, during and after the announcement open period, log into your USAJOBS account; applications will appear on the Welcome screen. The Application Status will appear along with the date your application was last updated. For information on what each application status means, visit: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/how-to/application/status/.

If you need help with login.gov or USAJOBS (e.g., account access, Resume Builder) visit the USAJOBS Help Center: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/

If you experience difficulty applying on USAJOBS, after clicking the Apply Online button, or you are experiencing a significant hardship hindering your ability to apply online, the Agency Contact listed in the announcement can assist you during normal business hours. If you receive any system error messages, take screenshots if possible, to aid technical support.
Agency contact information
Kelsey Hince
Phone
240-220-4551
Email
kelsey.hince@hc.doe.gov
Address
Office of Science - Office of Scientific and Technical Information
Department of Energy
Human Capital Shared Service Center
1000 Independence Ave, SW
Washington, DC 20585
US
Next steps
Once you submit your online application, you will receive a confirmation notification by email that your submission was successful. After the closing of the announcement, if your self-assessment responses place you as an eligible candidate for referral, we will refer your name to the hiring official, you may be contacted directly for a possible interview. We will notify you of the status of your Application Package at the time candidates are referred for consideration, and when the selection process is complete.

If you are interested in being added to our Schedule A or 30% or more Disabled Veterans repository, please submit your information by using the below links.

https://www.usajobs.gov/job/789178500 - 30 Percent or More Disabled Veteran Repository 2024 for Department of Energy

https://www.usajobs.gov/job/789179000 - Schedule A Repository 2024 for Department of Energy
Fair and Transparent
The Federal hiring process is set up to be fair and transparent. Please read the following guidance.
Criminal history inquiries
Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Policy
Financial suitability
New employee probationary period
Privacy Act
Reasonable accommodation policy
Selective Service
Signature and false statements
Social security number request
Required Documents
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:
Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement.Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted. Do not provide photos or list a Social Security Number or date of birth on any attachment.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.

Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. Citizens, Nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Military spouses
Clarification from the agency
U.S. citizens or U.S. Nationals; no prior Federal experience is required. Please read this Public Notice in its entirety prior to submitting your application for consideration.",4.3,US Department of Energy - Agency Wide,"Oak Ridge, TN",10000+ Employees,1977.0,Government,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,111.0,TN,47.0,1,0,0,0,0
"NAMS2 - Data Scientist I, II, III","$101K
/yr","Company Description

Crown is a leader in planning and implementing aerospace and advanced transportation services, with a focus on advanced air mobility (AAM). We have more than three decades of experience in developing strategy, exploring concepts, assessing technologies, developing use cases, and projecting economic impacts for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), and State Departments of Transportation. We are looking for an exceptional new team member to join our Crown innovators working with companies and government agencies to safely advance aviation’s newest frontier. Join our team to pioneer a better, more sustainable future

Job Description

Crown is looking for all levels of Data Scientists to work on the NAMS-2 project in Mountain View, CA to:
Identify trends, patterns, and anomalies found in big data sets by performing extensive data analysis to develop insights.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes to prepare data, implement data models, conduct analysis, and develop databases.
Interpret results from multiple structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques and tools.
Collaborate with teams to understand each data analysis projects' underlying purpose, focus, and objectives.
Design, develops, and implements the most valuable data-driven solutions for the
organization

Qualifications

Level I - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 0-2 years of related experience.
Level II - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Exposure to some of the complex tasks within the job function. Requires 2 -4 years of related experience.
Level III - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 5 - 8 years of related experience.

Additional Information

Visit: www.crownci.com for additional information on our company.
Competitive benefits program and matching 401K!
Crown is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, age, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.
Persons unable to complete an online application should contact Crown HR for assistance at (703) 650-0663 ext 3059.
Crown is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor
Crown was voted Best Places to Work in 2021
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Crown Consulting, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1989.0,Company - Private,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,101.0,CA,35.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Title: Data Scientist - Big Data Engineer
Place of Performance: Remote - Austin, TX 77040
Duration: 9 Months Approx.

About Radiant
Radiant is committed to solving complex challenges for our customers by delivering innovative technology solutions. Our client-centric model increases transparency and accountability, which helps promote efficiency and effectiveness. We work and grow together with our customers, and we help empower our clients to achieve success. Our flexible delivery model allows us to provide end-to-end solution delivery, single project execution, and, or strategic resources. CMMI Maturity Level III and ISO 9001 2015 certified.

Required Skills:
4 years of Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 years of Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 years of Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 years of Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 years of Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 years of Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 years Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.

Responsibilities:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
The above job description and requirements are general in nature and may be subject to change based on the specific needs and requirements of the organization and project.

This is a remote position.",3.1,Radiant Digital,"Austin, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2000.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,TX,24.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$57.50
/hr","Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Experience:
Data Scientist: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",Not listed,Tekfocus Minds LLC,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,57.5,Remote,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$55.50
/hr","Job Overview:
The Office of the Attorney General’s Chief Data Office (CDO) is seeking a dynamic and visionary Data Scientist to join our team and support our System Modernization efforts for the Child Support Division.
This individual must be able to work in a heavily technical environment, preparing and optimizing data for Snowflake and utilizing SAS Viya to build comprehensive federal and state reports.
You will play a pivotal role in transforming, analyzing, and leveraging our data assets to drive strategic initiatives and business outcomes.
You must be comfortable analyzing data, developing predictive modeling algorithms, and can communicate your findings through visualizations enabling the discovery of solutions to business problems.
As a Data Scientist your role will be impactful, visible, and rewarding.
Responsibilities will include:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
Required Qualification/Skill Experience:
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 Years: Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 Years: Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Position Details:
The primary work location(s) will be at OAG State Office located at 5500 E. Oltorf St, Austin, TX 78741.
Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.
The working position is Telework.
Services are expected to start 11/12/2024 and are expected to complete by 08/31/2025. Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 1000 hours. This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing. ""work made to hire.""
Pay: $58/hr as W2.
S#: 302CSD2504
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $53.00 - $58.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics and business intelligence tools: 4 years (Required)
Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, R: 4 years (Required)
Data conversion and report building Snowflake and SAS Viya.: 4 years (Required)
Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment: 4 years (Required)
Proficiency in ETL processes & tools as AWS Glue and Lambda: 4 years (Required)
Strong knowledge of database Mangat. & Data warehousing: 4 years (Required)
Ability to Commute:
Austin, TX 78741 (Required)
Ability to Relocate:
Austin, TX 78741: Relocate before starting work (Required)
Work Location: In person",5.0,Advanced Proactive Solutions LLC,"Austin, TX",Unknown,,Company - Private,Security & Protective,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,55.5,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Data Lake","$90K
/yr","For over 90 years, Topcon’s vision has been to solve societal challenges around the globe. In healthcare, we are developing innovations that improve patients’ health and quality of life.
We empower eye care providers with advanced imaging, diagnostic solutions, and intelligent data technology. Our robotic devices deliver simplicity without compromise, by capturing clear images with the push of a button.
By joining Topcon Healthcare, you become part of a growing, diverse, global team. With office locations throughout North America, whether you are on-site, remote, or hybrid, our culture empowers you to contribute to company and personal success each day. At Topcon Healthcare, you can grow your career, gain new perspectives, and help address society’s most pressing challenges. If you have drive, passion, and a desire to be part of a collaborative team, we want to hear from you.
At Topcon Healthcare, we don’t wait for the future. We invent it. Join us.
Learn more about working with us at
topconcareers.com
THI is seeking a mission-driven a Data Scientist, Data Lake specialized in data cleaning, curation, and labeling. This role will play a critical role in ensuring the quality and usability of ophthalmic data for machine learning and other analytics initiatives. This individual will be responsible for developing and implementing data cleaning and preprocessing pipelines, curating datasets for specific use cases, and executing data labeling efforts.
Main Responsibilities:
Data Cleaning and Preprocessing:
Design and implement robust data cleaning processes to identify and address missing values, outliers, inconsistencies, and errors in datasets.
Develop and maintain data preprocessing pipelines to standardize, transform, and normalize data.
Utilize statistical and machine learning techniques to identify and correct data quality issues.
Data Curation and Labelling:
Select, extract, and organize relevant data from diverse sources to create curated datasets tailored to specific use cases.
Ensure data consistency, integrity, and documentation throughout the curation process.
Design and manage data labeling projects to generate high-quality labeled data.
Implement quality control measures to ensure the accuracy and consistency of labeled data.
Develop and maintain tools and scripts for automating data cleaning, curation, and labeling tasks.
Collaboration and Communication:
Collaborate with clinical scientists, data engineers, ML engineers, and domain experts to understand data needs and challenges.
Clearly communicate data quality findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Stay up to date on the latest techniques and tools in data cleaning, curation, and labeling.
Qualifications:
BSc or MSc in Life Sciences, Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computer or Data Science
2 years’ experience doing clinical science or developing data-driven algorithms for medical devices.
Experience in the ophthalmic industry is preferred, and experience with OCT data is highly preferred.
Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, set priorities, and handle multiple tasks and projects with a high degree of efficiency and comfort with ambiguity.
Expertise with statistical packages such as Python or R is highly desirable.
Expertise with Matlab, IDL, or similar packages is highly desirable.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with cloud computing applications (such as AWS or Azure)
A passion for leveraging data to improve patient care and drive innovation
Base Pay:
Expected Base Pay Range: $70,000 to $110,000 Annualized
The base pay range included is a projected hiring range for a position, level and potential work location(s) listed. Topcon provides the compensation range that it in good faith believes it might pay and/or offer for this position. This compensation range is based on a full-time schedule.
Benefits*:
Topcon offers a comprehensive benefit package for this position including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, tax saving spending accounts a 401(k) plan with employer match, tuition reimbursement in addition to other perks and benefits. We also offer time off for our employees to recharge. Our employees are eligible for paid company holidays, paid personal time off, and paid sick time that meets or exceeds state/local requirements.
Topcon reserves the right to ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and offer additional benefits and other compensation; individual candidate compensation may be determined based on individual skills, experience, training, certifications, education, final work location and other factors not related to an applicant’s sex or other status protected by local, state, or federal law. Changes in the position level, location or other factors associated with the role may change the final determined compensation. The recruiter can provide additional information during the hiring process.
Topcon time off policies can vary between roles which are exempt or non-exempt. For hourly (“non-exempt”) employees, we offer personal paid time off which accrues in accordance with local standards. For salaried (“exempt”) employees, we offer a flexible paid time off policy giving you flexibility to take time when needed, while supporting business needs. All paid time off policies are in accordance with or exceeding local law. Employees working at least 30 hours per week are eligible for our Health and Welfare benefit package.
EEO Statement:
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status.",3.2,Topcon Healthcare,"La Jolla, CA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,90.0,CA,,1,0,0,1,0
IT Data Scientist I-IV,"$103K
/yr","IT Data Scientist I-IV
- (2400277)

Founded in 1934, Medical Mutual is the oldest and one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio. We provide peace of mind to more than 1.6 million Ohioans through our high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans.
Medical Mutual’ s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we don’t answer to Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us and help our members achieve their best possible health and quality of life.
IT Data Scientist I
Entry-level data scientist developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist II
Experienced junior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends
IT Data Scientist III
Senior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Senior data scientists are expected to be self-sufficient and able to assist in coaching junior data scientists. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist IV
Expert data science developer responsible for leading team activities for design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
Responsibilities
IT Data Scientist I
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist II
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist III
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist IV
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned

Qualifications
IT Data Scientist I
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
0 to 1-year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
Python programming language
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist II
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
2+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
2+ years of experience with SQL programming language
1+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist III
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
4+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
4+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Advanced programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist IV
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
6+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
6+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Mastery of programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
Medical Mutual is looking to grow our team! We truly value and respect the talents and abilities of all of our employees. That's why we offer an exceptional package that includes:
A Great Place to Work
We will provide the equipment you need for this role, including a laptop, monitors, keyboard, mouse, and headset.
Whether you are working remotely or in the office, employees have access to on-site fitness centers at many locations, or a gym membership reimbursement when there is no Medical Mutual facility available. Enjoy the use of weights, cardio machines, locker rooms, classes and more.
On-site cafeteria, serving hot breakfast and lunch, at our Brooklyn, OH location. Convenience stores at many locations.
Discounts at many places in and around town, just for being a Medical Mutual team member.
The opportunity to earn cash rewards for shopping with our customers.
Business casual attire, including jeans.
Excellent Benefits
Employee bonus program
401(k) with company match up to 4% and an additional company contribution.
Health Savings Account with a company matching contribution.
Excellent medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance — insurance is what we do best, and we make affordable coverage for our team a priority.
Access to an Employee Assistance Program, which includes professional counseling, personal and professional coaching, self-help resources and assistance with work/life benefits.
Company holidays and up to 16 PTO days during the first year of employment with options to carry over unused PTO time.
After one year of service, parental leave for eligible employees who become parents through maternity, paternity, or adoption.

An Investment in You
Career development programs and classes.
Mentoring and coaching to help you advance in your career.
Tuition reimbursement up to $5,250 per year, the IRS maximum.
Diverse, inclusive, and welcoming culture with Business Resource Groups.

About Medical Mutual
Medical Mutual’s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we do not answer Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us.
There is a good chance you already know many of our Medical Mutual customers. As the official insurer of everything you love, we are trusted by businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout Ohio to provide high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans. Our plans provide peace of mind to more than 1.5 million Ohioans.
We are not just one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio, we are also the longest running. Founded in 1934, we aree proud of our rich history with the communities where we live and work.
At Medical Mutual and its family of companies we celebrate differences and are mutually invested in our employees and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse and nicotine testing.

Primary Location US-OH-Brooklyn
Work Locations Brooklyn 100 American Road Brooklyn 44144
Job 7 - General Staff
Organization Enterprise Analytics
Schedule Regular
Shift Standard
Employee Status Individual Contributor
Job Type Full-time
Job Level Day Job
Job Posting Oct 16, 2024, 2:39:10 PM",4.1,Medical Mutual of Ohio,"Brooklyn, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1934.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,OH,90.0,1,0,1,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$77K
/yr","Transport is at the core of modern society. Imagine using your expertise to shape sustainable transport and infrastructure solutions for the future? If you seek to make a difference on a global scale, working with next-gen technologies and the sharpest collaborative teams, then we could be a perfect match.
What you will do
As a Data Scientist, you will apply advanced data analytics techniques to analyze various types of vehicle and test data and provide detailed insights to simulation and engineering teams. The position entails a high level of collaboration with engineering teams working on future products, analyzing different types of logged and/or measured data (high frequency and low frequency) from customer trucks, field trucks and test vehicles to help make data driven engineering decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Utilize advanced analytics and machine learning techniques on customer and test vehicle data to extract meaningful insights and provide actionable recommendations to engineering and simulation teams
Integrate data from multiple sources (Customer vehicles, test vehicles etc.) and automate data flow, ensuring data quality and consistency, to facilitate deployment of advanced analytics techniques within vehicle engineering
Create data visualizations and dashboards to translate technical and customer data to provide actionable insights to stakeholders
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product development, and IT, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Collaborate with global teams on developing and improving analysis & simulation strategies based on actual customer data
Collaborate with engineering, testing and IT teams to drive development of AI/ML models to support and accelerate predictive modeling in engineering
Stay updated with the latest advancements in data science and automotive technologies to continuously improve usage of data analytics within vehicle engineering

Your future team
The Advanced Calculation Team is an important part of the Vehicle Engineering function for Volvo Group Trucks Technology, north America. Our team is a dynamic team of highly competent engineers who specialize in various CAE disciplines. We are responsible for ensuring functional requirements are met for durability & reliability, thermal management, cooling performance and other mechanical systems for heavy duty trucks developed for North America.
Who are you?
Do you dream big? We do too, and we are excited to grow together. In this role, you will bring:
A strong attention to detail with the ability to interpret data and translate information into actionable intelligence.
Capable of networking with individuals and teams across various departments and sites, sharing information and resources as needed, and working towards achieving common group goals.
Effective communication with the ability to listen effectively, transmit information accurately, and actively seek feedback from other experienced engineers, project managers, etc.
Ability to perform a wide range of tasks, respond positively to changing timelines and/or project scope, and open to accepting new challenges, responsibilities, and assignments.
Ease with communicating highly technical information to people of varying technical ability.
A desire and passion to create the very best product, working as an integral part of a highly technical organization.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
1-3 years of experience in data analytics with automotive industry background. Heavy duty vehicle experience is considered a plus
Demonstrated experience with machine learning and advanced analytics for predictive modeling such as regression analysis, neural networks (Deep Learning, RNN, LSTM, DQN etc.), time series forecasting, classification, clustering etc.
Proficiency in statistical analysis methods and programming languages such as Python (including libraries like Numpy, SciPy, Pandas, Tensorflow), SQL, Git, Azure, Hadoop, Matlab/Simulink, pySpark
Experience with building dashboards and help create visualizations from data using PowerBI, QlikView, Tableau etc.
Familiarity with Database Management Systems (BDMS) and proficiency in querying and manipulating data using SQL
Experience with Git and version control methods is a plus

What’s in it for you?
We offer a solid package of compensation and benefits, plus you will enjoy:
An organization the prioritizes employee's health and well-being.
Working in an empowered team solving complex challenges.
Opportunity to work with new technologies such as automation, electromobility, and connectivity.
Modern workspaces that allow agility and collaboration.
Multiple electric charging stations for cars.
Onsite facilities and activities that make everyday life easier including a cafeteria, chair massages, fitness center and fitness classes offered daily.
Ready for the next move?
If you are a Data Analyst / Scientist with an interest in working with a global organization focused on impacting everyday lives, apply today and join our team on this exciting journey!

We value your data privacy and therefore do not accept applications via mail.

Who we are and what we believe in
Our focus on Inclusion, Diversity, and Equity allows each of us the opportunity to bring our full authentic self to work and thrive by providing a safe and supportive environment, free of harassment and discrimination. We are committed to removing the barriers to entry, which is why we ask that even if you feel you may not meet every qualification on the job description, please apply and let us decide. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.”

Applying to this job offers you the opportunity to join Volvo Group. Every day, across the globe, our trucks, buses, engines, construction equipment, financial services, and solutions make modern life possible. We are almost 100,000 people empowered to shape the future landscape of efficient, safe and sustainable transport solutions. Fulfilling our mission creates countless career opportunities for talents with sharp minds and passion across the group’s leading brands and entities.

Group Trucks Technology are seeking talents to help design sustainable transportation solutions for the future. As part of our team, you’ll help us by engineering exciting next-gen technologies and contribute to projects that determine new, sustainable solutions. Bring your love of developing systems, working collaboratively, and your advanced skills to a place where you can make an impact. Join our design shift that leaves society in good shape for the next generation.",4.1,Volvo Group,"Greensboro, NC",10000+ Employees,1927.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,77.0,NC,97.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist (Mid),"$118K
/yr","This job opportunity is part of an RFP process; candidates are invited to submit their resumes detailing relevant experience.
Location: Bethesda, MD (Hybrid)
LCG is a minority-owned technology consulting firm that has been a trusted partner to more than 40 federal agencies, including 21 of the 27 Institutes and Centers (ICs) at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). For over 25 years, LCG has brought digitization and innovation to the Health and Human Services (HHS) and the NIH ecosystems. We support IT organizations by bringing precision technology and operation models that achieve mission capabilities and performance success.
Job Title: Data Scientist (Mid)
Job Summary: We are seeking an intermediate-level Data Scientist to perform extensive data analysis on large datasets to develop insights, identify trends, patterns, and anomalies. The successful candidate will collaborate with various teams to understand project objectives, perform data mining, data cleaning, and aggregation, and implement data models. This role will involve working with structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques. The Data Scientist will also support cloud computing initiatives, including developing automation solutions and enabling scientific cloud workflows.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and interpret large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation to prepare data for analysis and model implementation.
Develop and implement data models, conduct analysis, and interpret results using statistical techniques.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand the objectives and focus of data analysis projects.
Design, develop, and implement data-driven solutions to support organizational objectives.
Contribute to cloud computing initiatives, including automated self-service portals, cloud module development, and integration support for scientific computing.
Assist with cloud security operations by supporting the validation of security vulnerabilities and maintaining necessary security documentation.
Provide data analysis and insights to support decision-making for cloud environments, including usage, cost, and workload rationalization.
Support cloud workload migration projects by performing infrastructure assessments and assisting in business case development.
Collaborate with product management and development teams to support data-driven decisions for cloud platforms and products.
Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in data analysis, statistical modeling, and data mining.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, SQL, and experience with data visualization tools.
Knowledge of cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP) and experience with GitHub API integrations.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with attention to detail.
Familiarity with cloud security best practices and compliance standards such as NIST and FISMA.
Experience in cloud computing, scientific workflows, and automation.
Familiarity with Azure Active Directory (AD) and GitHub automation tools.
Experience in cloud enablement and workload migration for scientific computing environments.
Knowledge of federal security and compliance standards.

The projected compensation range for this position is $98,100 to $135,750 per year benchmarked in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. The target salary is 114,000. The salary range provided is a good faith estimate representative of all experience levels. Salary at LCG is determined by various factors, including but not limited to role, location, the combination of education/training, knowledge, skills, competencies, certifications, and work experience.
LCG offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance options (medical, dental, vision), life and disability insurance, retirement plan contributions, as well as paid leave, federal holidays, professional development, and lifestyle benefits.
Devoted to Fair and Inclusive Practices
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. If you are interested in applying for employment with LCG and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department by email at hr@lcginc.com.
Securing Your Data
Beware of fraudulent job offers using LCG's name. LCG will never request payment-related details or advancement of money during the application process. Legitimate communication will only come from lcginc.com or system@hirebridgemail.com emails, not free commercial services like Gmail or WhatsApp. If you receive suspicious emails asking for payment or personal information, contact us immediately at hr@lcginc.com.
If you believe you are the victim of a scam, contact your local law enforcement and report the incident to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.",3.8,"LCG, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1990.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,118.0,MD,34.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","We are searching for a Data Scientist – someone who works well in a fast-paced setting. In this position, you will harness the largest pediatric healthcare dataset in the nation to deliver analytics, insights, and solutions that help us create a healthier future for our global community.
The individual in this role delivers data analytics and supports the development and implementation of advanced analytic tools to meet the needs of teams throughout the organization. Works with a multidisciplinary team to design, develop, and create analytical solutions through applications of data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), and emerging technologies. Collaborates with clinical, business, and information systems team members to ideate and create new analytic solutions impacting patient care and hospital operations. Partners with subject matter experts to understand the relationship
between workflows and data and uses that data to create innovative solutions that support and advance targeted outcomes.
Exercises knowledge of descriptive, predictive, and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques, to develop strategic insights to drive operational and clinical goals.
Teaches developers, architects and analysts how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Provides data science and statistical support for advanced analytics projects at Texas Children's Hospital. Analyzes and interprets clinical, operational, and other data to provide insight into care delivery and operational initiatives. Responsible for evaluating data quality, preparing data, generating insights, and developing and presenting high-impact data stories. Serves as a subject matter expert associated with data analysis processes, advanced analytics techniques, statistics, and meaningful data visualizations. Provides consultation and support in the development, analysis, interpretation, and management of a
variety of complex data sources. Works on multiple concurrent projects.
Think you’ve got what it takes?
Job Duties & Responsibilities
Creates data models and generates data insights
Generates and communicates business and clinical insights, using various techniques and understanding the strengths and risks of different approaches to data analysis
Analyzes large, noisy datasets and identifies meaningful patterns that provide actionable results. Data sources may include the Enterprise Data Warehouse, various source systems and databases, and data from external sources such as the Census Bureau. Source data may include both structured and unstructured data
Evaluates and communicates data quality within the context of the problem being analyzed, and implements appropriate data cleaning techniques when preparing data
Performs basic and advanced statistical analyses, modeling, interpretation, documentation, and presentation
Builds and tests statistical, optimization, and machine learning models, including regression, classification, clustering, natural language processing, deep learning, and/or statistical modeling. Applies best practices for data preparation, statistical methods, and approaches to data analysis to ensure valid and reliable results
Independently owns descriptive, diagnostic analysis of complex data problems, consulting with data architects and subject matter experts as needed.
Designs, develops, and creates advanced analytical solutions
Communicates data insights and acts as a data storyteller by translating data analyses into easily understandable dialogue and terms to influence business decisions or actions.
Provides statistical consultation
Plans, communicates, and manages risk related to tasks
Participates in overall analytics and application support delivery activities
Skills & Requirements
Required master's degree in mathematics, computer science, statistics, engineering, analytics, life sciences, or a specific healthcare field (such as nursing, pharmacy, respiratory, etc.)
Preferred Ph. D
3 years of experience in experience in data science, data analytics, business analysis, data modeling, statistical analysis, statistical modeling, or machine learning
A Ph. D may substitute for 2 years of experience.",3.7,Texas Children's Hospital,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1954.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,TX,70.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Data Scientist, Growth","$175K
/yr","The Wealthfront Data Science Team utilizes our rich financial and behavioral data to influence key product and marketing decisions, as well as to safeguard our clients’ information and assets. The team draws from backgrounds in Computer Science, Natural Sciences, Statistics, Operations Research and Econometrics.

The Data Scientist in this role will be primarily embedded within Wealthfront’s Growth Team. The Growth Team is focused on acquiring new clients, as well as deepening Wealthfront’s relationship to existing clients. The team addresses this mandate by designing creative initiatives that cut across product lines. These initiatives can include testing new in-app features, discovering new channels of client acquisition, launching email campaigns, or targeted incentives – all based on unique insights about our clients and their interaction with the prevailing economic environment.

A fundamental trait for an effective Growth Data Scientist is curiosity for discovering new insights about client behavior. This person will enjoy going deep into the data to understand what’s driving client actions, proposing ideas for new projects and for driving clarity on the ‘why’ behind experiment results.

Technical tools used in this role include Hypothesis testing (potentially with atypical distributions), mathematical transforms of variables, data mining, natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML). You don't need experience in all of the techniques but must have the ability to pick them up as needed.

Potential project areas for this role include (but are not limited to) analyzing client signup flow, creating client groups according to business rules or automated clustering, creating ML models for estimating incentive revenues or costs and Named Entity Recognition using NLP.
Responsibilities
Demonstrate an owner’s mindset in formulation, execution, communication and timing of your projects.
Analyze and explain A/B test experiment results. Investigate why the experiment was a success or a failure. Discover client segments for whom the experiment worked unusually well or otherwise.
Suggest follow ups for recently concluded initiatives and experiments. Create and present rationales for questions including whether the experiment should be continued, and what should be different in the next iteration.
Work closely with Product, Design, Engineering and User Research members on the Growth Team to craft a long term (quarterly) learning plan and subsequently execute your part in that plan.
Collaborate with cross functional stakeholders to come up with feasibility of an experiment, experiment structure and opportunity sizing/impact of the experiment to guide the team’s roadmap.
Work with Data platform teams to procure required (but unavailable) data.
Enhance overall Data Science team execution through hands-on help, design feedback and peer review.
Requirements
A Master's or a PhD degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, or Natural Sciences with 4+ years of prior experience in a Data Science role. Exceptions to these requirements may be considered on a case-by-case basis.
Prior experience in Growth or Marketing
Prior experience analyzing complex experiments, including developing data insights and data backed recommendations for stakeholders.
Strong communication, storytelling and collaboration skills and a record of partnering across organizations to sharpen project requirements. Sometimes this includes re-framing the original request to solve a more general problem with similar effort.
Hands-on mathematical and software engineering skills to execute on complex projects.
Proficiency in Python and SQL.
Desire and ability to mentor junior Data Scientists within the team by exemplifying math, engineering and technical communication skills.
Estimated annual salary range: $165,000 - $185,000 USD plus equity and a discretionary bonus.

Benefits include medical, vision, dental, 401K plan, generous time off, parental leave, wellness reimbursements, professional development, employee investing discount, and more!

About Wealthfront

Wealthfront started with the ambition to transform the investment advisory business, with the goal to unlock access to high quality investment advice for millions who were underserved by the traditional institutions. We built one of the first automated investment products that allows you to invest in a personalized portfolio of thousands of companies in seconds for a remarkably low fee. We then expanded. We now work with partner banks to offer exceptional banking features through a Wealthfront Brokerage Cash Account, which makes it remarkably easy for people to automate their finances end-to-end and eliminated the hassle of money management, all of which resulted in attracting more than $70 billion of our client’s hard earned money, pioneering the robo-advisor category and transforming the broader industry. And yet, we have a long way to go to achieve our mission to build a financial system that favors people, not institutions.

Wealthfront’s vision is to make it delightfully easy to build long-term wealth on your own terms. This vision is more relevant than ever because millions more people are getting into the market early and investing their hard earned savings in a handful of stocks. While this is a great way to start, it is inconsistent with building long-term wealth. We want to empower young investors to expand their horizon, and easily explore and execute on a wider range of investing strategies, make informed investment decisions that are consistent with their values and beliefs while also making it effortless to grow and compound their savings exponentially in a way that’s transformational to their lives and their long-term future.

For more information please visit www.wealthfront.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Please review our candidate privacy notice.",4.1,Wealthfront,"Palo Alto, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,CA,13.0,1,0,0,1,0
DH Data Scientist,"$173K
/yr","Job Description:
Job Summary
The Data Scientist is responsible for maximizing the value of rich date resources available. This person will independently investigate and derive actionable insights to drive improvement for research and development and for clinical deployment of DeepHealth products.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Utilize statistics, data mining and programming knowledge to analyze clinical data and present insights to key stakeholders.
Identify patterns to drive improvement of research, product development and clinical deployment.
Generate and test hypotheses independently.
Investigate and improve data quality.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze product performance.
Summarize data in concise reports including tables, plots and other visual representations.
Document analysis for the engineering and clinical teams.

PLEASE NOTE: This is not an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities and requirements of the position described above. Other functions may be assigned and management retains the right to add or change duties at any time.

Minimum Qualifications, Education, and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in relevant field such as computer science, math, statistics, engineering (M.S. preferred).
At least two (2) years of experience (five plus (5+) years preferred).
Expertise in Python and scientific libraries such as numpy and pandas.
Expertise with data visualization techniques.
Experience working with medical data.
Experience evaluating machine learning models.
Experience evaluating clinical performance preferred.
Familiarity with machine learning techniques preferred.
Strong individual team contributor and collaborator.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.

Quality Standards
Communicates, cooperates, and consistently functions professionally and harmoniously with all levels of supervision, co-workers, patients, visitors, and vendors.
Demonstrates initiative, personal awareness, professionalism and integrity, and exercise confidentiality in all areas of performance.
Follows all local, state and federal laws concerning employment to include but not limited to: I-9, Harassment, EEOC, Civil rights and ADA.
Follows OSHA regulations, RadNet and site protocols, policies and procedures.
Follows HIPAA, compliance, privacy, safety and confidentiality standards at all times.
Practices universal safety precautions.
Promotes good public relations on the phone and in person.
Adapts and is willing to learn new tasks, methods, and systems.
Reports to work regularly as scheduled; consistently punctual with respect to working hours and lunch schedules, and maintains satisfactory personal attendance in accordance with RadNet guidelines.
Consistently adheres to the time management policies and procedures.
Completes job responsibilities in a quality and timely manner.

Physical Demands
This position often requires sitting, standing, walking, bending, twisting, reaching with hands and arms, using hands and fingers, handling, or feeling, speaking, listening, and high-level cognitive thinking. Must be able to use a computer and other office machinery including copiers, scanners and computer software. Must be able to lift up to 10 pounds occasionally. The position requires the ability to travel (~20% of time), drive a vehicle, and utilize other forms of transportation.

Working Environment
Office setting

Pay Range: USD $165,000.00 - USD $180,000.00 /Yr.",2.6,Deephealth,"Cambridge, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,173.0,MA,40.0,1,0,0,1,1
Wildfire Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills and talents to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.
Position Summary

We are seeking a highly skilled Data Scientist to join our team focused on innovative Wildfire Mitigation strategies. As a Data Scientist specializing in wildfire mitigation, you will play a crucial role in leveraging data-driven insights to develop and implement proactive measures to mitigate the impact of wildfires on communities and utility infrastructure. This position will analyze historical wildfire data, data on wildfire ignitions, data from vegetation management, and other relevant datasets to develop predictive models to assess wildfire risks and behavior to aid in prevention of wildfire events.
This is a hybrid position with 3-days per week (T-W-Th) in office at the Xcel Energy location listed for this position.
Applicants must be authorized to work for ANY employer in the U.S. We are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment visa at this time for this position.

Essential Responsibilities
Follow consistent practices to ensure data integrity and deal with imperfections in data. Champion the acquisition of new data sources to enhance value and fill gaps; automate collection processes; effectively process structured and semi-structured/unstructured data; proficiently integrate varied datasets; collaborate with business stakeholders as needed to ensure solid data understanding and proper data transformation; work cross-functionally with development and engineering teams; analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns; draw conclusions and gain actionable insights.
Build predictive models; propose solutions and strategies for business problems; apply the appropriate machine learning algorithm to data problems (e.g. supervised vs. unsupervised machine learning, clustering, ensemble methods, etc.); validate model results. Work closely with architecture and engineering team to deploy models; communicate results in a clear and non-technical manner.
Interact with senior management and effectively communicate technical information to numerous audiences (e.g. senior management, client community, peers and junior associates);effectively develop relationships with individuals inside and outside of IT; deliver difficult messages and express disagreement with others with confidence and self-control; address challenges to analytic processes and influence others to change their approach and work collectively to implement new tools/techniques; gain support from related stakeholders for analytic solutions and champion data driven business decisions.
Apply appropriate statistical techniques to data exploration and model development/assessment; communicate complex statistical concepts to non-technical audiences; maintain skills through continuing education.
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate results and highlight business impact; utilize various techniques and delivery methods of visualization that are audience appropriate.
Effectively collaborate with others to deliver efficient and high quality code; implement solid validation process to ensure consistency and minimize errors; champion more efficient ways to produce code iteratively; maintain skills through continuing education; stay up to date on new technologies/ tools; seamlessly transition between languages to apply the right approach to the problem.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT or math related field and 7 years of experience in analytics OR Master's degree in IT or math related field and 5 years of experience in an analytics
Problem solving skills, business acumen, and demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills
Expert SQL, Python skills Distributed Computing experience Excellent data visualization skills
Knowledge of data architecture and structure
Experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, predictive modeling are imperative; text mining and topic modeling are plus
Experience with Neural Networks and corresponding technologies
As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com.
Non-Bargaining
The anticipated starting base pay for this position is: $92,300.00 to $130,567.00 per year
This position is eligible for the following benefits: Annual Incentive Program, Medical/Pharmacy Plan, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Dependent Care Reimbursement Account, Health Care Reimbursement Account, Health Savings Account (HSA) (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Limited-Purpose FSA (if enrolled in eligible health plan and HSA), Transportation Reimbursement Account, Short-term disability (STD), Long-term disability (LTD), Employee Assistance Program (EAP), Fitness Center Reimbursement (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Tuition reimbursement, Transit programs, Employee recognition program, Pension, 401(k) plan, Paid time off (PTO), Holidays, Volunteer Paid Time Off (VPTO), Parental Leave
Benefit plans are subject to change and Xcel Energy has the right to end, suspend, or amend any of its plans, at any time, in whole or in part.
Deadline to Apply: 10/24/24
EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)
ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.",3.3,Xcel Energy,"Denver, CO",10000+ Employees,1909.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,111.0,CO,115.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","As a Data Scientist with a focus on machine learning, you will be responsible for developing and deploying data models that provide critical insights to drive data-driven decision-making across the organization. You'll work with large datasets to build predictive and prescriptive models, evaluate their performance, and collaborate with cross-functional teams to implement these models into business processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection, Cleaning, and Preparation:
Source and collect large datasets from multiple sources, ensuring high data quality.
Perform data preprocessing, including cleaning, normalization, transformation, and feature engineering, to prepare data for machine learning models.
Manage data pipelines and ensure efficient data flow for real-time analysis.
Model Development and Deployment:
Design, develop, and validate machine learning models for classification, regression, clustering, and recommendation systems.
Deploy machine learning models in production environments, ensuring they operate efficiently and scale as needed.
Continuously monitor, test, and update models in production to maintain optimal performance.
Machine Learning Techniques and Analysis:
Apply machine learning algorithms, including supervised and unsupervised learning techniques, to solve complex business problems.
Conduct A/B testing, cross-validation, and hyperparameter tuning to optimize models for accuracy and generalizability.
Leverage advanced techniques such as deep learning, reinforcement learning, or natural language processing when appropriate.
Visualization and Communication:
Visualize complex data and model outcomes using data visualization tools like Matplotlib, Seaborn, and Tableau to effectively communicate insights.
Present findings and actionable insights to non-technical stakeholders through clear, concise reports and presentations.
Collaborate with product managers, engineers, and business analysts to translate data insights into strategic initiatives.
Project Management and Cross-Functional Collaboration:
Lead data science projects from concept to completion, managing timelines, objectives, and deliverables.
Work closely with data engineers to maintain data infrastructure and optimize data processing workflows.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business goals and ensure that data science efforts are aligned with organizational objectives.
Continuous Learning and Development:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in data science and machine learning, and experiment with new tools and techniques.
Share knowledge and best practices with the data science team, contributing to the team's growth and development.
Attend conferences, workshops, and other professional development opportunities to enhance skills and knowledge.
Key Skills and Qualifications:
Technical Skills:
Programming Languages: Proficiency in Python or R, with strong knowledge of libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and Scikit-learn for data manipulation and model building.
Machine Learning Frameworks: Experience with TensorFlow, PyTorch, or Keras for building and deploying machine learning models.
Big Data Technologies: Familiarity with tools like Apache Spark, Hadoop, or Dask for processing and analyzing large datasets.
SQL: Ability to write complex SQL queries to extract, transform, and load data from relational databases.
Machine Learning Knowledge:
Supervised Learning: Experience with classification, regression, and time-series forecasting models.
Unsupervised Learning: Knowledge of clustering, principal component analysis (PCA), and anomaly detection.
Deep Learning: Understanding of neural networks and deep learning architectures for tasks such as image and speech recognition.
NLP: Familiarity with natural language processing techniques, such as topic modeling, sentiment analysis, and text classification.
Data Visualization:
Proficiency in data visualization tools, such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, Plotly, or Power BI, to create compelling visualizations of data and model results.
Experience with dashboarding tools, like Tableau or Power BI, to create interactive reports and dashboards.
Statistical and Mathematical Skills:
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, hypothesis testing, and probability.
Knowledge of linear algebra, calculus, and optimization methods commonly used in machine learning.
Soft Skills:
Problem-Solving: Ability to analyze complex problems and develop data-driven solutions.
Communication: Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to present technical information to non-technical stakeholders.
Collaboration: Experience working in cross-functional teams, with the ability to build strong relationships with team members across the organization.
Education and Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field. A Ph.D. is a plus.
Experience: 2+ years of experience in data science, with a focus on building and deploying machine learning models in a business setting.
Portfolio: A portfolio of completed projects demonstrating experience in machine learning, with examples of model development, deployment, and impact on business outcomes.
Example Projects:
Predictive Analytics: Developed a model to predict customer churn, enabling the company to implement targeted retention strategies.
Recommendation System: Built a recommendation engine for personalized product recommendations, which increased customer engagement.
Sentiment Analysis: Implemented a sentiment analysis model for customer feedback, helping the marketing team to understand customer sentiment and adjust campaigns accordingly.
Anomaly Detection: Created an anomaly detection model for fraud detection, reducing fraudulent transactions by identifying patterns in real-time.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $118,635.00 - $128,216.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Natural language processing: 1 year (Required)
Machine learning: 1 year (Required)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
Regression analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work Location: On the road",1.0,KesarWeb,United States,1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,123.0,United States,,1,0,1,0,1
"Data Scientist I, Lega Lab","$94K
/yr","WHY UT SOUTHWESTERN?
With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. As a world-renowned medical and research center, we strive to provide the best possible care, resources, and benefits for our valued employees. Ranked as the number 1 hospital in Dallas-Fort Worth according to U.S. News & World Report , we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development to align with your future goals. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more. We invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you'll discover a culture of teamwork, professionalism, and a rewarding career!

JOB SUMMARY
Works under specific direction to provide analysis and develops algorithms and software for clinical and/or basic research problems. Impacts data acquisition, management, and analysis in basic, translational, and clinical research, including clinical trials.

A Data Scientist I position is available in the Dr. Bradley Lega laboratory. Dr. Lega is an Associate Professor in the Department of Neurological Surgery at UT Southwestern Medical Center. He has secondary appointments in Neurology and Psychiatry. Dr. Lega's research focuses on how brain conditions affect memory. The research he began at the University of Pennsylvania, and that he continues at UT Southwestern, focuses on preserving memory function and restoring memory to patients with brain injuries or brain tumors.

This candidate will support study efforts studying intercranial Signal and data analysis for a new project. Prefer Master's degree or PHD in computational field. Candidate will need to be organized and have the ability to collaborate with trainees including undergraduate, graduate, medical students, as well as post-doctoral fellows and co-workers.

BENEFITS
UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:

PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage

100% coverage for preventive healthcare-no copay

Paid Time Off, available day one

Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)

Paid Parental Leave Benefit

Wellness programs

Tuition Reimbursement

Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer

Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!

EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATION
Required

Education
Master's Degree M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field or
Bachelor's Degree B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics

Experience

JOB DUTIES

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.

SECURITY AND EEO STATEMENT
Security
This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code 51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information.

EEO Statement
UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. Benefits UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:
PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage
100% coverage for preventive healthcare – no copay
Paid Time Off, available day one
Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)
Paid Parental Leave Benefit
Wellness programs
Tuition Reimbursement
Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer
Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!",3.9,UT Southwestern,"Dallas, TX",10000+ Employees,1943.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,94.0,TX,81.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","The Group:
Morningstar’s Research group provides independent analysis on individual securities, funds, markets, and portfolios. The Research group also provides data on hundreds of thousands of investment offerings, including stocks, mutual funds, and similar vehicles, along with real-time global market data on millions of equities, indexes, futures, options, commodities, and precious metals, in addition to foreign exchange and Treasury markets. Morningstar is one of the largest independent sources of fund, equity, and credit data and research in the world, and our advocacy for investors’ interests is the foundation of our company.

The Role:
As a Data Scientist, you will be a leading contributor in the implementation of Artificial Intelligence (AI) within Data Collections software applications, API’s, and other data products. This role requires significant interaction with both upstream and downstream stakeholders across Technology, Data, Products, Sales/Service, and Research.

The Data Scientist will transition approved Data Collections AI products from a prototype phase to a scalable and consumable service. Often, these services must be integrated into Morningstar’s platform of financial products, so that our clients can use these software tools in the investment decision-making process.

We are looking for an individual who possesses strong technical development skills, an ability to follow analyst requirements and technical specifications for robust code, and a passion for investment research.

This position reports to the Tech Manager of the Data Collections AI team. This position is based in our Chicago office. We follow a hybrid policy of 3 days onsite and 2 days remote work. Candidates must be currently authorized to work Permanently in the United States - this position does not sponsor H-1B Visa.

Responsibilities:
Automate manual data collection processes by applying cutting-edge solutions to tackle NLP problems, e.g., text classification, NER tasks.
Collaborate with upstream data analysts to clarify business needs, define project scope, design ML/AI solutions, and iteratively improve workflows and data storage practices
Implement ML/AI solutions from start to finish and collaborate with peer engineering teams for model deployment
Design innovative ways to improve automation rates for data collection
Research on latest technologies and propose new solutions to existing problems
Participate in team brainstorming sessions, provide guidance to MLDAs (machine learning data analysts), and contribute to the codebase
Introduce and follow good development practices, innovative frameworks and technology solutions
Follow best practices like estimation, planning, reporting and improvement brought to processes in daily work

Requirements:
No minimal industrial experience is required, if you have a Ph.D. degree in engineering, computer science, statistics or related field
Must demonstrate ML/AI knowledge and skills through research and/or side-projects in NLP related fields, if you have no prior industrial experience
Must have 2+ years of industrial experience in a data science role featuring NLP tasks, if you have a master’s degree or below
Fluent with Python and related packages like NumPy, pandas, scikit-learn, NLTK, PyTorch, TensorFlow, etc.
Sound knowledge of common ML/AI algorithms (e.g., linear/logistic regression, random forest, gradient boosting) and Deep Learning algorithms in particular (e.g., transformers, BERT, open-source LLMs)
Experience with SQL
Great communication and presentation skills
Able to work independently and being proactive
Experience with generative AI is preferred
Experience with finetuning LLMs is preferred
Experience with DevOps tools (e.g. Sagemaker, Git, Jenkins) is desirable
Experience developing and deploying solutions using services in the Amazon AWS ecosystem (Lambda, Sagemaker, EC2, RDS, EMR) is desirable
Intermediate knowledge of statistical methods is desirable
Familiarity with common data cleaning and munging techniques
Familiarity with data visualization
Familiarity with statistical methods, e.g., linear/logistic regression, optimization
Familiarity with mutual fund, fixed income, and equity data is a plus

001_MstarInc Morningstar Inc. Legal Entity
Morningstar’s hybrid work environment gives you the opportunity to work remotely and collaborate in-person each week. We’ve found that we’re at our best when we’re purposely together on a regular basis, at least three days each week. A range of other benefits are also available to enhance flexibility as needs change. No matter where you are, you’ll have tools and resources to engage meaningfully with your global colleagues.",3.9,Morningstar,"Chicago, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,IL,40.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$108K
/yr","Feedzai is the world's first RiskOps platform for financial risk management, and the market leader in safeguarding global commerce with today's most advanced cloud-based risk management platform, powered by machine learning and artificial intelligence. Feedzai is securing the transition to a cashless world while enabling digital trust in every transaction and payment type. The world's largest banks, processors, and retailers trust Feedzai to protect trillions of dollars and manage risk while improving the customer experience for everyday users, without compromising privacy. Feedzai is a Series D company and has raised $282M to date. With a valuation of +$1.5B, the company's technology protects 900 million people in 190 countries.
The Data Science Team within Customer Success is highly engaged with our clients making use of their critical thinking skills with a business-focused mentality and customer-facing attitude. They activate, maintain, and support clients, develop models and rules, and train & enable them. In addition, they work cross-functionally with other departments (e.g., Research, Product, Marketing) in a collaborative team spirit spanning the globe to ensure we deliver best in class risk prevention solutions. Being on the frontline of fighting crime and protecting people from financial harm is incredibly inspiring to each of us. Join Us!
Your Day to Day:
Understanding the data which our clients provide to us;
Cleaning that data and validating that it is correct;
Preprocessing the data, usually by using a mixture of shell scripts and a programming language such as Python, Java, Scala, etc
Iteratively computing features and tuning parameters to improve the quality of the model;
Communicating your findings to the project manager and assisting him/her in decision making on the Data Science part of the project;
Work together with key stakeholders (data scientists, engineers, risk managers) from our clients;
Work with other parts of the organization (Product, Research, etc.) to improve processes, best practices and tooling.
You Have & You Know-how:
MSc or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related field;
We welcome candidates with a minimum of 2 years of experience, ranging up to senior-level professionals;
Proficient in Machine Learning (training and testing, avoiding overfit, etc.);
Knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Spark, Hadoop and related;
Proficiency in bash, Python and either Java or Scala;
Knowledge of resource monitoring and runtime optimization (both at JVM and OS level);
Knowledge of statistics or data visualization is a plus;
Knowledge of tree based algorithms (Random Forests, XGBoost, LGBM) is a plus;
Knowledge of Deep Learning algorithms is a plus;
Ability to communicate your findings in a clear way.
The Customer Success Team is responsible for delivering our product to our clients. This includes education, configuration, solution development, and risk strategy to enable our clients to address their pain points. We collaborate with our clients to ensure they have the right solution, build out a strategy and training plan for them, and then support them through each phase of our client lifecycle. We grow at a fast clip and believe no challenge is too big or too small. Therefore, we have an open environment that encourages us to lean in, try new things, and discover our potential. Join Us!
#LI-IP1 #LI-Hybrid
Your First 30-Days at Feedzai:
You will be immersed in our brand with training, connections, and one-on-one time with your manager. You may shadow your colleagues virtually or onsite at an office depending on where you work as you are supported through your Feedzai journey. In addition, you will have access to a ton of information to give you history, context, and all the knowledge you can handle about Feedzai and the team. Finally, you will start working on projects and collaborating on work currently being done. We can't wait to have you join the team!
Life at Feedzai Instagram
Feedzai Culture
Feedzai is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Feedzai does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies.
Feedzai will use the personal data you provide us with by filling out this form for reviewing your application and to potentially negotiate a contract with you. Your personal data will be retained by Feedzai for 24 months following your application. Please see our Privacy Notice available at https://feedzai.com/about-us/privacy/ for more information on how we process your personal data.",3.1,Feedzai,"Atlanta, GA",501 to 1000 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,108.0,GA,13.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$127K
/yr","Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.
Micron Technology is a world leader in innovating memory and storage solutions that accelerate the transformation of information into intelligence, inspiring the world to learn, communicate and advance faster than ever.
As a Data Scientist at Micron Technologies, you will play a crucial role in analyzing and extracting valuable insights from large datasets related to semiconductor manufacturing, process optimization, and quality control. You'll collaborate with multi-functional teams to develop innovative solutions that improve product performance, yield, and reliability.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Data Analysis: Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) on semiconductor manufacturing data, including wafer fabrication, yield, and defect rates.
Model Development: Develop predictive models using machine learning techniques (such as regression, classification, and clustering) to optimize manufacturing processes and improve product quality.
Feature Engineering: Extract relevant features from raw data, considering factors like material properties, process parameters, and environmental conditions.
Anomaly Detection: Identify anomalies and outliers in semiconductor production data, suggesting corrective actions to improve yield.
Collaboration: Work closely with engineers, physicists, and domain experts to understand semiconductor processes and translate business requirements into data-driven solutions.
Visualization: Build clear and informative visualizations to communicate findings and insights to collaborators.
Continuous Improvement: Stay up to date with industry trends, research advancements, and emerging technologies in data science and semiconductor manufacturing.
QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
Master’s or Ph.D. in Data Analytics, Data Science, or related field with practical experience with Virtual Metrology, AI, process control, yield improvement, quality control, semiconductor process engineering, image analytics, or related semiconductor field focus.
EXPERIENCE
Prior experience in semiconductor manufacturing, yield optimization, or process control is highly desirable.
Technical Skills:
Proficiency in Python,
Strong knowledge of machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques.
Familiarity with web application and reporting, Experience with SQL and database management
Technologies:
ML frameworks: Decision trees, Clustering, Regression, Neural Networks, NLP, Pytorch, Big Data, Tensorflow, Pandas, Streamlit
Tools and technologies:
Docker, Containerization, Kubernetes, Jenkins, Ansible, Elasticsearch, SSL, Microservices, data visualization tools (e.g., Streamlit, Tableau, PowerBI, etc.).
Cloud expertise:
Google Cloud Platform, OpenShift Container Platform
AI Skills:
AI specialization and Virtual Metrology/Modeling/Computation:
Python library sklearn, xgboost, pycaret, etc. with the ability to learn any new package.
Knowledgeable with the general process of data science work like data extraction, feature extraction, feature selection and modeling.
Familiar with the skills to deal with time series data (feature extraction, modelling, similarity measure of time series).
Image specialization:
Familiar with deep learning network CNN and package keras.
Frontend:
Languages: HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Typescript
Frameworks/Libraries: Angular, HighCharts, Plotly, AG Grid, BootStrap, Ngx Bootstrap, RxJS
Packaging: npm, Jenkins
Backend/API:
Languages: Python,
Preferred, but not required: Java, C#, PHP, Perl, C++
Frameworks: Flask, FastAPI, Experience with RESTful APIs, Minor experience with WSLs
Databases: MySQL, MSSQL, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, BigQuery SQL, Snowflake SQL, basic understanding of SSL
Tools:
Git, Bitbucket
Soft Skills:
Analytical approach and problem-solving abilities.
Strong communication skills to work effectively with teams from various functions.
Adaptability and willingness to learn new technologies and methodologies.
Project Skills:
AGILE, Waterfall, Scrum, Software Development Lifecycle, JIRA, Change management, Release management, Configuration management
Schedule: Ability to conduct and/or attend meetings when needed in the evening.
As a world leader in the semiconductor industry, Micron is dedicated to your personal wellbeing and professional growth. Micron benefits are designed to help you stay well, provide peace of mind and help you prepare for the future. We offer a choice of medical, dental and vision plans in all locations enabling team members to select the plans that best meet their family healthcare needs and budget. Micron also provides benefit programs that help protect your income if you are unable to work due to illness or injury, and paid family leave. Additionally, Micron benefits include a robust paid time-off program and paid holidays. For additional information regarding the Benefit programs available, please see the Benefits Guide posted on micron.com/careers/benefits.
Micron is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other factor protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws.
To learn about your right to work click here.
To learn more about Micron, please visit micron.com/careers
For US Sites Only: To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact Micron’s People Organization at hrsupport_na@micron.com or 1-800-336-8918 (select option #3)
Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.
Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron.",3.8,Micron,"Manassas, VA",10000+ Employees,1978.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,127.0,VA,46.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The CDC Foundation helps the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) save and improve lives by unleashing the power of collaboration between CDC, philanthropies, corporations, organizations and individuals to protect the health, safety and security of America and the world. The CDC Foundation is the go-to nonprofit authorized by Congress to mobilize philanthropic partners and private-sector resources to support CDC’s critical health protection mission. Since 1995, the CDC Foundation has raised over $1.9 billion and launched more than 1,300 programs impacting a variety of health threats from chronic disease conditions including cardiovascular disease and cancer, to infectious diseases like rotavirus and HIV, to emergency responses, including COVID-19 and Ebola. The CDC Foundation managed hundreds of programs in the United States and in more than 90 countries last year. Visit www.cdcfoundation.org for more information.

Job Highlights
Location: Remote, must be based in the United States
Salary Range: $92,700-$134,275 per year, plus benefits. Individual salary offers will be based on experience and qualifications unique to each candidate.
Position Type: Grant funded, limited-term opportunity
Position End Date: June 30, 2025
Overview
The Data Scientist will play a crucial role in advancing the CDC Foundation's mission by providing informatics expertise and performing health informatics activities for a public health organization, which require specialized knowledge and skills in both health and information technology, including health informatics, scientific analysis, data management, and security standards. This role is aligned to the Workforce Acceleration Initiative (WAI). WAI is a federally funded CDC Foundation program with the goal of helping the nation’s public health agencies by providing them with the technology and data experts they need to accelerate their information system improvements.

Working within North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office, the Data Scientist will plan and manage the development, implementation, and maintenance of data systems and informatics processes needed for data generation, storage, processing, and analysis. The Data Scientist will collaborate with data content experts, analysts, data scientists, data modelers, warehouse architects, IT staff and other organization staff to design and implement proposed solutions that meet the needs of the public health agency.

The Data Scientist will be hired by the CDC Foundation and assigned to the North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office. This position is eligible for a fully remote work arrangement for U.S. based candidates.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, select, test, implement, and evaluate new or modified informatics solutions, data structures, and decision-support mechanisms to support agency information management needs within various contexts.
Create and manage the systems and pipelines that enable efficient and reliable flow of data, including ingestion, processing, and storage.
Create new and update existing health integration engine (Rhapsody) routes to handle new data elements and formats creating the necessary output for upload into surveillance systems and databases as well as reporting to the CDC.
Develop, implement, and improve data analysis and visualization tools for use by organization staff, to provide timely, relevant information that informs decisions affecting the public’s health.
Analyze diverse datasets related to public health issues to identify trends, patterns, and correlations.
Apply statistical methods and machine learning algorithms to extract actionable insights.
Develop predictive models to anticipate disease patterns, assess risk factors, and guide intervention strategies.
Continuously optimize algorithms for enhanced accuracy and performance.
Create compelling visualizations and reports to communicate findings to partners and decision-makers.
Present data-driven insights in a clear and understandable manner to facilitate informed decision-making.
Collaborate with the public health organization and its partners to understand their data needs and objectives.
Provide data-driven support and guidance to inform public health policies and initiatives.
Knowledgeable about industry trends, best practices, and emerging technologies in informatics and data management, and incorporating the trends into the organization's data infrastructure.
Provide technical guidance to other staff.
Prepare and maintain system documentation and architecture diagrams for processes assigned (new and existing).
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Informatics, Computer Science, Information Technology, Data Science, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of relevant professional experience
Proficiency in programming languages commonly used in data engineering, such as Python, Java, Scala, or SQL. Candidate should be able to implement data automations within existing frameworks as opposed to writing one off scripts.
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Scikit-learn).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Strong analytical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to interpret complex datasets and derive meaningful insights.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Expertise with Rhapsody Integration Engine (Rhapsody Certification or ability to obtain certification preferred)
Experience with multiple health data types (i.e. HL7, ELR, eCR, FHIR)
Solid understanding of API-based architectures (including FHIR)
Ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical partners effectively.
Flexibility to adapt to evolving project requirements and priorities.
Professional certifications in data science, machine learning, or public health analytics preferred.
Outstanding interpersonal and teamwork skills; collegial; energetic; and able to develop productive relationships with colleagues, partners, and partners.
Demonstrated ability to work well independently and within teams
Experience working in a virtual environment with remote partners and teams
Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Special Notes
This role is involved in a dynamic public health program. As such, roles and responsibilities are subject to change as situations evolve. Roles and responsibilities listed above may be expanded upon or updated to match priorities and needs, once written approval is received by the CDC Foundation in order to best support the public health programming.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status, and all other characteristics protected by law.

We comply with all applicable laws including E.O. 11246 and the Vietnam Era Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 governing employment practices and do not discriminate on the basis of any unlawful criteria in accordance with 41 C.F.R. §§ 60-300.5(a)(12) and 60-741.5(a)(7). As a federal government contractor, we take affirmative action on behalf of protected veterans.

The CDC Foundation is a smoke-free environment.
Relocation expenses are not included.",4.3,CDC Foundation,North Dakota,1001 to 5000 Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,113.0,North Dakota,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Details
Position Details
Job Title
Data Scientist

Position Number
8150736

Job Category
University Staff

Job Type
Full-Time

FLSA Status
Exempt

Campus
Maywood-Health Sciences Campus

Department Name
PHYSIOLOGY

Location Code
PHYSIOLOGY (06240A)

Is this split and/or fully grant funded?
Yes

Duties and Responsibilities
The Data Scientist will perform detailed analyses of large bodies of heterogeneous omics and clinical data to discover new patterns and insights that impact patient health or augment human capabilities. The Data Scientist should have deep expertise in the methods used to analyze data and deep knowledge of data types, topics, and scientific challenges and approaches that will be used to help inform and define new products, experiences, and technologies. This position works in conjunction with basic and clinical scientists to create intelligence-driven systems to solve complex translational problems.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Participates in multidisciplinary teams to design, develop, and recommend new approaches for data-driven decision-making.
Leads discovery processes on pioneering Artificial Intelligence (“AI"")/Machine Learning (“ML”) based approaches to solve complex data problems across a variety of domains.
Provides strategic direction regarding data science and AI.
Guides and educates basic science and clinical teams to provide unbiased and accurate information, analysis, consultation, and recommendations to support strategic and operational data science initiatives.
Develops analytics tools that can be used by other staff with non-technical expertise.
Supports scientific projects under the supervision of the principal investigator.
Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis.


Minimum Education and/or Work Experience
Bachelor’s degree in related field required

Qualifications
BS, the position would not necessarily require a PhD, as considerable experience in the field would be acceptable.

Certificates/Credentials/Licenses
N/A

Computer Skills
Office Suite skills, AI/Machine Learning based approaches. Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Required operation of university owned vehicles
No

Does this position require direct animal or patient contact?
No

Physical Demands
None

Working Conditions
None

Open Date
10/01/2024

Close Date

Special Instructions to Applicants

Diversity and Inclusion Statement
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion

As one of the nation’s largest Jesuit, Catholic universities, Loyola University Chicago fosters a transformative cultural experience that honors diversity, equity, and inclusion. We are committed to not only recruiting, but also retaining a diverse, mission driven workforce and enabling a culture of inclusiveness in an environment that values service excellence, stewardship, personal well-being, and professional development for all of our employees. Loyola University Chicago supports its staff and faculty with a wide array of affordable, comprehensive and competitive benefits centered on health and wellness, financial security, equity, and work-life balance. We actively seek those who wish to join our faculty, staff, and students in a community of diverse opinions, perspectives, and backgrounds supporting our Jesuit mission and striving toward the same goal of being persons for and with others.


Quick Link for Posting
https://www.careers.luc.edu/postings/29300",3.8,Loyola University Chicago,"Maywood, IL",1001 to 5000 Employees,1870.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,105.0,IL,154.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$175K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 4 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 2 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$145,000/year to $204,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,175.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$93K
/yr","Job Overview:
Graham Tech is seeking a skilled and experienced Data Scientist to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing a set of techniques and analytics applications that transform raw data into meaningful insights, supporting strategic decision-making processes. This role will require proficiency in data-oriented programming languages, visualization software, and a deep understanding of data mining, data modeling, natural language processing, and machine learning.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement data-driven techniques and analytics applications to transform raw data into actionable insights.
Apply advanced data mining, data modeling, natural language processing (NLP), and machine learning (ML) techniques to extract and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets.
Visualize data findings using cutting-edge visualization tools, ensuring that data is presented clearly and effectively to stakeholders.
Interpret and report data analysis results, providing insights to inform decision-making processes.
Create and maintain dynamic data reports that offer real-time insights for business needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and implement strategies that leverage data analysis to solve complex business challenges.
Work independently to perform all functional duties and responsibilities in a fast-paced, results-driven environment.
Requirements:
Experience: 3-10 years of experience in data science, analytics, or a related field.
Education: BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field.
Technical Skills: Proficiency in data-oriented programming languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL) and visualization software (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, D3.js).
Strong expertise in data mining, data modeling, NLP, and ML techniques.
Experience working with large datasets, both structured and unstructured.
Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI (Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information) clearance required.
Additional Qualifications:
Strong analytical, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to present technical findings to non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to work independently and manage multiple projects in a high-pressure environment.
Compensation:
At Graham Technologies, we believe in treating every person the way we want to be treated - fairly. Our compensation package ensures everyone at Graham Technologies is given equal pay for equal work - regardless of race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, disability, religion, age, nationality, or even negotiation skills!
Most IT companies can probably offer many of the same services, but what sets us apart from the others is truly our people! We care about our employees and show it often with sincere appreciation and acknowledgment of not only the final work products but also the little steps taken along the way! In addition, our generous benefits package helps our team members live well and prosper.
Here are just a few highlights:
Four Week's Accrued PTO First Year
Ten Paid Federal Holidays
Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
401(k) Plan with Annual Employer Contributions
Flexible Schedules
Reimbursements for Continued Education and Training

Why Graham Technologies?
Our Core Values say it all!
Value our Customers
Care about our Employees
Passionate about Innovation
Believe in a Strong Work Ethic
Rely on Teamwork
Integrity Matters

Founded in 2007, GTech is a consulting services firm zealous about providing the best solutions to address our client's needs and maximize the value of their investments. One way we do this is by providing exceptional employees for our clients-whose range of expertise expands the entire IT industry! We've cultivated a family of individuals where integrity, commitment, and reliability are etched into the heart of our delivery teams.
In addition, we are equally zealous about caring for our employees - the lifeblood of our business! We've purposefully created a culture that is friendly, family-oriented, and all-inclusive. Our team members are encouraged to ""have a life,"" both in and out of the office, through flexible schedules (where available), continuing education, and support to pursue their passions!",4.4,Graham Technologies,"Tampa, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,93.0,FL,17.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist III, Analytics","$179K
/yr","Expedia Group brands power global travel for everyone, everywhere. We design cutting-edge tech to make travel smoother and more memorable, and we create groundbreaking solutions for our partners. Our diverse, vibrant, and welcoming community is essential in driving our success.
Why Join Us?
To shape the future of travel, people must come first. Guided by our Values and Leadership Agreements, we foster an open culture where everyone belongs, differences are celebrated and know that when one of us wins, we all win.
We provide a full benefits package, including exciting travel perks, generous time-off, parental leave, a global hybrid work setup (with some pretty cool offices), and career development resources, all to fuel our employees' passion for travel and ensure a rewarding career journey. We’re building a more open world. Join us.
Data Scientist III, Analytics
Are you excited by the opportunity to pioneer the future of travel? Do you want to redefine the way people plan, search for, and book their travel? At Expedia Group, we believe that travel brings the world together, and we are passionate about the endless possibilities.
The InsurTech team at Expedia is responsible for managing the InsurTech P&L and driving its strategy and business development efforts across the Expedia Group globally. We deliver millions of dollars of incremental revenue making a direct and meaningful impact to the company's bottom-line. At the same time, we increase customers’ confidence to book travel and make difference in their lives.
Introduction to team
This role is an excellent opportunity to join the InsurTech Analytics Team where we are passionate about delivering outstanding user experience! We power and deliver product analytics, user behavior analysis, experimentation, and visualization services that enable highly tailored and optimized experiences using the scientific methods and applied insights. We’re looking for a highly motivated individual to join our team to help us formulate business strategy and to deliver impactful analytics insights. If you enjoy using data to build business cases, solve business problems, improve ongoing business activities, and to work on a team that functions as the “business owner” you will fit right in. In this role, you will use your analytical and business skills to inspire product, engineering, finance and customer support, and our strategic partners to prioritize, implement and scale our product ideas
In this role, you will:
Provide strategic analysis and insights for the InsurTech business, while actively looking for opportunities to grow the business
Own end to end process in evaluating A/B or multivariate tests to improve learning; proactively uncover opportunities and recommend new features for test and learn; evaluate and apply alternative methods to supplement randomized testing
Performs advanced statistical analyses on experimental data to identify trends and derive actionable insights
Apply your expertise in data modeling, quantitative analysis, data mining, data visualization with a goal of improving customer experience and business results with a religious focus on impactful analytics, steward product team to drive insights
A high performing individual contributor who consistently applies and enhances the analytics capabilities, best practices and processes to solve complex business issues and identify opportunities
Function independently, assessing existing and upcoming business needs
Works with data engineers to ensure best practices are implemented through experimentation platform
Effectively communicates statistical findings and insights to stakeholders and collaborate with product development teams to integrate statistical insights into decision-making
Experience and qualifications:
Bachelor's, Masters or PhD degree in Mathematics, Science, Statistics, Engineering or 5+ years’ data analytics experience in a business context
Strong analytical/modeling skills with ability to convert raw data into measurable insights
Able to structure / work on data exploration problems, with innovative ways and solutions, bringing to bear strong reporting and data visualization skills
Strong hands-on experience in SQL
Proficient in building data visualizations (Tableau, Looker, etc.)
Intermediate (or better) knowledge of Statistics
Experience with R, python, or other coding language a plus
Experience with web analytics tools such as Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics a plus
Experience in modeling selection, building and evaluation
The total cash range for this position in Seattle is $137,500.00 to $192,500.00. Employees in this role have the potential to increase their pay up to $220,000.00, which is the top of the range, based on ongoing, demonstrated, and sustained performance in the role.
Starting pay for this role will vary based on multiple factors, including location, available budget, and an individual’s knowledge, skills, and experience. Pay ranges may be modified in the future.
Accommodation requests
If you need assistance with any part of the application or recruiting process due to a disability, or other physical or mental health conditions, please reach out to our Recruiting Accommodations Team through the Accommodation Request.
We are proud to be named as a Best Place to Work on Glassdoor in 2024 and be recognized for award-winning culture by organizations like Forbes, TIME, Disability:IN, and others.
Expedia Group's family of brands includes: Brand Expedia®, Hotels.com®, Expedia® Partner Solutions, Vrbo®, trivago®, Orbitz®, Travelocity®, Hotwire®, Wotif®, ebookers®, CheapTickets®, Expedia Group™ Media Solutions, Expedia Local Expert®, CarRentals.com™, and Expedia Cruises™. © 2024 Expedia, Inc. All rights reserved. Trademarks and logos are the property of their respective owners. CST: 2029030-50
Employment opportunities and job offers at Expedia Group will always come from Expedia Group’s Talent Acquisition and hiring teams. Never provide sensitive, personal information to someone unless you’re confident who the recipient is. Expedia Group does not extend job offers via email or any other messaging tools to individuals with whom we have not made prior contact. Our email domain is @expediagroup.com. The official website to find and apply for job openings at Expedia Group is careers.expediagroup.com/jobs.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. This employer participates in E-Verify. The employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.8,Expedia Partner Solutions,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1996.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,179.0,WA,28.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist / Data Resource Analyst II,"$78K
/yr","International Studies and Programs (ISP) supports MSU global learning and international engagement under the MSU Strategic Plan 2030 in the areas of research, teaching, and outreach. To fulfill its main objectives, ISP communicates key international data to university leadership and the public and serve as a campus-wide analytical resource. ISP manages MSU’s International Data Portals, which provide visualizations of MSU's Externally Funded International Projects, International Student Enrollment, Education Abroad, International Agreements Data, and International Research Collaboration. These dashboards utilize Tableau, Tableau Prep, and SQL Oracle to draw from MSU’s electronic data warehouse (EDW). International Studies and Programs (ISP) collaborates with units across campus to streamline and upgrade the international data plan.
ISP is seeking a Data Scientist who is curious, creative, and can see both the big picture and work with attention to detail. The successful candidate will have strong technical, interpersonal and communication skills to convey findings to various audiences and positively influence university leadership. The Data Scientist will need to articulate complex issues to a non-technical audience clearly and effectively. Daily activities may include development of data representations and visualizations, advising on predictive models and creating easy to understand reports and dashboards. This will be a full-time (100% FTE) 12-month fixed-term position funded for one year with the possibility of reappointments depending on funding and performance.
ISP is currently operating under a hybrid modality structure, with staff working three days in person and two days remote. ISP values individual and group differences and encourages applicants who will contribute to a culture of inclusion on campus.
Primary responsibilities include:
Data Analysis and Reporting
Analyze, interpret, summarize, and present data and findings in a clear, comprehensive, and effective manner
Conduct internal and external benchmarking analysis for ISP
Develop and design reports and dashboards in Tableau
Support Data-Driven Decision Making
Consult with and support ISP leadership and units by pulling and analyzing data
With ISP leadership, collaborate with other campus units on communicating, building, and evaluating data tools and streamlining data reporting
Provide analysis and decision support for university international initiatives, projects, and planning as needed
Provide training/capacity development support for ISP units in various data-related topics
Represent ISP on university-wide data-related committees
Keep apprised of trends and conversations about data in higher education and international education
Database Management and Development
Build custom SQL to meet reporting requirements and manage ISP International Data Portals
Perform query tuning and root cause analysis to optimize database performance and correct errors
Develop SQL to create database tables, views, and stored procedures to support data storage and report development
Provide targeted training on tools and platforms when necessary
Minimum Requirements
Master’s degree in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field including other degrees with a strong quantitative emphasis
Three to five years of post-graduate work experience in data mining, data warehousing, data science, data management, as well as data analysis and visualization
Experience writing advanced SQL queries; expertise with Oracle PL/SQL, expertise with Tableau
Experience using data retrieval and manipulation, and expertise in statistical tools (such as SAS, SQL, STATA, R, D3, Python) and data visualization tools (such as Tableau and Tableau Prep)
Demonstrated success in managing collaborative projects involving cross-functional and interdisciplinary teams
Excellent communication skills including presenting, editing, and writing, as well as ability to demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy
Desired Qualifications
Doctorate in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field with a strong quantitative emphasis
Proven excellence in program or project management
Experience working in a university setting and in-depth knowledge of university administrative organization, policies, procedures, and practices for institutional research-oriented roles
Experience managing higher education related data (student, research, business support systems)
Understanding of data warehouse technologies (Oracle preferred) and familiarity with data integration processes using enterprise ETL tools (DataStage preferred) and the role of data stewardship
Ability to model and analyze data in statistical tools (SPSS, R, SAS, Python, or similar) combined with experience integrating large datasets from a variety of sources; experience with ETL tools (DataStage, Informatica)
Ability to work closely with clients to build custom dashboards, conduct data analysis to support ISP centers and other units, as well as develop and streamline data reporting
Make data-informed recommendations to administrators to contribute to decision making
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, age, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Application Materials
Resume and cover letter
Work Hours
STANDARD 8-5
Description of End Date
one year from date of hire
Website
https://www.isp.msu.edu/
Bidding eligibility ends October 22, 2024 at 11:55 P.M.",4.3,Michigan State University,"East Lansing, MI",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,78.0,MI,169.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US; Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_113619
ABOUT US
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
OUR TEAM
Zynga’s Applied AI group focuses on developing innovative ways to tackle problems within the game development process, demonstrating directly the ways that AI can improve the creativity and productivity of team members across Zynga. Our team is multi-disciplinary, and includes Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers among others. We build cloud-based tools and technologies to support every aspect of the development process, from concept development through to LiveOps and publishing operations.
To be successful in this role you should have curiosity about the areas of Game Development, Artificial Intelligence and Computational Creativity, be a proactive learner, have good depth in technical skills, and a strong desire to build high quality software that delivers value and efficiency.
KEY ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Write well-crafted, efficient and testable code and algorithms
Design and build AI systems that solve computational creativity challenges
Implement and deploy solutions as part of a larger microservice architecture
Plan and implement tasks of small to medium scale independently
Excellent communication skills and comfort working in a collaborative inter-discipline environment
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Ph.D. or M.S. in Computer Science with specialization in AI, or equivalent experience
Experience building AI systems for games, procedural content generation, or computational creativity
Understanding of principles of AI, including ML
Familiarity with principles of game design and implementation
Familiarity with Python, and at least one of Typescript, C++, or Unity C#
Familiarity with containers and cloud infrastructure principles – AWS preferred
Desire to learn and share knowledge with peers, collaborate in a cross-functional team
WHAT WE OFFER YOU
Competitive salary, bonus plan and ESPP (Employee Stock Purchase Plan)
401K Company Match Contribution (US)
RRSP/DPSP company match contribution (Canada)
Health coverage, dental, disability, critical illness, EAP, and life insurance (Canada)
Medical, dental, vision, EAP, life insurance, and disability benefits (US)
Virtual mental health and neurodiversity support programs
Global Fitness reimbursement program
Global Wellbeing Program
Financial wellness program with unlimited access to certified financial planners
Discretionary Time Off policy for many employees
Family planning support program
Generous paid parental, pregnancy-related disability, caregiver, and compassionate leaves
Zynga happy hours and frequent employee events
Flexible working hours on many teams
Culture of diversity and inclusion including employee resource groups
Work with cool people and impact millions of daily player
This is a fully remote role that may be based anywhere in the United States. Below are the expected salary and wage ranges for applicants based in locations where the pay transparency law is in effect:
Colorado: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
California: $87,400 and $129,340 per year
New York State (inclusive of New York City): $98,400 and $145,620 per year
Washington: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
Base pay offered is based on market location, and may vary further depending on individualized factors for job candidates, such as job-related knowledge, skills, experience, and other objective business considerations. Subject to those same considerations, the total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a bonus and/or equity awards and eligibility to participate in our 401(K) plan, in addition to a full range of medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees will also receive 16 paid holidays per calendar year, unlimited discretionary time off, and will receive up to 6.5 sick days per calendar year. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation or benefit program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.
#LI-RK2
Zynga does not engage in financial exchanges during the recruitment or onboarding process. We do not conduct job interviews over third-party messaging apps such as Telegram, WhatsApp or others. We will never ask you for your personal or financial information over unofficial chat channels. Our in-house recruitment team only contacts individuals via official company email addresses (i.e., via a zynga.com or naturalmotion.com email domain).
If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you may wish to contact the authorities. In the United States, you may file a complaint with the FBI. More information is available here: https://www.ic3.gov.",4.2,Zynga,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,114.0,United States,17.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Type: Description:
Position: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
Duration: 12 months +
Job Description
Minimum Qualifications:
Have image processing background and a good understanding on image quality
Experience in data science and analytics, including statistical data analysis.
Strong programming skills, including python and Linux scripting for data processing and tool development.
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or related areas.
Good communication skill and positive working attitude
Expect to be self-motivated, proactive, and solution-oriented
Preferred Qualifications:
Hands-on experience with data batch processing and handling
Experience with deep learning network model training and inferencing
3 years of relevant work experience
Please send your resumes to gjose@sisinc.com (Max 3-4 pages)
Location San Diego , CA Min Experience (yrs): Required Education: Not Specified Benefits:",4.1,SIS,"San Diego, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1987.0,Company - Private,Film Production,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,CA,37.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$88K
/yr","Position Description:

Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead and support data processing and analysis tasks, such as building data pipelines, monitoring data quality, developing documentation, applying statistical and data science methods, and creating data visualizations. Our junior data scientists underpin our company's core offerings in program improvement and data science, which yield crucial evidence and information for policy and decision makers. This position will either work remotely or flexibly in one of our office locations.
This position focuses on health policy, which includes projects such as:
Enhancing knowledge management and library curation across all VRDC projects by developing Python scripts that leverage large language models for automated document classification.
Monitoring the impacts of an alternative payment model for primary care in terms of care quality, cost, and health outcomes for diverse beneficiaries, using claims from thousands of primary care practices across the country and predicting future hospital costs and behavior.
Developing and testing how claims and survey data from federal and state-level programs could be used to measure patients’ experience of care, quality of life, care coordination, and long-term outcomes for beneficiaries enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid.
Creating an interactive data visualization tool to help local policy and decision makers understand how social determinants of health are related to health outcomes in their county, using open-source data from public agencies and non-profits.
Specifically, this Data Scientist contributes to team-based projects by:
Co-developing analysis plans with a senior data scientist or researcher
Writing and maintaining programming systems in languages such as Python and R to obtain, combine, and transform datasets on cloud, internal, and client servers
Developing and maintaining documentation
Implementing quality assurance practices, such as version control and testing
Conducting analysis and communicating results, both to clients and internal teams, such as descriptive statistics, data visualizations, and model diagnostics
Leading and managing small teams and tasks with oversight from a senior staff member
Position Requirements:

Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree, with an academic record including courses in subjects such as statistics, data science, data analytics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, and/or social science; equivalent years of experience can be substituted
Demonstrated interest and/or experience using programming and data science and/or statistics to contribute to projects with a policy/social impact in academic and/or professional settings
At least three years of experience performing data cleaning and analysis using programming languages such as R, Python, or Julia in the academic, extra-curricular, or professional environment
Experience executing data science and statistics techniques including regression modeling, machine learning algorithms, network analysis, or natural language processing
Ability and desire to work independently as part of an interdisciplinary team that may be geographically dispersed. This includes being able to learn from and apply resources such as self-guided tutorials, package documentation, and academic articles and willingness to constantly learn and contribute to knowledge sharing with team members.
Experience with reproducible research principles, version control, interactive visualizations, and common packages/libraries for supporting data science work in R, Python, and/or Julia (e.g., tidyverse, R Shiny, R Markdown, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, MLJ.jl, DataFrames.jl, and/or Makie.jl).
Desired but not required: experience with healthcare datasets (for example, Medicare or Medicaid claims and enrollment data), production-quality machine learning applications, cloud computing environments, and algorithmic fairness and ethics
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $75,000- $100,000. This position is eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance. To apply, please submit a cover letter (optional), resume, code samples, and salary expectations.
Staff in our Health or Human Services units will eventually work with some of our largest clients, including the Centers for Medicaid & Medicare Services (CMS) and other agencies. Most staff working on these contracts will be required to complete a successful background investigation including the Questionnaire for Public Trust Position SF-85 (https://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/sf85p.pdf). Staff that are unable to successfully undergo the background investigation will need to be able to obtain work outside these contracts. Staff will work with their supervisor to get re-staffed, however if they are unable to do so it may result in employment termination due to lack of work.
STAFFING AGENCIES AND THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS: Mathematica is not accepting candidates for this role or any technical role from staffing agencies or third-party recruiters. Please do not contact technical or senior staff at Mathematica or share unsolicited resumes. All agency inquiries go through the talent acquisition team and will be routed accordingly.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ; Remote
#LI-AR1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1986.0,Company - Private,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,88.0,DC,38.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$192K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modeling project
At least 3 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, be able to work with cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $144000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,192.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","Recipient of the 2023 Exceptional PeopleFirst Workplace Award by IWPL, HelloGov® is an Artificial General Intelligence (AGI) company founded by ex-Machine Learning (ML) Researchers from OpenAI, Google, and the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), united by our shared patriotism and belief of advancing AI in the U.S. public sector to maintain global competitiveness. We conduct AGI research, solution development, and human capital resourcing with the declared intention of Democratizing AI for the Public Sector™.
HelloGov® was founded on the principles of nurturing our employees’ careers and wellness. We take pride in providing a work-life balance that stems from years of building companies in Silicon Valley. Our founders have pioneered some of the best AI technologies in the market and have always operated with humility and ambition. We operate with an award-winning people first mantra of:
Transparency.
Flexibility.
Work life balance.
Culture of sharing credit.
Empowering every employee, from the shop floor to the top floor.
Good company policies.
Investment in people.
Focus on ergonomics.
Fun traditions.
Benefits (Tier I Health/Vision/Dental insurance, 401K, EAP, Equity, Stipends, Investment in your wellness)
Equality in Compensation (i.e. every team member, from Junior to Executive staff, receives a Sign-On Bonus)
We are seeking a team of Data Scientists with 3+ years of experience in multi-intelligence and multi-domain systems, with a strong background in NLP, computer vision, statistical learning theory, and ML model development. Candidates should be proficient in Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++, and have experience communicating technical concepts to business, technical, and non-technical audiences. This role leverages advanced AI technology set to dominate the market for the next decade, supporting national biodefense through integrated biosurveillance (IB).
Major Duties:
Designs, configures, develops, tests, and supports informatics and data science solutions for a wide array of technical use cases;
Applies analytical methodologies to diagnose data-related challenges, implement solutions, and evaluate performance;
Documents and presents requirements, design alternatives, and findings to team members and clients;
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships; and
Experience with integrated development environments, data integration, data visualization, data mining, and analysis tools.
Maintains and guides the development of common libraries and tools used by multiple teams.
Aids in formulating a strategy on how to achieve rapid prototyping
Required Skills/Experience:
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory;
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models;
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility;
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models; and
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations.
LOCATION:
Falls Church, VA (Hybrid)
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATIONS:
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence, or related field required (Master's degree preferred).
CLEARANCE:
Top Secret (SCI eligible)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $138,997.00 - $189,983.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
No weekends
Experience:
Natural language processing: 3 years (Required)
AI models: 3 years (Required)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++: 5 years (Required)
large scale data handling + data mining: 5 years (Required)
GPU Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
DoD: 10 years (Preferred)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Falls Church, VA 22041",Not listed,HelloGov,"Falls Church, VA",-1,-1.0,-1,-1,-1,-1,0,1,164.0,VA,-1.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,1
DATA SCIENTIST,"$112K
/yr","Description
Applies knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to the development and improvement of processes. Identify limitations, or potential issues with datasets and data types that may impact performance from machine learning algorithms. Re-train models as needed to address new challenges, or novel goals. Aid investigators and stakeholders in the validation of results. Generate detailed reports and presentations. May mentor and train junior staff members.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Compile, manipulate, and analyze data using descriptive and inferential statistics to address a broad spectrum of research and administrative questions.
Use statistical software to create data analysis programs/syntax with appropriate documentation.
Understand and interpret data analysis programs/syntax written by others involved in data analysis in the department.
Explain complex statistical concepts in the form of presentations or written project reports/documentation
Write and/or review relevant portions of research study manuscripts and/or abstracts.
Effectively visualize and organize complex datasets for the production of high-quality figures and tables for reports, manuscripts, and presentations
Consult with various researchers or administrators regarding data analytic needs, feasibility of proposed analyses, sequential procedures, and project timelines
Perform other duties as assigned
Salary Range: $85,600 - $139,100

Qualifications
Doctorate degree in a related field OR Master's degree in a related field and two (2) years of related experience OR Bachelor's degree in related field and four (4) years of related experience required. Work experience may NOT substitute for education requirement.
UAB is an Equal Employment/Equal Educational Opportunity Institution dedicated to providing equal opportunities and equal access to all individuals regardless of race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, sex (including pregnancy), genetic information, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and veteran’s status. As required by Title IX, UAB prohibits sex discrimination in any education program or activity that it operates. Individuals may report concerns or questions to UAB’s Assistant Vice President and Senior Title IX Coordinator. The Title IX notice of nondiscrimination is located at uab.edu/titleix.

Primary Location: University
Job Category: Professional & Managerial
Organization: 312000000 Dept of Medical Education
Employee Status: Regular
Shift: Day/1st Shift
Work Arrangement (final schedule to be determined by the department/hiring manager): Onsite",4.0,University of Alabama at Birmingham,"Birmingham, AL",10000+ Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,AL,,0,0,0,0,0
Product Data Scientist,"$124K
/yr","The Company
PayPal has been revolutionizing commerce globally for more than 25 years. Creating innovative experiences that make moving money, selling, and shopping simple, personalized, and secure, PayPal empowers consumers and businesses in approximately 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy.

We operate a global, two-sided network at scale that connects hundreds of millions of merchants and consumers. We help merchants and consumers connect, transact, and complete payments, whether they are online or in person. PayPal is more than a connection to third-party payment networks. We provide proprietary payment solutions accepted by merchants that enable the completion of payments on our platform on behalf of our customers.

We offer our customers the flexibility to use their accounts to purchase and receive payments for goods and services, as well as the ability to transfer and withdraw funds. We enable consumers to exchange funds more safely with merchants using a variety of funding sources, which may include a bank account, a PayPal or Venmo account balance, PayPal and Venmo branded credit products, a credit card, a debit card, certain cryptocurrencies, or other stored value products such as gift cards, and eligible credit card rewards. Our PayPal, Venmo, and Xoom products also make it safer and simpler for friends and family to transfer funds to each other. We offer merchants an end-to-end payments solution that provides authorization and settlement capabilities, as well as instant access to funds and payouts. We also help merchants connect with their customers, process exchanges and returns, and manage risk. We enable consumers to engage in cross-border shopping and merchants to extend their global reach while reducing the complexity and friction involved in enabling cross-border trade.

Our beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We live each day guided by our core values of Inclusion, Innovation, Collaboration, and Wellness. Together, our values ensure that we work together as one global team with our customers at the center of everything we do – and they push us to ensure we take care of ourselves, each other, and our communities.
Job Description Summary: As a Data Scientist, you will spearhead our efforts to measure and enhance developer experience to integrate with PayPal's products. This role is central to our mission, offering you the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technology in a fast-paced environment. You will lead the data science projects for the initiatives that optimize features that are adopted by the external developer community, directly impacting PayPal's ability to offer seamless payment solutions to millions of users worldwide.
Job Description:
The Global Analytics and Data Science team is seeking a Data Scientist of PayPal’s SMB Analytics and ML Team to join us as exceptional problem solver with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus.
We are responsible to find opportunities and gaps in developer experience, product flows using statistical methods to strategize Product roadmap. This team empowers senior leadership with actionable insights for informed, data-driven decisions.
In this role, we are tackling the complex and fascinating challenge of optimizing the developer experience at PayPal. Developers go through a non-linear journey, from onboarding to integration, and it's crucial to understand their pain points at each stage. This includes analyzing what they search for, how they navigate the platform, when they begin integrating our APIs, and their activities during sandbox testing.
We aim to provide deep insights into these areas by applying advanced statistical methods and cutting-edge data science techniques. This allows us to uncover friction points and provide actionable recommendations to enhance the overall developer journey. Additionally, we leverage the latest generative AI tools to assist developers throughout their integration process. A key part of this role is to measure the efficacy and accuracy of these AI-driven solutions, ensuring they deliver value and improve the experience.
This is a unique opportunity to dissect the end-to-end developer journey, identify opportunities for product improvement, and collaborate with our product and engineering partners to drive innovation in developer tools and resources. The role goes beyond simple analytics, offering the chance to shape PayPal’s developer ecosystem and influence the tools that developers rely on to build seamlessly integrated solutions.
Your day to day:
Data Analysis and Decision Making:
Utilize large, complex datasets to drive improvements in developer KPIs.
Employ advanced analytical and statistical techniques to identify trends, issues, and opportunities.
Perform deep-dive analytics including Causal Inference analysis, Pre-Post analysis, Sensitivity analysis, financial projections, and additional ad-hoc exercises to provide holistic recommendations.
Strategic Influence: Develop and present insights and strategic recommendations to Product and Data Science leadership. Influence product direction and strategic decisions through data-driven insights.
Collaboration and Communication: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including product development, engineering, and marketing to implement data-driven improvements. Occasionally collaborate with developers to optimize their experiences. Mentor junior team members .
Innovation and Improvement: Lead initiatives to refine existing analytical processes and develop new approaches to business challenges. Promote a culture of continuous improvement and testing.
What do you need to bring
3+ years of experience in analyzing multi-dimensional datasets and creating actionable business solutions.
Strong educational background with a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Expertise in SQL, Excel, and visualization tools such as Tableau or Qlikview. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python is preferred.
Demonstrable experience with big data technologies such as Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, and BigQuery.
Knowledge of Python, Jupyter Notebooks, and SQL.
Exceptional communication skills to effectively articulate insights and influence cross-functional teams.
Prior experience in performing data science to fuel insights to drive Product within a high-tech environment.
Personal Attributes:
A data-driven decision maker, passionate about solving complex problems using analytical solutions.
A self-starter who is motivated to take initiative and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
A fun-loving team player who brings energy and enthusiasm to the workplace.
Comfortable with ambiguity and uncertainty in a dynamic business landscape.
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000
For the majority of employees, PayPal's balanced hybrid work model offers 3 days in the office for effective in-person collaboration and 2 days at your choice of either the PayPal office or your home workspace, ensuring that you equally have the benefits and conveniences of both locations.

Our Benefits:
At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.
We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:
To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.
Belonging at PayPal:
Our employees are central to advancing our mission, and we strive to create an environment where everyone can do their best work with a sense of purpose and belonging. Belonging at PayPal means creating a workplace with a sense of acceptance and security where all employees feel included and valued. We are proud to have a diverse workforce reflective of the merchants, consumers, and communities that we serve, and we continue to take tangible actions to cultivate inclusivity and belonging at PayPal.

Any general requests for consideration of your skills, please Join our Talent Community.

We know the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can get in the way of meeting spectacular candidates. Please don’t hesitate to apply.",3.7,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",10000+ Employees,1998.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,124.0,CA,26.0,1,0,0,0,1
Research Data Scientist,"$116K
/yr","Job ID
34394667
Category
Research and Development
Organization
University Library
Department
University Library Dept
Location
Main Campus - UCR
Salary
$81,500 - $150,100
Date Posted
October 10, 2024
Application Deadline
Open Until Filled
Schedule
8AM - 5PM
Full/Part Time
Full-time(100%)
Level of Supervision
General Supervision
Other Information
Qualifies for Employee Referral Bonus: No
UC Internal Job: No
Position Information
Reporting to the Director of Research Services, this position will be the driving force of the library's Data Science Initiative to support campus research through interdisciplinary collaboration on cutting-edge projects in STEM, Liberal Arts, and Social Sciences. Seeks opportunities to embed themselves in campus research teams to directly address UCR researchers' data and AI related needs through activities including but are not limited to: designing, developing and implementing infrastructure, systems, software and solutions; directly answering compute- and data- intensive research questions; contributing novel ideas, expertise, and methods to the teams' intellectual discourse and advancement; providing data/AI related consultation and instruction. In partnership with other library colleagues as well as UCR colleges, academic programs, and Research and Economic Development, Information Technology Services, and Research Computing, will continuously develop specialized and sought-after data science and AI expertise synergistic with UCR faculty's research agendas.

Candidates are encouraged to include a CV and/or portfolio link with examples of AI/Data related work, if available.

Finalists will be asked to conduct a presentation (including providing visual representation of work samples) as part of the interview process.

The full salary range for the Research Data Scientist is $81,500 - $150,100 annually. However, the expected pay scale for this position is up to $115,000 annually. We base salary offers on a variety of considerations, such as education, licensure and certifications, experience, and other business and organizational needs.

Applicants must have current work authorization when accepting a UCR staff position. Currently, we are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa for staff.

As a University employee, you will be required to comply with all applicable University policies and/or collective bargaining agreements, as may be amended from time to time. Federal, state, or local government directives may impose additional requirements.",4.2,"University of California, Riverside","Riverside, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,116.0,CA,,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Company Description
At Red Hat, we connect an innovative community of customers, partners, and contributors to deliver an open source stack of trusted, high-performing solutions. We offer cloud, Linux, middleware, and virtualization technologies, together with award-winning global customer support, consulting, and implementation services. Red Hat is a rapidly growing company supporting more than 90% of Fortune 500 companies.
Job Summary
Red Hat’s Global Engineering team is looking for an experienced data scientist to join the InstructLab team. In this role, you’ll contribute directly to Red Hat’s rapidly growing AI/ML (artificial intelligence and machine learning) family of products. You will be responsible for the investigation, evaluation, integration, and development of open source AI/ML systems and functionality to improve the overall development and operations of both Red Hat's downstream AI products and upstream open source AI projects. Qualified data scientists in this role regularly participate in design reviews and productization for major product features and bug fixes, and are experienced and comfortable working with Linux-based operating systems.

The ideal candidate will be a highly collaborative individual with a passion for working on complex projects in an open organization where contributions are valued and expected from all levels. This job role will require engaging in upstream open source communities. As this is a fast-moving area of opportunity for Red Hat, the ability to communicate productively and effectively with team members, stakeholders, and Red Hat leadership is critical.
This position reports directly to a Manager of Software Engineering for InstructLab. This position must have the ability to partner collaboratively in our Boston, MA office at least 3 days per week.
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop innovative capabilities for open source platforms used for building, training, testing, and serving models for AI-enabled applications, carrying your work through all phases of software development and delivery, including: researching and conceptualization, team design review, writing the implementation, authoring a testing strategy and necessary automation, productizing and packaging the code, and supporting its deployment through to end-users.
Monitor and participate in upstream open source AI/ML communities, evaluating new AI/ML-related technologies in the space and considering potential integrations and collaborations upstream.
Regularly reading papers and keeping up with AI/ML developments, particularly in the Generative AI space.
Promote and foster Red Hat’s open-source value proposition as it pertains to AI/ML engineering and product infusion and development.
Contribute to the development of the open-source projects that comprise Red Hat’s AI family of products.
Take part in the shared responsibility of delivering and maintaining assigned products.
Regularly communicate with project stakeholders including other teams of Red Hat engineers, product managers, consultants, management, and senior leadership.
Take on the role of Subject Matter Expert, as needed, per domain and project.
Lead, coach and collaborate with junior engineers as they build AI/ML knowledge and skills.
Coordinate and collaborate with external teams, including IBM Research on key strategic vision and implementation details.
Share our experiments and learnings from an experienced position in the Data Science community through blogs, presentations, new ideas and existing work at various technical outlets and conferences.
Promote upstream acceptance and community building.

Required Skills
Bachelor's degree in computer science, data science, computer engineering or equivalent
5+ years of experience as a data scientist (or similar roles).
Extensive, advanced experience with Python development.
Experience with AI and Machine Learning platforms, tools, and frameworks, such as: Tensorflow, PyTorch, LLaMA.cpp, and Kubeflow.
Experience working with Kubernetes/OpenShift and containers, troubleshooting issues, and working with YAML.
Experience with Cloud Native Technologies and Platforms (e.g. Kubernetes)
Demonstrates knowledge of unit testing frameworks and methodologies
Demonstrates knowledge of machine learning relevant mathematics and statistics.
Strong self-motivation and organizational skills.
Demonstrates ability to context switch between multiple concurrent projects.
Excellent English written and verbal communication skills.
Collaborative attitude and willingness to share ideas openly.
Ability to quickly learn and use new tools and technologies.
Passion for developing open source software.
Nice to Haves
Familiarity with participating in an agile development team
Experience writing Kubernetes controllers and operators.
Experience creating Ansible automation scripts.
Experience with big data storage techniques, such as Parquet, Avro, and S3.
Experience with hardware accelerators, such as GPU, CUDA, and ROCm.
Understanding of DevOps methodology.
The salary range for this position is $127,890.00 - $211,180.00. Actual offer will be based on your qualifications.
Pay Transparency
Red Hat determines compensation based on several factors including but not limited to job location, experience, applicable skills and training, external market value, and internal pay equity. Annual salary is one component of Red Hat’s compensation package. This position may also be eligible for bonus, commission, and/or equity. For positions with Remote-US locations, the actual salary range for the position may differ based on location but will be commensurate with job duties and relevant work experience.
About Red Hat
Red Hat
is the world’s leading provider of enterprise
open source
software solutions, using a community-powered approach to deliver high-performing Linux, cloud, container, and Kubernetes technologies. Spread across 40+ countries, our associates work flexibly across work environments, from in-office, to office-flex, to fully remote, depending on the requirements of their role. Red Hatters are encouraged to bring their best ideas, no matter their title or tenure. We're a leader in open source because of our open and inclusive environment. We hire creative, passionate people ready to contribute their ideas, help solve complex problems, and make an impact.
Benefits
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Flexible Spending Account - healthcare and dependent care
Health Savings Account - high deductible medical plan
Retirement 401(k) with employer match
Paid time off and holidays
Paid parental leave plans for all new parents
Leave benefits including disability, paid family medical leave, and paid military leave
Additional benefits including employee stock purchase plan, family planning reimbursement, tuition reimbursement, transportation expense account, employee assistance program, and more!
Note: These benefits are only applicable to full time, permanent associates at Red Hat located in the United States.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion at Red Hat
Red Hat’s culture is built on the open source principles of transparency, collaboration, and inclusion, where the best ideas can come from anywhere and anyone. When this is realized, it empowers people from diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and experiences to come together to share ideas, challenge the status quo, and drive innovation. Our aspiration is that everyone experiences this culture with equal opportunity and access, and that all voices are not only heard but also celebrated. We hope you will join our celebration, and we welcome and encourage applicants from all the beautiful dimensions of diversity that compose our global village.
Equal Opportunity Policy (EEO)
Red Hat is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer. We review applications for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, veteran status, genetic information, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

Red Hat does not seek or accept unsolicited resumes or CVs from recruitment agencies. We are not responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions, or any other payment related to unsolicited resumes or CVs except as required in a written contract between Red Hat and the recruitment agency or party requesting payment of a fee.
Red Hat supports individuals with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodations to job applicants. If you need assistance completing our online job application, email
application-assistance@redhat.com
. General inquiries, such as those regarding the status of a job application, will not receive a reply.",4.2,"Red Hat, Inc.","Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,1993.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,170.0,MA,31.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$163K
/yr","It's time to transform markets
Existing workflows within syndicated loan and CLO markets are painful for clients: they are outdated, overcomplicated, and time-consuming. It's time for a change.
Octaura is reimagining the way these markets trade, with efficiency, transparency and simplicity at the heart of what we do. We bring trading capabilities, data and analytics together for the first time on a digitized platform–fundamentally transforming the markets and streamlining workflows like never before.
At Octaura, everyone belongs
It's essential that Octaurians are confident in knowing they have the space to use their voice and talents. The world is diverse and we actively want our team to reflect this. We're a values-driven company and by engaging, solving and evolving together, we create a culture that is collaborative, transparent, impactful and innovative. And fun!
The role in a nutshell
As a Senior Data Scientist at Octaura, you'll be a key member of our Product team, playing a critical role in the development and growth of our Data and Analytics products. This is an early-stage opportunity to shape the future of our data science initiatives and make a significant contribution to the company's success.
What You'll Do
Drive the full product lifecycle: From ideation and market research to model development, deployment, and performance monitoring, you'll be involved in every stage of creating impactful data-driven solutions.
Develop advanced models: You'll leverage your expertise in machine learning and statistical modelling to extract valuable insights from large and complex datasets, building predictive models that fuel our product offerings.
Build scalable infrastructure: Design, implement, and maintain cloud-based infrastructure on AWS and/or Azure to support our data processing and model deployment needs.
Collaborate effectively: Work closely with the Go-to-Market team to understand client needs and market trends, and partner with the Technology team to build robust data pipelines.
Communicate insights: Clearly and effectively communicate your findings to stakeholders across the company, translating complex data into actionable insights
The Opportunity
Make a real impact: You'll have a direct and significant impact on the company's growth and success.
Early-stage opportunity: Shape the future of our data science products and be a part of building something truly innovative.
Collaborative environment: Work alongside a talented and passionate cross functional teams in a supportive and collaborative environment.
Growth potential: Ample opportunities for professional development and career advancement within a rapidly growing startup.
The Person
Advanced degree and experience: PhD (or MSc + 5 years of experience) in statistics, physics, mathematics, computer science, or a related field.
Strong programming skills: Proficiency in Python and experience with popular machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Proven modelling experience: A track record of building and deploying predictive models using machine learning algorithms.
Data analysis expertise: Strong analytical skills with the ability to analyse and interpret complex datasets, identify patterns, and draw meaningful conclusions.
Excellent communication: Exceptional written and verbal communication skills with the ability to explain technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Cloud proficiency: Experience with cloud-based architectures (AWS and/or Azure) is highly preferred.
Fintech/Financial Services experience is a plus: Experience in the financial services industry, particularly within the fixed income market, is a valuable asset.
If you are passionate about data science in finance, have a strong background in technical majors, and are excited about building predictive models and cloud-based infrastructure using AWS and Azure, we want to hear from you. As a startup, we offer a dynamic and entrepreneurial work environment, where you will have the opportunity to take ownership of your work and make a real impact on our business.
The base pay range for this position in New York is $150,000 - $175,000 annually. Pay may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Equity and year-end bonus may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and other benefits, dependent on the position offered. Applicants should apply via Octaura's internal or external careers site.

Octaura Work Perks
At Octaura, our people are our most valuable asset, and we are pleased to offer the following benefits to all full-time employees:
Competitive compensation and equity
Unlimited Paid Time Off
Competitive Parental Leave
Daily breakfast, coffee and snacks in the office
90% company-paid healthcare
Onsite gym & discounted membership
We're committed to equal opportunity employment
Octaura is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status.",5.0,Octaura,"New York, NY",1 to 50 Employees,2022.0,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,163.0,NY,2.0,1,0,0,1,1
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$193K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 18, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200573520

Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products, such as Siri and Search. Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products. This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.
Solid foundation in data science, machine learning, and evaluation, with hands-on experience in independently conducting and analyzing experiments. Ability to take ownership of smaller analytical projects and contribute effectively to larger initiatives.
Proficiency in critical thinking, problem-solving, and collaboration with cross-functional teams to address business needs. Strong communication skills for articulating and translating business questions into actionable insights using statistical techniques and available data.
Strong programming skills in Python for data processing, with expertise in SQL or Spark. Proficient in data wrangling, and able to assist in prototyping data quality and evaluation pipelines, working alongside engineering teams to help solve data challenges.
Some relevant internship or work experience for M.S. or Ph.D. candidates, or 3 years of relevant work experiences for people with other degrees in quantitative fields.

Preferred Qualifications
Experience in generative model and application development, with a focus on data, evaluation, and automation. Ability to adopt or implement established methodologies and apply statistical analysis in problem-solving.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $135,400 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,193.0,WA,48.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Monitoring Operations","$270K
/yr","About the Team
OpenAI’s mission is to ensure that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We believe that achieving our goal requires real world deployment and iteratively updating based on what we learn.
The Intelligence and Investigations team supports this by identifying and investigating misuses of our products – especially new types of abuse. This enables our partner teams to develop data-backed product policies and build scaled safety mitigations. Precisely understanding abuse allows us to safely enable users to build useful things with our products.
About the Role
As a Data Scientist on the Monitoring Operations team, you will be responsible for building systems to proactively identify abuse on OpenAI’s products. This includes ensuring we have robust monitoring in place for new products, and can sustain monitoring for existing products. You will also respond to critical escalations, especially those that are not caught by our existing safety systems. This will require expert understanding of our products and data, and involves working cross-functionally with product, policy, and engineering teams.
This role is based in our San Francisco office and includes participation in an on-call rotation that will involve resolving urgent escalations outside of normal work hours. Some investigations may involve sensitive content, including sexual, violent, or otherwise-disturbing material.
In this role, you will:
Scope and implement monitoring requirements for new product launches. This involves working with Product and Policy teams to understand key risks, and working with Engineering teams to ensure we have sufficient data and tooling.
Improve processes to sustain monitoring operations for existing products. This includes developing approaches to automate monitoring subtasks.
You might thrive in this role if you:
Have at least 4 years of experience doing technical analysis, especially in SQL and Python.
Have experience in trust and safety and/or have worked closely with policy, enforcement, and engineering teams
Have experience with basic data engineering, such as building core tables or writing data pipelines (not expected to build infrastructure or write production code)
Have experience scaling and automating processes, especially with language models
About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,270.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II,"$130K
/yr","Want a meaningful career where you can make a difference? Edward Jones sounds perfect for you.

Collaboration. Autonomy. Opportunity. Words our headquarters associates use when talking about working at Edward Jones. Words that describe what it's like being part of a firm where everyone is aligned toward a singular focus: serving the client. And everyone is working to make the firm better together - as they grow as individuals. If these words resonate with you, we should talk.

Job Overview

Position Schedule: Full-Time

Overview:
Come join us in Firm Strategy, where we strive to unleash the full potential of data and AI to address business challenges. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will design, develop and deliver data science solutions requiring advanced mathematical methods, statistical and machine learning models in support of data-driven strategies. You will combine data from multiple sources to develop innovative solutions to business problems and collaborate with business partners and other data scientists to develop tailored analytic solutions that inform and influence decisions across the firm.

Key Responsibilities:
Partner with business partners to design, develop and deploy solutions that enable hyper-personalized interactions.
Use machine learning, numerical optimization, and statistical modeling to discover and explain patterns in data.
Create features and develop models beyond standard toolset libraries to meet unique business challenges.
Proactively interpret and communicate findings and insights from the data to business partners. Clear communication without technical jargon is important to success.
Execute projects from design and data-gathering, through implementation, final delivery, and monitoring.
Define data needs and evaluate data quality for applicability to posed problems.
Rapidly optimize data and model inputs to increase predictiveness and relevance in response to changes in data availability, data quality, or business specifications.


Edward Jones' compensation and benefits package includes medical and prescription drug, dental, vision, voluntary benefits (such as accident, hospital indemnity, and critical illness), short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage. Short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage are provided at no cost to associates. Edward Jones offers a 401k retirement plan, and tax-advantaged accounts: health savings account, and flexible spending account. Edward Jones observes ten paid holidays and provides 15 days of vacation for new associates beginning on January 1 of each year, as well as sick time, personal days, and a paid day for volunteerism. Associates may be eligible for bonuses and profit sharing. All associates are eligible for the firm's Employee Assistance Program. For more information on the Benefits available to Edward Jones associates, please visit our benefits page.

At Edward Jones, we value and respect our associates and their contributions, and we recognize individual efforts through a rewards program that promotes a long-term career, financial security and well-being. Visit our career site to learn more about our total compensation approach, which in addition to base salary, typically includes benefits, bonuses and profit sharing. The salary range for this role is based on national data and actual pay is based on skills, experience, education, and other relevant factors for a potential new associate:

Hiring Minimum: $96471
Hiring Maximum: $164262

Read More About Job Overview

Skills/Requirements
Master of Science Degree in a quantitative field required. PhD degree desired.
5+ years professional experience.
Proficiency with one or more computing languages (Python, SQL).
Ability to deliver capabilities that derive insights or novel ideas from data and mathematical models using best data science practices. Connect insights to desired research or business outcomes.
Demonstrated ability and interest in learning new algorithms and tools, e.g. GenAI, machine learning, and optimization.
Proficiency with cloud computing platforms and distributed systems for large-scale data processing.

Please note: Candidates that live within a commutable distance from our Tempe, AZ and St. Louis, MO home office locations are expected to work in the office three days per week, with preference for Tuesday through Thursday.

Read More About Skills/Requirements

Awards & Accolades

At Edward Jones, we are building a place where everyone feels like they belong. We're proud of our associates' contributions to the firm and the recognitions we have received.

Check out our U.S. awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Check out our Canadian awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Read More About Awards & Accolades

About Us

Join a financial services firm where your contributions are valued. Edward Jones is a Fortune 500¹ company where people come first. With over 8 million clients and 19,000 financial advisors across the U.S. and Canada, we're proud to be privately-owned, placing the focus on our clients rather than shareholder returns.

Behind everything we do is our purpose: We partner for positive impact to improve the lives of our clients and colleagues, and together, better our communities and society. We are an innovative, flexible, and inclusive organization that attracts, develops, and inspires performance excellence and a sense of belonging.

People are at the center of our partnership. Edward Jones associates are seen, heard, respected, and supported. This is what we believe makes us the best place to start or build your career.

View our Purpose, Inclusion and Citizenship Report.

1Fortune 500, published June 2023, data as of December 2022. Compensation provided for using, not obtaining, the rating.

Edward Jones does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, gender, religion, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, pregnancy, veteran status, genetic information or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.",3.7,Edward Jones,United States,10000+ Employees,1922.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,United States,102.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection","$170K
/yr","Proof is the world's first identity-assured transaction management platform and we are on a mission to digitize trust for all of life’s most critical transactions. Developed by the same market leaders and experts who brought notarization online with Notarize℠, Proof offers trust in a digital world by verifying identities and securing transactions to protect businesses and their customers. Since 2015, we’ve completed many of the world’s first digital commerce transactions, including the first online real estate closing, online mortgage closing, online auto sale, and online will and we're still just getting started!

We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our Fraud Tech product engineering team. As a member of this team, you will use your analytical skills to identify and prevent fraud risks. You will work with product and engineering partners, as well as risk and policy teams to build solutions that fit product needs.

Proof is a growing startup. You will get a chance to meaningfully contribute to building new products and services leveraging novel, data driven solutions, wear multiple hats, and closely collaborate within and outside of a small team.
What you’ll do as the Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection at Proof:
Leverage advanced analytics, machine learning, and statistical methods to detect and mitigate fraudulent activities on Proof platform
Contribute to large-scale analytical fraud research and implementation projects through all stages
Partner with product managers, engineers, operational and legal teams to envision and implement best in class data based solutions
Evaluate fraud cases holistically to identify areas of improvement
Analyze and incorporate additional signals that continuously improve fraud detection
Maintain knowledge and understanding of current trends and issues affecting the area of expertise
What we're looking for:
Master’s degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related field
5+ years of experience in data science with a focus on fraud detection or a similar domain
Traditional and advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms
Excellent quantitative and analytical skills; ability to derive patterns, trends and insights, and perform risk/reward tradeoff analysis
Deep understanding of data management such as data pipeline and data quality
Experience in building machine learning powered products
Analytic thought leadership; intellectual curiosity
Effective communication skills and experience presenting findings to stakeholders
$130,000 - $210,000 a year
This is the expected cash compensation range for this position. The salary offered within this range will be determined based on factors including but not limited to skills, qualifications, experience and location. The total compensation package for this role also includes benefits such as medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability coverage, flexible paid time off, Carrot Fertility, participation in a 401(k) with company match and more!
Proof is committed to building an inclusive environment for people of all backgrounds and everyone is encouraged to apply. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We'd love to hear from you.",4.7,Proof.com,United States,1 to 50 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,170.0,United States,3.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II (NLP Required),"$90K
/yr","Job Summary:
The Data Scientist II is responsible for designing and validating predictive models, machine learning models, and artificial intelligence that inform and improve business processes across the organization (operational, clinical, financial, marketing, etc.).
Targeting a candidate fluent in NLP, generalized linear models, LLM, deep learning and predictive modeling.
Essential Functions:
Create, maintain, and communicate an analytical plan for each project
Mine and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets
Employ wide range of data sources to develop algorithms for predicting risk and understanding drivers, detecting outliers, etc.
Develop visualizations that demonstrate the efficacy of developed algorithms
Provide statistical validation and analysis of outcomes associated with clinical programs and interventions
Collaborate with other teams to integrate with existing solutions
Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders
Prepare code for operationalization of end-to-end model pipeline and deliverable for business consumption
Perform any other job duties as requested
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, other related field or equivalent years of relevant work experience is required
Minimum of three (3) years of experience in data analysis and/or analytic programming required
Experience with cloud services (such as Azure, AWS or GCP) and modern data stack (such as Databricks or Snowflakes) is preferred
Healthcare experience is preferred
Competencies, Knowledge, and Skills:
Proficient in SQL and at least one of the following programming languages: Python or R
Preferred beginner level of knowledge of developing reports or dashboards in Power BI or other business intelligence applications
Ability to perform basic statistical analyses and techniques including A/B testing, general significance testing, and sampling methodologies
Working knowledge of predictive modeling and machine learning algorithms such as generalized linear models, non-linear supervised learning models, clustering, decision trees, dimensionality reduction and natural language processing
Proficient in feature engineering techniques and exploratory data analysis
Familiarity with optimization techniques and artificial intelligence methods
Ability to analyze large quantities of information and identify patterns, irregularities, and deficiencies
Proficient with MS office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Access)
Demonstrated critical thinking, verbal communication, presentation and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and within a cross-functional team environment
Licensure and Certification:
None
Working Conditions:
General office environment; may be required to sit or stand for extended periods of time
Compensation Range:
$69,400.00 - $111,000.00
CareSource takes into consideration a combination of a candidate’s education, training, and experience as well as the position’s scope and complexity, the discretion and latitude required for the role, and other external and internal data when establishing a salary level. We are highly invested in every employee’s total well-being and offer a substantial and comprehensive total rewards package.
Compensation Type (hourly/salary):
Salary
Organization Level Competencies
Create an Inclusive Environment
Cultivate Partnerships
Develop Self and Others
Drive Execution
Influence Others
Pursue Personal Excellence
Understand the Business

This job description is not all inclusive. CareSource reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. CareSource is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are dedicated to fostering an inclusive environment that welcomes and supports individuals of all backgrounds.",3.7,CareSource,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,90.0,Remote,35.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","About Us
At Vast.ai, we value creativity, energy, drive and teamwork. We are looking for talented people who share these values to join as we grow our team. Our vision is to widely distribute AI computing to reshape our future for the good of humanity. Come join us. If witnessing the birth of AGI excites you, we can't wait to hear from you!
Vast.ai is a market based cloud computing platform focused on reducing the cost and friction of compute-intensive workloads, enabling anyone to easily leverage large-scale GPU liquidity. Vast.ai is the market leader for low cost GPU rentals. Our GPU marketplace powers AI projects and businesses all over the world.
NOTE: Currently hiring for on-site work in Westwood, Los Angeles.
About the Role
We're looking for a skilled Marketing Data Scientist to join our growing team. In this role, you'll be instrumental in applying advanced analytics to our marketing and sales funnels, driving growth and efficiency through data-driven insights. You'll work closely with our marketing, sales, and product teams to implement measurement tools, design and run A/B tests, and develop predictive models that inform our marketing strategies. This position offers a unique opportunity to apply your data science expertise in a dynamic startup environment at the forefront of AI technology.
Key Responsibilities
Develop and implement predictive analytics models for our marketing and sales funnels.
Design, implement, and analyze A/B tests to optimize marketing campaigns and user experiences.
Create SQL queries and custom analysis for production sales and website tracking data.
Develop innovative approaches using LLMs/AI for customer analysis.
Develop data-driven recommendations to inform marketing strategy and budget allocation.
Stay current with the latest data science techniques and marketing analytics trends.
You Are
A data-driven problem solver with a passion for marketing analytics.
Familiar with SQL and direct database manipulation.
Experienced in designing and implementing A/B tests and experimentation frameworks.
Proficient in statistical analysis and machine learning techniques.
An excellent communicator, able to present technical concepts to diverse audiences.
Proactive and self-motivated, with the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.
Qualifications
Master's degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or a related field.
3+ years of experience applying data science in a marketing context.
Strong programming skills in Python or R, and proficiency with SQL.
Experience with marketing analytics tools (e.g., Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics) and A/B testing platforms.
Proven track record of implementing predictive models in a business setting.
Familiarity with machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Knowledge of digital marketing channels and metrics.
Bonus: Experience in the B2B SaaS or cloud computing industry.
Benefits
Full-Time, Monday - Friday.
Onsite at the Vast.ai HQ in Westwood, Los Angeles.
Health, dental, vision and life insurance coverage.
Matching 401K.
Ambitious, fast-paced startup environment.
Generous equity.",4.5,Vast.ai,"Los Angeles, CA",201 to 500 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,CA,3.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$154K
/yr","The Microsoft AI (Artifical Intelligence) Web Data team is looking for a Data Scientist II to help us build the next generation platform for Bing and Microsoft AI. In Web Data, we are on a mission to build the most vast and accurate model of the Web to power search and AI. We are pushing frontiers of scalability and index quality by creating models and systems for discovering, storing, processing Web content, and operating AI solutions. Our core set of engineering challenges includes:
Discovering diverse content on the Web quickly and efficiently by understanding the structure and dynamics of the Web and optimizing crawl scheduling.
Building Big Data pipelines, creating ML(Machine Learning) and AI models for index selection, and determining document quality.
Designing and implementing models and pipelines for near-real time (NRT) indexing and content freshness.
Designing and implementing methods for leveraging AI in platform and backend solutions.
This is a great opportunity for someone who loves to tackle deep technical challenges and strives for industry-wide impact. At this role, you'd be dealing with and learning how to do data collection, analysis and cleaning, building Big Data pipelines, making decision based on data, doing model training and deployment, and working with LLMs both for prompt engineering and fine-tuning.

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
Acquire the data necessary for your project plan and use querying, visualization, and reporting techniques to describe that data. You’ll also explore data for key attributes and collaborate with others to perform data science experiments using established methodologies.
Understand modeling techniques, select the correct tool and approach to complete objectives, and evaluate the output for statistical and business significance. You’ll also analyze model performance and incorporate customer feedback into its evaluation.
Understand the current state of the industry, including current trends, so that you can contribute to thought leadership best practices.
Write efficient code for a specific feature, and develop a working expertise of proper debugging techniques.
Understand each customer’s business goals and learn best practices for identifying growth opportunities.
Examine projects through a customer-oriented focus, and manage customer expectations regarding project progress.
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 2+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR equivalent experience.
1+ year(s) customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR equivalent experience.
Data Science IC3 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $98,300 - $193,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $127,200 - $208,800 per year.

Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until October 21, 2024.

#Bing
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,"Redmond, WA",10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,154.0,WA,49.0,0,0,0,1,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Overview:
At LMI, we’re reimagining the path from insight to outcome at The New Speed of Possible™. Combining a legacy of over 60 years of federal expertise with our innovation ecosystem, we minimize time to value and accelerate mission success. We energize the brightest minds with emerging technologies to inspire creative solutioning and push the boundaries of capability. LMI advances the pace of progress, enabling our customers to thrive while adapting to evolving mission needs.
Responsibilities:
Frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available visualization and dashboard tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to research questions.
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications:
Pursuit of a bachelor’s degree from a HBCU or MSI in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline
Previous experience or internships at a government consulting or technology consulting firm is required
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
Preferred experience with data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics; additional preferred qualifications include working with unstructured text and natural language processing
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Applicants for this position may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Please note that only US citizens are eligible to obtain security clearances.",4.1,Logistics Management Institute,"Tysons Corner, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1961.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,105.0,VA,63.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","The Data Lab team seeks a talented data scientist - with experience in data engineering, data analysis and documentation, workflow management, and web development - to lead the team’s technical priorities. Following is an overview of key duties:

Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,131.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","ABOUT THIS POSITION
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist. The data scientist role involves solving data-driven Healthcare problems using various machine learning and predictive modeling methods. This person will primarily work as part of the larger Data Science team interacting Product Management and Application teams to conduct analysis and experimentation to maximize the utility of predictive modeling and data driven strategies across Waystar. applying machine learning, predictive modeling, and analytic components to maximize operational outcomes for healthcare providers. The ideal candidate for this position will have exposure to the healthcare revenue cycle, can approach problem-solving challenges independently, has a strong attention to detail, and enjoys working in a fast-paced, collaborative, and team-based environment.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
Must be a quick-learner with the ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Presentation abilities and the ability to communicate with all levels of the Business.
Comfortable working in ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability are key skills.
Competent communication and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Bachelor’s degree in the fields of Computer or Data Science, Statistics, or Mathematics is required. Additional experience and/or education in healthcare, business operations or other areas is preferred.
An aptitude for medical informatics is preferred
ABOUT WAYSTAR
Through a smart platform and better experience, Waystar helps providers simplify healthcare payments and yield powerful results throughout the complete revenue cycle.
Waystar’s healthcare payments platform combines innovative, cloud-based technology, robust data, and unparalleled client support to streamline workflows and improve financials so providers can focus on what matters most: their patients and communities. Waystar is trusted by 1M+ providers, 1K+ hospitals and health systems, and is connected to over 5K commercial and Medicaid/Medicare payers. We are deeply committed to living out our organizational values: honesty; kindness; passion; curiosity; fanatical focus; best work, always; making it happen; and joyful, optimistic & fun.
Waystar products have won multiple Best in KLAS® or Category Leader awards since 2010 and earned multiple #1 rankings from Black Book™ surveys since 2012. The Waystar platform supports more than 500,000 providers, 1,000 health systems and hospitals, and 5,000 payers and health plans. For more information, visit
waystar.com
or follow
@Waystar
on Twitter.
WAYSTAR PERKS
Competitive total rewards (base salary + bonus, if applicable)
Customizable benefits package (3 medical plans with Health Saving Account company match)
Generous paid time off starting at 3 weeks + 13 paid holidays including 2 personal floating holidays
Paid parental leave (including maternity + paternity leave)
Education assistance opportunities and free LinkedIn Learning access
Free mental health and family planning programs, including adoption assistance and fertility support
401(K) program with company match
Pet insurance
Employee resource groups
Waystar is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We celebrate, value, and support diversity and inclusion. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws.
This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",4.2,Waystar,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1999.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,126.0,GA,25.0,0,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Our mission is to open the door to the life-changing impact of education and help make education accessible for all. As a nimble growth stage start-up, we've emerged as the leading online education platform helping over 30 million learners and educators each month. Study.com has earned numerous awards and it has been recognized as one of the most transformational companies in EdTech, living up to our commitment to all learners: Breakthroughs Start Here. From students and educators in over 9,000 school districts that use Study.com, to working adults striving to complete their college degree or gain professional certifications, we empower them to reach their full potential. Our product is our impact! Across our college programs alone we have saved students over $200M in tuition and enabled tens of thousands to become nurses, teachers, accountants and more. Additionally, as part of our mission we've donated over $27 million across social impact programs to learners and educators.
As an education technology leader, Study.com owes much of its success to its data-driven approach. We help over thirty million learners and instructors on Study.com each month, improving their user experience and driving growth by collecting, storing, and presenting massive amounts of data that are crucial to everyday business decisions.
We're looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing team. The ideal candidate is passionate about all aspects of data – digging deep to explain observations or gain business insights, turning complex data into intuitive visualizations, transforming it to simplify future tasks and building machine learning models to provide the business with accurate predictions.
This role is based in our Mountain View, CA office and is hybrid in office Mondays, Wednesdays, and Thursdays.
What You'll Do:
Share ownership and maintenance responsibilities of our entire data warehouse, including 50-100 million events coming through a Kafka queue each day, a 20 node Cassandra cluster, a 15 TB relational database, and an integration with Google BigQuery.
Monitor and analyze the team's A/B tests and proactively communicate key insights within your team and to external stakeholders.
Be the voice of data by supporting the team's product owner in finding business opportunities, defining KPIs, and setting team goals.
Provide leadership with data pulls, analyses and deep dives that significantly influence important company decisions.
Create and update ETLs as our source data and data needs evolve
Build data visualizations and reports using Tableau
Build, maintain, and improve machine learning models (neural networks, logistic regressions, boosted trees, k-means clustering, etc.)
Innovate! We're a team that likes to stay on the cutting edge. Everyone is expected to always be looking for ways to leverage the latest technology to improve our processes and drive better results.
What You'll Bring To The Role:
3-5 years of experience in a Data Science or related role (experience with web analytics is a plus)
BS in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field (master's degree or PhD a plus)
Strong proficiency in SQL (Google BigQuery and MySQL)
Experience writing code (Python and Java/Groovy)
A willingness to work in a face-paced, dynamic environment while juggling multiple projects
A passion for innovation and learning with a driven mindset
Excellent communication skills
Nice To Have:
Experience creating complex data visualizations with Tableau
Hands-on experience with advanced statistical concepts, such as cluster analysis, singular value decomposition, gradient descent, etc.
Knowledge of web analytics software and best practices
Strong ability to use Generative AI (e.g. ChatGPT, copilot, etc.) to assist with technical tasks
The salary range for this position is $120,000 - $150,000 per year. Pay and is dependent upon factors including skills, work experience, business needs, and market demands.
At Study.com, we know that strong communities are built on the power of our diversity, and we respect and strive to understand for the diverse identities, race, ethnicities, backgrounds, and perspectives of our team members. Our work and company culture have been consistently recognized, including:
Inc. Best Place to Work
Fortune Great Places to Work – Best Workplaces in the Bay Area
Golden Bridge Awards – Gold Winner, Corporate Social Responsibility
San Francisco Business Times & Silicon Valley Business Journal – Best Places to Work
Study.com provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran or disability status. In addition to federal law requirements.
Study.com complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. Additionally, qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records will be considered for the position in accordance with applicable state and local laws.",3.0,Study.com,"Mountain View, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2002.0,Company - Private,Education & Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,135.0,CA,22.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","This Opportunity
WSP is currently initiating a search for a Data Scientist for our Baltimore, MD office. Be a member of our Planning Advisory Team a growing organization that meets our client’s objectives and solves their challenges. This position will be working full-time for our client The Maryland Transit Administration, Office of Performance Management/Office of Customer Experience (OPM/OPX) requiring on-site work in the client’s office in Baltimore’s Inner Harbor 2-3 days per week.
As a Data Scientist, you will work on a scrum team with other embedded Data Scientists, the Manager of Data Science, and the Manager of Performance Programs and Data Analytics. Your work will fall into two categories: building and maintaining technical artifacts, and building and refining processes and policies. The Data Science Team is currently working to expand its capacity, and you will contribute to that effort by building data pipelines in our Data Lake to support enterprise intelligence products, building data services that drive institutional goals, and conducting various analyses to answer specific questions for stakeholders. You will also help develop internal processes and policies by writing and updating pages in our team handbook, building Github actions and unit tests, and collaborating with team members to solve recurring technical problems.
Your Impact
Support efficient and effective operations by analyzing data in R and/or Python programming languages and delivering clear answers to specific questions.
Support the data analyst's Power BI products by designing, building, and modifying data models and data
pipelines in a manner consistent with the data science team's data governance policy.
Maintain transparency and minimize technical debt by using Git DevOps platforms to commit code, submit
merge requests, and track your work using issues and epics in a manner consistent with the data science team's DevOps policy.
Prioritize performance management projects by working with the Data Analytics team to define enterprise
objectives, user stories, and data stories.
Promote teamwork by making meaningful contributions to our team handbook, creating and modifying policies and procedures to enhance productivity.
Honor the data science team's warranty on artifacts in production by debugging and solving programming and data problems.
Identify new opportunities to improve MTA customer experience by conducting self-guided exploratory work or as part of assigned tasks.
Who You Are
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Math, Data Analysis, Accounting, Finance or related field.
1 to 3 years of relevant post education experience working as a data scientist/analyst.
A passion for improving public transportation through the effective use of data analytics.
The ability to construct complex queries in SQL involving multiple joins, sub-queries, case when statements, etc.
R and Python programming skills.
Ability to problem-solve independently using Google searches, Stack Overflow, Chat GPT, and other similar
resources.
Ability to communicate clearly and respectfully to technical and non-technical staff of differing backgrounds and experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with version control such as Git, and cloud-based services such as GitHub.
Experience working on a scrum team.
Prior experience within the engineering consulting industry is preferred.
#LI-MH4



About WSP
WSP USA is the U.S. operating company of WSP, one of the world's leading engineering and professional services firms. Dedicated to serving local communities, we are engineers, planners, technical experts, strategic advisors and construction management professionals. WSP USA designs lasting solutions in the buildings, transportation, energy, water and environment markets. With more than 15,000 employees in over 300 offices across the U.S., we partner with our clients to help communities prosper.
www.wsp.com
WSP provides a flexible and agile workplace model while meeting client needs. Employees are also afforded a comprehensive suite of benefits including medical, dental, vision, disability, life, and retirement savings focused on providing health and financial stability throughout the employee’s career.
At WSP, we want to give our employees the challenges they seek to grow their careers and knowledge base. Your daily contributions to your team will be essential in meeting client objectives, goals and challenges. Are you ready to get started?
WSP USA (and all of its U.S. companies) is an Equal Opportunity Employer Race/Age/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disability or Protected Veteran Status.
The selected candidate must be authorized to work in the United States.
NOTICE TO THIRD PARTY AGENCIES:
WSP does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters, employment agencies, or other staffing services. Unsolicited resumes include any resume or hiring document sent to WSP in the absence of a signed Service Agreement where WSP has expressly requested recruitment/staffing services specific to the position at hand. Any unsolicited resumes, including those submitted to hiring managers or other business leaders, will become the property of WSP and WSP will have the right to hire that candidate without reservation – no fee or other compensation will be owed or paid to the recruiter, employment agency, or other staffing service.",3.7,WSP,"Baltimore, MD",10000+ Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,102.0,MD,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$130K
/yr","About the Role

Houzz is looking for a world-class Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.
What You'll Do
Collaborate with leadership, product, data, and engineering teams to identify, define, and launch strategic and operational data science initiatives to improve growth performance
Define key metrics (KPIs) to guide business decision-making across various aspects of our site
Manage the key metrics of the business and product efficiently
Design product experiments, interpret results to draw detailed and impactful conclusions, and conduct root cause analysis
Work with data infrastructure/product engineering teams to define the data collection needs
Provide recommendations to assist quick product ideation and feature launch decisions
Develop and maintain data products to serve real-time business insights or to be used in production environments
Build and maintain dashboards and reports that provide actionable insights for finance, product, and sales
At a Minimum, We'd Like You to Have
Bachelors/Masters Degree with 2+ years of experience working within an analytical role in a high-growth tech company
Proficiency in writing complex SQL queries such as using aggregate functions and all types of joins using Hadoop, Hive and Presto. Strong programming skills in Python or R
Strong in problem-solving and analytical thinking to take an open business question from exploratory data analysis to actionable insights and guided execution recommendations
Proficiency in using Tableau for visualization
Proficiency in advanced experimental designing, testing, and analysis
Strong communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
A passion for analytics and product development
Self-motivated, independent, and eager to learn
Ability to have fun!
Ideally, You'll Also Have
An advanced degree in a technical field such as Statistics, Operations Research, or Engineering
Experience with subscription-based analytics, web/app user engagement, and funnel conversion
Ability to learn and act quickly, making decisions and drawing conclusions in the face of ambiguity
Experience with statistical modeling
Experience working with remote teams with a time zone difference
Compensation, Benefits and Perks

This role has an annual starting salary range of $120,000 - $140,000. In addition to salary, you’re eligible for competitive benefits that support you and your family as part of your total rewards package at Houzz. Also, depending on the role, you could be eligible for an equity award. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors, including, but not limited to, skills, experience, and specific work location.

Benefits and perks include:
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Home internet stipend
Medical, dental, and vision benefits
Maternity/paternity leave program
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Professional Development Reimbursement Program
401(k) retirement savings plans (Pre-Tax and Roth)
- Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA) - Medical & Dependent Care
Health Savings Account (HSA) with company contribution
Healthy at Houzz program

Houzz is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. When applying for a role at Houzz, we guarantee your application will be considered regardless of your sex; race; color; gender; national origin; height or weight; ancestry; physical or mental disability; medical condition; genetic information; marital status; registered domestic partner status; age; sexual orientation; military and veteran status; or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law or ordinance or regulation.

We embrace and celebrate the value that diversity brings to an organization. Diverse backgrounds and different points of view help Houzz provide the best experience for our community. Houzz is committed to fostering an inclusive environment through projects and initiatives, such as employee resource groups, that support Houzzers’ efforts to be themselves and share their lives at work.

If you would like assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please email us at accommodations@houzz.com. This information will be treated as confidential and used only for determining an appropriate accommodation for the interview process.

Houzz is an Equal Opportunity Employer. M/F/Disability/Veterans
__________________

Be Who You Are and Do What You Love at Houzz

About Houzz
When founders Adi and Alon remodeled their home, they were frustrated by the lack of resources and inspiration to help them articulate a vision and select the right pro to make it a reality.

So they built Houzz.

Houzz is now the leading platform for home remodeling and design, providing an all-in-one software solution for industry professionals and tools for homeowners to update their homes from start to finish. Using Houzz, people can find ideas and inspiration, hire professionals, and shop for products. Houzz Pro (houzz.com/pro) provides home industry professionals with a business management and marketing SaaS solution that helps them to win projects, collaborate with clients and teams, and run their business efficiently and profitably.

Our Mission and Core Values
We're proud to say there's no one quite like us. Houzz is a community-centric, innovative tech company that continues to disrupt the home renovation and design industry. Our mission-driven culture is rooted in our core values, and we’re all here for one purpose: make the home remodeling and design process more fun and productive for everyone.

Our Mission
To create the best experience for home renovation and design.

Our Core Values
We’re a Community
We put our community of Houzzers, industry professionals and homeowners first. We approach our work with care, humility and respect. We deliver value to our community through our products and services.

We Build the Future
We are visionaries who challenge the status quo. We are creative, innovative and curious. We embrace change and different ideas to drive our industry forward.

We Make Things Happen
We are solution-seekers and self-starters. We listen, move fast and empower our teams to deliver extraordinary results and products. We play to win.

By applying for a job with us, you acknowledge and agree to the terms of our Job Applicant Privacy Notice.

Roles listing ‘Remote - US’ as a location are not currently available in the following states: Alaska, Hawaii, Louisiana and Montana.

#LI-Remote",3.8,Houzz,United States,501 to 1000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,130.0,United States,15.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","Overview:
The Data Scientist will create data science and data engineering products that include data models, data ingestion/transform, analytics which may include machine learning, and some form of output as either a machine-readable format (e.g. file output, database output, standard/streaming output) or a user interface or dashboard.
Responsibilities:
Demonstrated experience with the following:
Python programming
REST APIs and microservices.
Demonstrated experience performing the extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) of structured and unstructured data
Demonstrated experience modeling, structuring, cleaning, and conditioning data from multiple sources and in multiple different formats, languages, and encodings.
Demonstrated experience with cloud services, such as AWS.preferred",2.3,SilverEdge,"Chantilly, VA",Unknown,,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,0
Associate Data Scientist,"$86K
/yr","Requisition ID: R10174460
Category: Research and Sciences
Location: Chandler, Arizona, United States of America
Clearance Type: None
Telecommute: No- Teleworking not available for this position
Shift: 1st Shift (United States of America)
Travel Required: No
Positions Available: 1
At Northrop Grumman, our employees have incredible opportunities to work on revolutionary systems that impact people's lives around the world today, and for generations to come. Our pioneering and inventive spirit has enabled us to be at the forefront of many technological advancements in our nation's history - from the first flight across the Atlantic Ocean, to stealth bombers, to landing on the moon. We look for people who have bold new ideas, courage and a pioneering spirit to join forces to invent the future, and have fun along the way. Our culture thrives on intellectual curiosity, cognitive diversity and bringing your whole self to work — and we have an insatiable drive to do what others think is impossible. Our employees are not only part of history, they're making history.
Space Systems is looking for an Associate Data Scientist to join the Launch Vehicles business unit within the Mission Assurance team located in Chandler, AZ.
This position requires the incumbent to work on-site at our Chandler campus that features engineering, office and state-of -the-art manufacturing space.
You will be part of a team that supports all of Launch Vehicles, its sibling business units and sector level initiatives. Work may vary with shifting priorities based on business needs.
The Associate Data Scientist will:
Create data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.
Conduct Analysis utilizing many applications to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization. Requires strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Create/maintain documentation of all aspects or work duties, applications, charts, training, etc. related to any tasks within the scope of responsibilities or assignment.
Generate monthly CAB metrics, Supplier Scorecards, support QA Call Board.
Create and maintain digital solutions that support Chandler/Space Sector initiatives for digital transformation.
Able to work/collaborate with a team to develop/maintain existing products/applications and supporting documentation
Able to innovate new solutions and applications from ground up to full implementation.
Must be able to take verbal feedback and determine how to implement it into the tools/applications to provide desired results to requestors
Must be able to analyze data, determine causes for discrepancies or areas of improvement, offer alternative solutions and implement them
Works primarily with immediate supervisor, project leaders, and other professionals in the section or group. May be called in to groups or meetings with high level participants. Communication of applications, skills, supporting documentation and demonstration of tools may be required.
Typical work week is 9/80A schedule. General hours are day shift, core hours of 9:00AM to 3:00PM. Hours for monthly metric generation and review will need to be flexible and could require flex schedule some evenings.
Basic Qualifications:
This position requires a Bachelor's degree with 1 year of related work experience.
Intermediate level experience in Tableau and Excel is required.
Experience using SQL databases and tools to extract necessary information for Tableau charts required.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
No clearance is required to start.
Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science with 2 years of experience is preferred.
Ability to code in Python/SQL a plus.
Salary Range: $68,500 - $102,700
The above salary range represents a general guideline; however, Northrop Grumman considers a number of factors when determining base salary offers such as the scope and responsibilities of the position and the candidate's experience, education, skills and current market conditions.
Employees may be eligible for a discretionary bonus in addition to base pay. Annual bonuses are designed to reward individual contributions as well as allow employees to share in company results. Employees in Vice President or Director positions may be eligible for Long Term Incentives. In addition, Northrop Grumman provides a variety of benefits including health insurance coverage, life and disability insurance, savings plan, Company paid holidays and paid time off (PTO) for vacation and/or personal business.
The application period for the job is estimated to be 20 days from the job posting date. However, this timeline may be shortened or extended depending on business needs and the availability of qualified candidates.
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit. U.S. Citizenship is required for all positions with a government clearance and certain other restricted positions.",4.0,Northrop Grumman,"Chandler, AZ",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,86.0,AZ,85.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","Software Bloc LLC, Plano, TX
Technologies –Proficient in Python and R with experience in SQL, GitHub (not a deal breaker), and AWS/Azure and cloud storage related experience.
Full Time

JOB DESCRIPTION

Your role will work to inform the business on strategic recommendations on data collection, integration, and retention requirements incorporating business needs and knowledge of best practices
Work on improvements to methods and algorithms, developing innovative and effective approaches to solve businesses’ analytical problems and communicate these results and methodologies to our teams
Support recommendations of ongoing improvements that lead to findings, including new information, in collaboration with our Lead Data Scientist
QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field
3+ years in a related field is preferred
Skills to communicate well in a global environment",Not listed,Software Bloc,"Plano, TX",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,102.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","DESCRIPTION:
The Data Scientist may be responsible for any of the following tasks: Analyzing data that is collected in our current and future products and services, Develop statistical and machine learning models using state of the art Machine Learning and AI technologies, Visualize insights for business actions and collaborate with Software Developers to implement into our products and services. The Data Scientist would need to be able to apply the data analysis, models, and software to the markets our products are in for us to better serve our customers. The Data Scientist must have good communication and organization skills, along with a working knowledge of day-to-day operations and priorities within their department and the company. Assume other duties as assigned.
Now offering a 4.5-day workweek!




QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Statistics or Mathematics preferred or any other quantitative discipline
Strong proficiencies in the languages, development tools, and frameworks of Python, R, SQL and Tableau
Ability to gain knowledge of the products and customers of the Auction and Heavy Equipment industries
Technical understanding regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques
General understanding of Machine Learning and AI tools and frameworks
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Knowledge of Data Ops and Data Management tools, such as Docker, Jenkins and Spark.
Adept at generating reports and presenting findings in an understandable manner
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Able to work independently and communicate within a team environment
Results oriented
Flexible and open to change
Stable and progressive work history
Professional appearance and demeanor
Ability to travel by air and ground - valid driver’s license required
Able to work with minimal supervision
In Office Position. 4.5 day regular work week. Ability to commute daily to local office is required.",3.1,"Sandhills Global, Inc.","Lincoln, NE",1001 to 5000 Employees,1978.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,111.0,NE,46.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$109K
/yr","This Data Scientist position at Mimecast is the advanced analytical engine of the Business Intelligence team, focused on solving high-value business problems using cutting-edge AI/ML tools and techniques. This role involves building and enhancing machine learning models, collaborating with stakeholders to develop new Generative AI tools, and transforming the business with actionable insights. We prioritize providing exceptional user experiences and taking on projects with game-changing potential. At Mimecast, we deliver the right data to the right people at the right time, supporting data-driven decisions with self-service dashboards, custom alerts, and executive presentations. As the company grows, so does our appetite for data, analysis, and insights.
What You'll Do:
Work cross-functionally with stakeholders across the business to evaluate, prioritize, and develop new Machine Learning and Generative AI powered solutions to solve business problems.
Own, maintain, and optimize existing Machine Learning models, as required
Work collaboratively with analysts, data engineers, and analytics engineers to bring data science and machine learning powered solutions to life.
Partner directly with functional teams to bring data and analytics expertise to our decision-making processes.
Contribute to the Data Science team’s capabilities as an internal expert on machine learning and advanced analytics.
Foster stakeholder partnerships, and work to create a culture of collaboration and data literacy to increase the company’s analytics maturity.
Present findings and technically challenging topics to a diverse group of technical and non-technical business stakeholders.
What You'll Bring:
A minimum of 3 years of work experience in data science, analytics or directly related area, during which both technical and analytical capabilities have been clearly demonstrated.
Prior success deploying machine learning solutions based on complex datasets at scale in production environments with an emphasis on creating impact to business outcomes.
Proven ability to extract actionable insights from statistical and machine learning powered models.
Strong knowledge of the underlying mathematical foundations of machine learning algorithms including linear regression, classification methods, clustering algorithms, Random Forests, time series analysis, and deep learning.
Demonstrated excellence in using Python and SQL to develop data science workflows usings tools such as scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Snowflake, and dbt.
Strong communication and presentation skills with the ability to explain complex concepts in a simple manner to colleagues & stakeholders.
Demonstrated experience collaborating and working cross-functionally with teams and stakeholders to design and implement machine learning powered solutions.
Strong understanding of best practices and KPIs around e-commerce, transactional and subscription-based products is a plus.
Experience with building solutions and utilizing tools in AWS is a plus.
Familiarity with generative AI techniques (LLMs, GANS, VAEs) and their applications in business operations is highly desirable.
What We Bring:
We’re fast thinking. We go big to reach our cyberattack-disrupting goals. And we do what we need to protect the world of business from getting important (and potentially compromising) data stolen. We never leave anyone behind. We deliver quickly – and outstandingly. We’re big on honesty because it makes us better. We’re empowered by our mission. And if cybercriminals have a good day, we work twice as hard to make the rest of their days a nightmare. That’s The Mimecast Way. And the Mimecast way is also a hybrid-working way. We empower our people to balance their time between home and the office in a way that works best for them, their team, and our stakeholders Become a Mimecaster and put corporate data under your protection. Fill our teams with respect. And bring cybercrime-obstructing energy to your work. Be passionate. Be powerful. Be alive with purpose.
#LI-ND1
DEI Statement
Cybersecurity is a community effort. That’s why we’re committed to building an inclusive, diverse community that celebrates and welcomes everyone – unless they’re a cybercriminal, of course.
We’re proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, and we’d encourage you to join us whatever your background. We particularly welcome applicants from traditionally underrepresented groups.
We consider everyone equally: your race, age, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, ability, marital status, nationality, or any other protected characteristic won’t affect your application.
If you require any adjustments or accommodations due to a disability, or any other reason that may help you in your interview process, please let us know by emailing careers@mimecast.com.
Due to certain obligations to our customers, an offer of employment will be subject to your successful completion of applicable background checks, conducted in accordance with local law.",4.0,Mimecast,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,109.0,MA,21.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","Role: Data Scientist, Senior Consultant/Consultant
Location: Miami/South Florida

Please note: This role is not eligible for 100% remote work. Employees must live within a commutable distance of the Miami Metro Area and must be willing to be onsite at the client and/or Slalom Florida office up to 5 days a week.

Who You’ll Work With
As a modern technology company, we've never met a technical challenge we didn't like. We enable our clients to learn from their data, create incredible digital experiences, and make the most of new technologies. We blend design, engineering, and analytics expertise to build the future. We surround our technologists with interesting challenges, innovative minds, and emerging technologies. Our Florida Data & Analytics practice is looking to add a Data Scientist Consultant to our locally based team.

What You’ll Do
Apply fundamental and advanced quantitative methods, including machine learning and statistical modeling, to solve complex business problems and enable data-driven decision-making (e.g., build statistical and machine learning models for trend analysis and forecasting to predict future business outcomes for a Fortune 100 company)
Collaborate with client data science teams to enhance, scale, and operationalize existing models
Communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Provide thought leadership on the latest ML/AI technologies and applications to client industry and use cases
Lead and participate in solutioning sessions, working hand-in-hand with businesses/clients, translating business objectives into actionable machine learning/data science use cases
What You’ll Bring
Production-level experience with core quantitative analysis techniques (e.g., predictive modeling, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or natural language processing) in a consulting environment
Quantitative background with relevant experience using data to solve problems and answer questions
Strong proficiency in Python, R, SQL, and experience with libraries/frameworks such as PyTorch, TensorFlow, and Scikit-learn
Experience with cloud and modern data science tools and platforms such as Databricks MLFlow, GCP BigQuery, AWS SageMaker, Kubeflow, and Azure ML
Experience using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Qlik, or Power BI
Knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practices
About Us
Slalom is a purpose-led, global business and technology consulting company. From strategy to implementation, our approach is fiercely human. In six countries and 43 markets, we deeply understand our customers—and their customers—to deliver practical, end-to-end solutions that drive meaningful impact. Backed by close partnerships with over 400 leading technology providers, our 11,000+ strong team helps people and organizations dream bigger, move faster, and build better tomorrows for all. We’re honored to be consistently recognized as a great place to work, including being one of Fortune’s 100 Best Companies to Work For seven years running. Learn more at slalom.com.
Compensation and Benefits
Slalom prides itself on helping team members thrive in their work and life. As a result, Slalom is proud to invest in benefits that include meaningful time off and paid holidays, parental leave, 401(k) with a match, a range of choices for highly subsidized health, dental, & vision coverage, adoption and fertility assistance, and short/long-term disability. We also offer additional benefits such as a yearly $350 reimbursement account for any well-being related expenses as well as discounted home, auto, and pet insurance.

Slalom is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices. Actual compensation will depend upon an individual’s skills, experience, qualifications, location, and other relevant factors.

Application Deadline:
The anticipated application deadline for this role is 11/1/2024

EEO and Accommodations
Slalom is an equal-opportunity employer and is committed to inclusion, diversity, and equity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veterans’ status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. Slalom will also consider qualified applications with criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. Slalom welcomes and encourages applications from individuals with disabilities. Reasonable accommodations are available for candidates during all aspects of the selection process. Please advise the talent acquisition team if you require accommodations during the interview process.",3.8,Slalom Consulting,"Miami, FL",10000+ Employees,2001.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,118.0,FL,23.0,1,0,0,1,0
Senior Clinical Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","As the Senior Clinical Data Scientist, you will partner with a broad range of stakeholders across the organization. You will be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data that will drive critical growth decisions and positive outcomes.

What you’ll do
Define and demonstrate clinical, operational and financial excellence of Best Buy Health products and services
Lead collaborative relationships with external partners and conduct analyses to produce peer-reviewed scientific evidence about the economic value and return on investment for care at home programs
Identify data sources, gaps in data, and metrics of value, considerations for preprocessing data, and potential internal improvements
Maintain industry knowledge to support Best Buy Health as a subject matter expert and ensure we are considering the latest trends in data and clinical research (e.g. experimental design, HEOR methodologies)
Contribute and demonstrate knowledge of ‘bread and butter’ data science techniques within, and outside of, the team

Basic qualifications
Master’s Degree in health economics, health service research, data science, epidemiology, public health or a closely related field
5+ years conducting comprehensive data analysis and research studies
3+ years of relevant experience within a healthcare / health technology setting
Publication track record in clinical field
Preferred qualifications
PhD
5+ years of experience leading data science strategy in a healthcare or health technology setting
3+ years of health economics and outcomes research experience
Strong relationship-building skills
Strong communication skills, including executive presence

Best Buy Health is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer dedicated to creating an inclusive environment that values the diversity of our employees and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant. We are committed to equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic under applicable law. Learn more about our Affirmative Action Policy Statement HERE.

Reasonable Accommodation

Best Buy Health will make reasonable accommodations for employees and applicants for their religious beliefs and practices, mental or physical disabilities, and pregnancy, childbirth and related conditions. If you need a reasonable accommodation in the application process - to access job postings, to apply for a job, for a job interview, for pre-employment testing or with the onboarding process - please contact Talent Acquisition at talent.acquisition@bestbuy.com.

To learn more about, view the “Know Your Rights” poster and Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision HERE.
Position Type: Full time",3.6,Best Buy Health,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,131.0,Remote,6.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Data Scientist II at its facility located at 500 N. Morton Ave., Morton, IL 61550. Lead large/complex projects within a systems process area. Serve as subject matter expert for global team for all key metric reporting and tools. Define requirements for system processes for major releases or emergency changes. Test accountability for systems processes for major releases or emergency changes. Manage and coordinate work for team in Bangalore. Provide guidance to other members on the global team. Perform deep-dive analysis. Generate ad-hoc reporting. Execute medium and high complexity data requests. Develop medium and high complexity PowerBI reporting. Develop medium and high complexity SAS programs and reports. Independent contributor to multi-person analytic teams. Work is typically directed by a direct supervisor, project, or team lead through a review of results. Make decisions on routine, medium risk issues that may affect the project team, suppliers, or internal customers. Mentor and develop the capabilities and organizational knowledge of more junior information scientists I & II. REQS: This position requires a Bachelor's, degree, or foreign equivalent, in Civil Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Supply Chain, Business Management or a related field and 4 years Professional experience in supply chain industry or IT. Additionally, the applicant must have employment experience with: (1) SAS; (2) SQL; (3) Datawarehouse applications Snowflake and Microsoft Power BI; (4) Python; (5) Supply Chain experience with a focus on Inventory Management; (6) Project Management; and (7) Microsoft Office tools. Telecommuting: 4 days/week. Applicants who are interested in this position should apply via www.caterpillar.com/careers , search [Data Scientist II / Reference # R0000278409]. #LI-DNI
Posting Dates:
October 14, 2024 - February 10, 2025
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Morton, IL",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,IL,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","CHEP helps move more goods to more people, in more places than any other organization on earth via our 300 million pallets, crates and containers. We employ 11,000 people and operate in more than 55 countries. Through our pioneering and sustainable share-and-reuse business model, the world’s biggest brands trust us to help them transport their goods more efficiently, safely and with less environmental impact.

What does that mean for you? You’ll join an international organization big enough to take you anywhere, and small enough to get you there sooner. You’ll help change how goods get to market and contribute to global sustainability. You’ll be empowered to bring your authentic self to work and be surrounded by diverse and driven professionals. And you can maximize your work-life balance and flexibility through our
Hybrid Work Model
.
Job Description
POSITION PURPOSE
To assist in developing tools and technologies that leverage data from a variety of sources to increase supply chain efficiencies and provide value to our customers.
MAJOR / KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
Responsible for experimenting with and implementing machine learning techniques on internal/external customer projects
Responsible for learning new data science techniques/programming languages and exploring their viability on current projects
Will contribute to data science team discussions, providing insight as needed on current approaches and methods
MEASURES
Successful application of data science principles
Successful completion of projects
AUTHORITY / DECISION MAKING
Data science model selection and implementation
Working autonomously
KEY CONTACTS
Internal: Other data scientists, data science manager, project stakeholders
External: Project stakeholders
QUALIFICATIONS
BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems and/or equivalent formal training
Proficient with machine learning and statistics
Proficient with Python, deep learning frameworks, Spark
Excellent communication skills
Desirable Qualifications:
1-2 years work experience in data science position
Proficient with Go, C/C++, other languages
Proficient with cloud computing environments, Kubernetes, etc.
Software development experience
EXPERIENCE
Participated in numerous data science projects
Utilized several data science methodologies
Have worked autonomously and delivered results on schedule
Have presented results to non-data scientist audience
SKILLS AND KNOWLEDGE
Strong programming skills (Python, R, etc.)
Knowledge of major data science topics, models, and methods (from logistic regression to advanced neural networks)
Strong analytical skills
Preferred Education
Bachelors
Preferred Level of Work Experience
1 - 3 years
Remote Type
Hybrid Remote
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, and we are committed to developing a diverse workforce in which everyone is treated fairly, with respect, and has the opportunity to contribute to business success while realizing his or her potential. This means harnessing the unique skills and experience that each individual brings and we do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state, or local protected class.
Individuals fraudulently misrepresenting themselves as Brambles or CHEP representatives have scheduled interviews and offered fraudulent employment opportunities with the intent to commit identity theft or solicit money. Brambles and CHEP never conduct interviews via online chat or request money as a term of employment. If you have a question as to the legitimacy of an interview or job offer, please contact us at recruitment@brambles.com.",4.4,Brambles Group,"Santa Clara, CA",10000+ Employees,1875.0,Company - Public,Shipping & Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,125.0,CA,149.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist III,"$151K
/yr","Our Opportunity:
Do you want to build a model that impacts the company's bottom line? Do you want to see how your ideas, insights, recommendations, and experiments affect top-level decision-makers? If so, Chewy is looking for a Data Scientist III to join our Merchandising Data Science Team. In this role, you will combine deep understanding of machine learning, advanced data analysis, statistical testing, and the ability to communicate insights effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders. As a Data Scientist III, you will play a crucial part in designing, implementing, and deploying machine learning models to solve complex problems for our Retail Operations business partners.
The ideal candidate will operate as a full stack data scientist who should have expertise in both machine learning and cloud technologies. In this role, they will have the opportunity to develop and implement sophisticated data models and analytics solutions to support strategic decision-making across the organization.
What you'll do:
Design, develop, and implement machine learning models for various applications, including but not limited to predictive analytics, natural language processing, and computer vision.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms to address specific business challenges.
Analyze large, complex data sets to extract actionable insights and identify trends, patterns, and opportunities.
Oversee data collection, cleansing, and validation processes to ensure data integrity and reliability.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data scientists, software engineers, and domain experts, to understand requirements and deliver effective solutions.
Document code, algorithms, and processes to facilitate knowledge sharing and ensure reproducibility.
Provide technical guidance in best practices for model development to the data science team.
Effectively communicate complex technical concepts and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
What you'll need:
Candidate must possess a Graduate Degree (MS/PhD) in Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, Mathematics, or related discipline.
6+ years of experience in developing and deploying advanced machine learning models and algorithms in a production environment.
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, machine learning, and deep learning techniques.
Expertise in programming languages such as Python.
Advanced proficiency with SQL
Proficiency with version control systems (e.g., Git) and collaborative coding practices.
Good understanding of cloud platforms such as AWS.
Strong problem-solving skills and the ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent oral and written communication skills including the ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time
Chewy is committed to equal opportunity. We value and embrace diversity and inclusion of all Team Members. If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or similar law, and you need an accommodation during the application process or to perform these job requirements, or if you need a religious accommodation, please contact CAAR@chewy.com.

If you have a question regarding your application, please contact HR@chewy.com.

To access Chewy's Customer Privacy Policy, please click here. To access Chewy's California CPRA Job Applicant Privacy Policy, please click here.",3.4,Chewy,"Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,2011.0,Company - Public,Pet & Pet Supplies Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,151.0,MA,13.0,1,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist I,"$116K
/yr","JOB DESCRIPTION:
Apply statistical modeling, data transformation, data mining and machine learning to develop predictive models, attributes, alerts and indicators to improve Identity Access Management and Point of Contact processes for insurance carriers. Execute database queries to extract and aggregate LN’s data assets into attributes used for predictive modeling, reporting and analysis. Analyze client data to prepare for analysis. Identifies data quality concerns and opportunities (i.e. performance indicators, scores, approval/declination indicators, etc.) and clearly communicate these concerns to stakeholders. Explore and mine new data sources to help optimize and validate existing models. Review product results and communicate findings to internal and external stakeholders. Ideate, research and design new analytics and data science methodologies on large scale and complex data assets. Store, archive, index, transfer and analyze large and complex datasets (structured and unstructured data). Create and enhance Python/R or GUI-based reporting tools that allow team members to gain insights about LexisNexis data assets. Enforce data quality testing best practices. Perform other duties as needed.
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s or foreign equivalent degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Information Systems, or a related field required.
3 years of experience in job offered or related occupations required.
Also required is: 2 years of experience: in advanced ECL Programming (HPCC Systems); with Record Linking for Insurance Header files; creating product dashboards using PowerBI; and batch LexID assignment for customer records.
Employee reports to LexisNexis Risk Solutions, Inc. office in Alpharetta, GA, but may telecommute from any location within the U.S.
Experience can be concurrent.
#LI-DNI
#ICT
LexisNexis, a division of RELX, is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. We are committed to providing a fair and accessible hiring process. If you have a disability or other need that requires accommodation or adjustment, please let us know by completing our Applicant Request Support Form:
https://forms.office.com/r/eVgFxjLmAK
, or please contact 1-855-833-5120.
Please read our
Candidate Privacy Policy
.",4.2,RELX,"Alpharetta, GA",10000+ Employees,1880.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,116.0,GA,144.0,1,0,0,0,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$91K
/yr","Orbis Operations is seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Junior Data Scientist to support our growing team in the collection, transformation, and analysis of open source data. In this role, you will be responsible for building data pipelines, cleaning and organizing datasets, and providing data-driven insights to support government missions. While experience with AI and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, this role focuses primarily on open source data collection and processing, offering an excellent opportunity for career growth in the data science field.
Key Responsibilities
Duties/Responsibilities
Assist in the collection, preprocessing, and transformation of large-scale open source datasets from various structured and unstructured sources.
Develop and maintain data pipelines to ensure efficient data flow and integration across different platforms.
Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) to uncover patterns and insights in open source data that align with mission objectives.
Collaborate with data engineers, software developers, and mission stakeholders to understand data requirements and deliver tailored solutions.
Write clear, well-documented code to automate data processing tasks and streamline workflows.
Generate reports and visualizations that communicate findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Stay up to date with trends in open-source data tools, technologies, and methodologies to continuously improve data collection and pipelining processes.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This position has no supervisory responsibilities
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, or related field, or equivalent work experience.
1-3 years of experience working in data science, with a focus on open source data collection, cleaning, and pipelining.
Strong programming skills in Python, with familiarity in libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and requests for data manipulation and processing.
Experience working with APIs and web scraping tools to collect and integrate data from open source platforms.
Understanding of data cleaning, transformation, and storage best practices.
Strong problem-solving skills, with an ability to manage multiple tasks and projects simultaneously.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to work effectively in a team and present findings to non-technical audiences.
ACTIVE Security Clearance TS SCI w POLY
Preferred Qualifications
Experience working with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) for data storage and processing.
Familiarity with SQL or NoSQL databases for querying and managing datasets.
Knowledge of data visualization tools such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, or Power BI.
Experience with natural language processing (NLP) and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, but not required.
Prior experience working on government or public sector projects.
Physical Requirements
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer.
Routine video conference and/or in-person meetings.
Ability to attend planned meetings within the Washington Metro Area region.
We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

Location
McLean, VA",3.9,Orbis Operations Management Company,"McLean, VA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,91.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$160K
/yr","Snapshot
We are a highly innovative AI startup that builds products and solutions from the ground up while using cutting-edge technology. We are seeking a data scientist with machine learning and Python experience to work with our team to develop our products for predictive maintenance (PMX) and digital signals processing (DSP).
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in a quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
2+ years of experience in Python data science stack: NumPy, Pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow/PyTorch, PySpark, Dask, Matplotlib, Seaborn, Bokeh, etc.
A strong sense of ownership and accountability; eagerness to learn skills as needed by business focus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable with public speaking and presenting to executives
Responsibilities
Build innovative data analytics and machine learning pipelines.
Become an expert in predictive maintenance (PMX) or signals processing products. Attend conferences and assess competitive products.
Meet with domain experts and present to stakeholders regularly.
Salary range: $140,000-$180,000",4.3,PUTNAM RECRUITING GROUP,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Private,Staffing & Subcontracting,Human Resources & Staffing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,160.0,Remote,,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","At Similarweb, we are revolutionizing the way businesses interact with the digital world by revealing to them everything that happens online.
Our unique data and solutions empower over 4,300 customers globally, including industry giants like Google, eBay, and Adidas, to make game-changing decisions that drive their digital strategies.
In 2021, we went public on the New York Stock Exchange, and we continue to reach new heights! Come work alongside Similarwebbers across the globe who are bright, curious, practical and good people.
We're looking for a Data Analyst / Data Scientist to partner with our consulting team by delivering best-in-class data analysis for research projects for prospective and existing clients, and driving value for clients' strategic business needs.
This role will report to the Research Analytics Manager of Data Labs.
Why is this role so important at Similarweb?
Similarweb is more than just a data provider. We develop long-term and collaborative partnerships with our clients, and are constantly striving to help them make better business decisions using our data. One of the ways we do this is through our advisory services.
As a Data Analyst, you will work with our team of Advisory Services Consultants and Data Engineering team, to create customized data analyses using Similarweb data.
Your data analysis will support our prospective clients' and existing clients' strategic business needs, and help the business increase and retain customers.
So, what will you be doing all day?
Your role as part of the Data Labs Team means your daily responsibilities may include:
Partnering with our in-house consultants and GTM teams to scope out custom data analysis projects for client
Building models and utilizing sophisticated technology such as web scraping and AI to enrich datasets to target client pain points
Collaborating with Data Engineering to ensure the existence of use-case specific data, and estimating the availability and effort required to produce specific custom reports
Preparing and communicating customized data analysis to advisory services consultant, to ensure successful delivery to clients
This is the perfect job for someone who:
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in data analysis (Python, Excel, Tableau, SQL)
Can use their analytical skills to drive business impact
Has a general understanding of digital marketing trends
Has experience in client-facing roles (preferred)
Has experience working collectively with other teams and stakeholders to accomplish business goals
Is able to apply relevant industry knowledge to solve specific client business needs, and demonstrate value within individual client use cases
**At Similarweb, collaborating with our colleagues in-office creates a more connected, unified culture. Our best work is a product of our face-to-face collaboration, with the ability to work partially from home.**
Why you'll love being a Similarwebber:
You'll actually love the product you work with: Our customers aren't our only raving fans. When we asked our employees why they chose to come work at Similarweb, 99% of them said ""the product."" Imagine how exciting your job is when you get to work with the most powerful digital intelligence platform in the world.
You'll find a home for your big ideas: We encourage an open dialogue and empower employees to bring their ideas to the table. You'll find the resources you need to take initiative and create meaningful change within the organization.
We offer competitive perks & benefits: We take your well-being seriously, and offer competitive compensation packages to all employees. We also put a strong emphasis on community, with regular team outings and happy hours.
You can grow your career in any direction you choose: Interested in becoming a VP or want to transition into a different department? Whether it's Career Week, personalized coaching, or our ongoing learning solutions, you'll find all the tools and opportunities you need to develop your career right here.
Diversity isn't just a buzzword: People want to work in a place where they can be themselves. We strive to create a workplace that is reflective of the communities we serve, where everyone is empowered to bring their full, authentic selves to work. We are committed to inclusivity across race, gender, ethnicity, culture, sexual orientation, age, religion, spirituality, identity and experience. Our culture of equality and mutual respect also helps us better understand and serve our customers in a world that is becoming more global, more diverse, and more digital every day.
We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here, as applicable: https://www.similarweb.com/corp/legal/applicant-privacy-policies/
* Please note: We're unable to sponsor employment visas at this time.*
#LI-DC #LI-Hybrid

We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here.",3.9,Similarweb,"Burlington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,118.0,MA,16.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$120K
/yr","Job Overviews
Location:
Salt Lake City, UTAH
Job Title:
Data Engineer
Experience:
9 Years
Employement:
Full Time
Job Code:
998163

Job Details
The Data Scientist will be responsible for utilizing advanced analytics and statistical modeling techniques to extract valuable insights from complex data sets. S/he will play a pivotal role in developing innovative solutions, optimizing business operations, and driving data-driven decision-making processes. S/he will possess a strong background in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling, and exceptional problem-solving and communication skills. The Data Scientist will use various methods to transform raw data into useful data systems. S/he will create algorithms and conduct statistical analysis. Overall, you’ll strive for efficiency by aligning data systems with business goals.
Job Responsibilities
Identify, collect, and analyze large volumes of structured and unstructured data from various sources, including internal databases, external APIs, and third-party vendors.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure its quality, integrity, and suitability for analysis.
Conduct exploratory data analysis to identify patterns, trends, and anomalies that can provide actionable insights.
Develop and implement advanced statistical models and machine learning algorithms to solve complex business problems, such as demand forecasting, customer segmentation, or anomaly detection.
Apply state-of-the-art machine learning techniques, including deep learning, natural language processing, and computer vision, to extract meaningful information from diverse data types.
Evaluate and optimize models for accuracy, performance, and scalability.
Create visually appealing and intuitive data visualizations to effectively communicate findings and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Prepare clear and concise reports, presentations, and dashboards that summarize analytical results and provide actionable recommendations.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to deliver data-driven insights and contribute to evidence-based decision-making processes.
Collaborate with IT teams to identify and implement appropriate data infrastructure and tools, such as data lakes, data warehouses, or cloud-based solutions.
Develop and maintain robust data pipelines and workflows for efficient data ingestion, processing, and storage.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries and manage database performance and scalability.
Job Requirements
Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, including software engineers, data engineers, business analysts, and product managers, to define project requirements and deliverables.
Mentor and provide guidance to junior data scientists and analysts, fostering a culture of learning and growth.
Work with stakeholders, including the Executive, Product, Data, and Design teams, to support their data infrastructure needs and assist with data-related technical issues.
Collect, manage, and convert raw data into information that can be interpreted by data scientists and business analysts.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, assembling large, complex data sets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements.
Implement server-side logic and database integration using programming languages like Python, Java, or Node.js.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries, and manage database performance and scalability.
Conduct unit testing, integration testing, and troubleshooting issues to ensure the overall quality and reliability of software applications.
Identify and resolve performance bottlenecks in both front-end and back-end systems to ensure optimal user experience.
Create and maintain technical documentation, including system architecture, API documentation, and user guides.
Continuously research and evaluate emerging technologies, tools, and frameworks to improve development practices and enhance the software stack.
Skill & Experience
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or Information Systems, or Progressive experience in Computer Science with experience in the development of applications.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or Scala, along with familiarity with data manipulation libraries (e.g., pandas, NumPy) and machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Strong knowledge of statistical analysis, machine learning techniques, and data modeling.
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI) and proficiency in SQL and working with databases.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving abilities, with the capability to interpret complex data sets and derive actionable insights.
Outstanding communication skills, with the ability to effectively present complex ideas and findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.",5.0,CloudBerg Tec,"Salt Lake City, UT",Unknown,,Unknown,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,UT,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$132K
/yr","About Direct To Consumer (DTC)
Disney’s Direct to Consumer team oversees the Hulu and Disney+ streaming businesses within Disney Entertainment helping to bring The Walt Disney Company’s best-in-class storytelling to fans and families everywhere.
The Walt Disney Company Direct to Consumer’s (DTC) Data Science team combines deep data analysis and research of our rich user data to present a compelling vision around user retention and preferences across the vast ecosystem of our product offerings and content. We are the insights and modeling partners for the content, marketing, product, and engineering teams at Disney+, Hulu and ESPN+.
As Data Scientists, we use data to empower decision-makers with information, predictions, and insights that ultimately influence the experiences of millions of users worldwide. If you are someone who loves to work cross-functionally, build models, perform statistical analysis, and create visualizations to provide scalable and iterative capabilities, then this is a fantastic role for you!
What You'll Do
Modeling: Apply state of the art machine learning and statistical analysis to develop models related to opportunity sizing, targeting, and optimization.
Deep analysis: Analyze user behavioral data to identify patterns, uncover opportunities, and create common understanding of how people are interacting with the service and content.
Visualization of Insights: Development of prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, and robust analytics leading to impactful insights communicated clearly and visually.
Partnership: Partner closely with business stakeholders to identify and unlock opportunities, and with other data teams to improve platform capabilities around data modeling, data visualization, experimentation and data architecture.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field
3+ years related experience with developing machine learning models and conducting statistical analysis
Deep understanding of machine learning concepts and statistical methods
Ability to draw insights and conclusions from data to inform model development and business decisions
Desire to collaborate with other data scientists, data analysts, and key business partners
Proficient in analyzing data and developing ML models using Python (with ML frameworks like tensorflow, scikit-learn, etc.)
Capable of reading and writing Object-Oriented code to review and implement modeling pipelines (Airflow, Luigi, etc.)
Understanding of SQL and distributed data technologies (Hive, Spark)
Preferred Qualifications
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Physics or related quantitative field (e.g. Econometrics, Mathematics, Operations Research)
Working knowledge of Bayesian modeling and familiarity with probabilistic programming packages/language such as Stan, PyMC
Experience fully integrating data science solutions into the business and operationalizing ML models
Additional Information
#DISNEYTECH

The hiring range for this position in the Los Angeles, CA area is $112,600-$151,000. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate’s geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",3.9,Disney Direct to Consumer,"Santa Monica, CA",10000+ Employees,1923.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,132.0,CA,101.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$177K
/yr","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the team
The Data Science team of the Tech and Product department at TikTok USDS is responsible for building high-quality and timely data solutions for the business as the single source of truth and for building easy-to-use and scalable data products to support business growth. You will have the exciting opportunity to:
Conduct product analytics to provide product recommendations that drive product growth
Deep dive into data sources, understand their limitations, and communicate complex data insights through exploratory analysis and research to suggest improvement
Design and monitor core metrics; understand root causes of metric movements
Design and build advanced analytical solutions and models to deliver superior business outcomes
In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.
Qualifications
Previous internship(s) or 1-2 years of full-time experience
Experience with SQL, Python, or R
Experience navigating and working with large data sets using SQL
Self-motivated, detail-oriented, learn autonomously, and highly organized
Ability to conduct rigorous analysis and communicate conclusions to both technical and non-technical audiences
BS/MS in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Statistics, or other science and engineering fields
Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States. This position is not eligible for visa sponsorship or support.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at https://shorturl.at/ktJP6

This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $114000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,177.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$185K
/yr","Job ID:
13443

Location:
Newport News, VA

Category:
Computer

Division:
CST Division

Position Type:
Regular

Education:
Masters Degree

Experience Required:
12+ years

Relocation Provided:
Position Description

Come join our team at Jefferson Lab, where great minds matter .

Posting Date: 10/17/24
Salary Range: $133,200 - $236,000 (SSCS)
Work Location Type: Hybrid (combination of on-site and remote work based on business need)

What your job will be like:
The incumbent will be responsible for developing, implementing and leading new data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory's data science capabilities in alignment with the overall mission to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and take leadership roles in future DOE data science initiatives.

In this role you will:
Be responsible for developing, implementing and leading data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory’s data science capabilities in alignment with strategic plans to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and contribute significantly to future DOE data science initiatives.
Provide key contributions to the data sience department program development efforts, including contributing to on-going AI/ML in support of the 12 GeV science program, the Electron Ion Collider (EIC) detector design, and the High Performance Data Facility (HPDF).
Guide and provide ultimate direction as the Lab’s Subject Matter Expert and technical resource for data science program and projects.
Be responsible for developing competences in operational and/or applied mathematics data science core in order to support the program.
Be responsible for attracting external funding in data science projects.

Qualifications We Require:Education:
Master's Degree in Computer Science or other relevant field required.
Ph.D. preferred.

Experience:
12 or more years related experience with considerable work specific to developing scientific computing applications and/or data science.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Recognized technical expertise in data science with recognized expertise in one or more additional areas of scientific computing.
Demonstrated knowledge of computational infrastructure and applications applicable to large scale experimental facilities.
Demonstrated experience with strategic planning and implementation of a data science portfolio aligned with overall institutional objectives.
Ability to interact across organizational levels including senior leadership and effectively form partnerships with external partners.
Must possess exceptional written and oral communication skills.
Successful history in attracting funding.
Prior experience in DOE or National Lab environment is highly desired.

About Jefferson Lab

Join a community with a common purpose of solving the most challenging scientific and engineering problems of our time. The Jefferson Lab campus is located in southeastern Virginia amidst a vibrant and growing technology community.

A career at Jefferson Lab is more than a job. You will be part of “big science” and work alongside top scientists and engineers from around the world unlocking the secrets of our visible universe. Managed by Jefferson Science Associates, LLC; Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility is entering an exciting period of mission growth and is seeking new team members ready to apply their skills and passion to have an impact. You could call it work, or you could call it a mission. We call it a challenge. We do things that will change the world.

Total Rewards at Jefferson Lab

At Jefferson Lab, we believe that a comprehensive employee benefits program is an important and meaningful part of the compensation employees receive. Our benefits program includes, but is not limited to:

Medical, Dental, and Vision Care Plans
Flexible Spending Accounts
Paid Time-off and Leave Programs (Paid Parental, vacation, holidays, and sick leave)
401(k) Plan – 9% Lab Contribution; 100% vested
Flexible Work Arrangements (Remote & Alternate Work Schedules available)
Tuition Assistance, Training and Professional Development Programs
Live near the waterways of the Chesapeake Bay region with access to nearby beaches, mountains, and all major metropolitan centers on the East Coast

Jefferson Science Associates, LLC (JSA) manages and operates the Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility (Jefferson Lab). JSA is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of race, color, religion, ethnicity, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, disability, or veteran status or on any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. As part of the JSA’s equal employment opportunity policy, we also take affirmative action as called for by applicable laws and Executive Orders to ensure that minority group individuals, females, disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, other protected veterans, Armed Forces, and qualified disabled persons are introduced into our workforce and considered for promotional opportunities.

JSA is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities (unless doing so will result in an undue hardship). If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to employment @ jlab.org or call (757) 269-7598 to provide the nature of your request. Reasonable accommodations are considered on a case-by-case basis.

Employment with JSA is conditional upon DOE approval if at any time during your employment you are participating in a Foreign Government Talent Recruitment Program or Affiliated activity. Generally, such programs/activities include any foreign-state-sponsored attempt to acquire U.S.-funded scientific research through programs run or funded by the government that target scientists, engineers, students, academics, researchers, and entrepreneurs of all nationalities working or educated in the United States. This includes positions or appointments, both domestic and foreign, titled academic, professional, or institutional appointments whether or not remuneration is received and whether full-time, part-time or voluntary.",4.2,Jefferson Lab,"Newport News, VA",501 to 1000 Employees,1984.0,Government,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,185.0,VA,40.0,0,0,0,1,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$175K
/yr","AirDNA began with a big dream in a balmy California garage in 2015. Since then, the technology startup has grown into the leading provider of data and business intelligence for the billion-dollar travel and vacation rental industry—with offices in Denver and Barcelona. Our self-serve MarketMinder platform eliminates guesswork and equips Airbnb hosts with smart and competitive insights needed to succeed in the ever-evolving short-term rental landscape. We also arm enterprise clients with customized reports and in-depth dashboards to ensure they can scale and invest strategically. These customers include hundreds of top financial institutions, real estate companies, vacation rental managers, and destination marketing organizations around the world. We track the daily performance of over 14 million Airbnb, Vrbo, & Booking.com properties across 120,000 global markets. We also collect data from over thousands partner properties. This marriage of scraped and source data, enhanced by our proprietary algorithms, makes our solutions the most accurate and comprehensive in the world. We’re firm believers that data isn’t the destination; it’s the starting point. The launchpad. The bedrock for any future-forward business.

The AirDNA Team:
At AirDNA, we’re a team of data nerds on a mission to empower our customers to smartly grow their businesses. And we’re on the hunt for a team leader who can take an agile approach to help us build sophisticated and scalable acquisition strategies. In short: Life is never boring here. And we genuinely live and breathe our company values: Happy, Hungry and Honest. People who are ready to exemplify these values are especially encouraged to apply. We invite you to apply even if you are unsure about whether you meet every single requirement in this posting. We carefully consider every application, not just those that check off all the boxes.

The Role:
As a Senior Data Scientist working on software for short-term rental hosts, you will play a key role in leveraging data-driven insights to design, develop, and maintain software solutions that enable our hosts to effectively invest in short-term rentals, manage their properties, streamline operations, optimize pricing, and deliver exceptional guest experiences. At AirDNA, models are at the heart of all of our systems. A Senior Data Scientist is responsible for setting and implementing strategies to continuously improve our algorithms in a fast-changing industry. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams, including product managers, engineers, and designers, to create user-friendly and impactful tools that empower hosts and maximize their potential.
Here's what you'll get to do:
Guide the strategy for creating or improving ML systems that empower short-term rental hosts to make better decisions, such as estimating revenue potential, pricing optimization, dynamic inventory management, demand forecasting, guest profiling, and review sentiment analysis.
Utilize advanced data analysis, statistical modeling, and machine learning techniques to extract actionable insights from complex and diverse datasets, including host performance data, guest behavior data, and market trends.
Work closely with product managers, engineers, and designers to define product requirements, prioritize features, and ensure the successful delivery of software tools that meet the needs of short-term rental investors and hosts.
Develop predictive models, algorithms, and optimization techniques to empower hosts in making data-driven decisions regarding, comp sets, pricing strategies, occupancy rates, availability management, and revenue maximization.
Drive the implementation and integration of data science models and algorithms within the software infrastructure, ensuring scalability, reliability, and performance.
Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in data science, machine learning, and software development, and apply emerging technologies and methodologies to enhance the capabilities and impact of our software tools.
Create and implement strategies to source and utilize short-term rental training data at scale.
Create processes to continuously monitor and improve the performance of our models.
Here's what you'll need to be successful:
Bachelors, Master's or Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related quantitative field.
Minimum of 5 years of professional experience as a Data Scientist, with a focus on software development and advanced analytics.
Proven track record of designing, developing, and deploying successful software solutions powered by data science and analytics.
Experience in short-term rental investment, revenue management, price optimization, time-series or forecasting is a strong plus.
Strong expertise in programming languages such as Python, with proficiency in data manipulation and analysis libraries (e.g., Pandas, Scikit-learn, XGBoost, PyTorch or TensorFlow).
Proficiency in SQL and database management systems.
Expertise working with large data sets in distributed systems such as pyspark and snowflake.
Experience in ML engineering, cloud-based deployment and model lifecycle management.
Here's what you can expect from us:
Competitive cash compensation and benefits, the salary range for this position is $170,000 - $180,000 per year.
Colorado Salary Statement: The salary range displayed in specifically for those potential hired who will work or reside in the state of Colorado if selected for this role. Any offered salary is determined based on internal equity, internal salary ranges, market data/ranges, applicant’s skills and prior relevant experience, certain degrees and certifications.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, and vision packages to meet your needs
Unlimited vacation policy; take time when you need it
Eligible for Company’s annual discretionary bonus program
401K with employer match up to 4%
Continuing education stipend
16 weeks of paid parental leave
New MacBooks for employees

Benefits for Denver Office employees:
Commuter/RTD benefit
Quarterly team outings
In-Office Lunch 3 Days a Week
We have a great office located just a few blocks away from Union Station in the heart of Denver’s historic LoDo neighborhood–high ceilings, exposed brick, a fully stocked kitchen (snacks, espresso, etc.), and plenty of meeting rooms and brainstorming nooks
Pet-friendly!
AirDNA seeks to attract the best-qualified candidates who support the mission, vision and values of the company and those who respect and promote excellence through diversity. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, age, national origin, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, physical or mental disability, marital, familial or parental status, genetic information, military status, veteran status or any other legally protected classification. The company complies with all applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment and prohibits unlawful harassment based on any of the aforementioned protected classes at every location in which the company operates. This applies to all terms, conditions and privileges of employment including but not limited to: hiring, assessments, probation, placement, benefits, promotion, demotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leave of absence, compensation, training and development, social and recreational programs, education assistance and retirement.

We are committed to making our application process and workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Upon request, AirDNA will reasonably accommodate applicants so they can participate in the application process unless doing so would create an undue hardship to AirDNA or a threat to these individuals, others in the workplace or the company as a whole. To request accommodation, please email compliance@airdna.co. Please allow for 24 hours to process your request.",3.5,AirDNA,Remote,51 to 200 Employees,2015.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,Remote,9.0,1,0,1,1,1
Data Scientist II - Experimentation,"$156K
/yr","Welcome to Warner Bros. Discovery… the stuff dreams are made of.
Who We Are…
When we say, “the stuff dreams are made of,” we’re not just referring to the world of wizards, dragons and superheroes, or even to the wonders of Planet Earth. Behind WBD’s vast portfolio of iconic content and beloved brands, are the storytellers bringing our characters to life, the creators bringing them to your living rooms and the dreamers creating what’s next…
From brilliant creatives, to technology trailblazers, across the globe, WBD offers career defining opportunities, thoughtfully curated benefits, and the tools to explore and grow into your best selves. Here you are supported, here you are celebrated, here you can thrive.
The Job

As a Data Scientist II on the WBD Experimentation Data Science team, this individual will leverage large datasets to extract insights and guide decision-making throughout the full lifecycle of product development for our streaming platform, MAX. You will be responsible for setting up best practices around experiment design and advanced analysis. You will work with product stakeholders from various areas in the video streaming business including search personalization, merchandising and growth, etc. Your work will be essential to drive growth for MAX and come join us if you are passionate about video streaming platform and analytics!

The Daily
Support the design, monitor and deep dive analysis of A/B tests in various business settings. Work end to end with product stakeholders from idea initiation, experiment design/monitoring to sharing results analysis for decision making.
Study and fully understand WBD data sources and develop metrics for measuring platform performance in A/B tests.
Write efficient queries to pull data for KPIs and metrics to diagnose changes observed in experiments and work with engineering and product partners to resolve potential issues.
Perform advanced statistical tests to real world A/B test datasets to measure impacts of new product features.
Apply causal model to investigate cause-effect relationship between KPIs and key product changes.
Perform research to acquire best in class data science techniques and best practices to improve the rigor and efficiency in product experimentation.
Capture business requirements for data science solutions and communicate data science output and recommendations to inform business strategies.
Present analysis to business partners and senior leadership and make product launch recommendations.
How We Get Things Done…
This last bit is probably the most important! Here at WBD, our guiding principles are the core values by which we operate and are central to how we get things done. You can find them at www.wbd.com/guiding-principles/ along with some insights from the team on what they mean and how they show up in their day to day. We hope they resonate with you and look forward to discussing them during your interview.
Championing Inclusion at WBD
Warner Bros. Discovery embraces the opportunity to build a workforce that reflects the diversity of our society and the world around us. Being an equal opportunity employer means that we take seriously our responsibility to consider qualified candidates on the basis of merit, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
If you’re a qualified candidate with a disability and you require adjustments or accommodations during the job application and/or recruitment process, please visit our accessibility page for instructions to submit your request.
In compliance with local law, we are disclosing the compensation, or a range thereof, for roles in locations where legally required. Actual salaries will vary based on several factors, including but not limited to external market data, internal equity, location, skill set, experience, and/or performance. Base pay is just one component of Warner Bros. Discovery’s total compensation package for employees. Pay Range: $109,200.00 - $202,800.00 salary per year. Other rewards may include annual bonuses, short- and long-term incentives, and program-specific awards. In addition, Warner Bros. Discovery provides a variety of benefits to employees, including health insurance coverage, an employee wellness program, life and disability insurance, a retirement savings plan, paid holidays and sick time and vacation.
If you’re a qualified candidate with an arrest or conviction record, please know that your application will be considered in accordance with the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act.",3.5,Warner Bros. Discovery,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,2022.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,156.0,CA,2.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist - Product,"$151K
/yr","Position at Confluent Inc
With Confluent, organizations can harness the full power of continuously flowing data to innovate and win in the modern digital world. We have a purpose that drives us to do better every day – we're creating an entirely new category within data infrastructure - data streaming. This technology will allow every organization to create experiences and use the power of data in ways that profoundly impact the way we all live. This impact is our purpose and drives us to do better every day.
One Confluent. One team. One Data Streaming Platform.
Data Connects Us.
About the Role:
The mission of the Data Science team at Confluent is to serve as the central nervous system of all things data for the company: we build analytics infrastructure, metrics, insights, and models. Our outputs enable data-driven thinking and help optimize every part of the business. There are limitless opportunities for an ambitious data scientist to make an immediate and meaningful impact within a high-growth company.
As a Product Data Scientist at Confluent, you will be a key player in helping define the experiences and driving product strategy at Confluent. You will collaborate with our Product leadership team and cross-functional partners across the Data organization. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s challenges, unlocking growth of our product adoption funnel. This role requires a strong blend of technical skills, strategic thinking and communication skills to influence product strategy and investment decisions.
What You Will Do:
Collaborate with product managers, product engineers, and other stakeholders to define and measure success metrics for product features and initiatives.
Develop and maintain dashboards, reports, and visualizations to communicate key metrics and insights to stakeholders.
Utilize data to uncover trends, identify opportunities for growth, drive strategic product decisions, and shape product roadmaps.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to improve product experience
Share actionable insights and recommendations with leadership at various levels, playing a pivotal role in determining Product strategy
Collaborate with other data scientists across our organization to share best practices, learn new analytical techniques, and champion an organizational culture where data is central to decision making
What You Will Bring:
Strong stakeholder management skills with the ability to influence and build relationships at all levels of the organization.
3+ years of experience in Product Data Science/Analytics
Excellent communication skills, and ability to collaborate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders
Exceptional problem solving skills and analytical skills
Strong proficiency in data manipulation with data querying languages (e.g. SQL). Proficiency in scripting languages (e.g. Python) preferred.
Proficiency in data visualization and building dashboards with tools such as Tableau
Experience and familiarity with A/B testing and experiment best practices
Bachelor or advanced degree in a quantitative discipline: computer science, engineering, statistics, economics, etc.
What Gives You an Edge:
Experience and knowledge of causal inference, machine learning and other advanced analytical methods
Experience in SaaS/Product-led Growth companies

Come As You Are
At Confluent, equality is a core tenet of our culture. We are committed to building an inclusive global team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, beliefs, and experiences. The more diverse we are, the richer our community and the broader our impact. Employment decisions are made on the basis of job-related criteria without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other classification protected by applicable law.
At Confluent, we are committed to providing competitive pay and benefits that are in line with industry standards. We analyze and carefully consider several factors when determining compensation, including work history, education, professional experience, and location. This position has an annual estimated salary of $139,230 - $163,620, an annual bonus, and a competitive equity package. The actual pay may vary depending on your skills, qualifications, experience, and work location. In addition, Confluent offers a wide range of employee benefits.",3.7,Confluent,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,151.0,United States,10.0,1,0,0,0,1
Fraud Risk Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Do the best work of your career as a champion for small and mid-size businesses.
BILL is a leader in financial automation software for small and midsize businesses (SMBs). As a champion of SMBs, we are dedicated to automating the future of finance so businesses can thrive. Hundreds of thousands of businesses trust BILL solutions to manage financial workflows, including payables, receivables, and spend and expense management. With BILL, businesses are connected to a network of millions of members, so they can pay or get paid faster. Through our automated solutions, we help SMBs simplify and control their finances, so they can confidently manage their businesses, and succeed on their terms.
BILL is a trusted partner of leading U.S. financial institutions, accounting firms, and accounting software providers. We have operations in San Jose, CA, Draper, UT, and are continuing to expand into other geographic locations. If you’re looking for a place that helps you do the best work of your career, look no further than BILL.
Make your impact within a rapidly growing Fintech Company
We are looking for a detail oriented, enthusiastic and dedicated Risk Data Scientist to join Bill’s Risk Data Innovation team with a focus on fraud and credit risk. The incumbent will be working on data science projects related to key risk department initiatives. The data scientist will own key projects associated with predictive fraud detection, transaction risk modeling, credit underwriting, portfolio monitoring and loss mitigation (fraud) to support new payment products. This individual will also design experiments to understand the impact of customer experience when leveraging machine learning in complex risk strategy changes. This position requires a person who has experience with developing machine learning models and performing advanced analytics preferably in the risk domain.
We’d love to chat if you have:
Minimum 2 years of industry experience in data science and machine learning, preferably in risk, payments or financial services domain.
It is preferred this person has an advanced degree (M.S., PhD.) with 2+ years of experience or a Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years of experience, preferably in Statistics, Physical Sciences, Computer Science, Economics, Mathematics, or a related technical field
Strong track record of performing data analysis and statistical modeling using Python, SQL or similar tools
Good understanding of a wide range of Machine Learning techniques, tools, and methodologies with a demonstrated capability to apply them to a broad range of business problems and data sources
Machine learning techniques include clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural nets, anomaly detection etc.
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical experts, business partners, and executives
Comfortable with ambiguity and yet able to steer analytics projects toward clear business goals, testable hypotheses and action-oriented outcomes
Experience solving problems related to risk using data science and analytics
Experience working with cross functional teams including product, engineering and operations and leading organization-wide initiatives spanning multiple team
Ability to proactively find the pain points in the current process flows and make business suggestions that are sustainable and able to have long term impact by leveraging strategic thinking, and independently provide solutions to business problems with the solid technical skills and problem solving skills
The estimated salary range for this role is noted below for our San Jose based role. Our ranges for each role and job level are based on a variety of factors including candidate experience, expertise, and geographic location and may vary from the amounts listed above. The role is also eligible for a competitive benefits package that includes: medical, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, 401(k) retirement plan, flexible spending & health savings account, paid holidays, paid time off, and other company benefits.
San Jose pay range
$110,200—$132,100 USD
Let’s talk about benefits
100% paid employee health, dental, and vision plans (choose HMO, PPO, or HDHP)
HSA & FSA accounts
Life Insurance, Long & Short-term disability coverage
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
11+ Observed holidays and wellness days and flexible time off
Employee Stock Purchase Program with employee discounts
Wellness & Fitness initiatives
Employee recognition and referral programs
And much more
For positions that are in office we support a hybrid work environment with on-site and remote work days. Check out our LinkedIn Life Page for each location and discover BILL.
We live our culture and values every day
At BILL, we’re different by design—it's our culture. Our CEO is a trusted entrepreneur who lives our cultural values: Humble, Authentic, Passionate, Accountable, and Fun. People here love being their authentic selves, contributing unique experiences, sharing ideas, perspectives, and intellectual curiosity. We celebrate our diversity as the heart and soul of how we work, grow, and succeed together. Inspiring people with meaningful career experiences they love really does make the dream work and our successes just keep getting better. There’s no limit to what we can build and where we can go from here. We’d love you to join us.

BILL is proudly an Equal Opportunity Employer where everyone is welcome. Our innovation and technology are inspired by an inclusive culture unlike any other. Everyone brings a different personal story and perspective and this diverse mix of minds, backgrounds, and experiences is where our greatest ideas come from. We welcome people of all races, ethnicities, ages, religions, abilities, genders, and sexual orientations to make us an even more vibrant company. We want everyone to bring their authentic selves here, to share our values, shape our vision, drive innovation, and become part of a culture we celebrate every day.
Our promise to our candidates is to be transparent, diligent, and engaging while guiding individuals through each step of our hiring process. At BILL we strive to achieve an inclusive and positive candidate experience that aligns with our core values and focuses on diversity.
If you require a reasonable accommodation for your application, interviews, or another aspect of the hiring process, please contact interviewaccommodations@hq.bill.com.
BILL Culture:
Humble - We check our egos at the door. We are curious. We listen, accept feedback.
Authentic - We earn and show trust by being real—embracing our authentic selves.
Passionate - We care deeply about each other and our customers.
Accountable - We are duty-bound to each other, our customers, and society.
Fun - We wrap it all together by building connections and enjoying time spent together.",3.6,Bill.com,"San Jose, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2006.0,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,121.0,CA,18.0,1,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$133K
/yr","Total Wine & More is seeking a Senior Data Scientist with expertise in all aspects of data science and data analysis, to join our Data Services team. The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for leveraging advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive business value across all of Total Wine & More’s departments. We are looking for an individual who is skilled in all facets of the Analytics Lifecycle, including data gathering, data analysis, variable creation & selection, model building & selection, and visualization. This individual will work closely with the business, software development and support teams, infrastructure, and security staff and will enjoy learning and problem-solving in a fast-paced environment. The Total Wine & More Data Services team is growing, and we are driving business value through technology across all aspects of our business. You will report to the Director of Data Science and Analytics.
You will
Use a wide range of advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive Total Wine & More business
Build and manage machine learning and forecasting models through all phases of development from design, through training, validation, deployment, monitoring and measurement
Scope technical solutions on large amounts of data that leverage data analysis and predictive modeling based off business needs
Integrate scalable solutions into necessary applications and data pipelines
Champion best practices in ML/AI domain across Total Wine & More. Communicate effectively with stakeholders of various tech skillsets about project implementation, results and evolutions of project
Be proactive and take ownership of the projects and tasks assigned
You will come with
Bachelor's degree from four-year College or university in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related field. Master’s or PhD preferred
4+ years of experience in data science, predictive analytics, econometrics or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
4+ years of experience in software engineering, data engineering, or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
Strong background in Applied Mathematics and Statistics
Advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or related field) is a plus
Proven track record in building impactful solutions using predictive & prescriptive modeling
Experience in the use of machine learning, econometrics, predictive modeling
Experience in leveraging the cloud in the application of advanced analytics
Experienced with general programing, statistical languages, and deep learning packages used to manipulate data and build statistical and machine learning models at a large scale, such as Python, Spark, PyTorch, Tensorflow, Keras, SQL, and SQL-like query languages for NoSQL databases
Understanding of data science-related technology landscape, processes and design principles
Familiarity with data architecture, data engineering, data management, and data analysis tools and techniques
Passionate about data, data science, and insight generation
Familiar with retail, wholesale, planning and allocation systems, or supply chain operations, preferred
Strong analytic skills, attention to detail, ability to multi-task, troubleshoot and problem solve along with the ability to make recommendations based on analysis are extremely important
We offer
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Generous store discounts
Health care plans (medical, prescription, dental, vision)
401(k), HSA, FSA, Pre-tax commuter benefits
Disability & life insurance coverage
Paid parental leave
Pet insurance
Critical illness and accident insurance
Discounted home and auto insurance
College tuition assistance
Career development & product training
Consumer classes
& More!
Grow with us
Total Wine & More is the country's largest independent retailer of fine wine, beer and spirits, and we continue to grow our footprint year over year. Total Wine offers exciting and unique career opportunities across the country and in our corporate office. Our strength is our people. We have a commitment to training and career growth, all in an environment that values new ideas and teamwork. If you share our entrepreneurial spirit and a passion for providing best-in-class customer experience, take a moment to apply or learn more at www.TotalWine.com/About-Us/Careers!
The exempt compensation range for this position is $101,900 - $165,000. Compensation may vary based on a number of factors including, but not limited to, market location, job-related knowledge, skills and/or experience. Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation. Estimated salaries determined by third parties have not been validated by Total Wine & More.
Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation
Total Wine & More is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. Total Wine & More makes reasonable accommodations during all aspects of the employment process, including during the interview process. Total Wine & More is a Drug Free Workplace.
The information provided above indicates the general nature and level of work required of the position and is not a comprehensive list of all responsibilities or qualifications. Benefits list is only a highlight of some of the benefits offered to team members; eligibility for certain benefits apply.",3.4,Total Wine & More,"Bethesda, MD",5001 to 10000 Employees,1991.0,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,133.0,MD,33.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior Healthcare Data Scientist,"$152K
/yr","Job Description
Are you passionate about using data to take on business challenges? Do you have experience in healthcare specific data analytics and applied statistics? Are you looking for an opportunity to address interesting business questions in the life sciences and grow your skillset by working on a collaborative team? You might be the person we are looking for.

Our corporate data science, data engineering and product team is looking for a data scientist with experience in Healthcare Real-World Data (RWD), machine learning, statistics, and a real passion for addressing business needs through data analysis and solutions. You will work on a highly collaborative, centralized team of data scientists, engineers, and strategists to deliver analytical insights and data products that drive value and impact for our highest priority business needs. You’ll work side-by-side with internal partners across development, clinical, commercial, and general and administrative areas to develop creative solutions that contribute meaningfully to our business and patients.

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with a centralized team of data scientists/engineers/strategists and cross-functional partners to conceptualize, develop, and deploy data science solutions for highest priority business problems and to design and execute A/B tests to quantify the value of these solutions
Be the primary technical lead focused on creative use of diverse data sources to solve business problems, such as clinical operations data, Electronic Health Record (EHR), insurance claims data, and/or other provider and patient-level data
Build and deliver compelling data visualizations and outputs to communicate findings to technical collaborators, non-technical audiences, and business leaders
Participate in the broader data science community to stay current with methodology, software, and data development and availability
Bring an entrepreneurial and ethical mindset, openness, transparency, and collegiality to your work
Minimum Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Epidemiology, Health Economics, Computer Science, Clinical/Biomedical Informatics or a related computational and quantitative discipline, or a Master’s degree (scientific field of study) and 3+ years of relevant experience.
Domain knowledge in clinical data, Real-World Data (EHR, insurance claims, e.g. Clarivate DRG, MarketScan, IQVIA, TriNetX, Optum, Premier), and/or related data sources
Expertise in programming languages (e.g. Python, R, SQL, JavaScript), version control, and other data science related tools (e.g. D3, AWS, dbt)
Extensive experience with statistical/analytical methodologies and machine learning algorithms (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, feature selection/engineering, deep learning, time-series analysis, network analysis, hypothesis testing)
Comfortable working with both technical and non-technical staff in a fast-paced environment to come up with solutions/algorithms and create working prototypes
Ability to build and manage relationships with various cross-functional collaborators and stakeholders across the company
Exceptional communication skills and ability to present findings to non-technical audiences with effective data visualization approaches
Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge of the biopharma or healthcare industry
Experience with LLM prompt engineering and familiarity with creating LLM-based solutions and architectures such as retrieval-augmented generation
Experience with developing advanced data visualizations and dashboards (e.g. Dash, Streamlit, R Shiny and front-end frameworks such as Flask and Angular) in business settings
Familiarity with data product UX/UI design and testing
Flex Designation:
Hybrid-Eligible Or On-Site Eligible
Flex Eligibility Status:
In this Hybrid-Eligible role, you can choose to be designated as:
1. Hybrid: work remotely up to two days per week; or select
2. On-Site: work five days per week on-site with ad hoc flexibility.
Note: The Flex status for this position is subject to Vertex’s Policy on Flex @ Vertex Program and may be changed at any time.
Company Information
Vertex is a global biotechnology company that invests in scientific innovation.
Vertex is committed to equal employment opportunity and non-discrimination for all employees and qualified applicants without regard to a person's race, color, sex, gender identity or expression, age, religion, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, disability, veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, marital status, or any characteristic protected under applicable law. Vertex is an E-Verify Employer in the United States. Vertex will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.
Any applicant requiring an accommodation in connection with the hiring process and/or to perform the essential functions of the position for which the applicant has applied should make a request to the recruiter or hiring manager, or contact Talent Acquisition at ApplicationAssistance@vrtx.com",4.2,Vertex Pharmaceuticals,"Boston, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1989.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,152.0,MA,35.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Senior Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$253K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Provide guidance to junior analysts and data scientists
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modelling project
At least 5 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, capable of working independently in a dynamic, fast-paced environment, and delivering projects from end to end
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
Experience collaborating with cross-functional teams while managing and prioritizing multiple projects
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $176355 - $329333 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,253.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist II (REMOTE),"$110K
/yr","For more than 170 years, The Hanover has been committed to delivering on our promises and being there when it matters the most. We live our values every day, demonstrating we CARE through our values, ESG initiatives and IDE journey.

Our Data Science team is currently seeking a Data Scientist II in our Worcester, MA location or remote work arrangement.

This is a full time, exempt role.

POSITION OVERVIEW:
The Data Scientist II designs, implements, and evaluates advanced statistical models, machine learning algorithms, and tools for application in the business’s most complex issues. The Data Scientist builds econometric and statistical models for various problems inclusive of projections, classification, clustering, pattern analysis, sampling, simulations, and so forth.

In this capacity, the Data Scientist II researches new ways for predicting and modeling end-user behavior as well as investigating data summarization and visualization techniques for conveying key applied analytics findings.

The Data Scientist II also performs ad-hoc data mining and exploratory statistics tasks on very large data sets related to the business’s strategies. The Data Scientist II will also prepare reports and presentations for senior data scientists and relevant stakeholders that will give insights for departmental as well as business-wide decision making.

IN THIS ROLE, YOU WILL:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Collaborate with product management and the LOB’s to understand company needs and devise possible solutions
Keep up-to-date with the latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision-makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and solution design
Usually works with minimum supervision, conferring with business partners on data/reporting requests
Documents the development and the design of the solutions built
Conducts reviews for the work of less senior team members.
Handle multiple projects simultaneously
Begin to work on more complex projects with minimal supervision.
WHAT YOU NEED TO APPLY:
Minimum of 4+ years of related experience and a bachelor’s degree, Master’s, or Ph.D. degree is preferred.
Must be eligible to work in the US without requiring sponsorship now or in the future (IE: US Citizen or green card required)
Ability to drive larger more complicated projects independently
Insurance experience is preferred
TECHNICAL SKILLS:
Practical (Advanced) experience with R, and/or Python
(Advanced) SQL, Data Management, and Documentation
Experience with ETL (Azure Data Factory, SSIS, etc.)
Experience in various modeling techniques
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience in data mining and complex statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Experience in more complex Machine Learning techniques such as deep learning, neural networks, natural language processing.
Model Governance, Metadata Management
Experience with unstructured data and document-based systems (NoSQL, Data Lakes)
Azure DataBricks experience is preferred.
Experience with Agile data science life cycle management and related concepts like MLOps for Continuous deployment, integration, quality, and delivery is preferred.
CAREER DEVELOPMENT:
It’s not just a job, it’s a career, and we are here to support you every step of the way. We want you to be successful and fulfilled. Through on-the-job experiences, personalized coaching and our robust learning and development programs, we encourage you – at every level – to grow and develop.

BENEFITS:
We offer comprehensive benefits to help you be healthy, build financial security, and balance work and home life. At The Hanover, you’ll enjoy what you do and have the support you need to succeed.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance
401K with a company match
Tuition reimbursement
PTO
Company paid holidays
Flexible work arrangements
Cultural Awareness Day in support of IDE
On-site medical/wellness center (Worcester only)
Click here for the full list of Benefits
EEO statement:
The Hanover values diversity in the workplace and among our customers. The company provides equal opportunity for employment and promotion to all qualified employees and applicants on the basis of experience, training, education, and ability to do the available work without regard to race, religion, color, age, sex/gender, sexual orientation, national origin, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information, ancestry or any other status protected by law.

Furthermore, The Hanover Insurance Group is committed to providing an equal opportunity workplace that is free of discrimination and harassment based on national origin, race, color, religion, gender, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information or any other status protected by law.”

As an equal opportunity employer, Hanover does not discriminate against qualified individuals with disabilities. Individuals with disabilities who wish to request a reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, or to perform essential job functions, should contact us at: HRServices@hanover.com and include the link of the job posting in which you are interested.

Privacy Policy:
To view our privacy policy and online privacy statement, click here.

Applicants who are California residents: To see the types of information we may collect from applicants and employees and how we use it, please click here.",4.1,The Hanover Insurance Group,"Worcester, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1852.0,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,110.0,MA,172.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist - Cybersecurity,"$108K
/yr","Cybersecurity is seeking a Sr Data Scientist to join the Cybersecurity Artificial Intelligence team. This position will use machine learning, data engineering, automation, and Data Science principles to solve enterprise problems and advance our mission. This role is a key contributor to our team and will be directly responsible for design, development, deployment, and automation. The successful candidate will work closely with key stakeholders to rapidly advance the use of traditional and generative AI for cybersecurity. We are seeking candidates with passion to lead the implementation of cutting-edge technology and methodologies while establishing strong partnerships with data owners and stakeholders across Cybersecurity. The Sr Data Scientist will have demonstrated experience as a problem-solver, working alongside IT and business partners, and act as a trusted consultant.

Key Responsibilities and Duties
Structure business problems and drive viable, data-driven hypotheses in collaboration with business partners
Ability to skillfully enumerate a business problem, quantify its impact, size relevant data, and document applicable sources
Devise, develop and disseminate actionable intelligence from disparate data sources using advanced data analytics tools and techniques
Proficiency in evaluating and comparing data science models using a diverse range of metrics to enable informed decision-making and optimal model selection
Ability to perform in depth data analysis including but not limited to -
Machine Learning
Generative AI,
RAG frameworks, & NLP Token and sequence classification
Classification Optimization
Time Series analysis
Pattern Recognition
Able to work proactively and take initiative without being specifically directed Ability to extract & aggregate data from disparate data sources
Ability to communicate complex topics and visualize data in an easy-to-understand manner when presenting to management
Educational Requirements
Bachelor's Degree Required
Work Experience
3+ Years Required; 5+ Years Preferred
Physical Requirements
Physical Requirements: Sedentary Work

Career Level
7IC
Required Skills

3+ years of experience in a Data Science or Data Engineering related role
2+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Professional experience using at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)

Preferred Skills

3+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Experience in building Generative AI solutions for business problems
3+ years of experience developing solutions using SQL
2+ years of experience with at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)
1+ year of experience in Cybersecurity
1+ year of experience in Splunk SPL
Experience with modern data engineering utilizing APIs
Experience applying agile SDLC
M.S. or PhD in a Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM) or Economics related field of study
Related Skills
Business Acumen, Data Preprocessing, Data Science, Innovation, Machine Learning, Market/Industry Dynamics, Predictive Modeling, Programming, Statistics
Anticipated Posting End Date:
2024-11-15
Base Pay Range: $88,400/yr. - $126,800/yr.
Actual base salary may vary based upon, but not limited to, relevant experience, time in role, base salary of internal peers, prior performance, business sector, and geographic location. In addition to base salary, the competitive compensation package may include, depending on the role, participation in an incentive program linked to performance (for example, annual discretionary incentive programs, non-annual sales incentive plans, or other non-annual incentive plans).
_____________________________________________________________________________________________________
Company Overview
TIAA is the leading provider of financial services in the academic, research, medical, cultural and government fields. We offer a wide range of financial solutions, including investing, banking, advice and education, and retirement services.
Benefits and Total Rewards
The organization is committed to making financial well-being possible for its clients, and is equally committed to the well-being of our associates. That’s why we offer a comprehensive Total Rewards package designed to make a positive difference in the lives of our associates and their loved ones. Our benefits include a superior retirement program and highly competitive health, wellness and work life offerings that can help you achieve and maintain your best possible physical, emotional and financial well-being. To learn more about your benefits, please review our
Benefits Summary
.
Equal Opportunity
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment regardless of age, race, color, national origin, sex, religion, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other protected status.

Accessibility Support
TIAA offers support for those who need assistance with our online application process to provide an equal employment opportunity to all job seekers, including individuals with disabilities.
If you are a U.S. applicant and desire a reasonable accommodation to complete a job application please use one of the below options to contact our accessibility support team:
Phone: (800) 842-2755
Email:
accessibility.support@tiaa.org",3.7,TIAA,"Frisco, TX",10000+ Employees,1918.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,108.0,TX,106.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Spatial Omics","$129K
/yr","The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid

The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid",4.2,MD Anderson Cancer Center,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1941.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,83.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$161K
/yr","At Accenture Federal Services, nothing matters more than helping the US federal government make the nation stronger and safer and life better for people. Our 13,000+ people are united in a shared purpose to pursue the limitless potential of technology and ingenuity for clients across defense, national security, public safety, civilian, and military health organizations.
Join Accenture Federal Services to do the work you love in an inclusive, collaborative, and caring community, where you can be empowered to grow, learn and thrive through hands-on experience, certifications, industry training and more.
Join us to drive positive, lasting change that moves missions and the government forward!

Job Description:
Accenture Federal Services is seeking a data scientist who is excited about assessing problems, developing solutions, and solving national security related problems. Our team leverages technological advances for better performance in all mission areas—collection, analysis, and operations—while protecting against technological threats to the security of the customer's information. We are a cadre of information management, data science, and technology experts dedicated to revolutionizing the way we ""do data"", while upholding proper protection, accessibility, and release mandates. The objective of our efforts is to accelerate the development and application of data science capabilities – including artificial intelligence and machine learning – to the customer's core missions.
Here's what you need:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 7 years of experience; or
a Master's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 5 years of experience or equivalent work experience
5+ years experience as a Data Scientist or similar role
5+ years experience with machine learning or statistics
5+ years experience developing briefings, dashboards, reports, and other deliverables using data science tools and techniques
Knowledge of analytic methods and methodological tools such as: applied mathematics, computer programming, and/or visualization
Knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git, Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, and/or Unix commands
Bonus points if you have:
Proficiency in Python and other software/tools such as R, SQL, Git, Tableau
Experience with Python libraries such as Pandas, numpy, scikit-learn
Demonstrated experience working large volumes of data
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information
Experience working directly with customers to identify and develop functional requirements
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph

What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture Federal Services has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture Federal Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.

Los Angeles County Information Only
If you live in or expect to work from Los Angeles County if hired for this position, please review below for important additional information.

Criminal history may have a direct, adverse, and negative relationship with some of the material job duties of this position. These include the duties and responsibilities listed in the job posting, as well as the abilities to adhere to company policies, exercise sound judgment, effectively manage stress and work safely and respectfully with others, exhibit trustworthiness, meet client expectations, standards, and accompanying requirements, and safeguard business operations and company reputation. Pursuant to the California Fair Chance Act, Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers, Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance, and San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture Federal Services is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture Federal Services and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you are being considered for employment opportunities with Accenture Federal Services and need an accommodation for a disability or religious observance during the interview process or for the job you are interviewing for, please speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture Federal Services or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",4.1,Accenture Federal Services,"Chantilly, VA",10000+ Employees,1989.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,161.0,VA,35.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior AI Data Scientist,"$187K
/yr","Empowering players to create is an exciting future for the gaming industry. At Electronic Arts we have many examples of players creating content, whether it be a skateboard park in Skate or fantastical mansions in the Sims 4. The future definitely has our players being more empowered to create with their imagination being the only limit.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to help shape the future of content creation and gameplay with AI. If you have the right expertise and are interested we want to hear from you!
As a Senior AI Data Scientist you will:
Build, fine-tune and implement AI and machine learning models to solve challenging problems
Ensure AI and machine learning production pipelines are scalable, repeatable and cloud agnostic
Apply current and emerging techniques in deep learning, natural language processing and other machine learning areas
Collect, clean, manage, analyze and visualize large sets of data using multiple data platforms, tools and technique
Work in partnership with game teams to integrate AI solutions into products and services.
Optimize and fine-tune AI models for performance and scalability. Analyze and interpret data to extract meaningful insights and improve AI models.
Document and present findings and solutions to stakeholders.
Desired qualifications and experience:
A minimum of 3+ years of experience in data science
PhD or MSc in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related field
Strong expertise in deep learning, fluent in Python and SQL
Expertise in automating machine learning models and building end to end products
Experience with devops tools and principles (Git, CI/CD, Docker)
Effective within Cloud environments (GCP, AWS)
Understanding of containerization and orchestration technologies (Docker, Kubernetes, etc.
Ceci ne s’applique pas au Québec.

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

The base salary ranges listed below are for the defined geographic market pay zones in these locations. If you reside outside of these locations, a recruiter will advise on the range and benefits for your specific location.

EA has listed the base salary ranges it in good faith expects to pay applicants for this role in the locations listed, as of the time of this posting. Pay offered will be determined based on numerous relevant business and candidate factors including, for example, education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, geographic location, and business or organizational needs.



BASE SALARY RANGES

California (depending on location e.g. Los Angeles vs. Sacramento):
º $161,100 - $239,700 USD Annually
New York (depending on location e.g. Manhattan vs. Buffalo):
º $142,900 - $239,700 USD Annually
Jersey City, NJ :
º $187,400 - $239,700 USD Annually
Colorado (depending on location e.g. Denver vs. Colorado Springs):
º $153,100 - $206,200 USD Annually
Washington (depending on location e.g. Seattle vs. Spokane):
º $142,900 - $230,000 USD Annually
British Columbia (depending on location e.g. Vancouver vs. Victoria):
º $133,400 - $193,200 CAN Annually

Base salary is just one part of the overall compensation at EA. In the US, we offer a package of benefits including paid time off (3 weeks per year to start), 80 hours per year of sick time, 16 paid company holidays per year, 10 weeks paid time off to bond with baby, medical/dental/vision insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, and 401(k) to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity. For British Columbia, we offer a package of benefits including vacation (3 weeks per year to start), 10 days per year of sick time, paid top-up to EI/QPIP benefits up to 100% of base salary when you welcome a new child (12 weeks for maternity, and 4 weeks for parental/adoption leave), extended health/dental/vision coverage, life insurance, disability insurance, retirement plan to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity.

Electronic Arts creates next-level entertainment experiences that inspire players and fans around the world. Here, everyone is part of the story. Part of a community that connects across the globe. A place where creativity thrives, new perspectives are invited, and ideas matter. A team where everyone makes play happen.",4.1,Electronic Arts,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1982.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,187.0,WA,42.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,WA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Astronomical Data Scientist II,"$96K
/yr","Astronomical Data Scientist II
The Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is a multi-mission science operations center for finding stars and galaxies in the universe. Our world-class astronomical research center is based on the Johns Hopkins University Homewood campus in Baltimore, Maryland. Learn more about our missions - https://www.stsci.edu/what-we-do.
Description:
The Data Management Division (DMD) at the Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is seeking an astronomical data scientist to support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST). MAST is the public data archive for more than 20 missions spanning more than 30 years. The DMD is responsible for a multi-petabyte astronomical data archive that maintains Hubble Space Telescope (HST), James Webb Space Telescope (JWST), Kepler, GALEX, TESS, and the future Nancy Grace Roman Space Telescope (Roman) Mission data.
Job Summary:
This candidate will lead archive activities and science data exploration related to large scale astronomical dataset, provide scientific guidance on catalog development efforts and support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST) data products, tools, and interfaces.
This position can support hybrid work. This position can support hybrid work. Candidates must reside in or be willing to relocate to our local market. (MD, DE, VA, PA, DC & WV). Relocation assistance provided.
This position requires US Citizenship or Permanent Residence in order to meet ITAR requirements.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Regular:
Participate in the design and development of cloud-based solutions for storing, processing and managing astronomical catalogs and services that support community usage of catalogs
Maintain and support mission source catalogs such as Roman Source Catalog(s) to ensure the integrity, accessibility, and security of astronomical datasets.
Participate in cloud tool development for massive catalog dataset exploration
Support catalog data searching across multiple archive centers
Answer help desk questions from scientific users, especially for those related to astronomical catalogs
Requirements:
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in astronomy or astrophysics
Expertise (minimum of three years or equivalent knowledge level) in the scientific use of catalogs
Experience in Python scripting, including the use of common Python-based astronomy packages
Familiarity with AWS Cloud related tools/services
Effective communication skills and the ability to describe astronomical data to a broad science community
Ability to maintain effective working relationships with other scientific, technical, and administrative staff
Ability to analyze and solve problems independently, as well as work collaboratively and communicate effectively with multi-disciplinary teams and leadership
Preferred Qualifications:
Expertise in one (or both) of the following fields of study:
Extragalactic astrophysics
Time domain and multi-messenger (TDAMM) astrophysics
Experience working with and analyzing/processing massive catalogs
Experience with Git or other similar software version control tools
Experience applying machine learning algorithms/tools to produce/analyze astronomical catalogs
Experience with database SQL scripts
Required Education:
Ph.D. in Astronomy or equivalent field.
NOTE: Substitution of additional relevant education or experience for stated qualifications may be considered.
Salary range is $86,000 - $106,000.
Compensation is commensurate with education and experience. Our excellent benefits include:
Employer retirement contribution – direct STScI contribution of 10% of your salary from your first day
12 days sick leave, up to 24 days’ vacation, and 10 paid holidays
Flexible work schedule with healthy work/life balance
Comprehensive medical/dental/vision/prescription plans, and more!
TO APPLY: Please upload a resume, cover letter and online application using this link: Astronomical Data Scientist II
Applications received by 10/30/2024 will receive full consideration. Applications received after this date will be considered until the position is filled.
Explore all career opportunities at www.stsci.edu/opportunities
STScI offers a flexible and welcoming workspace for all. STScI embraces the diversity of our staff as a strategic priority in creating a first-rate community. We strongly encourage women, ethnic minorities, veterans, and disabled individuals to apply for these opportunities. Veterans, disabled individuals, or wounded warriors needing assistance with the employment process can contact us at careers@stsci.edu EOE/AA/M/F/D/V.
As a leader in the astronomical community, AURA is committed to diversity and inclusion. AURA develops and supports programs that advance our organizational commitment to diversity, broaden participation, and encourage the advancement of diversity throughout the workforce www.aura-astronomy.org/diversity.asp
As a recipient of U.S. Government funding, AURA is considered a government contractor subject to Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action regulations. As an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, AURA and all of the centers do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity/gender identity expression, lawful political affiliations, veteran status, disability, and any other legally protected status under applicable federal, state, and local equal opportunity laws. The statements below, as well as the requests for self-identification, are required under these regulations. We encourage your participation in meeting these federal reporting requirements for protection and assisting us in our record-keeping and reporting. Your responses are kept strictly confidential.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.5,"Assn of Univ for Res in Astronomy, Inc.","Baltimore, MD",1001 to 5000 Employees,1957.0,Company - Private,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,MD,67.0,1,0,0,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$103K
/yr","Overview:
In today’s rapidly evolving technology landscape, an organization’s data has never been a more important aspect in achieving mission and business goals. Our data exploitation experts work with our clients to support their mission and business goals by creating and executing a comprehensive data strategy using the best technology and techniques, given the challenge.

At Steampunk, our goal is to build and execute a data strategy for our clients to coordinate data collection and generation, to align the organization and its data assets in support of the mission, and ultimately to realize mission goals with the strongest effectiveness possible.

For our clients, data is a strategic asset. They are looking to become a facts-based, data-driven, customer-focused organization. To help realize this goal, they are leveraging visual analytics platforms to analyze, visualize, and share information. At steampunk you will design and develop solutions to high-impact, complex data problems, working with the best and data practitioners around.
Contributions:
We are looking for an Associate Data Scientist to work with our existing team of Data Architects and Developers to develop strategies, create ML/AI solutions, and deliver results. We are looking for a more than just an ""Associate Data Scientist"", but a technologist with excellent communication and customer service skills and a passion for data and problem solving.
Experience modeling on structured and unstructured data sets
Experience with exploratory data analysis
Experience in feature engineering
Experience in data visualization
Experience with Deep Learning methodology and state of the art libraries
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information and make decisions
Support an Agile software development lifecycle
Qualifications:
Ability to hold a position of public trust with the US government.
0-5 years industry experience developing ML/AI solutions and a passion for solving complex problems.
0-5 years direct experience in Data Modeling and Data Solution Development
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, engineering, business, or a scientific or technical discipline
Demonstrated experience manipulating structured and unstructured data for analysis
Strong programming skills in SQL, Python, R, Scala, Java, or similar language
Experience using Python to manipulate large data sets
Demonstrated experience with TensorFlow, Keras, or other Deep Learning tools and frameworks
Demonstrated experience in big data systems including Hadoop, Spark, Scala
Data visualization skills in Tableau, Power BI, D3, ArcGIS, or similar
Knowledge of DBOps and MLOps framework is a plus
Experience with Solr, Elasticsearch, or similar tool is a plus
About steampunk:
Steampunk relies on several factors to determine salary, including but not limited to geographic location, contractual requirements, education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience. The projected compensation range for this position is $75,000 to $130,000. The estimate displayed represents a typical annual salary range for this position. Annual salary is just one aspect of Steampunk’s total compensation package for employees. Learn more about additional Steampunk benefits here.

Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.3,Steampunk,"El Paso, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,TX,21.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist II - Operations Analytics,"$107K
/yr","Description

A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions which determine the source of disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety.

In North America we have more than 5,000 team members across 11 sites or subsidiaries, including Salt Lake City-based BioFire Diagnostics and one subsidiary in Montreal, Canada. Come be a part of our team and our mission as a Data Scientist!

bioMérieux - Salt Lake City is looking for a talented and engaged Data Scientist to play an integral role in the support of cutting-edge, life-saving medical devices. You will be joining a team that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and a healthy work life balance.
The candidate will be knowledgeable in various aspects of data analytics, and responsible for building and maintaining analytic dashboards, developing robust data pipelines, and performing complex mathematical and/or statistical analysis for projects to support the BioFire manufacturing departments. The candidate must have strong analytic and programming skills. The candidate will be embedded in the Data Science department but will have close collaboration with the Software Development, Production, and Engineering teams at bioMérieux. Therefore, the candidate must have strong communication skills and desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.

Studies and Experience:
A minimum of a B.S. in a quantitative discipline: Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Computational Biology
2+ years industry experience as a data scientist, mathematician, or statistician, or 0 years industry experience with a M.S. or PhD in a quantitative discipline.
Programming proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, MATLAB, C++, C#, or SQL

Skills and Qualifications:
Good communication, writing, and presentation skills
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Practical experience in any of the following: data visualization, data analytics platforms (e.g., Tableau), data pipelines, data cleaning and processing, probability, statistics, machine learning, image analysis, linear algebra, and optimization methods",4.0,bioMerieux SA,"Salt Lake City, UT",10000+ Employees,1963.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,107.0,UT,61.0,1,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$106K
/yr","Operations Analyst – Data Scientist
Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,106.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,0
Sr Data Scientist,"$129K
/yr","Role : Sr Data Scientist
Location : Dallas TX ( Hybrid role - In office REQIUIRED )
Overview: Blue Yonder is a Leading AI-driven Global Supply Chain Solutions Software Product Company and one of Glassdoor’s “Best Places to Work”
Seeking an expert individual that has a strong technical foundation with the additional ability to be hands-on with the broader engineering team as part of the development/deployment cycle, and deep knowledge of industry best practices, Data Science and Machine Learning experience with the ability to implement them working with both the platform, and the product teams.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Technical Environment
Operate within a sophisticated technical landscape, utilizing Python 3.* and frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, BigQuery, Apache Beam,
Apache Spark, Kubeflow, Dataflow, Kubernetes, Kafka, Pub/Sub, and Flask. Our application architecture follows a scalable, resilient, reactive, event-driven
, and secure multi-tenant Microservices design, hosted on Google and Azure Cloud.
Responsibilities:
As the Sr Data Scientist, you will:
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to execute data enrichment, cleansing routines, and feature selection.
Evaluate candidate models, select the final model, and report on test performance.
Ensure proper runtime deployment of models and implement runtime monitoring for continued model stability.
Drive collaboration with product, sales, and engineering teams to shape the final solution.
Utilize data to understand patterns, formulate and test hypotheses, and iterate as needed.
Play a key role in preparing sales materials and estimating hardware requirements.
Lead client meetings, both online and onsite, to discuss new and current functionality.
If you are a seasoned data scientist with a passion for leadership, ready to guide a team in implementing impactful initiatives, we invite you to lead innovation at Blue Yonder.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or any other related field is required
Min 7 years of experience with strong foundation in data science and deep learning principles.
Proficient in Python programming with a solid understanding of data structures.
Experience with frameworks and libraries like Pandas, NumPy, Keras, TensorFlow, Jupyter, Matplotlib, etc.
Expertise in a database query language, preferably SQL.
Familiarity with Big Data technologies like Snowflake, Apache Beam/Spark/Flink, and Databricks.
Solid experience with major cloud platforms, preferably Azure and/or GCP.
Knowledge of modern software development tools and best practices, including Git, Github Actions, Jenkins, Docker, Jira, etc.
Familiarity with deep learning, time series, NLP, reinforcement learning, and combinatorial optimization.
Proven experience in team leadership, mentoring junior data scientists in an official or unofficial capacity.
Desired knowledge of Kafka, Redis, Cassandra, etc.
LI-LOCAL
LI-SR1
-
The salary range for this position is $114,103.81 - $143,896.18
The salary range information provided, reflects the anticipated base salary range for this position based on current national data. Minimums and maximums may vary based on location. Individual salary will be commensurate with skills, experience, certifications or licenses and other relevant factors. In addition, this role will be eligible to participate in either the annual performance bonus or commission program, determined by the nature of the position.
At Blue Yonder, we care about the wellbeing of our employees and those most important to them. This is reflected in our robust benefits package and options that includes:
Comprehensive Medical, Dental and Vision
401K with Matching
Flexible Time Off
Corporate Fitness Program
A variety of voluntary benefits such as; Legal Plans, Accident and Hospital Indemnity, Pet Insurance and much more
At Blue Yonder, we are committed to a workplace that genuinely fosters inclusion and belonging in which everyone can share their unique voices and talents in a safe space. We continue to be guided by our core values and are proud of our diverse culture as an equal opportunity employer. We understand that your career search may look different than others, and embrace the professional, personal, educational, and volunteer opportunities through which people gain experience.
Our Values

If you want to know the heart of a company, take a look at their values. Ours unite us. They are what drive our success – and the success of our customers. Does your heart beat like ours? Find out here:
Core Values
Diversity, Inclusion, Value & Equity (DIVE)
is our strategy for fostering an inclusive environment we can be proud of. Check out Blue Yonder's inaugural
Diversity Report
which outlines our commitment to change, and our
video
celebrating the differences in all of us in the words of some of our associates from around the world.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.",4.1,Blue Yonder,"Dallas, TX",5001 to 10000 Employees,1985.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,39.0,1,0,1,0,0
Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine,"$128K
/yr","Job Description
Grow your career at Cedars-Sinai!
Data is vital to advance clinical knowledge across a spectrum of medical and surgical fields. Are you ready to transform data discoveries into valuable information, which will empower tomorrow's medicine?
Dr. Jason Moore is looking for a Research Data Scientist to join a diverse team!
To learn more about the department - Computational Biomedicine | Cedars-Sinai
The Research Data Scientist participates in biomedical research projects using programming, data-mining, statistics, machine learning, and visualization techniques to develop, evaluate, and/or apply algorithms and software for data analysis.
Responsibilities include querying databases, data processing, supervised and unsupervised machine learning, deploying production models, and communication of scientific findings via peer-reviewed publications and scientific conferences. Writes clean, performant, reusable code managed on GitHub to perform repeatable analyses and to train and deploy models to multiple environments.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Assists with the development, evaluation, and/or application of computational and statistical methods including artificial intelligence and machine learning algorithms and software for the analysis of biomedical data.
Assists with the presentation and communication of scientific results through laboratory meetings, scientific conferences, and peer-reviewed publications.
Creates database-to-deployment pipelines for models using the necessary programming languages (primarily R, Python, SQL).
Creates sustainable data science infrastructure and adheres to data analysis/machine learning best practices.
Performs exploratory data analysis to gauge the need for or appropriateness of advanced analytical methods.
Works with senior or lead data scientists and principal investigators to identify areas where data science can best be applied to answer biomedical research questions.
Tests and validates code to ensure robustness of data applications with version control through GitHub.
Performs all other duties as assigned.

Qualifications
Educational Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline required.

Master's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline preferred.
Experience:
2 years of professional experience in healthcare or pharmaceutical industries working with biomedical data.
2 years - Experience in programming at an intermediate skill level with a high-level programming language such as R or Python. College projects may be acceptable.
2 years - Experience in programming at a basic to intermediate proficiency level in SQL preferred
Experience in biomedical machine learning is preferred
Physical Demands:
Standing, Walking, Sitting, Lifting 50 lbs. Carrying 50 lbs. Pushing 50 lbs. Pulling 50 lbs. Reaching, Handling, Grasping, Feeling, Talking, Hearing, Repetitive Motions, Eye/Hand/Foot Coordination

Req ID : 5630
Working Title : Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine
Department : Computational Biomedicine
Business Entity : Cedars-Sinai Medical Center
Job Category : Information Technology
Job Specialty : Bus Intelligence/Reporting
Overtime Status : EXEMPT
Primary Shift : Day
Shift Duration : 8 hour
Base Pay : $94,764 - $161,096",3.9,CEDARS-SINAI,California,10000+ Employees,1902.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,128.0,California,122.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","The Bioanalytics Systems & Technologies Group focuses on driving analytics to take advantage of vast and rapidly expanding biological datasets to address national security needs. The Group’s efforts include developing software architectures and systems, bioinformatics tools, and AI algorithms to further the nation’s efforts in chemical and biological defense, biosecurity, public and global health and warfighter performance.

Job Description

Our group is seeking a highly motivated data scientist to join our diverse and multi-functional team. As a Technical Staff member, you may be responsible for contributing to technical solutions as well as working with the sponsor, understanding their needs, translating them to a technical roadmap, and leading multidisciplinary teams to bring that to fruition. We are looking for an individual who has a strong background a technical field and who will further the Group’s mission by developing and applying state-of -the-art data science technologies that can help us address key national stakeholder needs. Example areas of effort include, but are not limited to, assessing the AI data readiness of systems, prototyping reference data science architectures, and leveraging multi-omics, clinical, and imaging data to provide insights for therapeutic suitability for a range of diseases. As a Technical Staff member, you will be a principal investigator for projects, lead teams, define research plans, and provide technical and management oversight.

Requirements

Ph.D. in Data Science, Mathematics, Physics, Computational Biology, Biomedical Engineering, or related scientific field or equivalent experience in technical analysis. In lieu of a Ph.D., a master’s degree with 5+ years of directly related experience will be considered.
Demonstrated ability to derive actionable information from multi-modal data.
Ability to work collaboratively and lead highly interdisciplinary teams.
Demonstrated skills in scientific writing, as well as development and clear presentation of technical materials to a wide spectrum of technical and non-technical audiences.
Occasional travel (<10%) with optional opportunities for travel.

At MIT Lincoln Laboratory, our exceptional career opportunities include many outstanding benefits to help you stay healthy, feel supported, and enjoy a fulfilling work-life balance. Benefits offered to employees include:
Comprehensive health, dental, and vision plans
MIT-funded pension
Matching 401K
Paid leave (including vacation, sick, parental, military, etc.)
Tuition reimbursement and continuing education programs
Mentorship programs
A range of work-life balance options
... and much more!
Please visit our Benefits page for more information. As an employee of MIT, you can also take advantage of other voluntary benefits, discounts and perks.
Selected candidate will be subject to a pre-employment background investigation and must be able to obtain and maintain a Secret level DoD security clearance.
MIT Lincoln Laboratory is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran status, disability status, or genetic information; U.S. citizenship is required.

Requisition ID: 41544",4.4,MIT Lincoln Laboratory,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1951.0,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,MA,73.0,0,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$184K
/yr","We are the Web and Work Experiences team within M365 Core, focused on creating the best AI Copilot Web and Work Experiences for commercial users. Our team develops engaging, modern chat solutions for information workers and enterprise users, delivering exceptional Web and Work Copilot experiences. To help us reach our goals and collaborate with key partners in design, research, product management, and data science, we are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to shape the future of M365 Copilot.

In this role as a Senior Data Scientist you will have the opportunity to work with teams across Microsoft and globally, developing innovative AI solutions for enterprise users across all commercial platforms within Microsoft. You’ll contribute to components integrated into applications across the Microsoft 365 ecosystem, spanning both desktop and mobile platforms. If you are passionate about building scalable, fault-tolerant services and developing components that are accessible and inclusive of all users, we encourage you to apply for this exciting opportunity!

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
We are seeking a talented and motivated Data Scientist with a strong Data Scientist with a passion for analyzing large scale data to identify insights to grow business and improve user experience. In this role, you will have the opportunity to collaborate with teams across Microsoft, leverage state-of-the-art technology and contribute to exciting products like Copilot.
Build a solid understanding of the business and the metrics that drive performance
Process and analyze big data using Statistical, Machine Learning modeling, to identify opportunities, patterns, pain points in users’ journey and provide insights to the leadership teams to help in driving user experience and product growth.
Research, propose and implement innovative solutions to enhance our tools, processes, and analytics capabilities.
Collaborate with PMs, data scientists, developers and partner teams.
Work with Product teams on roadmap, define KPI, forecast and measure product goals.
Embody our Culture and Values
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
o OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results))
o OR equivalent experience.
2+ years customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Other Requirements:

Ability to meet Microsoft, customer and/or government security screening requirements are required for this role. These requirements include but are not limited to the following specialized security screenings:
Microsoft Cloud Background Check: This position will be required to pass the Microsoft Cloud background check upon hire/transfer and every two years thereafter.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proven experience building and deploying machine learning models in real-world scenarios.
Experience working with both structured and unstructured data.
Excellent problem-solving and critical thinking abilities.
Strong communication skills with the ability to convey complex data concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Self-starter with the ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Continuous learning mindset and a passion for staying updated on the latest industry trends.
Ability to mentor and guide data analysts, providing technical oversight and ensuring best practices.
Solid analytical skills with a track record of solving complex problems.
Knowledge of big data tools such as Hadoop, Spark, or similar.
Experience in Chat bot domain, online service, app, or Web site for millions of users.
Data Science IC4 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $117,200 - $229,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $153,600 - $250,200 per year. Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until November 1, 2024

#M365CORE #MSAI
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,United States,10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,184.0,United States,49.0,0,0,1,1,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$150K
/yr","About Us
Capital Bank N.A. is headquartered in Maryland, and has been serving our communities since 1999. We stand as a publicly traded company (NASDAQ: CBNK) with over $2 billion in assets. We offer commercial and consumer banking services to clients in Maryland, DC, and Northern Virginia, alongside two nation-wide lending brands; Capital Bank Home Loans and OpenSky, a credit card division that offers and services credit cards across all states. Our personalized approach to banking, paired with cutting-edge technology solutions and a comprehensive suite of products and services, fuels our growth, and enables us to support our customers at every stage in their financial journey.

OpenSky, a division of Capital Bank, NA, is an issuer of secured credit cards. We provide an entry-level credit product for consumers with a need to build or establish a credit history. The business is going through a phase of investment and rapid growth. OpenSky is a dynamic and entrepreneurial environment where you are limited only by your imagination. Being a data-driven business, OpenSky is building out a robust analytics team.

Come join a bank where our employees thrive and are engaged in meaningful work. For the last 4 out of 5 years, Capital Bank was named one of the ""Best Banks to Work For"" in the U.S. by American Banker.

Position Purpose
The Senior Data Scientist will build and maintain customer valuation models, as well as analyze and optimize customer acquisition and retention strategies. You will be constantly seeking opportunities to improve response rates, lower acquisition costs, reduce process cycle times and optimize revenue. This role will analyze the strategic landscape to find areas where we should be competing, including financial product offerings, service offerings and technologies.

Position Responsibilities
Build and maintain customer valuation models
Analyze customer segments for targeting purposes
Analyze current customer base for retention programs and cross-sell opportunities
Analyze business intelligence data and provide insights that drive potential new tactics and strategies
Partner across the organization and with external vendors to initiate, prioritize, scope, design and deliver new programs
Minimum Education and Experience
4 to 8 years work experience in an analytical environment
High aptitude for problem solving
Ability to connect analysis to business solutions
Proven analytical and critical thinking skills, with extreme attention to detail
Capacity to prioritize and manage multiple tasks simultaneously without sacrificing quality
Must be an entrepreneurial spirit and thinker, capable of working in a highly fluid, fast-paced environment
Technical Knowledge and Skills
“Data Fluent” with exposure or basic skills in SQL and / or other data tools
Advanced Excel user, including Pivot Tables, Lookups, Formulas, Graphs
Experience in building financial and valuation models
Education
Bachelor’s degree
Working Arrangements
This is a hybrid role expected to work in office Monday, Tuesday, Thursday, and Friday. You will be able to work remotely on Wednesday.
Compensation
Base Salary Range: $120,335 - $180,502 annually. Final determination of where you are at in the salary range is based on numerous factors such as relevant experience, skill set, education, and ability to meet qualifications within the job description.
Additional Compensation: This role will include a yearly annual target bonus based on individual performance.

Why Join Us?
Join a growing company with a culture that fosters an entrepreneurial spirit
Comprehensive benefits package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Company Paid Life Insurance, Disability Insurance, and more!
Company Contributions to your 401k - Regardless of your contribution
Employee Perks: Paid Parental Leave, Employee Recognition Program, Leadership Program, Tuition Reimbursement Program, Employee Bank Checking Account, and much more!
Generous Paid Time Off and Paid Holidays – Including Paid Charity Hours to support volunteer opportunities

Supporting Businesses. Helping People. Strengthening Communities.
Capital Bank, N.A. is an Affirmative Action, E-Verify, and Equal Opportunity Employer.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Capital Bank, N.A.","Rockville, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1999.0,Company - Public,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,150.0,MD,25.0,0,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$101K
/yr","Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,101.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist IV,"$151K
/yr","About the company
Albertsons Companies is at the forefront of the revolution in retail. With a fixation on raising the bar with innovation and building belonging through our culture, our team is rallying our company around a unique purpose : to create joy around each table and inspire a healthier tomorrow for every community.
Albertsons Companies is one of the largest food and drug retailers in the United States, with over 2,200 stores in 34 states and the District of Columbia. Our well-known banners include Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen, Carrs, Kings Food Markets, and Balducci's Food Lovers Market. We support our stores with 22 distribution centers and 19 manufacturing plants.
Placing a premium on adaptability, safety and family well-being, our work model, Presence with a Purpose, offers a hybrid work environment between remote work and office time. A one-size-fits-all approach does not apply to everyone, and teams are empowered to make decisions best for them.
Bring your flavor
Building the future of food and well-being starts with you. Join our team and bring your best self to the table.
#bringyourflavor
#LI-ST4
What you will be doing

The Data Science team at Albertsons Companies is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work for the most transformational food and drug retailers in the United States. Albertsons operates over 2,300 stores under 19 well-known banners including Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen and Carrs. The company reported revenue of over $60 billion from over 34 million weekly shoppers and is the third largest private company in the country.
Data Science at Albertsons is inspired to build best in class customer experience and revolutionize the food and drug retail industry. We are looking for people who are excited in re-imagining the grocery experience by harnessing the power of AI and digital technologies. The Data Science team collects and relies on big data from existing stores and customer interactions at the 2300 nationwide stores and beyond. We are a highly driven team that applies data science to delight our customers, to improve store operations, to optimize supply chain and to proactively improve product lifecycle.
You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into business impacts on regular basis. You will work closely with other data scientists and business partners in identifying and defining data science projects, building machine learning algorithms and models on top of existing data platforms. The candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field with experience working with large data sets and applying data-driven decision making. A successful candidate will be both technically strong and business savvy, with a passion to make an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. You are a self-starter, smart yet humble, with a bias for action.
This position is primarily located in Pleasanton, California, but the candidate can work virtually from anywhere in the US. Our other affiliated teams are located in Phoenix, AZ; Boise, ID; Plano, TX; Vancouver, BC. We can offer additional location options upon request.
Main responsibilities

Collaborate with business teams to develop production grade machine learning models on large-scale datasets and improve customers’ overall shopping experience
Use machine learning to solve real problems, power the next generation experience for large scale applications.
Be a thought partner in the area of Experimentation and drive end to end process in designing and running complex experiments (A/B tests, Pre-Post, Interleaving), proactively see new opportunities.
Develop statistical and machine learning projects in experimentation using a wide variety of methodologies, including causal inference techniques, Bayesian framework
Identify key drivers for customer satisfaction and opportunities to delight customers through mining complex data
Apply machine learning to enhance recommendation engines and deliver personalized user experience on ecommerce website and loyalty mobile app
Build models and algorithms to fuel growth initiatives for Digital, Merchandising, Marketing and Loyalty teams
Apply predictive modeling techniques to optimize the forecasts for planning needs
Scale up prototypes and implement reliable automated production workflow for models
Collaborate with software development engineers to integrate models
The salary range is $131,600 to $171,080 annually. Starting salary will vary based on criteria such as location, experience, and qualifications. There may be flexibility for exceptional candidates.

What we are searching for

Master’s or PhD degree in quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, Math, Statistics or related fields
2+ years of industry experience in applying data science and modeling methodologies: regression model, survival model, ensemble modeling, NLP, recommendation algorithm, clustering, deep learning algorithm, experimental design (Multivariate/A-B testing) and nonparametric Bayesian modeling etc.
2+ years of experience and proficiency in SQL, Python and/or Spark-ML
2+ years of SQL development skills writing queries, transforming data, mining structured and unstructured data.
2+ years of hands-on experience in building data science solutions and production-ready systems on big data platforms such as Snowflake, Spark, Hadoop
Strong teamwork and communication skill
Ability to write production-level code in Python
Experience with Snowflake, Azure Databricks is a strong plus
What is it like at Albertsons?
Our 290,000 associates have a passion for great service and building lasting relationships with our customers. Through a companywide focus on innovation, we are continually enhancing our digital and product offerings, making it easy for customers to get what they need, wherever they are.
Albertsons is an Equal Opportunity Employer
This Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ethnicity, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, or on any other basis prohibited by law. Consistent with applicable state and local law, the Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We endeavor to make this site accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact us at 1-888-255-2269(option #4).",3.4,Albertsons Companies,"Pleasanton, CA",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Grocery Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,151.0,CA,85.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
Our common values and focus on inclusion and respect drive the decisions made by our company, teams and people. This is why we are committed to hiring and building diverse teams representative of the customers we serve globally. When you join our team, you can apply your unique life and job experiences and work in an environment where your ideas are heard, your contributions are celebrated, and your whole-self matters.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
About Cat Financial
Cat Financial is a subsidiary of Caterpillar Inc., the world’s leading manufacturer of construction and mining equipment, off-highway diesel and natural gas engines, industrial gas turbines and diesel-electric locomotives. For more than 40 years, Cat Financial has provided a wide range of financing solutions to customers and Cat® dealers for machines, engines, Solar® gas turbines, genuine Cat parts and services. Headquartered in Nashville, Tennessee, Cat Financial serves customers globally with offices and subsidiaries located throughout North and South America, Asia, Australia, Europe and Africa. Visit cat.com to learn more about Cat Financial.
Role Definition
Performs analytical tasks and initiatives on large datasets to support data-driven business decisions, with focus on modeling of credit risk for loan origination and credit allowance.
Responsibilities
Support the team’s development, implementation and management of scoring, probability of default and loss given default data, models and methodologies utilized for the Allowance Process, as well as for Auto Decisioning processes globally.
Collect and curate data from various systems for use in model development, validation, and inference.
Use various data visualization technologies to produce reports and dashboards for management.
Conduct literature research on models and methodologies, capturing industry best practices and market and regulatory trends
Provide analytics expertise and promote innovation and process automation.
D e g r e e Requirement
A 4-year college or university degree in a business or quantitative discipline, preferably in Data Science, Statistics or Computer Science. A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience and an advanced degree in a quantitative discipline are strongly preferred
S k il l Descriptors
B us i n e s s Statistics: Knowledge of the statistical tools, processes, and practices to describe business results in measurable scales; ability to use statistical tools and processes to assist in making business decisions.
Understands basic statistical concepts such as sample size, various statistical distributions, joint and conditional probabilities, hypothesis testing, and goodness of fit tests.
Works with various statistical software tools.
Explains reasons for common statistical errors, misinterpretations, and misrepresentations.
A cc u racy and Attention to Detail: Understanding the necessity and value of accuracy; ability to complete tasks with high levels of precision.
Evaluates and makes contributions to best practices.
Processes large quantities of detailed information with high levels of accuracy.
Productively balances speed and accuracy.
Implements a variety of cross-checking approaches and mechanisms.
Demonstrates expertise in quality assurance tools, techniques, and standards.
A n a l y t i c a l Thinking: Knowledge of techniques and tools that promote effective analysis; ability to determine the root cause of organizational problems and create alternative solutions that resolve these problems.
Approaches a situation or problem by defining the problem or issue and determining its significance.
Makes a systematic comparison of two or more alternative solutions.
Uses logic and intuition to make inferences about the meaning of the data and arrive at conclusions.
M a c h i n e Learning: Knowledge of principles, technologies and algorithms of machine learning; ability to develop, implement and deliver related systems, products and services.
Completed specific tasks and initiates utilizing machine learning technologies.
Utilizes specific tools and techniques to process descriptive and inferential statistics.
Applies specific computing languages and tools in machine learning, such as R and Python.
Explores to use machine learning to make business improvements.
Conducts data mining and cleaning initiatives.
P rogramming Languages: Knowledge of concepts and capabilities of programming; ability to use tools, techniques and platforms in order to write and modify programming languages.
Works with low-code/no-code tools, e.g. Alteryx, PowerApps, etc.
Participates in the implementation and support of specialized programming languages.
Conducts basic reviews on writing a specific programming language within a specific platform.
Follows an organization's standards, policies and guidelines for structured programming specifications.
Diagnoses and reports minor or routine programming language problems.
Q u e ry and Database Access Tools: Knowledge of data management systems; ability to use, support and access facilities for searching, extracting and formatting data for further use.
Defines, creates and tests queries by using associated command language in a specific environment.
Applies appropriate query tools used to connect to the data warehouse.
Obtains and analyzes query results.
Employs tested query statements to retrieve, insert, update and delete information.
Works with advanced features and functions.
#LI-Hybrid
Relocation is available for this position.Visa Sponsorship is not available for this position. This employer is not currently hiring foreign national applicants that require or will require sponsorship tied to a specific employer, such as, H, L, TN, F, J, E, O. As a global company, Caterpillar offers many job opportunities outside of the U.S which can be found through our employment website at www.caterpillar.com/careers.
Posting Dates:
October 15, 2024 - October 22, 2024
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Nashville, TN",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,TN,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$209K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 12, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200571863

Would you like a chance to be part of a diverse team driving product impact using meticulous measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to create innovative technologies, methodologies, and research to enable amazing user experiences and advance the frontier of machine learning. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product and methodology evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with various engineering teams to improve product quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Use data from multiple types of sources including human annotation data. Build and prototype analysis pipelines and visualizations iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products using rigorous and innovative ways with the data at hand. You are determined to making and sharing impactful work through methodological development and articulate and persuasive communication.
Experience in data science, machine learning, and analytics, including statistical data analysis and A/B testing.
Using Foundation Models for data science: prompt engineering and fine-tune foundational models for specific tasks.
Strong communication skills and the ability to naturally explain difficult technical topics to everyone from data scientists to engineers to business partners.
Strong programming skills, including data-querying skills (SQL) and experience with Python scripting language for data processing and development. Be able to translate ideas/methods into code and dashboards without hesitation.
M.S in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Operations Research or related areas.

Preferred Qualifications
Ph.D. in machine learning, computer science, statistics, operations research or related areas.
Experience with large language models, leveraging LLM for evaluation and product improvement.
Worked in areas intersecting Responsible AI and Generative AI
Worked with methods that account for variability in human annotation data
Some comfort in the use of JavaScript frameworks to design UI mock ups.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $166,600 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,209.0,WA,48.0,1,0,0,0,0
Health Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) has an immediate need for a ealth Data Scientist t provide mid-level support related to the surveillance of arboviral diseases for our government customer located in Fot Collins, Colorado. o
tion may include periodic travel and need for flexible work schedule to accommodate alternate time zones. DE
IPTION OF RESPONSIBILITIES: Pro
mid-level support related to the surveillance of arboviral diseases. Support
e Surveillance and Epidemiology Team Lead (or designee). Data mana
ent of ADB surveillance system. Ensure that
propriate state partners maintain access to the surveillance system. Perform routi
data downloads to the central database. Run SAS program
identify any abnormal findings in the data (e.g., clinical symptoms do not match reported clinical syndrome; arbovirus in new area not previously documented, pregnant male, etc.). Will communicate with appropriate partner at state health department to resolve and/or investigate issues. Generate surveill
e reports using data management and visualization software. Generate routine re
ts during the transmission season using statistical data and visualization tools such as SAS, R, MS Excel, ArcGIS, and Tableau. Analyses are primarily descriptive. Surveillance reports
include: 1) PDF reports are emailed to all state partners and state epidemiologists; 2) updating CDC websites and dashboards with preliminary and final year data; and 3) internal surveillance data reports used for presentations and publications. Responding to internal
external surveillance data requests. Reconciling surveillance
a with state and local health partners. Participate in regular conf
nce calls; provide subject matter expertise related to the ArboNET surveillance system; confirmation of message transmissions; run diagnostics to confirm that messages are correctly transmitted; help jurisdictions and other CDC staff troubleshoot when problems are identified. Participating in meetings and
nference calls by preparing and presenting data and data and answering technical questions. Support public health response
research activities related to viral vector-borne pathogens and related diseases. CDC Emergency Response: Support p
ic health emergency response, including remote and field- based deployments to assist with responding to pandemics and other emerging threats. Provide administrative and logistical support for CDC Emergency Operations Center activities. This may occur through Incident Management Structure teams or direct support to state and local health departments. Will be expected to maintain high d
quality standards and will be responsible for maintaining standard operational procedures for all data management activities. Will work closely with SET staff and
ormatics staff to address technical issues related to reporting and assist with activities related to CDC’s ongoing efforts to strengthen and modernize the national disease surveillance system. REQUIRED DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATI
Must have a Bachelors in Biologics, Mi
ology, or related discipline. Preferred a MS in Statistics, Applied Anal
cs, Data Science, Business Analytics REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE: Strong SA
kills/experience - writing SAS
and debugging SAS code. Experience with large data sets; experience spe
ically with public health surveillance data a plus. DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE: Strong data visu
zatn skills desired. Competent
ing with Tableau or PowerBI a major plus. REQUIRED CITIZENSHIP AND CLEARANCE: Must be a US Citi
. Must be able to pass a NACI backg
check. The Alaka`ia
ndation Family of Companies (FOCs) is a fast-
owing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries. Eligible full-time employees enjoy a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 11 paid holidays. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We ar
roud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees. The Ak`ina oundation Family of Companies (FOCs) is comprised of
dustry-recognized government service firms designated as Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO)-owned and 8(a) certified businesses. The Family of Companies (FOCs) includes Ke`aki Technologies, Laulima Government Solutions, Kūpono Government Services, and Kāpili Services, Po`okela Solutions, Kīkaha Solutions, LLC, and Pololei Solutions, LLC. Alaka`ina Foundation activities principally benefit the youth of Hawaii through charitable efforts which includes providing innovative educational programs that combine leadership, science & technology, and environmental stewardship. For additional information, please visit www.alakainafoundation.com",3.8,Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies,"Fort Collins, CO",1001 to 5000 Employees,,Government,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,113.0,CO,,0,0,0,0,1
Advanced Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Advance Data Scientist
Advance Data Scientist for Honeywell International, Inc. in Atlanta, GA

Responsibilities:
Develop data modeling, mining, pattern analysis, data visualization and machine learning solutions to address customer needs.
Provide technical leadership by guiding the team to drive optimization and efficiency across scalable solutions.
Foster relationships with business team members by being proactive, displaying a thorough understanding of the business processes and by recommending innovative solutions.
Communicate project output in terms of customer value, business objectives, and product opportunity.
Promote data science methods and processes across functions.
Work with our businesses and infrastructure teams to develop a strategy that will clearly outline how our enterprise platforms can enable business growth & productivity.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Location: Atlanta, GA
40 hours/week
Employee Referral Fee: $1500
If offered employment must have legal right to work in U.S. EOE.
YOU MUST HAVE:
Qualified applicants must have a Master’s degree or foreign equivalent in Computer Science, Information Science, Operation Research, Engineering, Mathemetics, Statistics, or a related field, and over 2 years of experience in Data Science. Full term of experience must include: Data Science and Analytics; Machine learning engineering, Microsoft Azure; Databricks; Natural Language Processing (NLP); and coding in Python, Jupyter Notebooks. Telecommuting permitted up to two (2) times per week.
Additional Information
JOB ID: req467879
Category: Engineering
Location: 715 Peachtree Street, N.E.,Atlanta,Georgia,30308,United States
Exempt
Honeywell is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, religion, or veteran status.",4.0,Honeywell,"Atlanta, GA",10000+ Employees,1885.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,123.0,GA,139.0,1,0,0,0,0
Sr. Data Analyst,"$108K
/yr","Take a leap and join our team!
At Gesa, we believe in the power of our people. Coming from all walks of life, our team members individual stories and unique experiences are our most valuable asset. But its how we come together, igniting our collective compassion and commitment to empowering our communities, that makes us succeed. Because we know we go further when we go together.
Here you can join a team who is passionate about serving others, has a desire to do good, and shares a deep love of people. You can engage in meaningful work that impacts your community. You can challenge yourself and grow in your career. And, you can rest assured that your wellbeing and prosperity are our priority.
Get to know us:About - Gesa Credit Union
Role Summary:
Under the general supervision of the Data Integrity & Business Intelligence Manager/Team Leader, a Senior Data Analyst is responsible for supporting the business intelligence and data governance needs of the Credit Union. Primary duties shall include the maintenance and validation of the Credit Unions data governance system, development of business intelligence tools, and creation of business intelligence reporting to meet the needs of stakeholders within the Credit Union to further their ability to make quality, data driven decisions. As a member of the Risk and Performance Team, a Senior Data Analyst will be an integral part of the ongoing strategic planning and monitoring process for the Credit Union.
What You Will Be Doing:
Act as a team lead within the Risk and Performance Department. Represent Risk and Performance in projects and committees as assigned.
Lead the development, maintenance, and support of accurate analytical models, Business Intelligence/reporting systems, and data warehouse solutions to meet the business intelligence needs of the Credit Union and its stakeholders.
Work with internal stakeholders to identify new reporting, dash boarding, and analytical opportunities in furtherance of the Credit Unions business and strategic goals. Lead the implementation of identified opportunities and work with stakeholders to drive adoption.
Support the ongoing validation and maintenance of the Credit Unions data sources in support of the Credit Unions data governance framework.
Design, develop, and maintain the Credit Unions Data Warehouse and other databases in furtherance of the business intelligence goals of the Credit Union.
Assist with various data validation, balancing, and business intelligence projects.
Develop and maintain business intelligence systems and capabilities that support the needs of a diverse group of Credit Union stakeholders. Lead the training of stakeholders throughout the organization on the Credit Unions business intelligence systems.
Monitor indicators of performance and quality metrics and ensure compliance with data related policies, standards, roles and responsibilities, and adoption requirements. Provide suggestions for improved performance and adherence when appropriate.
Lead evaluations of the Credit Unions quality control systems and report findings along with recommendations for improvements as needed.
Lead the training of new team members within the Credit Unions Business Intelligence team with a focus on the tools and methods utilized by the team to accomplish their essential job functions.
Develop and maintain an expert level of knowledge regarding the Credit Unions core operating systems, data warehouse solutions, and business intelligence systems and software solutions.
Identify and troubleshoot data-related problems and make maintenance or modification suggestions.
Assist with the Credit Unions annual budgeting and forecasting processes along with other major Risk & Performance Team initiatives as assigned.
Must understand and perform Bank Secrecy Act (BSA) functions as applicable to job responsibilities.
Attend Credit Union training sessions, conferences, or seminars as approved by Management.Maintain awareness of policies and regulations related to duties and responsibilities.
Maintain and protect all sensitive data utilizing the highest standard of confidentiality and professionalism. Consistently display respect for all areas of diversity and levels of knowledge.
Display mutual respect, trust and dignity. Act in the best interest of the Credit Union; lead by example by displaying solid ethics and integrity at all times. Control risk and manage duties and tasks in a safe and sound manner.
Maintain a general knowledge of all Credit Union products and services, as well as the activities of departments.
About You:
Ability to maintain thorough knowledge of Credit Union business lines, processes, and products.
Strong analytical, quantitative, and modeling skills.
Ability to quickly grasp and adapt to changes in business models and new technologies.
Strong knowledge of relational databases, data mining techniques, and business intelligence tools.
Ability to write complex queries using tools such as SQL for reporting, analytics, and business intelligence.
Excellent interpersonal and listening skills.
Demonstrate commitment to continual process improvement.
Ability to work jointly and successfully in a team environment.
Able to successfully and professionally communicate both orally and in writing.
Able to prioritize tasks and projects with varying deadlines and priorities.
What You Will Need:
Four-year degree in Mathematics, Economics, Accounting, Finance, Data Analysis, Statistics; or equivalent training, coursework, and experience.
A minimum of eight years of similar or related experience; financial institution environment experience preferred.
High level of proficiency with business intelligence tools and large-scale data management.
Ability to interpret, validate, and balance large amounts of financial data with relative ease.
Proficient with standard office equipment, word processing and reporting.
Our Team Member Value Proposition:
In exchange for bringing your talent to Gesa, here are a just a few of the benefits and perks we offer:
Competitive Pay
Medical, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
20 days/year of Paid Time Off Plus 10 Paid Holidays!
401(k) Match
Incentive Program
Tuition Assistance and Student Loan Repayment
Commuter Benefits
Paid Time Off to Volunteer in the Community
Product discounts
Engaging Work Environment
Rewards and Recognition Programs
Salary Range:
$86,586.54 - $129,879.81
Get wise to whats possible with a career at Gesa. Join us!
We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact the HR Department at (509) 378-3100 or hrmail@gesa.com to request an accommodation.
Gesa Credit Union reserves the right to revise or change the job description as the need arises. This job description is not all inclusive of total job responsibilities nor does it constitute a written or implied contract of employment.
Selected candidate(s) must be able to pass a pre-employment credit/background check.
Gesa Credit Union is an Equal Opportunity Employer and strong advocate of workforce diversity. Race/Color/Gender/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Religion/National Origin/Disability/Veteran.
Equal Employment Opportunity (gesa.com)",4.7,Gesa Credit Union,"Richland, WA",501 to 1000 Employees,1953.0,Nonprofit Organization,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,108.0,WA,71.0,0,0,0,0,1
Homeless & Community Development Data & Research Scientist,"$110K
/yr","Description:
The Cloudburst Group is a unique small business working at the intersection of domestic and international development to strengthen government programs that benefit low-income and vulnerable populations.
As part of its compensation package, The Cloudburst Group offers a robust benefits program to full-time, part-time, and intermittent employees based on their eligibility, which includes paid time off, health insurance, life insurance, retirement savings, flexible spending accounts, and voluntary supplemental benefits.
The expected compensation range for this position is: $100,000 to $120,000, yearly
The Cloudburst Group is seeking a Senior Data and Research Scientist to join its Homeless Assistance Team and support other domestic research projects. Cloudburst has a growing portfolio of data analysis, research, and evaluation projects with state, local, and federal government clients, including funding from HUD’s Office of Special Needs Assistance Programs to support local communities to effectively use data to drive strategic decision-making.
We’re looking for someone to provide leadership in the execution of current projects, liaise with clients to scope and manage work, and drive strategic growth through organic and new business development. Cloudburst is looking for someone who:
Is passionate about finding solutions to homelessness and reducing disparities in housing outcomes.
Is grounded in the data, evidence, and research on solutions to prevent and end homelessness.
Is a collaborative problem solver and analytic thinker with experience harnessing the power of data and/or evaluation to measure program effectiveness.
Homelessness disproportionately impacts Black, Indigenous, and People of Color as a result of structural and institutional racism. Cloudburst believes that effective solutions to homelessness are created with communities historically impacted by the systems we are attempting to transform. We strongly encourage applications from people who are representative of the culturally and ethnically diverse communities we work with, as well as from those with lived experience of homelessness.
RESPONSIBILITIES
This position will lead a variety of data analysis, evaluation, and applied research projects. It will require flexibility, self-motivation, and the willingness to work and collaborate in remote settings.
Specific responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Designing data-driven improvement strategies for homeless continuums of care (CoCs), leveraging community Homeless Management Information System (HMIS) and other data to help guide community planning
Assisting in collecting, managing, and analyzing data from homelessness or other social service programs for a variety of research and evaluation projects.
Supporting research and other initiatives on issues of concern to Cloudburst at the intersection of housing, homelessness, gender-based violence, disaster resilience and response, community, and economic development that center persons with lived experience.
Designing collaborative research, theories of change, and key research questions to address client’s needs; including presenting results and findings in easy-to-understand presentations with actionable recommendations.
Providing leadership, coaching, staff, and contractor supervision as well as quality assurance oversight of projects.
Establishing and maintaining positive client relationships that foster organic growth and inform new business pursuits.
Identifying strategic growth opportunities and contributing to new business pursuits, especially in the areas of program evaluation.
Requirements:
Master's degree or higher (PhD preferred) in a related field and a minimum of 15 years of relevant work experience, or significant life experience in the field of homelessness or housing.
Experience with impact and performance evaluations; data collection and analysis, including both qualitative and quantitative research. Academic experience is acceptable, on-the-job experience is preferred.
Proficiency with Excel (e.g., pivot tables, VLOOKUP) and GIS analysis is required. Experience with NVIVO, Stata, or other data analysis software is preferred.
Strong writing and analysis skills.
Familiarity with Google G-Suite products.
Experience with data visualization software (e.g., PowerBI) is preferred.
Knowledge of HUD homelessness programs and Homeless Management Information Systems is preferred.
COMPANY INFORMATION
The Cloudburst Group (Cloudburst) is a mission-driven Women-Owned Small Business whose staff strives to create impact, empower communities, and build resiliency. Cloudburst works at the intersection of domestic and international development with the goal of improving the effectiveness of programs and investments targeted to build social, economic, and environmental resilience in the U.S. and abroad.
Cloudburst’s work is guided by a mission to improve economic, social, and environmental resilience. To this end, many of the populations and communities we work with focus on addressing structural and institutional racism that disproportionately impacts Black, Indigenous, and other people of color. Cloudburst believes that effective services and solutions are created with communities historically impacted by the systems we are attempting to transform. We strongly encourage applications from people who are representative of the culturally and ethnically diverse communities we work with.
The Cloudburst Group is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. Cloudburst will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.",4.3,The Cloudburst Group,Maryland,Unknown,,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,110.0,Maryland,,0,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Analytics & Data","$138K
/yr","About the Team:
At Williams Sonoma, our brand promise is to nourish people's lives. This mission inspires us, informs our strategy, and makes us special. You will engage our customers as part of the Marketing Strategy, Data Science, & Analytics team through insights, analysis, data reporting, modeling, machine learning and AI development. Our team ensures that we are engaging with our customers at the right time and in the right place by always measuring and improving upon our success. You will love working with incredible marketers and strategists across the company.
About the Role:
This role works closely with the other senior data scientists on the team to enhance our products, develop new tools, and create actionable recommendations. You will also collaborate with cross-functional teams in an omnichannel marketing organization and be exposed to various technology stacks (MarTech, AdTech, FinTech, etc.). The day-to-day work will include data modeling, developing machine learning/AI algorithms, data mining, analysis and presentation of your work to the team(s). This role requires an individual to have a healthy amount of intellectual curiosity, creativity, and an innovative mindset.
You're excited about this opportunity because you will…
Take ownership of data models, datasets, manage data integrity, preparation, cleansing, and final delivery of your work for senior leadership
Own data quality assurance and management protocols/processes
Develop ML/AI applications, maintain dashboards, documentation, and reporting
Stay updated with current ML/AI trends to improve and advance existing processes with more automation
Support production models and enrich existing ML/AI framework to improve performance accuracy and reduce costs of ML/AI systems
Test, learn, and run machine learning/AI experiments comparing different techniques and algorithms
Scale and automate analyses for marketing across 8 brands
Support adhoc and recurring requests for multiple cross-functional teams
We're excited about you because you have...
Bachelors’ Degree or higher education in Applied ML/AI, Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Analytics, Economics, or related technical field
Excel, SQL, R, Python Required; Other programming/scripting languages a plus
3+ years of professional experience or equivalent academic course work in Machine Learning/AI, statistical modeling, data analytics, market research, or other data centric role
Understanding, knowledge, and experience or equivalent academic work in Long Short Term Memory with Attention (LSTM-a), Markov Chain Monte Carlo (MCMC) algorithms, Deep Learning Neural Network, Prophet/NeuralProphet, Regression (Bayesian, SARIMA, ARIMA), A/B testing, and other methodologies or algorithms
Proficient using Databricks, TensorFlow, Keras, Jupyter Notebook, Ubuntu and/or other data science tools
Experience with Marketing Mix Modeling and/or Multi-Touch Attribution a huge plus
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills are a must
Strong attention to details and problem-solving abilities
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
About Williams-Sonoma, Inc.:
Founded in 1956, Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is the premier specialty retailer of high-quality products for the kitchen and home in the United States. Our family of brands are Williams-Sonoma, Pottery Barn, Pottery Barn Kids, PBteen, West Elm, Williams-Sonoma Home, Rejuvenation, and Mark and Graham. These brands are among the best known and most respected in the industry. We offer beautifully designed, stylish and functional products for every area of the home, including the kitchen, living room, bedroom, home office, closet, laundry room and even outdoor spaces. We've seen some big changes since our first brick-and-mortar store opened more than half of a century ago. What hasn't changed is our passion for high-quality products, functional design, outstanding customer service, and enhancing the lives of our customers and the communities where we operate. Today, we're a multi-brand, multi-channel, global enterprise supported by state-of-the-art technology and some of the most talented teams in retailing - and we're always looking for new energy and ideas.
WSI will not now or in the future commence an immigration case or ""sponsor"" an individual for this position (for example, H-1B or other employment-based immigration. This role is not eligible for relocation assistance.
Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Williams-Sonoma, Inc. will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, or other applicable state or local laws and ordinances.
The expected starting pay range for this position is $130,000 - $145,000 annually. Applicable pay ranges may differ across markets. Actual pay will be determined based on experience and other job-related factors permitted by law. In addition to competitive pay, compensation may include a variety of other components like benefits, paid time off, merit, and bonus opportunities.

Our Company

Founded in 1956, Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is the premier specialty retailer of high-quality products for the kitchen and home in the United States. Our family of brands are Williams Sonoma, Williams Sonoma Home, Pottery Barn, Pottery Barn teen, pottery barn kids, Rejuvenation, Mark & Graham, west elm, or Outward. These brands are among the best known and most respected in the industry. We offer beautifully-designed, stylish and functional products for every area of the home, including the kitchen, living room, bedroom, home office, closet, laundry room and even outdoor spaces. We've seen some big changes since our first brick-and-mortar store opened more than half of a century ago. What hasn't changed is our passion for high-quality products, functional design, outstanding customer service, and enhancing the lives of our customers and the communities where we operate. Today, we're a multi-brand, multi-channel, global enterprise supported by state-of-the-art technology and some of the most talented teams in retailing - and we're always looking for new energy and ideas.",3.3,Williams Sonoma,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,1956.0,Company - Public,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail & Wholesale,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,138.0,CA,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Purpose:
The successful candidate will be based in our Austin, TX facility and will support numerous research & development and test & evaluation projects related to defense, forensics, and national security. The candidate will be based in our Austin, TX headquarters within the Quality Assurance & Data Science Business Area. The candidate must be motivated to contribute in a team environment, collaborate across multiple scientific and technical disciplines, and be excited to develop new skills. The candidate must have the flexibility to balance multiple on-going tasks while operating efficiently with minimal supervision. As needed, the candidate should be able to direct others to accomplish project tasks. The candidate must be detail oriented and be able to appropriately document their work. Job functions will include performing data analytics and statistical analyses, training and optimizing machine learning and predictive models, generating visualizations, and developing automated data processing pipelines on chemical, biological, radio frequency (RF), visual (imagery), and text-based data.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities:
Performs data analytics, specifically data clean-up, data processing, machine learning modeling, statistical analysis, multivariate data analysis, and/or data visualization, as related to scientific data.
Applies technical skills to plan and execute assigned project work including development of data pre-processing routines, data summarizations, data visualizations and plotting, development and application of machine learning and artificial intelligence models, development of detection algorithms, and development and deployment automated processing pipelines.
Maintains operational capabilities of computational assets as needed by project requirements.
Leads meetings with company clients by preparing and presenting materials in meetings.
Appropriately annotates developed computer code/scripts with comments and through user guides/manuals.
Performs maintenance and updates of scripts/code for routine data analysis.
Presents technical results through the drafting of technical reports and presentation materials.
Presents experimental results and recommended actions at internal project meetings.
Supports business development efforts as needed by drafting technical sections of proposals, providing proposal review, assessing levels of effort required to complete proposed work, and brainstorming technical solutions to client problems.
Other duties as assigned.
Performance of all job duties is intended to be completed under limited direct supervision of their supervisor.

Required Knowledge,Skills,& Abilities:
Required
Proficiency in performing data analytics, predictive analytics, machine learning, multivariate data analysis, and data mining as it relates to scientific data
Software programming/scripting proficiency in R, Python, Java, and/or MATLAB
Experience and proficiency with Microsoft Excel, Word, and Powerpoint
Strong analytical, organizational, and problem-solving abilities are required
Ability to lead group of co-workers in execution of a task
Working knowledge of statistics, experimental error, and quantification as it applies to scientific data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to communicate technical information to non-technical audiences
Competent in using Linux/Unix operating system command line interface
Ability to work independently and to interact effectively with individuals on multi-disciplinary teams
Team player with a positive attitude

Preferred
Experience in analytical chemistry or biochemistry including chromatography, mass spectrometry, spectroscopy, hyperspectral imaging, proteomics, metabolomics, RF signal processing, genomics, or other biochemical analysis methods
Experience in developing proteomics or metabolomics data analysis pipelines
Experience with NextFlow, SnakeMake, or similar workflow/pipeline management systems
Experience in developing natural language processing (NLP) and/or machine vision models
Previous research and development experience related to chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, and/or explosive (CBRNE) threats
Working knowledge of good software development practices such as version control systems (e.g., Git) and Agile development (e.g., workflows, sprints)
Ability to develop and query relational databases (MySQL or similar)
Familiarity with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Google Cloud Platform, or Microsoft Azure cloud computing
Ability to think creatively, demonstrate curiosity, and lead research teams
Sufficient business knowledge to support marketing, and bids and proposal efforts

Education/Experience:
Successful candidate must have a Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Chemistry, Biochemistry, Biology, or a related scientific discipline with at least 3-5 years of professional experience; or a Ph.D. or Master's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Chemistry, Biochemistry, Biology, or a related scientific discipline. Successful candidate must have significant experience in software programming/scripting for scientific data analysis and machine learning modeling.

Clearance:
Candidate must be willing to seek and maintain government security clearance at the SECRET level following hire. Candidates with current DoD SECRET or other clearance will be given preference.

Working Conditions/Equipment:
Ability to sit for long periods of time at desk/computer.",3.5,"Signature Science, LLC","Austin, TX",51 to 200 Employees,,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,105.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,1
"Data Scientist, Stanford Law School","$69K
/yr","ONE-YEAR FIXED TERM POSITION
JOB PURPOSE:
The Deborah L. Rhode Center on the Legal Profession at Stanford Law School is looking for a Data Scientist to work across our research programs. This role will collaborate closely with teams of research fellows and students on projects the civil court system, access to justice, and transparency in state and federal courts. Under the direction of Rhode Center associated faculty and research affiliates, the role manage and analyze data critical to the Center’s data-science research agenda focused on expanding access to justice and transparency in U.S. Courts. This position will report to Professor David Engstrom.
CORE DUTIES*:
In collaboration and under the direction of Rhode Center research team members, lead the Center’s ongoing efforts to collect, manage, and structure large datasets from public sources.
Use cutting-edge natural language processing and machine learning tools to label high volumes of unstructured data and prepare for empirical analysis.
Conceptualize suitable empirical methodologies and models.
Develop algorithms to convert PDFs to analyzable data at scale. Conduct statistical analyses of complex datasets and interpretation of results.
Contribute original writing explaining data sources, analyses, and interpretation.
Where appropriate, have the opportunity to receive co-authorship on research papers.
Use reports and analyses to identify conflicting interpretations, make corrections/suggest solutions and determine root cause for data problems.
Collaborate with faculty and research staff on data collection and analysis methods.
Provide documentation based on audit and reporting criteria to faculty and research staff.
Communicate with government officials, grant agencies and industry representatives.
- Other duties may also be assigned
Education & Experience:
Bachelor's degree or a combination of education and relevant experience. Experience in a quantitative discipline (e.g., computer science, data science, statistics, engineering, mathematics, economics, or a related field).
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Substantial experience with MS Office and analytical programs.
Strong writing and analytical skills.
Ability to prioritize workload.
Programming experience in Python, R, SQL, and/or other languages
Prior experience working with large datasets on remote servers or cloud services is preferred
Prior experience working with machine learning, especially involving classifiers, is preferred
Outstanding academic credentials and intellectual creativity
Eagerness to take initiative and solve intricate problems
Excellent time-management skills and ability to work effectively with minimal supervision
Exceptional research, analytical writing, and communication skills
Prior research experience and coursework in the empirical social sciences is preferred, but not required
- Consistent with its obligations under the law, the University will provide reasonable accommodation to any employee with a disability who requires accommodation to perform the essential functions of the job.
WORK STANDARDS:
Interpersonal Skills: Demonstrates the ability to work well with Stanford colleagues and clients and with external organizations.
Promote Culture of Safety: Demonstrates commitment to personal responsibility and value for safety; communicates safety concerns; uses and promotes safe behaviors based on training and lessons learned.
The expected pay range for this position is $82,468 to $106,256 per annum (Stanford Region).
The expected pay range for this position is $54,763 to $83,636 per annum (Remote Region).
Stanford University provides pay ranges representing its good faith estimate of what the university reasonably expects to pay for a position. The pay offered to a selected candidate will be determined based on factors such as (but not limited to) the scope and responsibilities of the position, the qualifications of the selected candidate, departmental budget availability, internal equity, geographic location and external market pay for comparable jobs.
At Stanford University, base pay represents only one aspect of the comprehensive rewards package. The Cardinal at Work website (https://cardinalatwork.stanford.edu/benefits-rewards) provides detailed information on Stanford’s extensive range of benefits and rewards offered to employees. Specifics about the rewards package for this position may be discussed during the hiring process.
Stanford is an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
The job duties listed are typical examples of work performed by positions in this job classification and are not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, tasks, and responsibilities. Specific duties and responsibilities may vary depending on department or program needs without changing the general nature and scope of the job or level of responsibility. Employees may also perform other duties as assigned.
Stanford Law School seeks to hire the best talent and to promote a safe and secure environment for all members of the university community and its property. To that end, new staff hires must successfully pass a background check prior to starting work at Stanford University.",4.3,Stanford University,"Stanford, CA",10000+ Employees,1891.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,69.0,CA,133.0,1,0,0,0,1
IS Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Description
Overview
Identifies and integrates new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities, and work closely with the engineering team in the development of data products. Drives business results through data-based insights by leveraging variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations.
The successful applicant will work within a commutable radius of our Voorhees, NJ and report to the office on a hybrid basis (monthly, as needed). The annual salary range for this position is based on location with an annual discretionary incentive opportunity targeting up to 20% of salary.
Voorhees, NJ - $130,000 - $140,000
Philadelphia, PA - $130,000 - $140,000
New York City, NY - $145,000 - $155,000
Piscataway, NJ - $135,000 - $145,000
Named one of the 50 best non-profits to work for by the Non-Profit Times, our employees enjoy rewarding careers in a fast-paced, results-driven environment. We offer a competitive compensation package, including incentives. Eligible employees also participate in a comprehensive benefits program that includes medical, dental, orthodontia, vision coverage, student loan repayment, 403(b) retirement plan with substantial company match, discounted pet insurance, and generous paid-time-off benefits.
Responsibilities
Execute analytical experiments to help solve problems across various domains and divisions.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for business needs, collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables. Clean and transform data to eliminate irrelevant, incomplete, or inaccurate information.
Analyze raw data to identify patterns, trends, and insights. Develop statistical and predictive models to run against the data sets. Correlate similar data to find actionable results.
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes as well as to make predictions or automate decision-making.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes, analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Create data-driven products and features that can be incorporated into business processes and workflows.
Communicate findings and insights to stakeholders, providing recommendations on business strategies, and aiding in data-driven decision-making by creating data visualizations, dashboards and reports.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including engineering, IT, and business units, to understand needs and devise possible solutions.
Ensure data quality and integrity. Uphold privacy and data protection standards, considering ethical implications of data usage.
Stay updated with the latest technology trends, learning about new tools and technologies, and developing new skills. Research new techniques and best practices within the field of data science.
Demonstrates regular, reliable, and predictable job attendance.
Attends on-site and in-person meetings and training sessions.
Qualifications

Education & Experience: Master’s, PHD, or Bachelor’s Degree required in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field; and 7 or more years of professional experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, Proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis. Advanced experience in pattern recognition and predictive modeling; or an equivalent combination of education and work experience.
Communications Abilities: (Verbal) Expresses oneself clearly in conversations and interactions with others; tailors speech to the level and experience of the audience; uses appropriate grammar and choice of words; expresses ideas in a concise, organized manner; maintains eye contact when speaking with others; (Written) Expresses oneself clearly and concisely in writing; tailors written communications to effectively reach an audience; uses graphics and other aids to clarify complex or technical information; spells correctly; writes using concrete, specific language; uses punctuation correctly; writes grammatically.
Mathematical Skills: Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals; ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs; ability to understand and interpret statistical reports, data charts and graphs.
Technology Skills: Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc. Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc. Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc. Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using Tableau. Experience with machine learning and AI.
The American Arbitration Association is an equal opportunity employer (EEO) and considers all employees and applicants for positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, marital status, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.9,American Arbitration Association Inc.,"New York, NY",501 to 1000 Employees,1926.0,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,135.0,NY,98.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$208K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
A minimum of 6 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 4 years with a Ph.D.)
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$173,000/year to $242,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,208.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","In a world of possibilities, pursue one with endless opportunities. Imagine Next!
When it comes to what you want in your career, if you can imagine it, you can do it at Parsons. Imagine a career working with intelligent, diverse people sharing a common quest. Imagine a workplace where you can be yourself. Where you can thrive. Where you can find your next, right now. We’ve got what you’re looking for.
Job Description:
Parsons is looking for an amazingly talented Data Scientist to join our team! In this role you will be collaborating with headquarters and local customers to develop analytic capabilities. You will be a critical member on a small team, responsible for bringing your high-level analytic and data science skills to bear on a critical national security mission.
What You'll Be Doing:
Evaluate statistical models and other AI/ML products to determine the validity of analyses, implement evaluated models into production by collaborating with software developers, periodically re-evaluate and refine machine learning models being used in production
Perform/use statistics, machine learning and analytic approaches to answer key intelligence questions, producing results and re-usable products that provide real value to USCYBERCOM.
Apply machine learning techniques to identify and transform data features, find hidden patterns and trends, build and optimize classifiers, create automated anomaly detection systems, and automate steps of a process
Curate and collect the data from a variety of traditional and non-traditional sources: extract data from sources, transform and integrate data in line with existing data, and load data into data stores for access by others
Collaborate with other Data Scientists and other customer organizations to develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Effectively communicate ideas, design, and results to key decision makers, and other stakeholders
Develop and implement a configuration management plans for data sets and analyses to ensure thorough documentation of all processes, models, and activities
Research latest data science, AI tradecraft and technology
What Required Skills You'll Bring:
TS/SCI w/ Polygraph
Python or other relevant programming language
Minimum 5 years of experience with data science, AI, and/or analytics
Bachelor's Degree (or higher) in related field

What Desired Skills You'll Bring:
Deep understanding of the customer mission and established relationships that would enable effective cross-functional collaboration
Experience working with customer data
Experience with data extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) processes within cloud-based environments (AWS, Azure)
Minimum Clearance Required to Start:
Top Secret SCI w/Polygraph
This position is part of our Federal Solutions team.
Our Federal Solutions segment delivers resources to our US government customers that ensure the success of missions around the globe. Our diverse, intelligent employees drive the state of the art as they provide services and solutions in the areas of defense, security, intelligence, infrastructure, and environmental. We promote a culture of excellence and close-knit teams that take pride in delivering, protecting, and sustaining our nation's most critical assets, from Earth to cyberspace. Throughout the company, our people are anticipating what’s next to deliver the solutions our customers need now.
Salary Range:
$117,000.00 - $210,600.00
We value our employees and want our employees to take care of their overall wellbeing, which is why we offer best-in-class benefits such as medical, dental, vision, paid time off, 401(k), life insurance, flexible work schedules, and holidays to fit your busy lifestyle!
Parsons is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity, equity, inclusion, and accessibility in the workplace. Diversity is ingrained in who we are, how we do business, and is one of our company’s core values. Parsons equally employs representation at all job levels for minority, female, disabled, protected veteran and LGBTQ+.
We truly invest and care about our employee’s wellbeing and provide endless growth opportunities as the sky is the limit, so aim for the stars! Imagine next and join the Parsons quest—APPLY TODAY!",4.0,Parsons,Maryland,10000+ Employees,1944.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,164.0,Maryland,80.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$175K
/yr","Company Description

ATPCO is the foundation of flight shopping, providing pricing and retailing data, tools, and services to 500+ airlines, global distribution systems, sales channels, and technology companies. In addition, ATPCO links the entire airline community together, collaborating to develop industry standards for airline distribution and end-to-end technology solutions. As a result, ATPCO solutions work seamlessly across existing, new, and evolving technologies and methods from shopping to settlement. Airline-owned and reliably supporting air travel for more than 55 years, ATPCO is everywhere people buy flights.
We consider qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, gender, age, color, religion, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, disability, sexual orientation, protected military/veteran status, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, or any other legally protected factor.

Job Description

The Research Data Scientist will drive understanding, evaluation, and adoption of AI innovations relevant to ATPCO's data products and solutions. This role will provide strategic guidance, research, and domain expertise to shape ATPCO's AI strategy and airline industry engagement.
Responsibilities
Advise product teams on the models and tools our airline customers' will need to power their AI-driven dynamic offer creation, including airfare, pricing, ancillary pricing, and product selection.
Provide data science leadership in product-led engagements with airlines and tech vendors to identify customers’ problems that can be solved by models trained on ATPCO data
Lead in evaluation and design of potential AI-based ATPCO products, including around customer segmentation and impacts of external shocks (e.g., political, environmental, economic) on airline offer creation
Advise data engineers on AI tools to create efficiency in data ingestion and synthetic data creation
Collaborate with data engineering and infrastructure teams on how to optimize data for AI/ML
Monitor and research AI innovations, techniques, and use cases relevant to airline industry and ATPCO product portfolio
Promote AI adoption by presenting at industry events and creating content (or supporting presentations and created content)
Requirements
PhD / MA in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or closely-related field with specialization in AI/ML, or 10+ years professional experience
3+ years experience developing AI/ML solutions and prototypes
Strong verbal and written communication skills; ability to distill complex topics
Self-directed and curious, able to explore innovations on the frontier of AI.
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
Salary Range: $165,000 - $185,000
*The disclosed range estimate has not been adjusted for applicable geographic differential associated with the location*",3.8,ATPCO,"Herndon, VA",201 to 500 Employees,1965.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,175.0,VA,59.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Sr Data Scientist, Spatial Omics","$150K
/yr","The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Senior Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop computational tools as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up to date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal Candidate will have:

Background

Ph.D. degree in computer science, quantitative science, data science, bioinformatics, biostatistics, or a related field.

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Proficiency in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Proficiency in containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments are a plus.

Onsite Presence: Is Not Required

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-




PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-




COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's or PhD in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Five years of experience in scientific software or industry programming with a concentration in scientific computing. With Master's degree, three years experience required. With PhD, one year of experience required.

Preferred: Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170806
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 119,500
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 149,500
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 179,500
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid

The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Senior Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop computational tools as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up to date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal Candidate will have:

Background

Ph.D. degree in computer science, quantitative science, data science, bioinformatics, biostatistics, or a related field.

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Proficiency in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Proficiency in containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments are a plus.

Onsite Presence: Is Not Required

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-




PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-




COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's or PhD in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Five years of experience in scientific software or industry programming with a concentration in scientific computing. With Master's degree, three years experience required. With PhD, one year of experience required.

Preferred: Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170806
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 119,500
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 149,500
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 179,500
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid",4.2,MD Anderson Cancer Center,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1941.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,150.0,TX,83.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","Security Clearance required:
Able to obtain Public Trust
Do you want to make a difference?
Cognosante employees are passionate about improving people’s lives. With an innovative mindset and an unwavering commitment to those we serve, we partner with healthcare, civilian and defense agencies to deliver exceptional public services and programs. Our multi-faceted technology and customer experience (CX) solutions achieve program outcomes, solve critical challenges and create meaningful change. Whether we are helping Veterans access healthcare faster, ensuring that members of the military complete their missions safely, or helping people obtain health insurance, our work touches millions of people. Are you ready to make a difference?


What is the position?
Cognosante is seeking a Data Scientist with a proven track record of leveraging data to drive actionable insights and optimize business outcomes. The Data Scientist will apply expertise in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling to design and implement solutions that tackle complex challenges and uncover opportunities for improvement across diverse IT projects. This role is 100% remote.

What will I get to do?
Meet with clients or management to understand data requirements and needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data engineers and business analysts, to define data requirements and ensure data-driven decision-making.
Develop and refine data collection strategies to ensure the availability of high-quality, relevant data for analysis.
Employ advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify patterns, and develop predictive models that support data-driven decision-making.
Design and implement rigorous evaluation frameworks to assess the effectiveness of operating programs and business processes, utilizing both qualitative and quantitative data.
Transform complex data into clear and compelling visualizations that effectively communicate insights and recommendations to stakeholders at all levels.
Identify opportunities to enhance business processes through data-driven analysis, proposing and implementing solutions that improve efficiency and effectiveness.
Maintain detailed documentation for data engineering processes and best practices.
Develop best practice, processes, and standards for effectively carrying out data strategy activities.


What qualifications do I need?
A minimum of 3-5 years of IT experience
A Bachelor's degree a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or a related discipline (or 8 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education)
Proficiency in Python, R, or other relevant programming languages for data analysis and machine learning.
Strong understanding of various machine learning algorithms and techniques, with hands-on experience in their application.
Proficiency in utilizing data visualization tools and techniques to communicate complex information in a clear and impactful manner.
Demonstrated ability to approach complex problems with a structured and analytical mindset.
Experience with AWS cloud offerings (S3, Redshift, etc.)
Strong knowledge of SQL and database management systems (e.g., PostgreSQL, MySQL, or NoSQL databases).
Must be able to achieve a moderate (Tier 2) VA position of trust.


What additional characteristics will help me thrive?
Familiarity with healthcare and supply chain inventory data and supply chain industry-specific challenges.
Familiarity with client specific solution components, such as Databricks, Talend, etc.
Automated Engineering Management System/Medical Equipment Reporting System (AEMS/MERS), Equipment/Turn-In Request (EQUIP), Maximo Enterprise Asset and Work Management System (EAWM), Point of Use Family of Systems (PoU FoS), Real Time Location Systems (RTLS), and Strategic Equipment Planning Guide (SEPG)/Enterprise Equipment Request (EER) experience a plus
Experience working in the Federal Government, Veteran's Administration (VA) experience a plus
Active clearance for Public Trust Position
What We Offer
Our mission is to provide comprehensive and competitive pay, benefits, services, and programs to eligible employees and their dependents that:
Ensure optimal health and productivity of our employees
Support employee retention and attraction
Provide work/life balance to ensure our employees succeed inside and outside of the office
Compensation
$96,760.98 - $154,817.56
The pay range for this job is determined by various factors, including but not necessarily limited to location, responsibilities of the job, and alignment with market data. When determining a salary for this role, the following factors may be taken into consideration - contract-specific affordability, education, knowledge, skills, competencies and experience. The estimate displayed represents the salary range for this position and is just one component of Cognosante’s total compensation package for employees. It is not necessarily reflective of actual compensation that may be earned, nor a promise of any specific pay for any specific employee.
Cognosante will not provide sponsorship for employment-based immigration benefits for this position.
What We Promise
Cognosante employees are inspired by our bold mission to improve lives. To achieve this mission, we put our people first. No matter where they're located around the nation, our innovative workplaces enable individuals to apply their skills and experience to work toward a greater good.
We foster a winning culture of solution creators built on innovation, collaboration, flexibility, and work-life balance. And we invest in the next generation of diverse talent to foster an inclusive, progressive, adaptable workplace that prioritizes advancement for all. As an affirmative action employer, we are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.

Your safety during your job search is important. Recruiting communications will always be sent through one of the following corporate domain emails (@cognosante.com or @accurate.com).
We will never send communications through any other domain, including @cognosantecareers.com, @gmail.com or @yahoo.com). We will never request payment from you, nor will we send payment to you, prior to your start date. If you have been asked to send or receive any payment, or if you have any doubt about whether you have been contacted by a Cognosante employee, please contact us at
jobs@cognosante.com",3.5,"Cognosante, LLC",United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,126.0,United States,16.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist - Mid,"$120K
/yr","Join the Nalley Consulting team as a Data Scientist at Reston, VA.

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACTIVE TOP SECRET SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIRED FOR CONSIDERATION.
Positions: Data Scientist - Scientific Support (DCP 1) and Data Scientist - DSS (DCP 2)
LCAT: Mid
Location: Reston, VA
Clearance: TS/SCI and CI poly required

Desired experience: At least 8 years of experience relevant to the specific labor category, with at least a portion of the experience within the last 2 years.

Desired Education: Bachelor’s degree in an area related to the labor category
Qualifications:

Conducts data analytics, data engineering, data mining, exploratory analysis, predictive analysis, and statistical analysis, and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products, enabling more informed analytic decisions.

Proactively retrieves information from various sources, analyzes it for better understanding about the data set, and builds AI tools that automate certain processes.

Duties typically include: creating various ML-based tools or processes, such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems.

Performs statistical analysis, applies data mining techniques, and builds high quality prediction systems.

Should have prior experience with large data Multi-INT analytics, ML, and automated predictive analytics.

Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications, including:
Microsoft Office (Power BI) and Tableau.
Major data science languages, such as R and Python.
Managing and merging of disparate data sources, preferably through R, Python, or SQL.
Statistical analysis.
Data mining algorithms.
Other qualifications:
Understanding of chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, or missile programs.
Demonstrated ability to produce and comply with IC tradecraft standards.
Demonstrate ability to define comprehensive, new, or unique research approaches that enable rigorous assessments to address and contribute to high-level tasks.
Demonstrate in-depth analysis of analytic operations and knowledge management issues across organizational and intra-IC boundaries and clearly articulates key findings.
ABOUT NALLEY CONSULTING
Nalley Consulting is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business working with prime partners to staff Department of Defense and Intelligence Community positions. Created by a U.S. Navy intelligence veteran, Nalley Consulting has grown to include multiple IDIQ vehicles in several states.
Nalley Consulting fringe benefits include:
Excellent medical, dental, and vision benefits
PTO
11 paid federal holidays
Tuition assistance
Paid military-reserve leave
Paid parental leave for birth or adoption
401k matching up to 5 percent of the base salary
Flex time
Company-paid short-term disability, long-term disability, and life insurance.
ZIUW8NSJ7V",5.0,Nalley Consulting,"Reston, VA",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,VA,,1,0,0,0,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$179K
/yr","Vimeo AI team is actively seeking a talented and experienced Data Scientist to join our AI applications team. The AI applications team is working as an end to end unit, delivering product solutions from the very beginning of an idea towards the final user experience, where the main expertise is around products that require AI abilities.
You will work alongside a team of passionate engineers and researchers dedicated to transforming the way video is accessed, visualized, and shared.
What you'll do:
Design and develop advanced AI-based video analysis that incorporates multimodal content (audio, visual, and text), tailored specifically for video applications.
Conduct algorithmic research and prototyping, from conceptualizing and evaluating various AI methods to implementing production-ready solutions.
Optimize algorithms and solutions for real-time, large-scale inference capabilities, ensuring peak performance and efficiency.
Stay ahead of the latest advancements in AI/ML technologies and integrate relevant innovations into the development process.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including product management and design, to define and prioritize the AI-related product roadmap. Ensure alignment of AI development goals with broader business objectives.
Skills and knowledge you should possess:
Academic degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or a related field.
4+ years of experience in machine learning, AI, or related fields.
Expertise in natural language processing, deep learning, LLMs and generative models.
Familiarity with engineering operation tools, such as Docker, Jenkins, cloud platforms and services (e.g., AWS, GCP, Azure).
Strong programming skills in Python, ability to write and review production-level code and experience with ML/AI frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, or similar)
Outstanding analytical and problem-solving skills. Ability to understand and work with weakly defined problems, refine definitions and come up with actionable solutions.
Good communication skills and ability to work in a cross-functional team.
Bonus points (nice skills to have, but not needed):
Experience with video analysis.
Targeted Base Salary Range: $142,200 to $216,500
The base salary range listed above is for candidates located in the U.S., including the New York City metro area.
At Vimeo, we strive to hire and nurture amazing talent across the globe. Actual salaries will vary depending on factors including but not limited to experience, specialized skills, internal alignment and a candidate's home base.
Base salary is just one component of Vimeo's total rewards philosophy. We offer a wide range of benefits and perks that appeal to the variety of needs across our diverse employee base! Other rewards may include bonus or commission, Restricted Stock Units (RSUs), paid time off, generous 401k match, wellbeing resources, and more.
#LI-MM1
About Us:
Vimeo (NASDAQ: VMEO) is the world's most innovative video experience platform. We enable anyone to create high-quality video experiences to better connect and bring ideas to life. We proudly serve our community of millions of users – from creative storytellers to globally distributed teams at the world's largest companies – whose videos receive billions of views each month. Learn more at www.vimeo.com.
Vimeo is headquartered in New York City with offices around the world. At Vimeo, we believe our impact is greatest when our workforce of passionate, dedicated people, represents our diverse and global community. We're proud to be an equal opportunity employer where diversity, equity, and inclusion is championed in how we build our products, develop our leaders, and strengthen our culture.",3.7,Vimeo,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,179.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,CA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II – Engineering R&D Support,"$97K
/yr","Description

A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions which determine the source of disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety.

In North America we have more than 5,000 team members across 11 sites or subsidiaries, including Salt Lake City-based BioFire Diagnostics and one subsidiary in Montreal, Canada. Come be a part of our team and our mission as a Data Scientist!

bioMérieux - Salt Lake City is looking for a talented and engaged Data Scientist to play an integral role in the support of cutting-edge, life-saving medical devices. You will be joining a team that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and a healthy work life balance.
The candidate will be knowledgeable in various aspects of data science, and responsible for performing complex mathematical and/or statistical analysis for projects to support the BioFire Engineering departments. The candidate must have strong analytic and programming skills. The candidate will be embedded in the Data Science department but will have close collaboration with the Software Development and Engineering departments at bioMérieux. Therefore, the candidate must have strong communication skills and a desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.

Studies and Experience:
A minimum of a B.S. in a quantitative discipline: Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Computational Biology
2+ years industry experience as a data scientist, mathematician, or statistician, or 0 years industry experience with a M.S. or PhD in a quantitative discipline.
Programming proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, MATLAB, C++, C#, or SQL

Skills and Qualifications:
Good communication, writing, and presentation skills
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Practical experience in any of the following: data visualization, data analytics platforms (e.g., Tableau), data pipelines, data cleaning and processing, probability, statistics, machine learning, image analysis, linear algebra, and optimization methods.",4.0,bioMerieux SA,"Salt Lake City, UT",10000+ Employees,1963.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,97.0,UT,61.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Description
Looking for the opportunity to work on problems that matter, with colleagues that share your interest and expertise in AI and Machine Learning?
The Leidos Corporate Financial Planning & Analysis (FP&A) team is looking for an experienced Data Scientist with an entrepreneur’s mindset to support a new team working on projects to improve our Enterprise financial analytics and forecasting. The position will report to, and collaborate with, the SVP and VP of FP&A in building a Data & Analytics Team within Finance. The position is funded and an immediate fill opportunity.
You should be strongly experienced in Python coding and visualization building skills and have knowledge of commonly used ML libraries (SciKit-learn). Data engineering and ML Ops experience is a plus. We are looking for someone who is intellectually adaptive, likes to collaborate, inquisitive, and capable of conducting original science.
The FP&A Data & Analytics team will collaborate closely with Leidos’ AI Accelerator team which includes junior and senior research/data scientists and data engineers with expertise in information retrieval, UI development, information science, machine learning and artificial intelligence, and statistics.
The Data Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings. The Scientist will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations. The data scientist will partner with business and operational leaders to provide an impact by leveraging data and analytical tools, strategic thinking, and hypothesis-based analysis on machine learning (ML)-based projects. The data scientist is responsible for modeling complex business problems through statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques. Further, they will support senior leadership by creating business insights, reports, and analyses to aid in the decision-making process.
Additional Responsibilities:
Translates business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Performs large-scale experimentation and builds data-driven models to answer business questions
Proactively mines data warehouses to identify trends and patterns and generates insights for business units and senior leadership
Performs large-scale experimentation to identify hidden relationships between variables in large datasets
Researches and implements cutting-edge techniques and tools in machine learning/deep learning/artificial intelligence to make data analysis more efficient
Designs and conducts data analyses with the highest standard of rigor and scientific accuracy; this includes study design, methodology, algorithms, and statistical modeling
Analyzes data provided to identify trends, inform decisions
Supports developmental plans based on data findings related to program, personnel, training needs
Supports development and maintenance of primary program database and run interval reporting
Implements appropriate modeling and data science strategies required to address customer needs
Communicates results and methods for solutions to internal and external stakeholders
Designs, builds, trains, and evaluates machine learning models
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science or related field and over 6 years of relevant experience, Masters with 4 years of experience, or PhD with 2 years of experience.
Strong experience with Python as well as fluency in multiple programming languages and statistical analysis tools such as C++, JavaScript, R, SAS, Excel, SQL, MATLAB, SPSS
Experience /familiarity with frequentist statistics and probability including predicative modeling
Experience with data repositories and reporting tools
Good understanding of machine learning algorithms, tools and platforms
Experience with AI/ML tools, such as common Python packages (e.g., scikit-learn, NumPy, Pandas) and Jupyter notebooks
Experience with time series modeling, causal inference, or probabilistic forecasting models.
Experience with tabular data analysis using languages such as SQL, R, and/or Python
Experience with statistical modeling and data analysis
Understanding of transformers and foundation models
Self-starter with high intellectual curiosity
Great communication skills, able to explain model results to a non-technical audience
Proficient in data exploration techniques and tools
Ability to work in a cross functional team as this position will be under the Finance function but have opportunity to collaborate with the AI Accelerator team
US citizenship is required and able to obtain security clearance if needed
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with data visualization libraries such as Plotly, Streamlit, and matplotlib
Experience with building LLM and other Generative AI applications
Willing to learn new skills and platforms to support data analytics
Candidates will ideally have a specialization in ML or AI
Original Posting Date:
2024-10-04
While subject to change based on business needs, Leidos reasonably anticipates that this job requisition will remain open for at least 3 days with an anticipated close date of no earlier than 3 days after the original posting date as listed above.
Pay Range:
Pay Range $81,250.00 - $146,875.00
The Leidos pay range for this job level is a general guideline only and not a guarantee of compensation or salary. Additional factors considered in extending an offer include (but are not limited to) responsibilities of the job, education, experience, knowledge, skills, and abilities, as well as internal equity, alignment with market data, applicable bargaining agreement (if any), or other law.",3.9,Leidos,Virginia,10000+ Employees,1969.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,114.0,Virginia,55.0,1,0,0,0,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$119K
/yr","Sr Data Scientist
Job Description:
***Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. ; Sponsorship is not available for this position.***
Senior Data Scientist, Supply Chain (Technical Demand Planning)
WE CREATE EMPOWERED LEADERS!
Milwaukee Tool is seeking an experienced Senior Data Scientist to join our growing Business Analytics team in Milwaukee, WI. Milwaukee Tool is known for its strong business culture, which is centered around several core values. One of the most important of these values is a focus on innovation and technology. Milwaukee Tool is constantly pushing the boundaries of what is possible with business insights, and the company encourages its employees to think outside the box and come up with new and creative solutions to problems.
Your Role on Our Team
The Senior Data Scientist of Supply Chain is a pivotal role that combines technical expertise in data science to enhance the demand planning process. This role focuses on designing and implementing advanced demand planning tools, leveraging internal and external data to improve forecast models, and automating processes to enhance the overall efficiency and accuracy of the supply chain.
Key Responsibilities:
Enabling and Automating Demand Planning (40%)
Design, develop, and maintain advanced demand planning tools to enable the demand planning team to create accurate forecasts over a rolling 24-month horizon.
Perform ongoing analysis and monitoring of the performance of these tools, identifying significant variances, taking corrective actions, and documenting key assumptions.
Collaborate with sales, marketing, supply chain planning, and other stakeholders to ensure the tools meet their needs and achieve a consensus demand plan.
Support strategic initiatives to improve forecast quality and close identified gaps by enhancing the tools and methodologies used.
Implement and share best practices in demand planning tool development and usage.
System & Data Management (30%)
Implement data-driven solutions using Python (or other tools) and deploy them into production environments.
Perform data cleansing, exploratory data analysis, and data visualization to ensure high-quality inputs for forecasting models.
S&OP Process (20%)
Support the S&OP cycle by providing critical forecasting tools and distributing relevant forecast information to sales and supply chain planning for review.
Publish the consensus demand plan with clear explanations of forecast changes, key business drivers, risks, opportunities, and assumptions.
Develop solutions to connect the demand plan to the supply plan and optimize inventory
Analysis & Reporting (10%)
Provide timely and accurate responses to demand and forecast-related inquiries across the organization.
Develop critical planning tools, key reports, and provide analytical support to Senior Leadership for decision-making.
Complete special projects and ad-hoc requests as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s Degree in Business, Supply Chain Management, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field.
5+ years of experience in planning/forecasting, data science, or a combination thereof.
Demonstrated proficiency in statistical modeling, forecasting methods, and machine learning algorithms.
Strong programming skills in Python, with experience in training and deploying models into production.
Familiarity with Spark and parallel cloud computation.
Proficient in Microsoft Office, especially Excel.
Strong communication and collaboration skills, with the ability to explain complex analyses to technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Experience with data intelligence solutions including reports, dashboards, scorecards, and data visualizations.
Excellent problem-solving skills with a data-driven approach to decision-making.
Experience in manufacturing or similar industries is a plus.
Understanding of DevOps for CI/CD is a plus.
Personal Attributes:
Persuasive communication and interpersonal skills to effectively interact with cross-functional teams.
Strong leadership and facilitation skills to drive consensus and actionable items.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and adapt to changing business needs.
High level of analytical thinking and critical decision-making skills.
Passion for continuous improvement and innovation in demand planning and data science.
This role offers a unique opportunity to blend supply chain expertise with advanced data science techniques to drive significant improvements in forecast accuracy and supply chain efficiency. If you are a proactive and technically skilled professional looking to make a substantial impact, we encourage you to apply.",4.1,Milwaukee Electric Tool Corporation,"Milwaukee, WI",10000+ Employees,1924.0,Company - Public,Consumer Product Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,119.0,WI,100.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist - PECNA,"$96K
/yr","Overview: We are proud to announce the establishment of a state-of-the-art Li-ion battery factory, set amidst the beautiful Kansas City Metro. This groundbreaking green-field factory will serve as a pioneering hub for innovation in sustainable energy solutions. Responsibilities:
Summary: We are proud to announce the establishment of a state-of-the-art Li-ion battery factory, set amidst the beautiful Kansas City Metro. This groundbreaking green-field factory will serve as a pioneering hub for innovation in sustainable energy solutions.
If you are enthusiastic about contributing to a sustainable future and being part of a dynamic team shaping the electric vehicle revolution, this opportunity is tailor-made for you. We are seeking dedicated individuals to join us as full-time, on-site team members at our new, ultramodern factory located in the thriving city of DeSoto, Kansas.
Job Summary: The Data Scientist acts as the data analytical expert at the company, creating processes for data modeling and identifying business problems based on highly technical use of all datasets. The Data Scientist will apply advanced statistical methods and modeling to proactively explore key datasets based on business need. This role will define the statistical modeling standards and assist with educating other analyst team members on best practices. Additionally, the Data Scientist will identify gaps in existing data that would lead to further meaningful data insights for business use.
Essential Duties:
Collaborate with other internal and external team members to identify business cases for new analytical model creation.
Create and implement strategy for analytical modeling from start to end based on business need (data access, processing and aggregation and model creation, deployment, and verification)
Develop and implement machine learning models to solve business problems and improve processes.
Apply advanced statistical methods and data modeling processes to create algorithms based on business cases.
Translate ontology-based data contextualization into business benefits.
Verify data models with subject matter experts and monitor the model’s efficacy in production.
Define standard processes for modeling data and train fellow scientists and analysts on best practices for data model creation.
Function as subject matter expert for advanced analytical techniques (statistical analytics, machine learning, deep learning, etc.)
Explore areas of gaps in existing datasets for kickstarting new data acquisition projects based on business case.
Research and monitor new related technologies and systems and develop strategies for implementing advanced analytical modeling for business use.
Ensure data analysis and reporting processes comply with industry standards and regulations related to battery manufacturing and safety.
Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) Requirements:
To ensure the health and safety in the workplace and for the protection of our employee’s, wearing PPE is a possibility and may include equipment such as a full Tyvek suit, safety shoes, gloves, safety glasses, face mask, bump cap, and a full hazmat suit that includes a respirator.
The foregoing description is not intended and should not be construed to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, skills and efforts or work conditions associated with the job. It is intended to be an accurate reflection of the general nature and level of the job.
Qualifications: Requirements - Required and/or Preferred
Education:
Basic/Required: Bachelor’s Degree in quantitative field (Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Information Systems, etc.).
Preferred: Masters degree
Essential Qualifications:
Minimum of 5+ years of professional experience in Data science, Machine Learning, or related field
Experience working with big datasets in the following stages: acquisition, aggregation, analysis, and visualization at semiconductor/manufacturing industry.
Expert understanding and knowledge in algorithms and advanced statistics
Experience with advanced analytical techniques (statistical analytics, machine learning, deep learning, etc.)
Experience with Big Data technologies: Hadoop, Spark, or similar.
Programming skills for data science required (SQL, Python, R, Java, etc.)
Familiarity with machine learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, or scikit-learn.
Knowledge of cloud platforms: AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud.
Experience with developing data modeling processes and critical thinking mindset
Must be able to learn and understand equipment capabilities, operation flow, and data flow logics.
Excellent oral and written communication skills required, ability to describe technical theory to technical and non-technical audience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Able to work independently and in a team environment, as well as with cross-functional groups.
Resilient, self-motived and able to work well under pressure.
Alignment to Panasonic’s seven (7) core principles (contribution to society, fairness and honesty, cooperation and team spirit, untiring effort for improvement, courtesy and humility, adaptability, gratitude)
Knowledge of manufacturing, smart factories.
Preferred License(s):
None
Preferred Certification(s):
None
Physical Demands:
Physical Activities: (Percentage of time (equaling 100%) during the normal workday the employee is required to)
Sit: 20%
Walk: 50%
Stand: 20%
Lift: 10%
Required Lifting and Carrying: (Required frequency is: Not required (0%), Occasional (1-33%), Frequent (34-66%, Continuous (67-100%)
Up to 10 lbs.: Occasional
Up to 20 lbs.: Occasional
Up to 35 lbs.: Occasional
Team-lift only (over 35 lbs.): Occasional
About Us: At the heart of this visionary project, Panasonic is committed to manufacturing innovative cylindrical lithium-ion cells that will power the future of electric mobility. These cells will be meticulously crafted to meet the growing demands of the automotive industry, supporting various electric vehicle manufacturers in their quest for eco-friendly transportation solutions.
This role presents a unique chance to be at the forefront of innovation, working within a forward-thinking organization that is committed to environmental responsibility and the advancement of green technology. Be a part of our mission to power the future and make a difference in the world of electric mobility with Panasonic!
Supplemental Information: Pre-employment drug testing is required. Due to the high volume of responses, we will only be able to respond to candidates of interest. All candidates must have valid authorization to work in the U.S. without restriction.
Panasonic is an Equal Opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by law. All qualified individuals are required to perform the essential functions of the job with or without reasonable accommodation.
Thank you for your interest in Panasonic Energy Corporation of North America.",3.7,PECNA Panasonic Energy Corporation of North America,"De Soto, KS",1001 to 5000 Employees,1918.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,96.0,KS,106.0,1,0,1,1,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","About Rivian:
Rivian is on a mission to keep the world adventurous forever. This goes for the emissions-free Electric Adventure Vehicles we build, and the curious, courageous souls we seek to attract.

As a company, we constantly challenge what’s possible, never simply accepting what has always been done. We reframe old problems, seek new solutions and operate comfortably in areas that are unknown. Our backgrounds are diverse, but our team shares a love of the outdoors and a desire to protect it for future generations.
Role Summary:
The Sr. Data Scientist will be responsible for designing and developing dashboards to monitor and analyze factory quality metrics. This role will involve collecting, processing, and interpreting data to identify trends, issues, and opportunities for improvement. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in data engineering, experience with data visualization tools, and a passion for driving quality improvements in a manufacturing environment.
Responsibilities:
Dashboard Design and Development:
Design, develop, and maintain interactive and visually appealing dashboards to monitor factory quality metrics.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand their requirements and translate them into effective data visualizations.
Ensure dashboards provide actionable insights for decision-makers at various levels of the organization.
Data Collection and Processing:
Gather data from various sources, including factory equipment, ERP systems, and quality control processes.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure accuracy and reliability.
Develop and maintain ELT (Extract, Load, Transform) pipelines to streamline data integration.
Analysis and Reporting:
Analyze quality metrics to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Generate reports and presentations to communicate findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Provide ongoing support and updates to dashboards based on user feedback and changing requirements.
Collaboration and Change Management:
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including production, quality control, and software teams, to drive improvements based on data insights.
Advocate for data-driven decision making and foster a culture of continuous improvement.
Provide training and support to users to maximize the effectiveness of dashboards and reports.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Engineering, or a related field.
5+ years proven experience as a Data Engineer or similar role, with a focus on data visualization and dashboard development.
Proficiency in data visualization tools such as Hex, Tableau, Power BI, or similar platforms.
Familiarity with ELT tools and processes.
Strong SQL skills; Knowledge of programming languages such as Python or R is a plus.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong communication and collaboration abilities.
Experience with vehicle software, connected systems and/or manufacturing environments is preferred but not required.
Company Statements:
Equal Opportunity
Rivian is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information or characteristics, physical or mental disability, marital/domestic partner status, age, military/veteran status, medical condition, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Rivian is committed to ensuring that our hiring process is accessible for persons with disabilities. If you have a disability or limitation, such as those covered by the Americans with Disabilities Act, that requires accommodations to assist you in the search and application process, please email us at candidateaccommodations@rivian.com.
Candidate Data Privacy
Rivian may collect, use and disclose your personal information or personal data (within the meaning of the applicable data protection laws) when you apply for employment and/or participate in our recruitment processes (“Candidate Personal Data”). This data includes contact, demographic, communications, educational, professional, employment, social media/website, network/device, recruiting system usage/interaction, security and preference information. Rivian may use your Candidate Personal Data for the purposes of (i) tracking interactions with our recruiting system; (ii) carrying out, analyzing and improving our application and recruitment process, including assessing you and your application and conducting employment, background and reference checks; (iii) establishing an employment relationship or entering into an employment contract with you; (iv) complying with our legal, regulatory and corporate governance obligations; (v) recordkeeping; (vi) ensuring network and information security and preventing fraud; and (vii) as otherwise required or permitted by applicable law.

Rivian may share your Candidate Personal Data with (i) internal personnel who have a need to know such information in order to perform their duties, including individuals on our People Team, Finance, Legal, and the team(s) with the position(s) for which you are applying; (ii) Rivian affiliates; and (iii) Rivian’s service providers, including providers of background checks, staffing services, and cloud services.

Rivian may transfer or store internationally your Candidate Personal Data, including to or in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, and the European Union and in the cloud, and this data may be subject to the laws and accessible to the courts, law enforcement and national security authorities of such jurisdictions.

Please see our Candidate Data Privacy Notice for more information.

Please note that we are currently not accepting applications from third party application services.

To any candidates interested in a position with Rivian, please be aware of recruiting phishing scams impersonating Rivian. As a general practice, Rivian recruiting does not conduct interviews or communicate with candidates over Microsoft Teams.

Please visit Rivian’s Careers page for career opportunities at Rivian. If you believe you may have been a victim of identity theft because of the phishing scam impersonating Rivian, please go to www.IdentityTheft.gov where you can report and recover from identity theft. For more information about recommended computer security practices, please go to resources on the FTC’s consumer information site where you can learn how to protect yourselves online and avoid phishing attacks.",3.4,Rivian,"Normal, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,125.0,IL,15.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Science / AI Engineer,"$133K
/yr","Introduction
ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market, and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.
Job Mission
The EUV Source team in San Diego operates in a fast-paced, uniquely innovative, and challenging environment to deliver new-to-industry products supporting the commercialization of EUV technology by ASML. The Data Science/AI Engineer will be part of the EUV Source Performance team within ASML San Diego. Due to high complexity of the EUV light source, we, as Source Performance, are a dedicated team with the mission to validate and ensure that EUV sources meet or exceed customer performance requirements and expectations. In order to execute this mission, EUV Source Performance acts as the critical enabler of knowledge acquisition and transfer throughout the products development process, via:
Substantive participation in the technology development and system definition process for products in definition and early development stage.
Ensuring quality of the module to sub-system to system-level performance testing and validation for the products in integration phase.
Driving technology improvements enabling new products field release and refinement of system specifications based upon deep understanding of factory and field performance.
The creation and delivery of analytic tooling, action plans and procedures to drive maximum solving power of our customer support organizations for sustaining products.
The Data Science/AI Engineer will be an individual contributor on a team responsible for extracting the highest business value possible from the data available. This person will also refine requirements towards the data engineering team to ensure a rich and complete dataset is available for consumption and may be required to execute some data engineering work themselves. This role is part of a team aiming to further develop the site’s data science and AI competence. The person in this role will be responsible for executing the data science and AI work needed to further advance ASML’s capability to learn quickly and advise product changes that benefit the overall performance of the EUV light source. These projects include physics based model development, machine learning, Gen-AI, reduced order models, and the development of digital twins representing the EUV source, its sub-components, and the factory.
The role requires a willingness to develop a deep understanding across multiple engineering disciplines beyond data science in order to be effective. To be successful, the candidate must combine strong technical skills, problem solving and numerical analysis skills, and desire for life-long learning. In addition, to be effective in the role, candidates must possess interpersonal skills to cross functional boundaries and to build constructive and effective relationships across the organization and promote cross-functional and cross-sector collaboration.
Duties and Responsibilities
Contribute towards the technical roadmap representing the data science and AI activities of the site that supports the product roadmap and aligns with business objectives
Participate in the end-to-end AI and data science lifecycle, from data collection and preprocessing to model deployment and monitoring. Collaborate with other engineers in the best applications of data science solutions for various complex problems we are trying to resolve.
Apply theoretical models, concepts, methods, and novel experimental techniques to quantitatively interpret performance of EUV source systems across a wide range of issues and multiple technical disciplines.
Produce clear, concise technical documentation in defined company formats, present results and align with cross-functional teams.
Work closely with cross-functional groups (systems engineering, development engineering, scientists, IT, global customer support personnel, manufacturing personnel, senior management, marketing, external customers) to set clear technical direction and achievable milestones.
Travel as required to both customer sites and other ASML sites for the purposes of reporting, alignment, and collaboration.
Complete service, expense reports, and other administrative responsibilities in accordance with ASML’s procedures and with supervisor’s approval.
Other duties as assigned.
Education and experience
MS in Computer Science, Data Science, or Machine Learning. PhD preferred. Candidates with a degree in Physics that have specialized their careers in data science will also be considered.
Must have a minimum of 3 years’ experience in a similar role.
Experience in the semiconductor industry a plus.
Skills
Must have significant experience working in the following cloud and development environments: Azure Kubernetes Service (AKS), Google Distributed Cloud Edge (GDCE), Apache Spark, Azure Databricks, Python, MATLAB, and related technologies. Additionally, proficiency with MLFlow for managing the end-to-end machine learning lifecycle, including experimentation, reproducibility, and deployment, is required.
The ideal candidate will have extensive experience in designing and implementing machine learning and deep learning architectures. This includes:
Developing and optimizing neural network architectures using frameworks such as TensorFlow and PyTorch.
Implementing scalable machine learning models and algorithms in a cloud-based environment.
Experience with Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision, and other AI domains.
Knowledge of model deployment and serving strategies, including the use of containerization technologies such as Docker and Kubernetes.
Proficiency in using GPU and TPU hardware accelerators for deep learning training and inference.
Experience in monitoring and maintaining the performance of deployed models to ensure they meet business and technical requirements.”
Understanding of the concept of large complex system integration and practices.
Understanding of the concepts of optics and lasers, plasma generation, and control systems.
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills.
Excellent inter-personal and customer service skills, with an advanced understanding of customer relationship building.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to reduce large amounts of data, create a concise summary, and effectively report results through written and/or graphical formats.
Ability to define and execute tasks based on project descriptions with minimum or no supervision.
Other Information
This position is located in San Diego, CA. It works on a hybrid schedule of 3 days onsite/2 days remote. It requires onsite presence to attend in-person work-related events, trainings and meetings and to further ensure teamwork, collaboration and innovation.
Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability
Potential candidates will meet the education and experience requirements provided on the above job description and excel in completing the listed responsibilities for this role. All candidates receiving an offer of employment must successfully complete a background check band any other tests that may be required.
The current base annual salary range for this role is currently:
$0-0
Pay scales are determined by role, level, location and alignment with market data. Individual pay is determined through interviews and an assessment of several factors that that are unique to each candidate, including but not limited to job-related skills, relevant education and experience, certifications, abilities of the candidate and pay relative to other team members.
The Company offers employees and their families, medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees are able to participate in the Company’s 401k plan. Employees will also receive eight (8) hours of vacation leave every month and (13) paid holidays throughout the calendar year. For more information, please contact the Recruiter or click on this link Compensation & Benefits in the US.
All new ASML jobs have a minimum application deadline of 10 days.
This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the United States Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
Diversity and inclusion
ASML is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values and respects the importance of a diverse and inclusive workforce. It is the policy of the company to recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job titles without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, or gender identity. We recognize that diversity and inclusion is a driving force in the success of our company.
Need to know more about applying for a job at ASML? Read our frequently asked questions.
Request an Accommodation
ASML provides reasonable accommodations to applicants for ASML employment and ASML employees with disabilities. An accommodation is a change in work rules, facilities, or conditions which enable an individual with a disability to apply for a job, perform the essential functions of a job, and/or enjoy equal access to the benefits and privileges of employment. If you are in need of an accommodation to complete an application, participate in an interview, or otherwise participate in the employee pre-selection process, please send an email to USHR_Accommodation@asml.com to initiate the company’s reasonable accommodation process.
Please note: This email address is solely intended to provide a method for applicants to initiate ASML’s process to request accommodation(s). Any recruitment questions should be directed to the designated Talent Acquisition member for the position.",4.1,ASML,"San Diego, CA",10000+ Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,133.0,CA,40.0,1,0,1,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","Become a part of our caring community and help us put health first
Growth Analytics & AI within Humana is dedicated to transforming members’ journeys and Humana’s services using technology and analytics. We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist who will utilize cutting-edge AI, NLP, GenAI techniques, build predictive modeling, test rigorous hypotheses, design studies, and turn data into actionable insights. Being part of a talented team of Data Scientists with broad skills and applications, the Senior Data Scientist will work cross-functionally and collaboratively with teams across the enterprise through innovative AI, machine learning, and R&D platforms. The scope of our work includes forecasting, predictive modeling, designing business experiments, and ROI studies. The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience with healthcare data, demonstrated innovative, and creative methods for overcoming testing constraints, as well as successfully applying AI, NLP, GenAI, and machine learning techniques to address business needs.
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The Senior Data Scientist’s work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
The Senior Data Scientist develops, maintains, and collects structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting. Creates reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics. Exercises considerable latitude in determining objectives and approaches to assignments.

Use your skills to make an impact
This is a unique opportunity for a motivated individual to influence Humana’s vision to provide coordinated, integrated member journey via multiple innovative solutions. The Senior Data Scientist creates reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics. This role influences department’s strategy, contributes to the decision making on complex issues regarding technical approach for project components, and works on model building use cases with minimal supervision. Exercises considerable latitude in determining objectives and approaches to assignments. As a Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Develop and validate machine learning and statistical models, predictions, reports, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
Develop, maintain, and collect structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
Research and evaluate innovative analytical methodologies, approaches, and solutions
Collaborate with analytics and data teams to set objectives, approaches, and work plans
Interpret and communicate analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners
Understand department, segment, and organizational strategy and operating objectives, including their linkages to related areas
Compile and present regular and ad-hoc project status reports
Follow established guidelines/procedures
Required Qualifications
Master’s Degree in a quantitative discipline, such as Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related quantitative field
3+ years of experience in advanced data analytics
Demonstrated experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors with Python, R, SAS, SQL, DataRobot or similar statistical and scripting tools
Experience developing and validating machine learning and statistical forecasting models or predictive models, including Random Forest, Gradient Boosting, Neural Networks, cluster analysis, regression analysis, time series, and forecasting
Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
Experience interpreting and communicating analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners
Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
Naturally curious and comfortable with ambiguity and demonstrate critical thinking
Clear and concise verbal and written communication skills, with a proven ability to translate complex methodologies and analytical results to non-technical business insights
Strong interpersonal and consulting skills
Preferred Qualifications
PhD in a quantitative discipline, such as Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics or Statistics and/or related quantitative field
Healthcare or managed care experience
Experience in Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Experience developing and tuning LLM applications, utilizing GPT, LLAMA, or other models
Experience in health economics, test & learn, and/or experiment design
Experience building large-scale predictive models
Experience building visualization and reports using Tableau or Power BI
Experience in Big Data environment specifically PySpark and/or Databricks
Experience in cloud computing, Azure or AWS
Experience in deep learning and recommendation
Experience in cost of care and trend analysis
Actuarial background or experience
Work-At-Home Requirements
To ensure Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees’ ability to work effectively, the self-provided internet service of Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees must meet the following criteria:
At minimum, a download speed of 25 Mbps and an upload speed of 10 Mbps is recommended; wireless, wired cable or DSL connection is suggested
Satellite, cellular and microwave connection can be used only if approved by leadership
Employees who live and work from Home in the state of California, Illinois, Montana, or South Dakota will be provided a bi-weekly payment for their internet expense.
Humana will provide Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees with telephone equipment appropriate to meet the business requirements for their position/job.
Work from a dedicated space lacking ongoing interruptions to protect member PHI / HIPAA information
#LI-WG1
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Pay Range
The compensation range below reflects a good faith estimate of starting base pay for full time (40 hours per week) employment at the time of posting. The pay range may be higher or lower based on geographic location and individual pay will vary based on demonstrated job related skills, knowledge, experience, education, certifications, etc.
$104,800 - $144,300 per year
This job is eligible for a bonus incentive plan. This incentive opportunity is based upon company and/or individual performance.
Description of Benefits
Humana, Inc. and its affiliated subsidiaries (collectively, “Humana”) offers competitive benefits that support whole-person well-being. Associate benefits are designed to encourage personal wellness and smart healthcare decisions for you and your family while also knowing your life extends outside of work. Among our benefits, Humana provides medical, dental and vision benefits, 401(k) retirement savings plan, time off (including paid time off, company and personal holidays, volunteer time off, paid parental and caregiver leave), short-term and long-term disability, life insurance and many other opportunities.

About us
Humana Inc. (NYSE: HUM) is committed to putting health first – for our teammates, our customers and our company. Through our Humana insurance services and CenterWell healthcare services, we make it easier for the millions of people we serve to achieve their best health – delivering the care and service they need, when they need it. These efforts are leading to a better quality of life for people with Medicare, Medicaid, families, individuals, military service personnel, and communities at large.

Equal Opportunity Employer
It is the policy of Humana not to discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability or veteran status. It is also the policy of Humana to take affirmative action to employ and to advance in employment, all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability or protected veteran status, and to base all employment decisions only on valid job requirements. This policy shall apply to all employment actions, including but not limited to recruitment, hiring, upgrading, promotion, transfer, demotion, layoff, recall, termination, rates of pay or other forms of compensation and selection for training, including apprenticeship, at all levels of employment.

Not Specified
0",3.8,Humana,Remote,10000+ Employees,1961.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,125.0,Remote,63.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Duties
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Develop and oversee computational algorithms and statistical methods to analyze data and find relationships and patterns in large volumes of data.
Analyze unique and highly specialized datasets using a variety of data analytic tools.
Ensure software architecture and data pipeline usage is in compliance with Federal requirements and regulations.
Recommend algorithms or tools to support the design and build of scalable data pipelines.
Develop, modify, and provide recommendations on data visualization, scientific and technical Artificial Intelligence (AI), and other data science tools (e.g., machine learning
Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen or National.
This employer participates in the e-Verify program.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. See www.sss.gov.
If selected, your appointment may be subject to a suitability or fitness determination, as determined by a completed background investigation.
If selected, you may be required to complete a one year probationary period.
These positions are to be filled under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Inflation Reduction Act or Scientific, Technical, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) direct hire authority.
A preliminary background check must be completed before a new employee can begin work. Current Federal employees or other individuals with an existing completed background investigation may not be required to undergo another background check.
This position is included in a Bargaining Unit.
Qualifications
BASIC REQUIREMENT:
Degree: Mathematics, statistics, computer science, data science or field directly related to the position. The degree must be in a major field of study (at least at the baccalaureate level) that is appropriate for the position.
OR
Combination of education and experience: Courses equivalent to a major field of study (30 semester hours) as shown in paragraph A above, plus additional education or appropriate experience.


GS-12 SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level GS-11 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as meeting 2out of 3 of the following:
Identifying and analyzing advancements in application development concepts, techniques, and tools;
Utilizing data tools and techniques to process large, datasets into structured formats for matching, analysis, or estimation;
Assisting with coding in various programming languages (such as Python or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
GS-13 SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level GS-12 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as meeting 2out of 3 of the following:
Designing and developing data analytics/science related products using techniques such as machine learning, natural language processing, robotics process automation, and artificial intelligence;
Conducting analysis using software and/or programming languages such as Python or Java to test hypotheses and predict outcomes;
Using data tools and techniques to process large datasets into structured formats for matching, analysis, or estimation

""Experience"" refers to paid and unpaid experience. Examples of qualifying unpaid experience may include: volunteer work done through National Service programs (such as Peace Corps and AmeriCorps); as well as work for other community-based philanthropic and social organizations. Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills; and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

CTAP/ICTAP candidates: To be considered ""well qualified"" you must meet all of the requirements as described in this section.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This vacancy has a positive education requirement. In order to be rated as qualified, you must provide copies of your college transcripts. Failure to provide copies of your college transcripts may result in a rating of ""Ineligible"". Education must be obtained from an accredited institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. Foreign education must be reviewed by an organization recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For special instructions pertaining to foreign education and a list of organizations that can evaluate foreign education, see the Department of Education website.
Additional information
The U.S. Department of Energy fosters a diverse and inclusive workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
This job opportunity announcement may be used to fill additional similar vacancies across DOE.
For general information on government-wide Telework polices visit: www.telework.gov
Hiring incentives may be authorized in accordance with agency policy and if funding is available.
EEO Policy: https://www.energy.gov/justice/eeo-complaint-process
Reasonable Accommodation Policy: https://www.energy.gov/hc/department-energy-reasonable-accommodation-program
Veterans Information: https://www.energy.gov/careers/veterans-military-spouses
Selective Service Registration: http://www.sss.gov/
The Fair Chance Act prohibits specific inquiries concerning an applicant's criminal or credit background unless the hiring agency has made a conditional offer of employment to the applicant. An applicant may submit a complaint to the agency within 30 calendar days of the date of alleged noncompliance by completing the Fair Chance Act Intake Form and submitting it to the Administrative Investigations Program at AdministrativeInvestigations@hq.doe.gov.

Benefits
A career with the U.S. government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
This position is announced under a government-wide Direct-Hire Authority (DHA) for Data Scientist positions in the 1560 series. Under the DHA, applicants who meet the Education and Qualification requirements listed in this announcement will be referred for consideration. Veteran's Preference, category rating, and traditional rating and ranking of applicants do not apply under the DHA process.
Appointments made under the DHA are processed as ""new"" appointments. Current Federal employees may be required to serve a new probationary period (5 CFR 315.802(b).
Successful candidates will possess the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):
Data Management
Database Administration
Reasoning
Research
Technology Application


Career Transition Assistance Programs: If you are eligible for career transition assistance, such as ICTAP or CTAP, you must meet the Education and Qualification requirements to be referred for consideration.

Shared Certificates: The Department of Energy shares lists of applicants among its internal Departmental Elements and organizations. You may be referred for consideration to other DOE Hiring Managers throughout the Department for more than one position based on this application. By applying to this announcement, you understand your application materials may be shared with multiple Hiring Mangers throughout DOE. If additional positions are filled from this announcement conditions of employment may differ. You will be notified if you are referred for additional positions.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date (11/07/2024) of this announcement.

To preview the Assessment Questionnaire, click https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/12576965
Benefits
A career with the U.S. government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Required Documents
As a new or existing federal employee, you and your family may have access to a range of benefits. Your benefits depend on the type of position you have - whether you're a permanent, part-time, temporary or an intermittent employee. You may be eligible for the following benefits, however, check with your agency to make sure you're eligible under their policies.
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:
Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement.Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted. Do not provide photos or list a Social Security Number or date of birth on any attachment.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
How to Apply
Please read the entire announcement and all the instructions before you begin an application. To apply for this position, you must complete the initial online application, to include submission of the required documentation specified in the Required Documents section. A complete application package must be submitted by 11:59 PM (EST) on the announcement closing date to receive consideration. The application process is as follows:
Click the Apply Online button.
Answer the questions presented in the application and attach all required and supporting documentation.
Click the Submit Application button prior to 11:59 pm (ET) on 11/07/2024.
To update your application, including supporting documentation: During the announcement open period, return to your USAJOBS account, find your application record, and click Edit my application. This option will no longer be available once the announcement has closed.


To verify the status of your application, during and after the announcement open period, log into your USAJOBS account; applications will appear on the Welcome screen. The Application Status will appear along with the date your application was last updated. For information on what each application status means, visit: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/how-to/application/status/.

If you need help with login.gov or USAJOBS (e.g., account access, Resume Builder) visit the USAJOBS Help Center: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/

If you experience difficulty applying on USAJOBS, after clicking the Apply Online button, or you are experiencing a significant hardship hindering your ability to apply online, the Agency Contact listed in the announcement can assist you during normal business hours. If you receive any system error messages, take screenshots if possible, to aid technical support.
Agency contact information
Kelsey Hince
Phone
240-220-4551
Email
kelsey.hince@hc.doe.gov
Address
Office of Science - Office of Scientific and Technical Information
Department of Energy
Human Capital Shared Service Center
1000 Independence Ave, SW
Washington, DC 20585
US
Next steps
Once you submit your online application, you will receive a confirmation notification by email that your submission was successful. After the closing of the announcement, if your self-assessment responses place you as an eligible candidate for referral, we will refer your name to the hiring official, you may be contacted directly for a possible interview. We will notify you of the status of your Application Package at the time candidates are referred for consideration, and when the selection process is complete.

If you are interested in being added to our Schedule A or 30% or more Disabled Veterans repository, please submit your information by using the below links.

https://www.usajobs.gov/job/789178500 - 30 Percent or More Disabled Veteran Repository 2024 for Department of Energy

https://www.usajobs.gov/job/789179000 - Schedule A Repository 2024 for Department of Energy
Fair and Transparent
The Federal hiring process is set up to be fair and transparent. Please read the following guidance.
Criminal history inquiries
Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Policy
Financial suitability
New employee probationary period
Privacy Act
Reasonable accommodation policy
Selective Service
Signature and false statements
Social security number request
Required Documents
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:
Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement.Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted. Do not provide photos or list a Social Security Number or date of birth on any attachment.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.

Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. Citizens, Nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Military spouses
Clarification from the agency
U.S. citizens or U.S. Nationals; no prior Federal experience is required. Please read this Public Notice in its entirety prior to submitting your application for consideration.",4.3,US Department of Energy - Agency Wide,"Oak Ridge, TN",10000+ Employees,1977.0,Government,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,111.0,TN,47.0,1,0,0,0,0
"Analyst, Data Scientist","$97K
/yr","FS Investments is looking for a motivated Data Scientist to join our Data Strategy team. The selected candidate will be a member of the Data Strategy team, which is responsible for supporting the firm's Investment Management, Distribution & Marketing organizations. This role will have a focus on analytical modeling, working with key business stakeholders to derive value from various data sources.
Data Strategy is an interdisciplinary team that spans FS Investments. Made up of data science, analytics, and business domain experts, we are at the forefront of implementing data-driven strategies across the organization. We focus on delivering the platforms, analytical solutions and services that enhance User productivity and maximize business value.
**This is an on-site role with a minimum of 4 days in-office. Must be able to commute within the greater Philadelphia area.
The successful candidate is expected to:
Work as an integral part of the Data Strategy team, by learning to leverage our platform to perform analysis and derive key insights from our data.
Use statistical and machine learning (ML) techniques to create robust investment and distribution solutions.
Develop skills and participate in training to become proficient with our data science platform.
Participate in the evolution of the strategic vision for ML/AI at FS Investments.
Research and implement relevant ML and statistical approaches.
Contribute to the development and improvement of existing codebases, pipelines, and models.
Document code, algorithms, and processes for effective knowledge sharing and reproducibility.
Stay connected and current with the latest developments in data science and present findings to team members.
Work closely with key business stakeholders, data scientists, and analytics professionals to understand project requirements, develop ML models and algorithms, and contribute to the translation of prototypes into production systems.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in math, physics, logic, philosophy, or a related scientific discipline with a minimum of 2-4 years of practical experience in data science; an advanced degree in data science is a plus.
Basic understanding of data cleaning, feature engineering, model development and evaluation.
Familiarity with common ML frameworks and libraries, such as TensorFlow/Pytorch, Scikit-learn, Numpy, Pandas, etc.
Solid programming skills in Python and the ability to write clean, efficient, and well-documented code.
Experience working in an Agile environment.
Self-motivated team-player, good communicator, embraces challenges, and keen to learn.
Preferred understanding of ML methods and Statistics, including MLOps lifecycle and associated challenges at each stage of development.
Preferred knowledge and hands on experience with deep learning architectures and frameworks.
Passionate about learning new AI/ML skills and staying updated with the latest developments in the field.

FS Investments: 30 years of leadership in private markets
FS Investments is an alternative asset manager dedicated to delivering attractive returns across private equity, private credit and real estate. Following its 2023 acquisition of Portfolio Advisors, FS Investments now manages over $80 billion for both institutional and wealth management clients around the world, drawing on 30 years of experience and more than 500 employees operating across nine global offices.
The firm's investment professionals manage a wide range of differentiated strategies across private markets and collectively manage relationships with 300+ sponsors. FS Investments' active partnership model creates a virtuous cycle of superior market insights and deal flow, which inform the underwriting process and help to generate strong returns.
FS is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

FS Investments does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or search firms. Any resume or referral submitted in the absence of a signed agreement is property of FS Investments and no fee will be paid.",4.0,FS Investments,"Philadelphia, PA",201 to 500 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,97.0,PA,17.0,1,0,0,0,0
Senior AI Data Scientist,"$187K
/yr","Empowering players to create is an exciting future for the gaming industry. At Electronic Arts we have many examples of players creating content, whether it be a skateboard park in Skate or fantastical mansions in the Sims 4. The future definitely has our players being more empowered to create with their imagination being the only limit.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to help shape the future of content creation and gameplay with AI. If you have the right expertise and are interested we want to hear from you!
As a Senior AI Data Scientist you will:
Build, fine-tune and implement AI and machine learning models to solve challenging problems
Ensure AI and machine learning production pipelines are scalable, repeatable and cloud agnostic
Apply current and emerging techniques in deep learning, natural language processing and other machine learning areas
Collect, clean, manage, analyze and visualize large sets of data using multiple data platforms, tools and technique
Work in partnership with game teams to integrate AI solutions into products and services.
Optimize and fine-tune AI models for performance and scalability. Analyze and interpret data to extract meaningful insights and improve AI models.
Document and present findings and solutions to stakeholders.
Desired qualifications and experience:
A minimum of 3+ years of experience in data science
PhD or MSc in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related field
Strong expertise in deep learning, fluent in Python and SQL
Expertise in automating machine learning models and building end to end products
Experience with devops tools and principles (Git, CI/CD, Docker)
Effective within Cloud environments (GCP, AWS)
Understanding of containerization and orchestration technologies (Docker, Kubernetes, etc.
Ceci ne s’applique pas au Québec.

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

The base salary ranges listed below are for the defined geographic market pay zones in these locations. If you reside outside of these locations, a recruiter will advise on the range and benefits for your specific location.

EA has listed the base salary ranges it in good faith expects to pay applicants for this role in the locations listed, as of the time of this posting. Pay offered will be determined based on numerous relevant business and candidate factors including, for example, education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, geographic location, and business or organizational needs.



BASE SALARY RANGES

California (depending on location e.g. Los Angeles vs. Sacramento):
º $161,100 - $239,700 USD Annually
New York (depending on location e.g. Manhattan vs. Buffalo):
º $142,900 - $239,700 USD Annually
Jersey City, NJ :
º $187,400 - $239,700 USD Annually
Colorado (depending on location e.g. Denver vs. Colorado Springs):
º $153,100 - $206,200 USD Annually
Washington (depending on location e.g. Seattle vs. Spokane):
º $142,900 - $230,000 USD Annually
British Columbia (depending on location e.g. Vancouver vs. Victoria):
º $133,400 - $193,200 CAN Annually

Base salary is just one part of the overall compensation at EA. In the US, we offer a package of benefits including paid time off (3 weeks per year to start), 80 hours per year of sick time, 16 paid company holidays per year, 10 weeks paid time off to bond with baby, medical/dental/vision insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, and 401(k) to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity. For British Columbia, we offer a package of benefits including vacation (3 weeks per year to start), 10 days per year of sick time, paid top-up to EI/QPIP benefits up to 100% of base salary when you welcome a new child (12 weeks for maternity, and 4 weeks for parental/adoption leave), extended health/dental/vision coverage, life insurance, disability insurance, retirement plan to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity.

Electronic Arts creates next-level entertainment experiences that inspire players and fans around the world. Here, everyone is part of the story. Part of a community that connects across the globe. A place where creativity thrives, new perspectives are invited, and ideas matter. A team where everyone makes play happen.",4.1,Electronic Arts,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1982.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,187.0,WA,42.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,WA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Risk Data Scientist,"$120K
/yr","Thank you for your interest in a career at Regions. At Regions, we believe associates deserve more than just a job. We believe in offering performance-driven individuals a place where they can build a career --- a place to expect more opportunities. If you are focused on results, dedicated to quality, strength and integrity, and possess the drive to succeed, then we are your employer of choice.

Regions is dedicated to taking appropriate steps to safeguard and protect private and personally identifiable information you submit. The information that you submit will be collected and reviewed by associates, consultants, and vendors of Regions in order to evaluate your qualifications and experience for job opportunities and will not be used for marketing purposes, sold, or shared outside of Regions unless required by law. Such information will be stored in accordance with regulatory requirements and in conjunction with Regions’ Retention Schedule for a minimum of three years. You may review, modify, or update your information by visiting and logging into the careers section of the system.

Job Description:
At Regions, the Risk Data Scientist researches, models, implements, and validates algorithms (predictive and prescriptive) to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes.

The position at this level works with multiple teams of data scientists, analysts, and visualization experts contributing independently to solve business problems with high complexity and enable effective risk management. Additionally, the position at this level requires in-depth knowledge in quantitative analytical methods, data management, visualization, and programming skills suitable to drive data-driven decisions.

Primary Responsibilities
Works with large, structured, and un-structured datasets
Uses quantitative and analytical techniques to accelerate profitable growth and monitor and mitigate risk - unlocking value across all functional areas of business
Uses Big Data tools (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, H2O, CDSW, Domino Labs, etc.) to build data analytics solutions
Builds machine learning and Artificial Intelligence (AI) models from development through testing and validation
Designs rich data visualizations to communicate complex ideas to business leaders and executives
Communicates outcomes and proposed business solutions to senior Risk Data Scientists
Draws insights from data to make quick, well informed decisions with available information
Demonstrates ability to continuously learn and provide value in a dynamic environment
Understands all phases of the model lifecycle, ensuring that models and associated documentation comply with model validation expectations

This position is exempt from timekeeping requirements under the Fair Labor Standards Act and is not eligible for overtime pay.

This position may be filled at a higher level depending on the candidate's qualifications and relevant experience

This position will work a hybrid schedule with a combination of in-office and remote work

Requirements
Bachelor's degree and six (6) years of related experience
Or Master's degree and four (4) years of related experience
Or Ph.D. and two (2) years of related experience in a quantitative/analytical/STEM field
One (1) year of hands-on experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, Impala, Spark, or Kafka
Two (2) years of working experience with statistical and predictive modeling concepts and approaches such as machine learning, clustering and classification techniques, and artificial intelligence
Two (2) years of working programming experience analyzing large, complex, and multi-dimensional datasets using a variety of tools such as SAS, Python, Ruby, R, Matlab, Scala, or Java

Preferences
Background in banking and/or other financial services
Experience in Agile Software Development
May require experience in libraries such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, or Keras
Knowledge in Google Analytics and/or Adobe Digital

Skills and Competencies
Advanced Structured Query Language (SQL) skills
Comfortable with both relational databases and Hadoop-based data mining frameworks
Deep understanding of statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques, and recommendation and optimization algorithms
Expertise in analyzing large, complex, multi-dimensional datasets
Proficient in visualization tools like Power Business Intelligence (BI) and Tableau
Strong business acumen with the ability to communicate with both business and Information Technology (IT) leaders
Strong communication skills through data visualizations as well as written and oral presentations

Position Type Full time

Compensation Details
Pay ranges are job specific and are provided as a point-of-market reference for compensation decisions. Other factors which directly impact pay for individual associates include: experience, skills, knowledge, contribution, job location and, most importantly, performance in the job role. As these factors vary by individuals, pay will also vary among individual associates within the same job.

The target information listed below is based on the Metropolitan Statistical Area Market Range for where the position is located and level of the position.

Job Range Target:
Minimum: $98,467.60 USD
Median: $141,780.00 USD

Incentive Pay Plans:
Benefits Information
Regions offers a benefits package that is flexible, comprehensive and recognizes that ""one size does not fit all"" for benefits-eligible associates. Listed below is a synopsis of the benefits offered by Regions for informational purposes, which is not intended to be a complete summary of plan terms and conditions.
Paid Vacation/Sick Time
401K with Company Match
Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits
Disability Benefits
Health Savings Account
Flexible Spending Account
Life Insurance
Parental Leave
Employee Assistance Program
Associate Volunteer Program

Please note, benefits and plans may be changed, amended, or terminated with respect to all or any class of associate at any time. To learn more about Regions’ benefits, please click or copy the link below to your browser.

https://www.regions.com/welcometour/benefits.rf

Location Details Riverchase Complex North Building
Location: Hoover, Alabama

Bring Your Whole Self to Work

We have a passion for creating an inclusive environment that promotes and values the differences that make each of us stand out as unique individuals and help provide valuable perspective that makes us a better company and employer. More importantly, we recognize that creating a workplace where everyone, regardless of background, can do their best work and thrive is the right thing to do.

OFCCP Disclosure: Equal Opportunity Employer/Disabled/Veterans

Job applications at Regions are accepted electronically through our career site for a minimum of five business days from the date of posting. Job postings for higher-volume positions may remain active for longer than the minimum period due to business need and may be closed at any time thereafter at the discretion of the company.",3.6,Regions,"Nashville, TN",10000+ Employees,1971.0,Company - Public,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,120.0,TN,53.0,1,0,1,1,0
"Senior Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$240K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Provide guidance to junior analysts and data scientists
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modelling project
At least 5 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, capable of working independently in a dynamic, fast-paced environment, and delivering projects from end to end
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
Experience collaborating with cross-functional teams while managing and prioritizing multiple projects
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $167537 - $312866 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,240.0,WA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$169K
/yr","3+ years of data science experience with a Bachelor's degree in quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Business Analytics, Data Science, Mathematics, Economics, Engineering or Computer Science).
Expertise in using SQL for data analysis, reporting, and dashboarding.
Expertise with visualization tools like Tableau or Quicksight.
Experience with a scripting language such as Python or R.
Comfort with data warehouses and big data technologies at consumer scale such as Redshift, Snowflake, Big Query, etc.
If you are interested in this position, please apply on Twitch's Career site https://www.twitch.tv/jobs/en/

About Us:
Twitch is the world’s biggest live streaming service, with global communities built around gaming, entertainment, music, sports, cooking, and more. It is where thousands of communities come together for whatever, every day.

We’re about community, inside and out. You’ll find coworkers who are eager to team up, collaborate, and crush (or elegantly solve) problems together. We’re on a quest to empower live communities, so if this sounds good to you, see what we’re up to on LinkedIn and X, and discover the projects we’re solving on our Blog. Be sure to explore our Interviewing Guide to learn how to ace our interview process.

About the Role:
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to support our central analytics and finance disciplines at Twitch. Bringing to bear a mixture of data analysis, dashboarding, and SQL query skills, you will use data-driven methods to answer business questions, and deliver insights that deepen understanding of our viewer behavior and monetization performance. Reporting to the Head of Finance, Analytics, and Business Operations, your team will be located in San Francisco. While there is a preference for the San Francisco Bay Area.

You Will:
Create actionable insights from data related to Twitch viewers, creators, advertising revenue, commerce revenue, and content deals.
Develop dashboards and visualizations to communicate points of view that inform business decision-making.
Create and maintain complex queries and data pipelines for ad-hoc analyses.
Author narratives and documentation that support conclusions.
Collaborate effectively with business partners, product managers, and data team members to align data science efforts with strategic goals.
Master’s or Doctorate degree in a quantitative field (e.g. Statistics, Business Analytics, Data Science, Mathematics, Economics, Engineering, or Computer Science)
Experience in gaming or digital media
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at Twitch. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status, or other legally protected status.

Los Angeles County applicants: Job duties for this position include: work safely and cooperatively with other employees, supervisors, and staff; adhere to standards of excellence despite stressful conditions; communicate effectively and respectfully with employees, supervisors, and staff to ensure exceptional customer service; and follow all federal, state, and local laws and Company policies. Criminal history may have a direct, adverse, and negative relationship with some of the material job duties of this position. These include the duties and responsibilities listed above, as well as the abilities to adhere to company policies, exercise sound judgment, effectively manage stress and work safely and respectfully with others, exhibit trustworthiness and professionalism, and safeguard business operations and the Company’s reputation. Pursuant to the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $125,500/year in our lowest geographic market up to $212,800/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. This position will remain posted until filled. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.6,"Twitch Interactive, Inc.","San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,1994.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,169.0,CA,30.0,1,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Role located onsite in Fremont, CA.
As an employee of Boehringer Ingelheim, you will actively contribute to the discovery, development, and delivery of our products to our patients and customers. Our global presence provides opportunity for all employees to collaborate internationally, offering visibility and opportunity to directly contribute to the companies' success. We realize that our strength and competitive advantage lie with our people. We support our employees in several ways to foster a healthy working environment, meaningful work, diversity and inclusion, mobility, networking, and work-life balance. Our competitive compensation and benefit programs reflect Boehringer Ingelheim's high regard for our employees.
The Senior Data Scientist will execute data science projects at US Biopharma Fremont with the purpose of solving non-routine business problems by applying advanced methods including artificial intelligence, machine learning, causal inference, advanced statistics, natural language processing and other related techniques.
The Senior Data Scientist is highly experienced in delivering successful data science projects and will work in close collaboration with different business units (e.g., Biopharma sites in Vienna and Biberach) to develop applications which utilize data for smart decision making.
The role will include the responsibility for designing and building computational models, discovering insights, and identifying opportunities using statistical and algorithmic methods (for instance machine learning) as well as data visualization techniques. The Senior Data Scientist will utilize their experience to manage small and medium-sized projects, potentially including external support and to develop and mentor more junior colleagues.
Duties & Responsibilities
Delivering successful data science projects:
Understands business problems and design end-to-end data science use cases.
Collaborates across the business to understand data, and business constraints.
Prioritizes, scopes, and measures the corresponding Key Performance Indicators (KPIs)/ Objectives and Key Results (OKRs) for success.
Collaborates with developers to implement and deploy scalable solutions.
Establishes best data operational practices and maintain all compliance requirements.
Establishes the monitoring of data science models in production.

Achieving high analytical quality of delivered projects:
Applies strong expertise in data science to design, prototype, and build the next-generation analytics engines and services.
Generates hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process together with domain experts.
Identifies, evaluates, and implements the most appropriate algorithm for the specific challenge.

Establishing close collaborations across different departments to transform towards smart data-driven decision making:
Guides the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence (AI)/data science.
Actively networks on a regular basis with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Quickly develops extensive domain knowledge in various topics.
Trains and coaches other business and staff on basic data science principles and techniques.

Successful management of communities and partnerships:
Actively networks on a regular basis with internal and external partners.
Promotes collaboration and knowledge exchange with other data science teams within and outside the organization.
Provides thought leadership by researching best practices, conducting experiments, and collaborating with industry leaders.
Requirements
BS degree, with six-plus (6+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
MS degree with four-plus (4+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
PhD degree with two-plus (2+) years relevant industry experience.
Scientific degree in quantitative discipline such as theoretical physics, mathematics, computer Science, bioinformatics etc.

Technical Skills:
Deep technical expertise in at least one relevant field.
Experienced in handling unusual data sets such as unstructured data or big data.
Broad understanding of current technologies and technological developments including ability to evaluate potential technological benefits for data science projects.
Five-plus (5+) years’ experience in relevant computing languages such as R, Python and C++.
Experienced in handling UNIX environments.
Understanding of ETL processes and experience with various data formats.
Experienced in handling various types of data bases including data base operations and understanding of data base concepts and architectures.
Well-developed understanding of data hygiene as well as data enrichment.
Experienced in handling data bases including ability to run queries.
Sound knowledge in scripting languages such as PHP, Perl, Bash.
Experience with Large Language Models and/or mechanistic models is a plus.

Analytical Skills:
Ability to rapidly develop analytical problem-solving approaches to complex problems, including external constraints such as resource limitations, feasibility topics, consumption by business, change management aspects, etc.
High level of expertise to design, set up and execute validation and experimentation of data science outcomes in business and market environments.
High level of expertise in relevant methods and skills such as machine learning, advanced statistics, algebra, data visualization, artificial intelligence, natural language processing, classification methods, feature extraction, dimensionality reduction, data handling algorithms, regression methods, time-series analysis, predictive modelling, causal inference methods, Bayesian networks, Markov random fields, text analysis, etc.

Business Skills:
Ability to successfully manage different and potentially conflicting interests of various stakeholders in the framework of data science projects.
High expertise in change management demonstrated through several projects that involved a high degree of business transformation.
Ability to build relationships with business partners, operational managers, and colleagues.
Ability to handle multiple priorities under set deadlines.
Ability to constantly adapt to a fast-paced multidisciplinary changing environment (e.g., with regards to new data types or changes in competitive landscape).

Eligibility Requirements :
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without restriction.
Must be willing to take a drug test and post-offer physical (if required).
Must be 18 years of age or older.
Data Scientist II
Requirements
BS degree, with four-plus (4+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
MS degree with two-plus (2+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
PhD degree with zero to two (0-2) years relevant industry experience.
Scientific degree in quantitative discipline such as data science, mathematics, computer science, bioinformatics, etc.",4.2,BI Fremont,"Fremont, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1885.0,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,170.0,CA,139.0,1,0,0,0,0
"R&D Data Scientist - Minneapolis, MN","$99K
/yr","Job Description:
General Mills is seeking a Data Scientist to join the Data Science & Modeling team within the Innovation, Technology, and Quality (ITQ) function. The ITQ function is the center of science innovation, product development, and quality activities for the company.

In this role, you will be a key player on a team that is solving business problems within a data-rich science and engineering environment. You will have the opportunity to blend computer science, statistics, mathematics, modeling, and technology to transform data into actionable insights that drive business results.

You will join a successful, multi-talented, functional analytics team and collaborate with partners inside and outside General Mills to further the growth and impact of data science on our business.

KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
Work with teams to solve a wide range of problems using data
This includes an emphasis on product development, quality in manufacturing, nutrition science, consumer and market research, and other scientific domains of ITQ
Consult with scientists and engineers to translate and summarize complex analyses into actionable insights and recommendations that directly solve problems and influence business decisions
Develop statistical and machine learning models with Python, R, or other languages and tools
You will have the opportunity to scale analytics solutions for big data using Google Cloud Platform, working with a wide range of open-source tools
Train, validate, and deploy deep learning algorithms to deliver new measures and data outcomes that drive deeper understanding for consumer liking, product & package design performance and product quality
Partner to build Generative AI-enhanced software applications to unlock actionable insights on ITQ data

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Ph.D. in Statistics, Data Science, or Computer Science with a dissertation focus in analytics
M.S. in Statistics, Data Science, or Computer Science and 1-2 years work experience in analytics
Demonstrated ability to define problems and deliver solutions proactively against business or technical challenges
Good communication skills, with the ability to collaborate and build relationships in-person and virtually
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform data into advanced analytic solutions
Proficiency in SQL scripting languages, and experience with relational databases such as Big Query and Oracle
Experience with an analytics programming language (e.g., R or Python), and with source code repositories such as Git

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience working within a global team
Familiarity with a cloud enterprise data and computing platform (GCP, AWS, Azure)
Experience working with in an R&D or scientific organization, or experience with food industry applications

ADDITIONAL CONSIDERATIONS
This position is located in Minneapolis, MN and will not consider remote working arrangements
International relocation or international remote working arrangements (outside of the US) will not be considered
Applicants for this position must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis as General Mills will not sponsor applicants for this position for work visas
Company Overview:
We exist to make food the world loves. But we do more than that. Our company is a place that prioritizes being a force for good, a place to expand learning, explore new perspectives and reimagine new possibilities, every day. We look for people who want to bring their best — bold thinkers with big hearts who challenge one other and grow together. Because becoming the undisputed leader in food means surrounding ourselves with people who are hungry for what’s next.",4.1,General Mills,"Golden Valley, MN",10000+ Employees,1866.0,Company - Public,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,99.0,MN,158.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","DEPARTMENT: Analytics
JOB TITLE: Data Scientist
REPORTS TO: Director of Analytics

WHO WE ARE: Nuvative is a parent company that is helping businesses meet their goals through innovative technology and impactful employees. To recruit and retain top-notch talent, we consciously work to make and keep Nuvative an employer of choice. We provide our employees with a culture of kindness, fairness, learning and development, contribution, collaboration, diversity, innovative and fun.
JOB PURPOSE: We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our Wichita office who will develop and implement advanced analytics for analyzing data problems surrounding the day-to-day business and provide solutions across a range of functions. This includes customer segmentation, optimization, predictive analytics, and machine learning based decision making. They will also utilize machine learning solutions, along with advanced statistical math and algorithms, to provide accurate and timely data support, analysis, and maintenance on a variety of models, reports, and projects. The Data Scientist works closely with the other Data Scientists on analysis and prediction of trends while supporting cross-functional teams on the day-to-day delivery of projects and initiatives.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Contribute using SQL and R or Python languages to the design, development, and maintenance of ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc. to drive key business decisions.
Find, clean, and integrate data into usable and helpful information.
Identifies and utilizes machine learning, data analysis, and measurements effectively to identify performance trends, shortfalls.
Identify campaigns, strategies, and processes that drive highest results.
Turn data into insight: segment, cluster, model and mine to better understand behaviors and trends.
Analyze why things happened and predict what could happen in the future based on data.
Identify gaps in current data systems, drive and contribute to development of systems to bridge gap.
Plans and executes ongoing strategies including maximization of technologies and processes.
Responding with urgency to high priority requests from senior business leaders.
Adhere to professional conduct standards as defined by company guidelines.
Take initiative to make things better and provide solutions for challenges.
Demonstrate commitment to continued personal and professional improvement.
Supports management and advocates in day-to-day operations.
Anticipate operational needs based on volume/expansion and make recommendations.
Drive change – produce clear, understandable visualizations and reports to share with Senior Management.
Any other duties as assigned.",3.4,"Nuvative, Inc.","Wichita, KS",1 to 50 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,96.0,KS,17.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist-ESI Solutions,"$136K
/yr","Job Family:
Data Science Consulting

Travel Required:
Up to 10%

Clearance Required:
Ability to Obtain Public Trust
** Please note that this job posting is for a proposal of a potential client and is not reflective of an awarded job. In addition, we are only collecting resumes and interviewing based off the skillset and qualifications listed. ***
What You Will Do:
Our consultants on the ESI Solutions - Data and Analytics team help clients maximize the value of their data and automate business processes. This high performing team works with clients to implement the full spectrum of data analytics and data science, from data architecture and storage to data engineering and querying, to data visualization and dashboarding, to predictive analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence as well as intelligent automation. Our services enable our clients to define their information strategy, enable mission critical insights and data-driven decision making, reduce cost and complexity, increase trust, and improve operational effectiveness.
Our team supports Federal Civilian, State and Local, and Energy Provider clients through performing data science, analytics, data wrangling, statistical analysis, and machine learning. We focus on client services, while also supporting business development, internal firm initiatives, and ongoing professional development.

What You Will Need:
U.S. citizenship and ability to obtain a Public Trust clearance
Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative and computational discipline (e.g., data science, business analytics, economics, statistics, computer science, etc.) AND 3+ years of experience performing data science and analytics (e.g., data visualization, statistical analysis, predictive analysis, and machine learning) with special emphasis on data aggregation/synthesis, data wrangling, prepping data for model consumption; Or
Masters degree in a highly quantitative and computational discipline AND 2+ years of experience performing data science and analytics (e.g., data visualization, statistical analysis, predictive analysis, and machine learning) with special emphasis on data aggregation/synthesis, data wrangling, prepping data for model consumption
Proficiency using open source programming such as R or Python
Proficiency using Power BI, Tableau, Qlik, or Elastic X-Pack for data visualization and developing dashboards
Ability to design and deliver solutions with autonomy, working collaboratively as part of a team
Strong communication/presentation skills and ability to explain technical topics to non-technical audiences
Strong consulting skills: identifying and addressing client needs, building relationships, driving initiatives forward
Ability to travel as needed
Candidates must be local to the DMV area and capable of working onsite in Guidehouse office 1x per week

What Would Be Nice To Have:
Knowledge of or experience with cloud solutions for data science, such as Azure or AWS
Demonstrated work experience supporting Federal Civilian, State and Local Government, or Energy Provider clients
Ability to support business development including RFP/RFQ/RFI responses involving data science / analytics
The annual salary range for this position is $109,100.00-$163,700.00. Compensation decisions depend on a wide range of factors, including but not limited to skill sets, experience and training, security clearances, licensure and certifications, and other business and organizational needs.

What We Offer:
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Student Loan PayDown
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program
Mobility Stipend
About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",3.6,Guidehouse,"McLean, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,136.0,VA,6.0,1,0,0,1,0
Social Research Associate II - Population Health Data Scientist,"$72K
/yr","WELCOME TO CHATHAM COUNTY'S APPLICATION PROCESS.
To Apply: Become a part of the best local government in North Carolina click ""Apply"" in the top right corner.
All sections of the application, including work experience, MUST be completed. Please include the last ten (10) years of employment history. Incomplete applications may be rejected. Applications are stored on a secure site accessible only by authorized personnel. Your application can be saved and used to apply for more than one (1) job opening.
Chatham County is an equal opportunity employer and will consider reasonable accommodations as required by law. Chatham County participates in E-Verify and will provide the federal government with your Form I-9 information to confirm that you are authorized to work in the U.S.
Chatham County does not offer sponsorship of job applicants for employment-based visas or any other work authorization for our positions at this time.
Please Note: After submitting your application:
Log into your GovernmentJobs account daily. You will receive emails and notices from hiring managers asking you to complete tasks. You do not want to miss these.
The references you provided will be asked to complete a form. This does NOT mean you will be interviewed. It is an automated process in NeoGov.
We recommend you sign up for text message alerts when you create your account.
If you have issues with submitting your application, please contact Neogov Applicant Support at 1-855-524-5627.
Return to the Chatham County Homepage.
Job Description
Do you possess strong organizational skills and a data-driven mindset? Are you passionate about public health and the trends that influence it? Are you looking for an organization that recognizes your individuality and encourages personal development alongside a balanced work-life environment? If your answer is yes, seize this opportunity!

The primary purpose of this position is to develop and organize an in-house system of collecting, monitoring, analyzing, and reporting data on local health status, factors affecting health, and health department services, drawing on resources both within the department as well as from state and other resources. Evaluation of health status indicators, mortality and morbidity trends, and variables affecting health in preparation for communicating findings to community leaders, decision-makers, and government officials are essential components of this position. The position supports the needs of all divisions of the agency in collecting and analyzing data to support programmatic needs, and works with communicable disease, environmental health, health promotion staff, and community partners to collect, analyze, and present data through reports, presentations, and online resources, such as data dashboards. The position is responsible for overseeing the Community Assessment process and composing the report, as well as the Chatham Community Cohort Assessment and State of the County Health Reports. It also leads the Epi Team and assists with the coordination of the Chatham Health Alliance and subcommittees.
Essential Functions
Identifies and accesses a variety of health data resources;
Maintains a standardized data collection method to identify county health indicators and evaluate Health Department services;
Analyzes data collected to assess progress toward goals/objectives and identification of gaps;
Maintains records and prepares reports and correspondence related to data analysis;
Develops systems for collecting and organizing raw data into forms suitable for analysis;
Assures quality control of data;
Monitors county-wide health data indicators and variables affecting health;
Assesses progress toward the Healthy People 2030 goals and updates statistics as necessary;
Provides leadership in developing and implementing the community assessment using a multi-agency team, surveys, and qualitative approaches;
Organizes results of data analysis into written form for publication, presentation, and dissemination;
Produces the community assessment report;
Produces and distributes an annual report card on Chatham County's health status;
Develops and updates data dashboards with current Community Assessment data;
Supports and assists the Health Department staff in developing and implementing an evaluation plan for services/divisions of the Health Department;
Designs and uses data collection instruments, such as survey forms and questionnaires;
Develops and conducts systematic reviews of leading health indicators;
Designs data collection instruments for evaluation of current and new programs;
Trains other staff on data entry and quality control when appropriate;
Responsible for assuring comparability of statistics across divisions within the Health Department;
Serves as data and assessment resource for the broader community and community partners, representing the Health Department on steering committees or other groups as they relate to assessment;
Oversees and coordinates Epi Team, including planning meetings, and developing the agenda with Epi Team members;
Manages Epi Team strategic plan;
Works with Epi Team members to track data and develop reports;
Monitors emerging threats to public health and recommends strategies to respond to and prevent them;
Serves on health department committees, as needed;
Support the Emergency Preparedness & Response program, including leading tasks as needed;
Performs other duties as assigned.
Minimum Qualifications
Master’s degree in public health or public health work with a major in public health and two years of experience in public health education; Bachelor’s degree with a major in public health; or an equivalent combination of education and experience which may include one year of experience in gathering, editing, and analyzing data for social research; or an equivalent combination of education and experience. Graduate coursework in an area related to the work to be performed may be substituted for experience.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities
Knowledge of and ability to evaluate surveillance systems;
Ability to design and conduct epidemiological, health behavior, and attitude studies;
Knowledge and experience with statistical software;
Ability to interpret and evaluate surveillance data;
Effective oral and written communication skills;
Ability to prepare clear and concise reports;
Ability to take initiative and work semi-independently;
Skilled in data editing, data analysis, and report writing using PC-based applications such as Excel, Microsoft Word, and Access;
Knowledge of design methodology and statistical methods used in epidemiological studies;
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with County officials, department heads, peers, associates, and the general public.

Physical Requirements
This work requires the occasional exertion of up to 10 pounds of force; work regularly requires sitting, speaking, hearing and repetitive motions, frequently requires touching or feeling and occasionally requires standing, walking, climbing, balancing, reaching, pushing, pulling and lifting; work has standard vision requirements; work requires vocal communication to express or exchange ideas orally; work requires hearing to perceive information at normal spoken levels; work requires preparing and analyzing written or computer data; work has no exposure to environmental conditions; work is generally performed in a moderately noisy location (e.g. business office, light traffic).

Special Requirements
Must possess a valid North Carolina driver's license.
Chatham County is fully committed to equal employment opportunity (EEO) principles and issues this anti-discrimination/EEO compliance clause to support and maintain employee’s rights and responsibilities relating to equal employment. The core of equal employment opportunity is the right to work and advance on the basis of merit, ability, and potential, free from prejudice or discrimination. In accordance with the applicable anti-discrimination statutes, executive orders, and other authorities, Chatham County protects employees against discrimination, to the fullest extent of law, on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, political affiliation, whistleblower activity, parental status, and military service (past, present, or future), and against retaliation for participation in EEO activity or opposition to discrimination.",5.0,"Chatham County, NC","Pittsboro, NC",Unknown,,Government,Municipal Agencies,Government & Public Administration,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,72.0,NC,,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$103K
/yr","About DMI:
DMI is a leading global provider of digital services working at the intersection of public and private sectors. With broad capabilities across IT managed services, cybersecurity, cloud migration and application development, DMI provides on-site and remote support to clients within governments, healthcare, financial services, transportation, manufacturing, and other critical infrastructure sectors. DMI has grown to over 2,100+ employees globally and has been continually recognized as a Top Workplace in both regional and national categories.
About the Opportunity:
DMI, LLC is seeking a Data Scientist to join us. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will be responsible for designing and implementing advanced data models, analytics solutions, and machine learning algorithms that enable us to deliver accurate, actionable insights from large telecom datasets. You will leverage your deep understanding of data science, statistical analysis, and machine learning to solve complex business problems, such as telecom expense optimization, billing reconciliation, and usage forecasting. Your work will directly impact product innovation, improving the decision-making process for both our internal teams and external customers.

In this role, you will collaborate with cross-functional teams, including Database Administrators, Developers, Product Managers, and Customer Success Teams. You will also have the opportunity to shape the data strategy that powers the next generation of features within our Telecom Expense Management platform.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Data Analysis and Modeling:
Analyze large-scale datasets, primarily telecom billing and usage data, to uncover insights and develop data-driven strategies for improving expense management and customer outcomes.
Build, deploy, and refine predictive models using machine learning techniques such as regression, classification, clustering, and time series forecasting, to support customer cost optimization and forecasting needs.
Design advanced statistical models and algorithms to automate error detection and anomaly recognition, improving the accuracy and efficiency of billing reconciliations.
Machine Learning and Predictive Analytics:
Develop machine learning models that can forecast telecom usage patterns, identify cost-saving opportunities, and detect billing discrepancies.
Continuously improve and retrain machine learning models to enhance accuracy, performance, and scalability.
Create robust systems for identifying patterns in telecom data, such as fraud detection, usage anomalies, and outlier identification to mitigate risks for our clients.
Data Infrastructure and Pipeline Development:
Work closely with the Database Administrator and Development Teams to design, build, and maintain data pipelines that efficiently process telecom data from multiple sources, ensuring data quality and integrity.
Collaborate on the architecture of large-scale ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes, ensuring the efficient handling of high-volume telecom billing and usage data.
Use cloud-based tools and services, primarily in AWS, to automate and optimize data workflows, ensuring seamless integration with the platform.
Business Intelligence and Reporting:
Develop intuitive and insightful dashboards, reports, and visualizations using tools like Tableau, Power BI, or Python-based libraries to translate complex data into actionable insights for both internal stakeholders and external clients.
Provide insights and recommendations to drive product decisions, such as enhancements to cost analytics and telecom optimization tools, based on data trends and user behavior.
Collaborate with the Product and Customer Success teams to tailor data-driven solutions to customer needs, improving the overall user experience of the TEM platform.
Collaboration and Thought Leadership:
Partner with cross-functional teams, including Engineering, Product Management, and Service Delivery, to ensure data solutions align with customer needs and business objectives.
Provide guidance to junior data scientists or data engineers, fostering a culture of learning and innovation within the team.
Stay up to date with the latest trends and advancements in data science, machine learning, and the telecom industry to keep the company at the forefront of innovation.
Innovation and Data Strategy:
Identify and explore new opportunities for leveraging advanced data science techniques to expand and improve the platform’s features and capabilities.
Influence the company’s overall data strategy by recommending new ways to enhance data processing, integration, and analytics, contributing to long-term product innovation.
Lead initiatives to explore and evaluate emerging technologies in data science, cloud computing, and AI that could bring a competitive advantage to the platform.
Qualifications:
Education and Years of Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related field. Master’s Degree in a relevant field is preferred but not required.
Certifications: Relevant certifications in Data Science, Machine Learning, or AWS Cloud Services are highly desirable.
Experience: 3+ years of experience as a Data Scientist, Data Analyst, or similar role, working with large-scale data and developing data models.
Required and Desired Skills/Certifications:
Python Proficiency: Proficiency in Python and relevant libraries (e.g., Pandas, NumPy, Scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch) for data analysis, model development, and machine learning.
SQL Proficiency: Strong SQL skills, with the ability to write and optimize complex queries for data extraction, aggregation, and transformation from relational databases.
Machine Learning: Hands-on experience with machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, clustering, time series forecasting) and tools such as Scikit-learn, XGBoost, and LightGBM.
Data Visualization: Proficiency in using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Power BI, or Domo to create clear and impactful data visualizations.
Statistical Analysis: Strong background in statistical methods, probability theory, hypothesis testing, and multivariate analysis.
Cloud (AWS): Experience working with AWS services such as S3, Redshift, SageMaker, and Lambda to build and deploy models in the cloud.
Telecom Industry: Familiarity with telecom data and experience working with billing, usage records, and cost analysis in the telecom space is a strong plus.
Big Data: Experience working with big data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, or Kafka to manage and process large datasets.
Advanced Machine Learning: Experience with deep learning frameworks like TensorFlow or PyTorch and knowledge of advanced topics such as natural language processing (NLP) and reinforcement learning is a plus.
DevOps and Automation: Experience integrating machine learning models into production environments using DevOps pipelines and automation tools.
Data Governance: Familiarity with data governance best practices, including data quality, data privacy, and compliance standards.
Agile Methodology: Experience working in Agile development environments, participating in sprint planning, and collaborating in cross-functional teams.
Min Citizenship Status Required: Must be a U.S. Citizen

Physical Requirements:
Ability to work in an office environment.
Ability to sit for long periods of time.
Ability to utilize a keyboard and mouse.
Ability to work in front of a computer screen for long periods of time.
Location: Cincinnati, OH

Working at DMI
DMI is a diverse, prosperous, and rewarding place to work. Being part of the DMI family means we care about your wellbeing. We offer a variety of perks and benefits that help meet various interests and needs, while still having the opportunity to work directly with several of our award-winning, Fortune 1000 clients. The following categories make up your DMI wellbeing:
Convenience/Concierge - Virtual visits through health insurance, pet insurance, commuter benefits, discount tickets for movies, travel, and many other items to provide convenience.
Development – Annual performance management, continuing education, and tuition assistance, internal job opportunities along with career enrichment and advancement to help each employee with their professional and personal development.
Financial – Generous 401k matches both pre-tax and post-tax (ROTH) contributions along with financial wellness education, EAP, Life Insurance and Disability help provide financial stability for each DMI employee.
Recognition – Great achievements do not go unnoticed by DMI through Annual Awards ceremony, service anniversaries, peer-to-peer acknowledgment, employee referral bonuses.
Wellness – Healthcare benefits, Wellness programs, Flu Shots, Biometric screenings, and several other wellness options.
Employees are valued for their talents and contributions. We all take pride in helping our customers achieve their goals, which in turn contributes to the overall success of the company. The company does and will take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals with disabilities and protected veterans, and to treat qualified individuals without discrimination based on their physical or mental disability or veteran status. DMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minority/Female/Veterans/Disability. DMI maintains a drug-free workplace.

***************** No Agencies Please *****************

Applicants selected may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. US citizenship may be required for some positions.

#LI-EK1",3.6,DMI,"Cincinnati, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,2002.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,103.0,OH,22.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist,"$76K
/yr","JOB DESCRIPTION AND POSITION REQUIREMENTS:
The Department of Plant Science is seeking a Data Scientist to join GROW a dynamic research and extension network for integrated weed management. GROW conducts research on several IWM and ecological weed management tactics including cover crops and harvest-time weed seed control across a range of environments and is engaged in development of real-time weed and crop mapping systems using computer vision and artificial intelligence.
Primary responsibilities will include analyzing data, writing, and publishing research results in scholarly peer-reviewed journals and extension publications. This responsibility requires management and analysis of large agronomic and weed ecology datasets generated from multi-state GROW research projects and long-term datasets generated from cropping systems experiments. The successful candidate will benefit from significant professional networking opportunities by playing a central role in the GROW project, which is national in scope.
This is a limited term position funded for one year from date of hire with good possibility of refunding.
Location and mentoring structure : This position will be remote or located at The Pennsylvania State University , University Park, PA and will be principally advised by John Wallace. Occasional travel to Beltsville, MD may be necessary to engage with scholarship generated within the USDA-ARS-BARC Sustainable Agricultural Systems Laboratory.
Background and Qualifications : Minimum requirements for this position include a Bachelor's Degree and 1 or more years of relevant experience, or an equivalent combination of education and experience . We are looking for candidates with excellent organizational and quantitative skills, a demonstrated record of research productivity documented with peer-reviewed publications, and expertise in any of the following areas: weed ecology and population dynamics, multi-tactic weed management, agronomic crop production, agroecology, data science, and statistics. A M.Sc. is required in Weed Science, Agronomy, Soil Science, Plant Ecology, Environmental Sciences, Precision Agriculture, or related fields. Must pass a Federal background check.
This position requires that you operate a motor vehicle as a part of your job duties. A valid driver’s license and successful completion of a motor vehicle records check will be required in addition to standard background checks.
Application materials: Applications will require a resume (CV), letter of interest, and names and contact information of three references. Potential candidates should contact Dr. John Wallace (jmw309@psu.edu) to express interest and apply online at https://hr.psu.edu/careers under REQ_0000061338.
Review of Applicants and Start Date: Review will begin immediately and will remain open until a suitable candidate is identified. Starting date is negotiable.
Salary will commensurate with education and experience. Penn State offers competitive benefits to full-time employees, including medical, dental, vision and retirement plans, in addition to generous vacation time, sick time, and paid holidays.
The Pennsylvania State University is committed to and accountable for advancing diversity, equity, and inclusion in all of its forms. We embrace individual uniqueness, foster a culture of inclusive excellence that supports both broad and specific diversity initiatives, leverage the educational and institutional benefits of diversity, and engage all individuals to help them thrive. We value inclusive excellence as a core strength and an essential element of our public service mission.
The salary range for this position, including all possible grades is:
$61,800.00 - $89,600.00
Salary Structure - additional information on Penn State's job and salary structure.
CAMPUS SECURITY CRIME STATISTICS:
Pursuant to the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act and the Pennsylvania Act of 1988, Penn State publishes a combined Annual Security and Annual Fire Safety Report (ASR). The ASR includes crime statistics and institutional policies concerning campus security, such as those concerning alcohol and drug use, crime prevention, the reporting of crimes, sexual assault, and other matters. The ASR is available for review here .
Employment with the University will require successful completion of background check(s) in accordance with University policies.
EEO IS THE LAW
Penn State is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer, and is committed to providing employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please contact 814-865-1473.",4.2,Penn State University,"University Park, PA",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,76.0,PA,169.0,0,0,0,0,1
Sr Data Scientist,"$137K
/yr","Data Science is at the core of our business. Our Data Scientists have dedicated themselves to excellence in applied quantitative disciplines such as mathematics, statistics and physics. We are seeking Senior Data Scientists to join us in our attempt to solve the extremely challenging problem of modeling and predicting the financial markets using sophisticated machine learning techniques. If you are passionate about collaborating with a world-renowned team of Data Scientists, Engineers and Researchers Voloridge could be the home for you.
You will work alongside prominent Data Scientists, Kaggle Grandmasters and a KDD cup winner at an award-winning investment management firm managing over $7B in assets. We reward our employees with an exceptional compensation package that includes wealthy benefit plans and profit-sharing bonuses. Our office in beautiful Jupiter, Florida has water views, fully stocked kitchens with fresh fruit, snacks and salad bars, lounge and gaming areas, onsite massage rooms, free garage parking and more. We seek out only the best of the best talent to join our brilliant, collaborative, and hard-working team and boast a retention rate of 92%.
Job Responsibilities
Building and evaluating modern numerical/modeling techniques
Working daily with complex, large-scale datasets
Collaborative research projects requiring deep thinking, technical skills, and ingenuity
Keeping abreast of the latest research related to data science
Minimum Requirements
Deep understanding of modern machine learning techniques and algorithms
Must demonstrate exceptional aptitude in descriptive and inferential statistics
Extremely detail-oriented and self-motivated
Experience with time series data
Extensive experience working with large data
Creative thinker and self-learner, able to demonstrate extraordinary critical thinking and analytical skills
Competent skills in programming languages such as Python, R, C/#/++
Ability to communicate actionable results with present senior leadership
Advanced degree in Physics, Statistics, Mathematics or other quantitative disciplines or equivalent experience
Ability to work onsite in our Jupiter, FL office
Preferred Skills and Previous Experience
Outstanding achievements such as Math competitions, Kaggle – Grandmaster/Master, exceptional scores on SAT/GRE/LSAT, Chess Grandmaster, etc.
Experience with relational SQL databases
Compensation and Benefits

Relocation assistance available for the right candidate
Highly competitive base salary
Profit sharing bonus
Health, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance
401K
Licenses Required None required
Additional Information

Voloridge Investment Management is an SEC registered investment advisor. A private investment company founded in 2009, our mission is to deliver superior risk-adjusted returns for qualified investors, using advanced proprietary modeling technology, conservative investment tactics and sophisticated risk management. Our market neutral equities strategy takes both long and short positions in the most actively traded equities, and is designed to capture alpha while limiting exposure to directional markets risks. Our futures strategy takes both long and short positions in the most actively traded global futures and is also built to maximize alpha captured across all futures markets traded while capping exposure to any sector at a given time.
Voloridge Investment Management is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants are encouraged to apply and will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other legally protected characteristic or status.",4.6,Voloridge Investment Management,"Jupiter, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2009.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,137.0,FL,15.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product","$315K
/yr","About the Team
Earlier in 2022, we introduced DALL-E 2, AI that creates images from text. In 2021 we launched Copilot, powered by Codex, in partnership with GitHub – and developers love it. In 2020 we introduced GPT-3 which the MIT Technology Review listed as one of its 10 Breakthrough Technologies of the year (alongside mRNA vaccines).Our product team is bringing OpenAI technologies to consumers and businesses around the world. We recently launched ChatGPT and ChatGPT Enterprise.
About the Role
As an early member of our Data Scientist team on the Applied Product team, you will establish the data-driven product development culture for either consumer products or developer platform at OpenAI. You should expect to define our north-star metrics, design our first A/B tests, and establish source-of-truth dashboards that the entire company can use to answer their own product questions. Most importantly, you should expect to be a core member of the product development team building our first party offerings.This role is based in our San Francisco HQ. We offer relocation assistance to new employees.
In this role, you will:
Embed with the product development team as a trusted partner, uncovering new ways to improve the product and drive growth
Define and interpret A/B tests that help answer critical questions about the impact of model and UX changes to our product
Establish a data-driven product development culture by driving the definition, tracking, and operationalizing of feature-, product-, and company-level metrics
Develop and socialize dashboards, reports, and other ways of enabling the team and company to answer product data questions in a self-serve way
You might thrive in this role if you have:
5+ years experience in a quantitative role navigating highly ambiguous environments, ideally as a founding data scientist or product analyst at a hyper-growth product company or research org
Proposed, designed, and run rigorous experiments with clear insights and product recommendations utilizing SQL and Python
Defined, implemented, and operationalized new feature and product-level metrics from scratch
Excellent communication skills with demonstrated ability to communicate with product managers, engineers, and executives alike
Strategic insights beyond the paradigm of statistical significance testing
You could be an especially great fit if you have:
Demonstrated prior experience in NLP, large language models, or generative AI
Strong programming background, with ability to run simulations and prototype variants
Experience validating quantitative insights with qualitative methods (e.g. surveys, UXR)

About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,315.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist Engineer,"$146K
/yr","Company Overview:
MACOM designs and manufactures semiconductor products for Data Center, Telecommunication and Industrial and Defense applications. Headquartered in Lowell, Massachusetts, MACOM has design centers and sales offices throughout North America, Europe and Asia. MACOM is certified to the ISO9001 international quality standard and ISO14001 environmental management standard.
MACOM has more than 65 years of application expertise with multiple design centers, Si, GaAs and InP fabrication, manufacturing, assembly and test, and operational facilities throughout North America, Europe, and Asia. Click here to view our facilities. In addition, MACOM offers foundry services that represents a key core competency within our business.
MACOM sells and distributes products globally via a sales channel comprised of a direct field sales force, authorized sales representatives and leading industry distributors. Our sales team is trained across all of our products to give our customers insights into our entire portfolio.

Data Scientist Engineer

Job Description:
Responsible for investigating existing systems and providing architectural guidance, technological recommendations, and transitions strategies for the MACOM engineering data system and manufacturing execution system. The Data Scientist Engineer will improve and maintain large-scale data solutions that make use of on-premises databases and cloud solutions which organize disparate real time data streams from globally deployed test systems for future analysis. This work is the foundation for data access and querying according to the business needs. Must be passionate about data and have a strong understanding of the related initiatives such as data governance, quality, security, and processes. Must have a hands-on approach to database warehouse and cloud data lake technologies. A strong understand of the benefits and tradeoffs of technical stack and design decisions in support of manufacturing and engineering stakeholders is important. Will work with a highly collaborative team focused on building and supporting systems and solutions from the ground up.

Key Responsibilities:
Individual in this role will be working in the Big Data Team to improve data accessibility and data quality across the organization
Support various teams across MACOM with their data needs
Develop and deploy data pipeline to collect data from various sources and store in cloud
Assist in development of tools that allow users to access data stored in cloud and on-prem databases.
Collaborate with other members of the team to enable creative problem solving.

Key Competencies & Skills required:
Hands on experience with AWS platforms and tools (including but not limited to S3, QuickSight, Lambda, Athena, SAM)
Fluent in SQL and at scripting languages (Python, Java preferred)
Experience with building data pipeline and ETL
Strong understanding of relational and no-SQL databases
Knowledge of data ingestion using spark for supporting various file types like Json, Xml, Csv and databases
Able to architect high availability, high performance systems with zero risk of data loss
Knowledge of development methodologies like Agile, Scrum, DevOps and test-driven development.
Knowledge of API, Apache Spark, Grafana, Loki, Git, Docker, Linux
Experience uniting disparate legacy data sources into a unified platform for analysis and operations
AWS certifications a plus
Data Engineer certification a plus
Experience in the semiconductor industry is a plus

Required Qualifications and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related field required (Master’s degree preferred)
Proven ability to work in distributed systems
Must be able to develop creative solutions to problems
Strong analytical and creative thinking skills for effective and timely decision-making.
Strong communication skills – oral, written, and presentation.
Strong inter-personal skills and ability to motivate team members.
Ability to make work fun and contribute to the collaborative environment of the team
Due to ITAR regulations, candidate must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident

EEO:

MACOM is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. MACOM will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, marital status, or any other category protected under applicable law.

Reasonable Accommodation:
MACOM is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with physical and mental disabilities. If you have a disability and are in need of a reasonable accommodation with respect to any part of the application process please call +1-978-656-2500 or email HR_Ops@MACOM.com. Provide your name, phone number and the position title and location in which you are interested, and nature of accommodation needed, and we will get back to you. We also work with current employees who request or need reasonable accommodation in order to perform the essential functions of their jobs.",3.7,M/A Com Technolgy Solutions,"Lowell, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1950.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,146.0,MA,74.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist Product Manager,"$130K
/yr","At Lilly, we unite caring with discovery to make life better for people around the world. We are a global healthcare leader headquartered in Indianapolis, Indiana. Our employees around the world work to discover and bring life-changing medicines to those who need them, improve the understanding and management of disease, and give back to our communities through philanthropy and volunteerism. We give our best effort to our work, and we put people first. We’re looking for people who are determined to make life better for people around the world.
Organization Overview
At Lilly USA Data and Analytics, we are dedicated to using innovative technology to drive innovation and improve patient outcomes. Our team collaborates across various departments to deliver impactful solutions that enhance our digital presence and operational efficiency.
What You Will Do:
Own the development and implementation of AI models and algorithms to solve complex business problems.
Collaborate with multi-functional teams to find opportunities for AI-driven improvements.
Design, develop, and deploy machine learning models and AI solutions.
Analyze and interpret data to provide actionable insights and recommendations.
Stay updated with the latest advancements in AI and machine learning technologies.
Ensure the scalability and robustness of AI solutions.
How You Will Succeed:
Understanding of the technical, ethical, and user experience challenges and opportunities of generative AI systems and models.
Leadership qualities and the ability to make significant, impactful decisions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent communication and teamwork abilities.
Knowledge of natural language processing (NLP) and computer vision.
Familiarity with cloud platforms like AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud.
Your Basic Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, Data Science, or a related field.
1+ years of experience working with AI systems, preferably generative AI systems
2+ years of product management experience delivering end-to-end products from conceptualization to launch, ideally at a technology company working on ML/AI based products
Deep understanding of ML tech stacks for building, deployment, customization, and integration.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or Java.
Experience with machine learning frameworks like TensorFlow, PyTorch, or scikit-learn.
What You Should Bring:
Master's degree in a relevant STEM field preferred.
Experience with AWS, Azure or Databricks
Experience implementing Machine Learning Operations (ML Ops) frameworks that take models from proof of value to mature and automated.
Familiarity with data manipulation libraries (e.g., Pandas, NumPy) and experience with SQL and NoSQL databases.
Experience with Agile Development, CI/CD, Jenkins, Github, and Automation platforms.
Demonstrated ability to analyze large, complex data domains and craft practical solutions for subsequent data exploitation via analytics.
Demonstrated ability to communicate with a geographically dispersed group of business and technical colleagues
Team Values:
Innovate: Embrace new ideas and technologies to drive continuous improvement.
Accelerate: Work effectively with team members and stakeholders to achieve common goals.
Include: Uphold the highest standards of ethical behavior and transparency.
Deliver: Strive for excellence in all aspects of your work.
About the Organization:
Lilly IT builds and maintains capabilities using cutting edge technologies like most prominent tech companies. What differentiates Lilly IT is that we create new possibilities through tech to advance our purpose – creating medicines that make life better for people around the world, like data-driven drug discovery and connected clinical trials. We hire the best technology professionals from a variety of backgrounds, so they can bring an assortment of knowledge, skills, and diverse thinking to deliver innovative solutions in every area of our business.

The LillyUSA Tech@Lilly team is at the forefront of leveraging data and technology to launch new medicines to market, raise awareness, and gain access to medication for appropriate patients. With a deep technical and business understanding, working across all therapeutic areas/disease states, we design and implement digital solutions to power our business, creating best-in-class customer engagements that improve patient outcomes and deliver business results.
Lilly is dedicated to helping individuals with disabilities to actively engage in the workforce, ensuring equal opportunities when vying for positions. If you require accommodation to submit a resume for a position at Lilly, please complete the accommodation request form (https://careers.lilly.com/us/en/workplace-accommodation) for further assistance. Please note this is for individuals to request an accommodation as part of the application process and any other correspondence will not receive a response.

Lilly is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of age, race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
Our employee resource groups (ERGs) offer strong support networks for their members and help our company develop talented individuals for future leadership roles. Our current groups include: Africa, Middle East, Central Asia Network, African American Network, Chinese Culture Network, Early Career Professionals, Japanese International Leadership Network (JILN), Lilly India Network, Organization of Latinos at Lilly, PRIDE (LGBTQ + Allies), Veterans Leadership Network, Women’s Network, Working and Living with Disabilities. Learn more about all of our groups.
#WeAreLilly",4.1,Lilly,"Indianapolis, IN",10000+ Employees,1876.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,IN,148.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Working Hours : Full Time
Locations : Livonia, Michigan
Experience : 2+ Years

About the Role:
Soothsayer is seeking Data Scientist who has an interest in solving challenging ML/ AI problems. The Data Science team works on a variety of exciting analytics (ML, AI) projects.
Job Responsibilities
Solve cutting edge, challenging problems working alongside a great team of world class data scientists and analytics experts
Having a passion for solving interesting and challenging big data problems
Communicate results to scientific, business, and stakeholders
Mine data to prototype models for targeting and personalizatio
Collaborate with other engineers, data scientists
Key Skills
Python, Spark, Spark Mlib, SQL, insurance
Education & Experience
Masters or Ph.D. in computer science, Physics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or other quantitative/ Computational discipline.
2+ years hands-on industry work experience designing and building large-scale data, machine learning, and analytics applications and pipelines. Proficiency with Spark, Hadoop, Hive, and SQL
2+ years of INDUSTRY experience in analytics or ML or data science field.
2+ years of INDUSTRY experience with Python data analysis libraries (pandas, sklearn, numpy, scipy, and matplotlib), and Spark MLlib. Dimensionality reduction techniques such as PCA, SVD, embeddings etc.
2+ years of INDUSTRY experience with Data engineering experience, including SQL and manipulating large structured or unstructured datasets for analysis Strong hands-on experience in implementing machine learning algorithms and models Excellent data presentation skills
Experience working with GIT and shared codebases
Good to have
Prior work experience in the insurance
Prior experience in building Deep Learning models using Keras, TensorFlow etc.
Must to have
Ph.D. or Masters degree + 2 years of industry experience OR Bachelors degree + 5 years of industry experience
2 years of hands-on industry experience in Data Science/ ML
2 years of hands-on industry experience in python
1 year of hands-on industry experience in Spark MLlib
1 year of hands-on industry experience in SQL
Industry experience with large structured and unstructured datasets
Experience in building Deep Learning models using Keras, TensorFlow is a big plus
Insurance experience is a big plus
Soothsayer Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer and e-Verify Company.
Soothsayer Analytics is a Data Science company based out of Livonia, MI and offices in Columbus, OH and offshore in Hyderabad India. Advanced Analytics firm focused on Pattern Recognition and Unstructured Data.
Our team actively works with, creates, and researches cutting edge Data Science techniques. We approach each problem individually and architect custom solutions.
Our strength lies in our ability to build and productize proprietary algorithms and analytical tools.
Advised by 10 industry experts whose domain knowledge we leverage to better architect industry specific solutions.
Our delivery partners include 20+ Data Scientists with a combined 75 Patents and 300+ Publications.
We collaborate with this brain trust to keep us abreast of state-of-the-art techniques and to help deliver world-class results. We utilize cutting edge Machine Learning and Statistical Techniques to extract Hidden Insights and Patterns from Complex, High Dimensional, and Unstructured Data.
Our major clients include: DOW Chemicals, Ford, Visteon, D&B, Timken, US steels, Steelcase, Abercrombie, Express, Stanley Steemer, Whirlpool, AEP, NiSource, GEA, etc.
Soothsayer Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer and e-Verify Company.",3.3,Soothsayer Analytics,"Livonia, MI",Unknown,,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,MI,,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$109K
/yr","Base Pay Range: $80,800.00 - $137,400.00 Annually
Primary Location: USA-MI-Ann Arbor-KLA
KLA’s total rewards package for employees may also include participation in performance incentive programs and eligibility for additional benefits identified below. Interns are eligible for some of the benefits identified below. Our pay ranges are determined by role, level, and location. The range displayed above reflects the minimum and maximum pay for this position in the primary location identified in this posting. Actual pay depends on several factors, including location, job-related skills, experience, and relevant education level or training. If applicable, your recruiter can share more about the specific pay range for your preferred location during the hiring process.
Company Overview
KLA is a global leader in diversified electronics for the semiconductor manufacturing ecosystem. Virtually every electronic device in the world is produced using our technologies. No laptop, smartphone, wearable device, voice-controlled gadget, flexible screen, VR device or smart car would have made it into your hands without us. KLA invents systems and solutions for the manufacturing of wafers and reticles, integrated circuits, packaging, printed circuit boards and flat panel displays. The innovative ideas and devices that are advancing humanity all begin with inspiration, research and development. KLA focuses more than average on innovation and we invest 15% of sales back into R&D. Our expert teams of physicists, engineers, data scientists and problem-solvers work together with the world’s leading technology providers to accelerate the delivery of tomorrow’s electronic devices. Life here is exciting and our teams thrive on tackling really hard problems. There is never a dull moment with us.
Group/Division
KLA is well known for its high-performing business model which routinely produces significant profit margins and revenue. Key to supporting KLA business is the finance team that partners with corporate and global business organizations to provide expertise and guidance for developing and executing sound business models and practices. The Finance organization consists of operations and corporate finance teams. The operations finance team influences business decisions by gathering the best available operations information, distilling it and making recommendations to our management team on the best course of action. The corporate team provides a broad range of services, such as financial planning, corporate accounting, tax, industry analysis and benchmarking, internal audits, SEC reporting and merger and acquisition support.
Job Description/Preferred Qualifications
A Data Scientist is responsible for providing KLA executives and product groups across the company with critical data and analysis that helps them to make the better business decisions.
Job Description Responsibilities:
Developing and implementing databases and data collection systems which includes creation and management of databases and data collection systems that efficiently gather relevant information.
Identifying critical meaningful metrics and setting priorities: While collaborating with our internal customers to resolve most crucial Key Performance Indicators (critical metrics) to supervise, analyze, and establish priorities for the company.
Gathering information from original and secondary sources by acquiring comprehensive information for analysis from various sources, including primary and secondary sources.
Sorting and sanitizing data: Prior to analysis, data needs to be organized and cleansed to ensure accuracy and quality.
Identifying trends and patterns in large datasets: Apply sophisticated analytical techniques to model and uncover important trends and patterns hidden within extensive datasets.
Creating visual representations of data in the form of infographics, charts, PowerPoint slides, PowerBi representations: Employ data visualization tools to provide insights in a visually appealing and understandable format, enabling collaborators to easily absorb and comprehend understand sophisticated information. Excellent visualizations may also be able to be demonstrated externally in Investor Relations materials or in other presentations by c-suite executives.
Generating and modifying reports: Develop reports that summarize their findings, providing actionable insights and recommendations for decision-making purposes. These reports are continually refined and adjusted based on evolving data analysis requirements.
Building and maintaining PowerBI dashboards: Design and maintain interactive dashboards that offer real-time visualizations of critical metrics, allowing partners to monitor performance and make informed decisions.
Documenting data models, metrics, and infrastructure: Document the data models, metrics, and supporting infrastructure they create and maintain to ensure data integrity and facilitate collaboration
Minimum Qualifications
Doctorate (Academic) Degree and 0 years related work experience; Master's Level Degree and related work experience of 3 years; Bachelor's Level Degree and related work experience of 5 years.
Strong mathematical skills to help collect, measure, organize and analyze data
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Solid understanding of and experience with reporting packages (PowerBi), databases (SQL etc), programming (Python, R, XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
A high level of intellectual curiosity and a strong interest in understanding the semiconductor and electronics ecosystems
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Problem-solving skills
Accuracy and attention to detail
Strong verbal and written communication skills
The company offers a total rewards package that is competitive and comprehensive including but not limited to the following: medical, dental, vision, life, and other voluntary benefits, 401(K) including company matching, employee stock purchase program (ESPP), student debt assistance, tuition reimbursement program, development and career growth opportunities and programs, financial planning benefits, wellness benefits including an employee assistance program (EAP), paid time off and paid company holidays, and family care and bonding leave.
KLA is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or any other status protected by applicable law. We will ensure that qualified individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us at
talent.acquisition@kla.com
or at +1-408-352-2808 to request accommodation.",4.0,KLA,"Ann Arbor, MI",5001 to 10000 Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,109.0,MI,48.0,1,0,0,0,1
Expert Data Scientist,"$184K
/yr","Requisition ID # 161031

Job Category: Accounting / Finance
Job Level: Individual Contributor
Business Unit: Gas Engineering
Work Type: Hybrid
Job Location: San Ramon

Department Overview
The Risk Management team is responsible for overseeing the enterprise risk management practices within the Gas functional area. The team works closely with risk owners in asset management and operation groups to provide support to understand gas risks. The team also collaborates with the Enterprise Operations and Risk Management team to continue to mature and improve risk management practices within the company.

Position Summary
The successful candidate will be responsible for leading development and building statistical models, data analysis and generating visualizations using several analytical tools such as Python, R, Amazon Web Services (AWS), and Tableau to better understand, predict and manage PG&E’s risk in Gas. This position will combine asset performance research using internal and external data, along with financial information and risk management analysis. This position will also interact with other stakeholders outside the risk management department to facilitate the acquisition of data, determine its quality, and engage the risk owners and stakeholders on the development of quantitative risk models. As an Expert Data Scientist, it will also be required to effectively communicate the results and the model calculations to various PG&E personnel with different backgrounds (technical and non-technical) and to train other data scientists to do the same.

Position duties may include (but are not limited)-
Lead development and maintenance of quantitative risk models in support of enterprise risk management activities and regulatory proceedings.
Collaborate with Gas Operations risk owners and stakeholders to better understand their risks, available data, and provide solutions for the best modeling techniques.
Use risk model outcomes to support the portfolio prioritization process.
Be able to effectively communicate how the quantitative risk models work and explain the results to risk owners and the leadership team.
Create visualizations using R, Python or Tableau to communicate risk models results.
Extract useful statistics and insight from asset performance data to drive/support the quantitative risk assessment process.
Assess business implications associated with modeling and supports subject matter experts in the application of potential solutions.

This position is hybrid, working from your remote office and your assigned work location based on business need. The assigned work location will be within the PG&E Service Territory (San Ramon, CA)

PG&E is providing the salary range that the company in good faith believes it might pay for this position at the time of the job posting. This compensation range is specific to the locality of the job. The actual salary paid to an individual will be based on multiple factors, including, but not limited to, specific skills, education, licenses or certifications, experience, market value, geographic location, and internal equity. Although we estimate the successful candidate hired into this role will be placed towards the middle or entry point of the range, the decision will be made on a case-by-case basis related to these factors.

A reasonable salary range is:

Bay Area Minimum: $136,000
Bay Area Maximum: $232,000

This job is also eligible to participate in PG&E’s discretionary incentive compensation programs.

Job Responsibilities
Researches and applies advanced knowledge of existing and emerging data science principles, theories, and techniques to inform business decisions.
Creates advanced data mining architectures / models / protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in structured and unstructured data sets
Extracts, transforms, and loads data from dissimilar sources from across PG&E for their machine learning feature engineering
Applies data science/ machine learning /artificial intelligence methods to develop defensible and reproducible predictive or optimization models that involve multiple facets and iterations in algorithm development.
Wrangles and prepares data as input of machine learning model development and feature engineering
Writes and documents reusable python functions and modular python code for data science.
Assesses business implications associated with modeling assumptions, inputs, methodologies, technical implementation, analytic procedures and processes, and advanced data analysis.
Works with sponsor departments and company subject matter experts to understand application and potential of data science solutions that create value.
Presents findings and makes recommendations to senior management.
Act as peer reviewer of complex models
Qualifications-

Minimum:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Physics, Econometrics or Economics, Engineering, Mathematics, Applied Sciences, Statistics, or equivalent field.
6 years in data science (or no experience, if possess Doctoral Degree or higher)

Desired:
Excellent written and oral communication skills for coordinating across teams and effective communication of risk model assumptions/results.
Demonstrated collaboration or paired development work history.
Advanced Excel/Visual Basic skills.
A strong understanding of one or several analysis and programming packages such as R, SAS, or Python (with working knowledge of Pandas, SciPy, Numpy, IPython).
Deep knowledge of applied statistics including complex multivariate statistical analysis, Bayesian statistics, Time Series analysis (e.g Autoregressive models).
Proven proficiency in developing and implementing predictive models.
Experience and interest in data visualization techniques. Ability to convey complex analyses with the most efficient and intuitive visual methods and the ability to effectively communicate findings.
A passion and curiosity for data and data-driven decision making.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applying these techniques to make business decisions.
Ability to teach and/or mentor junior colleagues.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SQL, etc.
Experience with quantitative risk modeling specific to natural gas (gas dispersion, flare radiation, fireball, etc).
Gas Operations knowledge.
Familiarity with gas transmission and/or gas distribution flow models.",4.0,PG&E Corporation,"San Ramon, CA",10000+ Employees,1905.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,184.0,CA,119.0,1,0,0,1,1
Image Analysis Scientist,"$130K
/yr","Are you passionate about advanced pathology imaging and digital image analysis? Can you apply these skills to help us in drug discovery? Do you have expertise in applying image analysis techniques to complex tissue imaging data and have an appetite for applying these skills to advance the boundaries of science to deliver life-changing medicines to patients? We have an opening at our Pathology department at AstraZeneca!
As an Image Analysis Scientist, you will apply brand new technologies and advanced image processing and analysis to help derive biological insights from digital pathology imaging data to support drug development projects. You will work alongside our team of image analysis scientists, imaging scientist, pathologists, biologists and data scientists within Clinical Pharmacology and Safety Sciences (CPSS).
CPSS is changing the way imaging technologies are combined to offer unprecedented insight and impact. Our global Imaging teams combine data from histology, digital pathology, multiplex immunofluorescent assays and advanced molecular imaging techniques (including mass spectrometry imaging) to understand the spatial biology of disease and drug discovery.
This position offers the opportunity to be involved in the investigation of both the safety and efficacy of drugs within our projects in both a preclinical and clinical setting. We believe this is a truly exciting opportunity.
The Role
You will support drug discovery project delivering image analysis endpoints. You will develop image analysis algorithms using commercial software platforms and bespoke innovative computer vision models primarily for digital pathology based imaging modalities (H&E, IHC, multiplex immunofluorescence) across multiple therapeutic areas. You will be fully connected with our global imaging teams offering access to our full suite of technologies.

You will take a lead in delivering established and cutting-edge image analysis for imaging data sets. Providing expertise in image processing, segmentation and quantitative analysis using both established image analysis software as well as other computer vision based machine learning and deep learning approaches to derive solutions to a range of problems in biomedical images. Working in a highly multidisciplinary environment with scientists across AstraZeneca.
Main Duties and Responsibilities:
Drive the delivery of impact to drug projects through image analysis support across all AZ therapy areas
Deliver & develop image analysis support and data generation for digital pathology based imaging activities for preclinical studies. (e.g. Positive cell count, tissue segmentation, dual-stain analysis)
Experience using vendor platform (e.g HALO/Visiopharm) and other computer vision based approaches.
Collaborate with cross functional teams e.g. Imaging scientists, Pathologists and other Bioscientists, to develop analysis strategies & plans, lead image analysis studies, analyse images and derive results for drug safety and efficacy assessment.
Prepare and present visualization of image analysis results, associated with drug treatments, response and survival data and other sample attributes using appropriate statistical methods.
Active participation in the use of FAIR standards to support enterprise level image data storage and management, data ingestion processes, tools and technology to support current and future analyses and data insights to support AZ drug development portfolio.
Collaborate with other Image Analysis scientists within the Pathology group and wider AZ organization to propose, review and finalize future image analysis algorithm development and project work.
Communicates project results, conclusions and recommendations effectively to colleagues, teams, partners and collaborators through written reports and oral presentations at internal and external meetings.
Contributes to the publication of scientific abstracts, posters, presentations, manuscripts and/or patent applications.
Education & Experience Requirements:
MSc/PhD in a Biological Science, Biomedical Engineering, Bioinformatics, Computer Science or related field with 2 or more years of related experience in academia or pharmaceutical/biotech/CRO organization
Essential Requirements:
Prior experience of digital pathology and performing image processing, segmentation, classification and analysis of tissue-based imaging data is critical.
Shown experience using HALO and/or Visiopharm image analysis software
Experience delivering computer vision/machine learning approaches using off-the-shelf image analysis software (e.g. QuPath, ImageJ), or applying programming skills (e.g. Python, R, MATLAB) for tailored solutions
Knowledge of preclinical/clinical histopathology techniques such as H&E, IHC, multiplex IF & ISH is favorable.
Experience designing, developing, implementing and validating computer vision,machine learning, deep learning & image analysis processes to address quantification questions within tissue images.
Strong problem-solving skills with the ability to work both independently and collaboratively, and to handle several concurrent, fast-paced projects.
When we put unexpected teams in the same room, we fuel bold thinking with the power to inspire life-changing medicines. In-person working gives us the platform we need to connect, work at pace and challenge perceptions. That’s why we work, on average, a minimum of three days per week from the office. But that doesn't mean we’re not flexible. We balance the expectation of being in the office while respecting individual flexibility. Join us in our unique and adventurous world.
Why AstraZeneca?
At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being bold - finding those moments and recognizing their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organization to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means we’re opening new ways to work, pioneering groundbreaking methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.
So, what’s next?
Are you ready to bring new ideas and fresh thinking to the table? We have one seat available, and we hope it’s yours.
Where can I find out more?
Check out our landing page for more information on our BPD group https://careers.astrazeneca.com/bpd
Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/
Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/
Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en
The annual base pay (or hourly rate of compensation) for this position ranges from $ 104,270.40 to $ 156,405.60, either as annual base pay or as the hourly rate (annual base pay divided by 2080 hours)]. Hourly and salaried non-exempt employees will also be paid overtime pay when working qualifying overtime hours. Base pay offered may vary depending on multiple individualized factors, including market location, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. In addition, our positions offer a short-term incentive bonus opportunity; eligibility to participate in our equity-based long-term incentive program (salaried roles), to receive a retirement contribution (hourly roles), and commission payment eligibility (sales roles). Benefits offered included a qualified retirement program [401(k) plan]; paid vacation and holidays; paid leaves; and, health benefits including medical, prescription drug, dental, and vision coverage in accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable plans. Additional details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the Company reserves the right to modify base pay (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, Company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Waltham, MA",10000+ Employees,1913.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,MA,111.0,1,0,0,0,0
"NAMS2 - Data Scientist I, II, III","$101K
/yr","Company Description

Crown is a leader in planning and implementing aerospace and advanced transportation services, with a focus on advanced air mobility (AAM). We have more than three decades of experience in developing strategy, exploring concepts, assessing technologies, developing use cases, and projecting economic impacts for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), and State Departments of Transportation. We are looking for an exceptional new team member to join our Crown innovators working with companies and government agencies to safely advance aviation’s newest frontier. Join our team to pioneer a better, more sustainable future

Job Description

Crown is looking for all levels of Data Scientists to work on the NAMS-2 project in Mountain View, CA to:
Identify trends, patterns, and anomalies found in big data sets by performing extensive data analysis to develop insights.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes to prepare data, implement data models, conduct analysis, and develop databases.
Interpret results from multiple structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques and tools.
Collaborate with teams to understand each data analysis projects' underlying purpose, focus, and objectives.
Design, develops, and implements the most valuable data-driven solutions for the
organization

Qualifications

Level I - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 0-2 years of related experience.
Level II - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Exposure to some of the complex tasks within the job function. Requires 2 -4 years of related experience.
Level III - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 5 - 8 years of related experience.

Additional Information

Visit: www.crownci.com for additional information on our company.
Competitive benefits program and matching 401K!
Crown is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, age, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.
Persons unable to complete an online application should contact Crown HR for assistance at (703) 650-0663 ext 3059.
Crown is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor
Crown was voted Best Places to Work in 2021
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Crown Consulting, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1989.0,Company - Private,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,101.0,CA,35.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Title: Data Scientist - Big Data Engineer
Place of Performance: Remote - Austin, TX 77040
Duration: 9 Months Approx.

About Radiant
Radiant is committed to solving complex challenges for our customers by delivering innovative technology solutions. Our client-centric model increases transparency and accountability, which helps promote efficiency and effectiveness. We work and grow together with our customers, and we help empower our clients to achieve success. Our flexible delivery model allows us to provide end-to-end solution delivery, single project execution, and, or strategic resources. CMMI Maturity Level III and ISO 9001 2015 certified.

Required Skills:
4 years of Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 years of Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 years of Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 years of Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 years of Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 years of Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 years Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.

Responsibilities:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
The above job description and requirements are general in nature and may be subject to change based on the specific needs and requirements of the organization and project.

This is a remote position.",3.1,Radiant Digital,"Austin, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2000.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,TX,24.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$57.50
/hr","Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Experience:
Data Scientist: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",Not listed,Tekfocus Minds LLC,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,57.5,Remote,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$55.50
/hr","Job Overview:
The Office of the Attorney General’s Chief Data Office (CDO) is seeking a dynamic and visionary Data Scientist to join our team and support our System Modernization efforts for the Child Support Division.
This individual must be able to work in a heavily technical environment, preparing and optimizing data for Snowflake and utilizing SAS Viya to build comprehensive federal and state reports.
You will play a pivotal role in transforming, analyzing, and leveraging our data assets to drive strategic initiatives and business outcomes.
You must be comfortable analyzing data, developing predictive modeling algorithms, and can communicate your findings through visualizations enabling the discovery of solutions to business problems.
As a Data Scientist your role will be impactful, visible, and rewarding.
Responsibilities will include:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
Required Qualification/Skill Experience:
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 Years: Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 Years: Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Position Details:
The primary work location(s) will be at OAG State Office located at 5500 E. Oltorf St, Austin, TX 78741.
Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.
The working position is Telework.
Services are expected to start 11/12/2024 and are expected to complete by 08/31/2025. Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 1000 hours. This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing. ""work made to hire.""
Pay: $58/hr as W2.
S#: 302CSD2504
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $53.00 - $58.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics and business intelligence tools: 4 years (Required)
Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, R: 4 years (Required)
Data conversion and report building Snowflake and SAS Viya.: 4 years (Required)
Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment: 4 years (Required)
Proficiency in ETL processes & tools as AWS Glue and Lambda: 4 years (Required)
Strong knowledge of database Mangat. & Data warehousing: 4 years (Required)
Ability to Commute:
Austin, TX 78741 (Required)
Ability to Relocate:
Austin, TX 78741: Relocate before starting work (Required)
Work Location: In person",5.0,Advanced Proactive Solutions LLC,"Austin, TX",Unknown,,Company - Private,Security & Protective,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,55.5,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Data Lake","$90K
/yr","For over 90 years, Topcon’s vision has been to solve societal challenges around the globe. In healthcare, we are developing innovations that improve patients’ health and quality of life.
We empower eye care providers with advanced imaging, diagnostic solutions, and intelligent data technology. Our robotic devices deliver simplicity without compromise, by capturing clear images with the push of a button.
By joining Topcon Healthcare, you become part of a growing, diverse, global team. With office locations throughout North America, whether you are on-site, remote, or hybrid, our culture empowers you to contribute to company and personal success each day. At Topcon Healthcare, you can grow your career, gain new perspectives, and help address society’s most pressing challenges. If you have drive, passion, and a desire to be part of a collaborative team, we want to hear from you.
At Topcon Healthcare, we don’t wait for the future. We invent it. Join us.
Learn more about working with us at
topconcareers.com
THI is seeking a mission-driven a Data Scientist, Data Lake specialized in data cleaning, curation, and labeling. This role will play a critical role in ensuring the quality and usability of ophthalmic data for machine learning and other analytics initiatives. This individual will be responsible for developing and implementing data cleaning and preprocessing pipelines, curating datasets for specific use cases, and executing data labeling efforts.
Main Responsibilities:
Data Cleaning and Preprocessing:
Design and implement robust data cleaning processes to identify and address missing values, outliers, inconsistencies, and errors in datasets.
Develop and maintain data preprocessing pipelines to standardize, transform, and normalize data.
Utilize statistical and machine learning techniques to identify and correct data quality issues.
Data Curation and Labelling:
Select, extract, and organize relevant data from diverse sources to create curated datasets tailored to specific use cases.
Ensure data consistency, integrity, and documentation throughout the curation process.
Design and manage data labeling projects to generate high-quality labeled data.
Implement quality control measures to ensure the accuracy and consistency of labeled data.
Develop and maintain tools and scripts for automating data cleaning, curation, and labeling tasks.
Collaboration and Communication:
Collaborate with clinical scientists, data engineers, ML engineers, and domain experts to understand data needs and challenges.
Clearly communicate data quality findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Stay up to date on the latest techniques and tools in data cleaning, curation, and labeling.
Qualifications:
BSc or MSc in Life Sciences, Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computer or Data Science
2 years’ experience doing clinical science or developing data-driven algorithms for medical devices.
Experience in the ophthalmic industry is preferred, and experience with OCT data is highly preferred.
Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, set priorities, and handle multiple tasks and projects with a high degree of efficiency and comfort with ambiguity.
Expertise with statistical packages such as Python or R is highly desirable.
Expertise with Matlab, IDL, or similar packages is highly desirable.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with cloud computing applications (such as AWS or Azure)
A passion for leveraging data to improve patient care and drive innovation
Base Pay:
Expected Base Pay Range: $70,000 to $110,000 Annualized
The base pay range included is a projected hiring range for a position, level and potential work location(s) listed. Topcon provides the compensation range that it in good faith believes it might pay and/or offer for this position. This compensation range is based on a full-time schedule.
Benefits*:
Topcon offers a comprehensive benefit package for this position including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, tax saving spending accounts a 401(k) plan with employer match, tuition reimbursement in addition to other perks and benefits. We also offer time off for our employees to recharge. Our employees are eligible for paid company holidays, paid personal time off, and paid sick time that meets or exceeds state/local requirements.
Topcon reserves the right to ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and offer additional benefits and other compensation; individual candidate compensation may be determined based on individual skills, experience, training, certifications, education, final work location and other factors not related to an applicant’s sex or other status protected by local, state, or federal law. Changes in the position level, location or other factors associated with the role may change the final determined compensation. The recruiter can provide additional information during the hiring process.
Topcon time off policies can vary between roles which are exempt or non-exempt. For hourly (“non-exempt”) employees, we offer personal paid time off which accrues in accordance with local standards. For salaried (“exempt”) employees, we offer a flexible paid time off policy giving you flexibility to take time when needed, while supporting business needs. All paid time off policies are in accordance with or exceeding local law. Employees working at least 30 hours per week are eligible for our Health and Welfare benefit package.
EEO Statement:
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status.",3.2,Topcon Healthcare,"La Jolla, CA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,90.0,CA,,1,0,0,1,0
IT Data Scientist I-IV,"$103K
/yr","IT Data Scientist I-IV
- (2400277)

Founded in 1934, Medical Mutual is the oldest and one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio. We provide peace of mind to more than 1.6 million Ohioans through our high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans.
Medical Mutual’ s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we don’t answer to Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us and help our members achieve their best possible health and quality of life.
IT Data Scientist I
Entry-level data scientist developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist II
Experienced junior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends
IT Data Scientist III
Senior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Senior data scientists are expected to be self-sufficient and able to assist in coaching junior data scientists. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist IV
Expert data science developer responsible for leading team activities for design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
Responsibilities
IT Data Scientist I
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist II
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist III
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist IV
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned

Qualifications
IT Data Scientist I
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
0 to 1-year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
Python programming language
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist II
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
2+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
2+ years of experience with SQL programming language
1+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist III
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
4+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
4+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Advanced programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist IV
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
6+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
6+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Mastery of programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
Medical Mutual is looking to grow our team! We truly value and respect the talents and abilities of all of our employees. That's why we offer an exceptional package that includes:
A Great Place to Work
We will provide the equipment you need for this role, including a laptop, monitors, keyboard, mouse, and headset.
Whether you are working remotely or in the office, employees have access to on-site fitness centers at many locations, or a gym membership reimbursement when there is no Medical Mutual facility available. Enjoy the use of weights, cardio machines, locker rooms, classes and more.
On-site cafeteria, serving hot breakfast and lunch, at our Brooklyn, OH location. Convenience stores at many locations.
Discounts at many places in and around town, just for being a Medical Mutual team member.
The opportunity to earn cash rewards for shopping with our customers.
Business casual attire, including jeans.
Excellent Benefits
Employee bonus program
401(k) with company match up to 4% and an additional company contribution.
Health Savings Account with a company matching contribution.
Excellent medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance — insurance is what we do best, and we make affordable coverage for our team a priority.
Access to an Employee Assistance Program, which includes professional counseling, personal and professional coaching, self-help resources and assistance with work/life benefits.
Company holidays and up to 16 PTO days during the first year of employment with options to carry over unused PTO time.
After one year of service, parental leave for eligible employees who become parents through maternity, paternity, or adoption.

An Investment in You
Career development programs and classes.
Mentoring and coaching to help you advance in your career.
Tuition reimbursement up to $5,250 per year, the IRS maximum.
Diverse, inclusive, and welcoming culture with Business Resource Groups.

About Medical Mutual
Medical Mutual’s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we do not answer Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us.
There is a good chance you already know many of our Medical Mutual customers. As the official insurer of everything you love, we are trusted by businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout Ohio to provide high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans. Our plans provide peace of mind to more than 1.5 million Ohioans.
We are not just one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio, we are also the longest running. Founded in 1934, we aree proud of our rich history with the communities where we live and work.
At Medical Mutual and its family of companies we celebrate differences and are mutually invested in our employees and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse and nicotine testing.

Primary Location US-OH-Brooklyn
Work Locations Brooklyn 100 American Road Brooklyn 44144
Job 7 - General Staff
Organization Enterprise Analytics
Schedule Regular
Shift Standard
Employee Status Individual Contributor
Job Type Full-time
Job Level Day Job
Job Posting Oct 16, 2024, 2:39:10 PM",4.1,Medical Mutual of Ohio,"Brooklyn, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1934.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,OH,90.0,1,0,1,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$77K
/yr","Transport is at the core of modern society. Imagine using your expertise to shape sustainable transport and infrastructure solutions for the future? If you seek to make a difference on a global scale, working with next-gen technologies and the sharpest collaborative teams, then we could be a perfect match.
What you will do
As a Data Scientist, you will apply advanced data analytics techniques to analyze various types of vehicle and test data and provide detailed insights to simulation and engineering teams. The position entails a high level of collaboration with engineering teams working on future products, analyzing different types of logged and/or measured data (high frequency and low frequency) from customer trucks, field trucks and test vehicles to help make data driven engineering decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Utilize advanced analytics and machine learning techniques on customer and test vehicle data to extract meaningful insights and provide actionable recommendations to engineering and simulation teams
Integrate data from multiple sources (Customer vehicles, test vehicles etc.) and automate data flow, ensuring data quality and consistency, to facilitate deployment of advanced analytics techniques within vehicle engineering
Create data visualizations and dashboards to translate technical and customer data to provide actionable insights to stakeholders
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product development, and IT, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Collaborate with global teams on developing and improving analysis & simulation strategies based on actual customer data
Collaborate with engineering, testing and IT teams to drive development of AI/ML models to support and accelerate predictive modeling in engineering
Stay updated with the latest advancements in data science and automotive technologies to continuously improve usage of data analytics within vehicle engineering

Your future team
The Advanced Calculation Team is an important part of the Vehicle Engineering function for Volvo Group Trucks Technology, north America. Our team is a dynamic team of highly competent engineers who specialize in various CAE disciplines. We are responsible for ensuring functional requirements are met for durability & reliability, thermal management, cooling performance and other mechanical systems for heavy duty trucks developed for North America.
Who are you?
Do you dream big? We do too, and we are excited to grow together. In this role, you will bring:
A strong attention to detail with the ability to interpret data and translate information into actionable intelligence.
Capable of networking with individuals and teams across various departments and sites, sharing information and resources as needed, and working towards achieving common group goals.
Effective communication with the ability to listen effectively, transmit information accurately, and actively seek feedback from other experienced engineers, project managers, etc.
Ability to perform a wide range of tasks, respond positively to changing timelines and/or project scope, and open to accepting new challenges, responsibilities, and assignments.
Ease with communicating highly technical information to people of varying technical ability.
A desire and passion to create the very best product, working as an integral part of a highly technical organization.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
1-3 years of experience in data analytics with automotive industry background. Heavy duty vehicle experience is considered a plus
Demonstrated experience with machine learning and advanced analytics for predictive modeling such as regression analysis, neural networks (Deep Learning, RNN, LSTM, DQN etc.), time series forecasting, classification, clustering etc.
Proficiency in statistical analysis methods and programming languages such as Python (including libraries like Numpy, SciPy, Pandas, Tensorflow), SQL, Git, Azure, Hadoop, Matlab/Simulink, pySpark
Experience with building dashboards and help create visualizations from data using PowerBI, QlikView, Tableau etc.
Familiarity with Database Management Systems (BDMS) and proficiency in querying and manipulating data using SQL
Experience with Git and version control methods is a plus

What’s in it for you?
We offer a solid package of compensation and benefits, plus you will enjoy:
An organization the prioritizes employee's health and well-being.
Working in an empowered team solving complex challenges.
Opportunity to work with new technologies such as automation, electromobility, and connectivity.
Modern workspaces that allow agility and collaboration.
Multiple electric charging stations for cars.
Onsite facilities and activities that make everyday life easier including a cafeteria, chair massages, fitness center and fitness classes offered daily.
Ready for the next move?
If you are a Data Analyst / Scientist with an interest in working with a global organization focused on impacting everyday lives, apply today and join our team on this exciting journey!

We value your data privacy and therefore do not accept applications via mail.

Who we are and what we believe in
Our focus on Inclusion, Diversity, and Equity allows each of us the opportunity to bring our full authentic self to work and thrive by providing a safe and supportive environment, free of harassment and discrimination. We are committed to removing the barriers to entry, which is why we ask that even if you feel you may not meet every qualification on the job description, please apply and let us decide. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.”

Applying to this job offers you the opportunity to join Volvo Group. Every day, across the globe, our trucks, buses, engines, construction equipment, financial services, and solutions make modern life possible. We are almost 100,000 people empowered to shape the future landscape of efficient, safe and sustainable transport solutions. Fulfilling our mission creates countless career opportunities for talents with sharp minds and passion across the group’s leading brands and entities.

Group Trucks Technology are seeking talents to help design sustainable transportation solutions for the future. As part of our team, you’ll help us by engineering exciting next-gen technologies and contribute to projects that determine new, sustainable solutions. Bring your love of developing systems, working collaboratively, and your advanced skills to a place where you can make an impact. Join our design shift that leaves society in good shape for the next generation.",4.1,Volvo Group,"Greensboro, NC",10000+ Employees,1927.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,77.0,NC,97.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist (Mid),"$118K
/yr","This job opportunity is part of an RFP process; candidates are invited to submit their resumes detailing relevant experience.
Location: Bethesda, MD (Hybrid)
LCG is a minority-owned technology consulting firm that has been a trusted partner to more than 40 federal agencies, including 21 of the 27 Institutes and Centers (ICs) at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). For over 25 years, LCG has brought digitization and innovation to the Health and Human Services (HHS) and the NIH ecosystems. We support IT organizations by bringing precision technology and operation models that achieve mission capabilities and performance success.
Job Title: Data Scientist (Mid)
Job Summary: We are seeking an intermediate-level Data Scientist to perform extensive data analysis on large datasets to develop insights, identify trends, patterns, and anomalies. The successful candidate will collaborate with various teams to understand project objectives, perform data mining, data cleaning, and aggregation, and implement data models. This role will involve working with structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques. The Data Scientist will also support cloud computing initiatives, including developing automation solutions and enabling scientific cloud workflows.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and interpret large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation to prepare data for analysis and model implementation.
Develop and implement data models, conduct analysis, and interpret results using statistical techniques.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand the objectives and focus of data analysis projects.
Design, develop, and implement data-driven solutions to support organizational objectives.
Contribute to cloud computing initiatives, including automated self-service portals, cloud module development, and integration support for scientific computing.
Assist with cloud security operations by supporting the validation of security vulnerabilities and maintaining necessary security documentation.
Provide data analysis and insights to support decision-making for cloud environments, including usage, cost, and workload rationalization.
Support cloud workload migration projects by performing infrastructure assessments and assisting in business case development.
Collaborate with product management and development teams to support data-driven decisions for cloud platforms and products.
Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in data analysis, statistical modeling, and data mining.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, SQL, and experience with data visualization tools.
Knowledge of cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP) and experience with GitHub API integrations.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with attention to detail.
Familiarity with cloud security best practices and compliance standards such as NIST and FISMA.
Experience in cloud computing, scientific workflows, and automation.
Familiarity with Azure Active Directory (AD) and GitHub automation tools.
Experience in cloud enablement and workload migration for scientific computing environments.
Knowledge of federal security and compliance standards.

The projected compensation range for this position is $98,100 to $135,750 per year benchmarked in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. The target salary is 114,000. The salary range provided is a good faith estimate representative of all experience levels. Salary at LCG is determined by various factors, including but not limited to role, location, the combination of education/training, knowledge, skills, competencies, certifications, and work experience.
LCG offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance options (medical, dental, vision), life and disability insurance, retirement plan contributions, as well as paid leave, federal holidays, professional development, and lifestyle benefits.
Devoted to Fair and Inclusive Practices
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. If you are interested in applying for employment with LCG and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department by email at hr@lcginc.com.
Securing Your Data
Beware of fraudulent job offers using LCG's name. LCG will never request payment-related details or advancement of money during the application process. Legitimate communication will only come from lcginc.com or system@hirebridgemail.com emails, not free commercial services like Gmail or WhatsApp. If you receive suspicious emails asking for payment or personal information, contact us immediately at hr@lcginc.com.
If you believe you are the victim of a scam, contact your local law enforcement and report the incident to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.",3.8,"LCG, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1990.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,118.0,MD,34.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","We are searching for a Data Scientist – someone who works well in a fast-paced setting. In this position, you will harness the largest pediatric healthcare dataset in the nation to deliver analytics, insights, and solutions that help us create a healthier future for our global community.
The individual in this role delivers data analytics and supports the development and implementation of advanced analytic tools to meet the needs of teams throughout the organization. Works with a multidisciplinary team to design, develop, and create analytical solutions through applications of data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), and emerging technologies. Collaborates with clinical, business, and information systems team members to ideate and create new analytic solutions impacting patient care and hospital operations. Partners with subject matter experts to understand the relationship
between workflows and data and uses that data to create innovative solutions that support and advance targeted outcomes.
Exercises knowledge of descriptive, predictive, and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques, to develop strategic insights to drive operational and clinical goals.
Teaches developers, architects and analysts how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Provides data science and statistical support for advanced analytics projects at Texas Children's Hospital. Analyzes and interprets clinical, operational, and other data to provide insight into care delivery and operational initiatives. Responsible for evaluating data quality, preparing data, generating insights, and developing and presenting high-impact data stories. Serves as a subject matter expert associated with data analysis processes, advanced analytics techniques, statistics, and meaningful data visualizations. Provides consultation and support in the development, analysis, interpretation, and management of a
variety of complex data sources. Works on multiple concurrent projects.
Think you’ve got what it takes?
Job Duties & Responsibilities
Creates data models and generates data insights
Generates and communicates business and clinical insights, using various techniques and understanding the strengths and risks of different approaches to data analysis
Analyzes large, noisy datasets and identifies meaningful patterns that provide actionable results. Data sources may include the Enterprise Data Warehouse, various source systems and databases, and data from external sources such as the Census Bureau. Source data may include both structured and unstructured data
Evaluates and communicates data quality within the context of the problem being analyzed, and implements appropriate data cleaning techniques when preparing data
Performs basic and advanced statistical analyses, modeling, interpretation, documentation, and presentation
Builds and tests statistical, optimization, and machine learning models, including regression, classification, clustering, natural language processing, deep learning, and/or statistical modeling. Applies best practices for data preparation, statistical methods, and approaches to data analysis to ensure valid and reliable results
Independently owns descriptive, diagnostic analysis of complex data problems, consulting with data architects and subject matter experts as needed.
Designs, develops, and creates advanced analytical solutions
Communicates data insights and acts as a data storyteller by translating data analyses into easily understandable dialogue and terms to influence business decisions or actions.
Provides statistical consultation
Plans, communicates, and manages risk related to tasks
Participates in overall analytics and application support delivery activities
Skills & Requirements
Required master's degree in mathematics, computer science, statistics, engineering, analytics, life sciences, or a specific healthcare field (such as nursing, pharmacy, respiratory, etc.)
Preferred Ph. D
3 years of experience in experience in data science, data analytics, business analysis, data modeling, statistical analysis, statistical modeling, or machine learning
A Ph. D may substitute for 2 years of experience.",3.7,Texas Children's Hospital,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1954.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,TX,70.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Data Scientist, Growth","$175K
/yr","The Wealthfront Data Science Team utilizes our rich financial and behavioral data to influence key product and marketing decisions, as well as to safeguard our clients’ information and assets. The team draws from backgrounds in Computer Science, Natural Sciences, Statistics, Operations Research and Econometrics.

The Data Scientist in this role will be primarily embedded within Wealthfront’s Growth Team. The Growth Team is focused on acquiring new clients, as well as deepening Wealthfront’s relationship to existing clients. The team addresses this mandate by designing creative initiatives that cut across product lines. These initiatives can include testing new in-app features, discovering new channels of client acquisition, launching email campaigns, or targeted incentives – all based on unique insights about our clients and their interaction with the prevailing economic environment.

A fundamental trait for an effective Growth Data Scientist is curiosity for discovering new insights about client behavior. This person will enjoy going deep into the data to understand what’s driving client actions, proposing ideas for new projects and for driving clarity on the ‘why’ behind experiment results.

Technical tools used in this role include Hypothesis testing (potentially with atypical distributions), mathematical transforms of variables, data mining, natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML). You don't need experience in all of the techniques but must have the ability to pick them up as needed.

Potential project areas for this role include (but are not limited to) analyzing client signup flow, creating client groups according to business rules or automated clustering, creating ML models for estimating incentive revenues or costs and Named Entity Recognition using NLP.
Responsibilities
Demonstrate an owner’s mindset in formulation, execution, communication and timing of your projects.
Analyze and explain A/B test experiment results. Investigate why the experiment was a success or a failure. Discover client segments for whom the experiment worked unusually well or otherwise.
Suggest follow ups for recently concluded initiatives and experiments. Create and present rationales for questions including whether the experiment should be continued, and what should be different in the next iteration.
Work closely with Product, Design, Engineering and User Research members on the Growth Team to craft a long term (quarterly) learning plan and subsequently execute your part in that plan.
Collaborate with cross functional stakeholders to come up with feasibility of an experiment, experiment structure and opportunity sizing/impact of the experiment to guide the team’s roadmap.
Work with Data platform teams to procure required (but unavailable) data.
Enhance overall Data Science team execution through hands-on help, design feedback and peer review.
Requirements
A Master's or a PhD degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, or Natural Sciences with 4+ years of prior experience in a Data Science role. Exceptions to these requirements may be considered on a case-by-case basis.
Prior experience in Growth or Marketing
Prior experience analyzing complex experiments, including developing data insights and data backed recommendations for stakeholders.
Strong communication, storytelling and collaboration skills and a record of partnering across organizations to sharpen project requirements. Sometimes this includes re-framing the original request to solve a more general problem with similar effort.
Hands-on mathematical and software engineering skills to execute on complex projects.
Proficiency in Python and SQL.
Desire and ability to mentor junior Data Scientists within the team by exemplifying math, engineering and technical communication skills.
Estimated annual salary range: $165,000 - $185,000 USD plus equity and a discretionary bonus.

Benefits include medical, vision, dental, 401K plan, generous time off, parental leave, wellness reimbursements, professional development, employee investing discount, and more!

About Wealthfront

Wealthfront started with the ambition to transform the investment advisory business, with the goal to unlock access to high quality investment advice for millions who were underserved by the traditional institutions. We built one of the first automated investment products that allows you to invest in a personalized portfolio of thousands of companies in seconds for a remarkably low fee. We then expanded. We now work with partner banks to offer exceptional banking features through a Wealthfront Brokerage Cash Account, which makes it remarkably easy for people to automate their finances end-to-end and eliminated the hassle of money management, all of which resulted in attracting more than $70 billion of our client’s hard earned money, pioneering the robo-advisor category and transforming the broader industry. And yet, we have a long way to go to achieve our mission to build a financial system that favors people, not institutions.

Wealthfront’s vision is to make it delightfully easy to build long-term wealth on your own terms. This vision is more relevant than ever because millions more people are getting into the market early and investing their hard earned savings in a handful of stocks. While this is a great way to start, it is inconsistent with building long-term wealth. We want to empower young investors to expand their horizon, and easily explore and execute on a wider range of investing strategies, make informed investment decisions that are consistent with their values and beliefs while also making it effortless to grow and compound their savings exponentially in a way that’s transformational to their lives and their long-term future.

For more information please visit www.wealthfront.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Please review our candidate privacy notice.",4.1,Wealthfront,"Palo Alto, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,CA,13.0,1,0,0,1,0
DH Data Scientist,"$173K
/yr","Job Description:
Job Summary
The Data Scientist is responsible for maximizing the value of rich date resources available. This person will independently investigate and derive actionable insights to drive improvement for research and development and for clinical deployment of DeepHealth products.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Utilize statistics, data mining and programming knowledge to analyze clinical data and present insights to key stakeholders.
Identify patterns to drive improvement of research, product development and clinical deployment.
Generate and test hypotheses independently.
Investigate and improve data quality.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze product performance.
Summarize data in concise reports including tables, plots and other visual representations.
Document analysis for the engineering and clinical teams.

PLEASE NOTE: This is not an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities and requirements of the position described above. Other functions may be assigned and management retains the right to add or change duties at any time.

Minimum Qualifications, Education, and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in relevant field such as computer science, math, statistics, engineering (M.S. preferred).
At least two (2) years of experience (five plus (5+) years preferred).
Expertise in Python and scientific libraries such as numpy and pandas.
Expertise with data visualization techniques.
Experience working with medical data.
Experience evaluating machine learning models.
Experience evaluating clinical performance preferred.
Familiarity with machine learning techniques preferred.
Strong individual team contributor and collaborator.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.

Quality Standards
Communicates, cooperates, and consistently functions professionally and harmoniously with all levels of supervision, co-workers, patients, visitors, and vendors.
Demonstrates initiative, personal awareness, professionalism and integrity, and exercise confidentiality in all areas of performance.
Follows all local, state and federal laws concerning employment to include but not limited to: I-9, Harassment, EEOC, Civil rights and ADA.
Follows OSHA regulations, RadNet and site protocols, policies and procedures.
Follows HIPAA, compliance, privacy, safety and confidentiality standards at all times.
Practices universal safety precautions.
Promotes good public relations on the phone and in person.
Adapts and is willing to learn new tasks, methods, and systems.
Reports to work regularly as scheduled; consistently punctual with respect to working hours and lunch schedules, and maintains satisfactory personal attendance in accordance with RadNet guidelines.
Consistently adheres to the time management policies and procedures.
Completes job responsibilities in a quality and timely manner.

Physical Demands
This position often requires sitting, standing, walking, bending, twisting, reaching with hands and arms, using hands and fingers, handling, or feeling, speaking, listening, and high-level cognitive thinking. Must be able to use a computer and other office machinery including copiers, scanners and computer software. Must be able to lift up to 10 pounds occasionally. The position requires the ability to travel (~20% of time), drive a vehicle, and utilize other forms of transportation.

Working Environment
Office setting

Pay Range: USD $165,000.00 - USD $180,000.00 /Yr.",2.6,Deephealth,"Cambridge, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,173.0,MA,40.0,1,0,0,1,1
Wildfire Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills and talents to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.
Position Summary

We are seeking a highly skilled Data Scientist to join our team focused on innovative Wildfire Mitigation strategies. As a Data Scientist specializing in wildfire mitigation, you will play a crucial role in leveraging data-driven insights to develop and implement proactive measures to mitigate the impact of wildfires on communities and utility infrastructure. This position will analyze historical wildfire data, data on wildfire ignitions, data from vegetation management, and other relevant datasets to develop predictive models to assess wildfire risks and behavior to aid in prevention of wildfire events.
This is a hybrid position with 3-days per week (T-W-Th) in office at the Xcel Energy location listed for this position.
Applicants must be authorized to work for ANY employer in the U.S. We are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment visa at this time for this position.

Essential Responsibilities
Follow consistent practices to ensure data integrity and deal with imperfections in data. Champion the acquisition of new data sources to enhance value and fill gaps; automate collection processes; effectively process structured and semi-structured/unstructured data; proficiently integrate varied datasets; collaborate with business stakeholders as needed to ensure solid data understanding and proper data transformation; work cross-functionally with development and engineering teams; analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns; draw conclusions and gain actionable insights.
Build predictive models; propose solutions and strategies for business problems; apply the appropriate machine learning algorithm to data problems (e.g. supervised vs. unsupervised machine learning, clustering, ensemble methods, etc.); validate model results. Work closely with architecture and engineering team to deploy models; communicate results in a clear and non-technical manner.
Interact with senior management and effectively communicate technical information to numerous audiences (e.g. senior management, client community, peers and junior associates);effectively develop relationships with individuals inside and outside of IT; deliver difficult messages and express disagreement with others with confidence and self-control; address challenges to analytic processes and influence others to change their approach and work collectively to implement new tools/techniques; gain support from related stakeholders for analytic solutions and champion data driven business decisions.
Apply appropriate statistical techniques to data exploration and model development/assessment; communicate complex statistical concepts to non-technical audiences; maintain skills through continuing education.
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate results and highlight business impact; utilize various techniques and delivery methods of visualization that are audience appropriate.
Effectively collaborate with others to deliver efficient and high quality code; implement solid validation process to ensure consistency and minimize errors; champion more efficient ways to produce code iteratively; maintain skills through continuing education; stay up to date on new technologies/ tools; seamlessly transition between languages to apply the right approach to the problem.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT or math related field and 7 years of experience in analytics OR Master's degree in IT or math related field and 5 years of experience in an analytics
Problem solving skills, business acumen, and demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills
Expert SQL, Python skills Distributed Computing experience Excellent data visualization skills
Knowledge of data architecture and structure
Experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, predictive modeling are imperative; text mining and topic modeling are plus
Experience with Neural Networks and corresponding technologies
As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com.
Non-Bargaining
The anticipated starting base pay for this position is: $92,300.00 to $130,567.00 per year
This position is eligible for the following benefits: Annual Incentive Program, Medical/Pharmacy Plan, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Dependent Care Reimbursement Account, Health Care Reimbursement Account, Health Savings Account (HSA) (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Limited-Purpose FSA (if enrolled in eligible health plan and HSA), Transportation Reimbursement Account, Short-term disability (STD), Long-term disability (LTD), Employee Assistance Program (EAP), Fitness Center Reimbursement (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Tuition reimbursement, Transit programs, Employee recognition program, Pension, 401(k) plan, Paid time off (PTO), Holidays, Volunteer Paid Time Off (VPTO), Parental Leave
Benefit plans are subject to change and Xcel Energy has the right to end, suspend, or amend any of its plans, at any time, in whole or in part.
Deadline to Apply: 10/24/24
EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)
ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.",3.3,Xcel Energy,"Denver, CO",10000+ Employees,1909.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,111.0,CO,115.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","As a Data Scientist with a focus on machine learning, you will be responsible for developing and deploying data models that provide critical insights to drive data-driven decision-making across the organization. You'll work with large datasets to build predictive and prescriptive models, evaluate their performance, and collaborate with cross-functional teams to implement these models into business processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection, Cleaning, and Preparation:
Source and collect large datasets from multiple sources, ensuring high data quality.
Perform data preprocessing, including cleaning, normalization, transformation, and feature engineering, to prepare data for machine learning models.
Manage data pipelines and ensure efficient data flow for real-time analysis.
Model Development and Deployment:
Design, develop, and validate machine learning models for classification, regression, clustering, and recommendation systems.
Deploy machine learning models in production environments, ensuring they operate efficiently and scale as needed.
Continuously monitor, test, and update models in production to maintain optimal performance.
Machine Learning Techniques and Analysis:
Apply machine learning algorithms, including supervised and unsupervised learning techniques, to solve complex business problems.
Conduct A/B testing, cross-validation, and hyperparameter tuning to optimize models for accuracy and generalizability.
Leverage advanced techniques such as deep learning, reinforcement learning, or natural language processing when appropriate.
Visualization and Communication:
Visualize complex data and model outcomes using data visualization tools like Matplotlib, Seaborn, and Tableau to effectively communicate insights.
Present findings and actionable insights to non-technical stakeholders through clear, concise reports and presentations.
Collaborate with product managers, engineers, and business analysts to translate data insights into strategic initiatives.
Project Management and Cross-Functional Collaboration:
Lead data science projects from concept to completion, managing timelines, objectives, and deliverables.
Work closely with data engineers to maintain data infrastructure and optimize data processing workflows.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business goals and ensure that data science efforts are aligned with organizational objectives.
Continuous Learning and Development:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in data science and machine learning, and experiment with new tools and techniques.
Share knowledge and best practices with the data science team, contributing to the team's growth and development.
Attend conferences, workshops, and other professional development opportunities to enhance skills and knowledge.
Key Skills and Qualifications:
Technical Skills:
Programming Languages: Proficiency in Python or R, with strong knowledge of libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and Scikit-learn for data manipulation and model building.
Machine Learning Frameworks: Experience with TensorFlow, PyTorch, or Keras for building and deploying machine learning models.
Big Data Technologies: Familiarity with tools like Apache Spark, Hadoop, or Dask for processing and analyzing large datasets.
SQL: Ability to write complex SQL queries to extract, transform, and load data from relational databases.
Machine Learning Knowledge:
Supervised Learning: Experience with classification, regression, and time-series forecasting models.
Unsupervised Learning: Knowledge of clustering, principal component analysis (PCA), and anomaly detection.
Deep Learning: Understanding of neural networks and deep learning architectures for tasks such as image and speech recognition.
NLP: Familiarity with natural language processing techniques, such as topic modeling, sentiment analysis, and text classification.
Data Visualization:
Proficiency in data visualization tools, such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, Plotly, or Power BI, to create compelling visualizations of data and model results.
Experience with dashboarding tools, like Tableau or Power BI, to create interactive reports and dashboards.
Statistical and Mathematical Skills:
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, hypothesis testing, and probability.
Knowledge of linear algebra, calculus, and optimization methods commonly used in machine learning.
Soft Skills:
Problem-Solving: Ability to analyze complex problems and develop data-driven solutions.
Communication: Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to present technical information to non-technical stakeholders.
Collaboration: Experience working in cross-functional teams, with the ability to build strong relationships with team members across the organization.
Education and Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field. A Ph.D. is a plus.
Experience: 2+ years of experience in data science, with a focus on building and deploying machine learning models in a business setting.
Portfolio: A portfolio of completed projects demonstrating experience in machine learning, with examples of model development, deployment, and impact on business outcomes.
Example Projects:
Predictive Analytics: Developed a model to predict customer churn, enabling the company to implement targeted retention strategies.
Recommendation System: Built a recommendation engine for personalized product recommendations, which increased customer engagement.
Sentiment Analysis: Implemented a sentiment analysis model for customer feedback, helping the marketing team to understand customer sentiment and adjust campaigns accordingly.
Anomaly Detection: Created an anomaly detection model for fraud detection, reducing fraudulent transactions by identifying patterns in real-time.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $118,635.00 - $128,216.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Natural language processing: 1 year (Required)
Machine learning: 1 year (Required)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
Regression analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work Location: On the road",1.0,KesarWeb,United States,1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,123.0,United States,,1,0,1,0,1
"Data Scientist I, Lega Lab","$94K
/yr","WHY UT SOUTHWESTERN?
With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. As a world-renowned medical and research center, we strive to provide the best possible care, resources, and benefits for our valued employees. Ranked as the number 1 hospital in Dallas-Fort Worth according to U.S. News & World Report , we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development to align with your future goals. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more. We invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you'll discover a culture of teamwork, professionalism, and a rewarding career!

JOB SUMMARY
Works under specific direction to provide analysis and develops algorithms and software for clinical and/or basic research problems. Impacts data acquisition, management, and analysis in basic, translational, and clinical research, including clinical trials.

A Data Scientist I position is available in the Dr. Bradley Lega laboratory. Dr. Lega is an Associate Professor in the Department of Neurological Surgery at UT Southwestern Medical Center. He has secondary appointments in Neurology and Psychiatry. Dr. Lega's research focuses on how brain conditions affect memory. The research he began at the University of Pennsylvania, and that he continues at UT Southwestern, focuses on preserving memory function and restoring memory to patients with brain injuries or brain tumors.

This candidate will support study efforts studying intercranial Signal and data analysis for a new project. Prefer Master's degree or PHD in computational field. Candidate will need to be organized and have the ability to collaborate with trainees including undergraduate, graduate, medical students, as well as post-doctoral fellows and co-workers.

BENEFITS
UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:

PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage

100% coverage for preventive healthcare-no copay

Paid Time Off, available day one

Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)

Paid Parental Leave Benefit

Wellness programs

Tuition Reimbursement

Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer

Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!

EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATION
Required

Education
Master's Degree M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field or
Bachelor's Degree B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics

Experience

JOB DUTIES

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.

SECURITY AND EEO STATEMENT
Security
This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code 51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information.

EEO Statement
UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. Benefits UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:
PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage
100% coverage for preventive healthcare – no copay
Paid Time Off, available day one
Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)
Paid Parental Leave Benefit
Wellness programs
Tuition Reimbursement
Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer
Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!",3.9,UT Southwestern,"Dallas, TX",10000+ Employees,1943.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,94.0,TX,81.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","The Group:
Morningstar’s Research group provides independent analysis on individual securities, funds, markets, and portfolios. The Research group also provides data on hundreds of thousands of investment offerings, including stocks, mutual funds, and similar vehicles, along with real-time global market data on millions of equities, indexes, futures, options, commodities, and precious metals, in addition to foreign exchange and Treasury markets. Morningstar is one of the largest independent sources of fund, equity, and credit data and research in the world, and our advocacy for investors’ interests is the foundation of our company.

The Role:
As a Data Scientist, you will be a leading contributor in the implementation of Artificial Intelligence (AI) within Data Collections software applications, API’s, and other data products. This role requires significant interaction with both upstream and downstream stakeholders across Technology, Data, Products, Sales/Service, and Research.

The Data Scientist will transition approved Data Collections AI products from a prototype phase to a scalable and consumable service. Often, these services must be integrated into Morningstar’s platform of financial products, so that our clients can use these software tools in the investment decision-making process.

We are looking for an individual who possesses strong technical development skills, an ability to follow analyst requirements and technical specifications for robust code, and a passion for investment research.

This position reports to the Tech Manager of the Data Collections AI team. This position is based in our Chicago office. We follow a hybrid policy of 3 days onsite and 2 days remote work. Candidates must be currently authorized to work Permanently in the United States - this position does not sponsor H-1B Visa.

Responsibilities:
Automate manual data collection processes by applying cutting-edge solutions to tackle NLP problems, e.g., text classification, NER tasks.
Collaborate with upstream data analysts to clarify business needs, define project scope, design ML/AI solutions, and iteratively improve workflows and data storage practices
Implement ML/AI solutions from start to finish and collaborate with peer engineering teams for model deployment
Design innovative ways to improve automation rates for data collection
Research on latest technologies and propose new solutions to existing problems
Participate in team brainstorming sessions, provide guidance to MLDAs (machine learning data analysts), and contribute to the codebase
Introduce and follow good development practices, innovative frameworks and technology solutions
Follow best practices like estimation, planning, reporting and improvement brought to processes in daily work

Requirements:
No minimal industrial experience is required, if you have a Ph.D. degree in engineering, computer science, statistics or related field
Must demonstrate ML/AI knowledge and skills through research and/or side-projects in NLP related fields, if you have no prior industrial experience
Must have 2+ years of industrial experience in a data science role featuring NLP tasks, if you have a master’s degree or below
Fluent with Python and related packages like NumPy, pandas, scikit-learn, NLTK, PyTorch, TensorFlow, etc.
Sound knowledge of common ML/AI algorithms (e.g., linear/logistic regression, random forest, gradient boosting) and Deep Learning algorithms in particular (e.g., transformers, BERT, open-source LLMs)
Experience with SQL
Great communication and presentation skills
Able to work independently and being proactive
Experience with generative AI is preferred
Experience with finetuning LLMs is preferred
Experience with DevOps tools (e.g. Sagemaker, Git, Jenkins) is desirable
Experience developing and deploying solutions using services in the Amazon AWS ecosystem (Lambda, Sagemaker, EC2, RDS, EMR) is desirable
Intermediate knowledge of statistical methods is desirable
Familiarity with common data cleaning and munging techniques
Familiarity with data visualization
Familiarity with statistical methods, e.g., linear/logistic regression, optimization
Familiarity with mutual fund, fixed income, and equity data is a plus

001_MstarInc Morningstar Inc. Legal Entity
Morningstar’s hybrid work environment gives you the opportunity to work remotely and collaborate in-person each week. We’ve found that we’re at our best when we’re purposely together on a regular basis, at least three days each week. A range of other benefits are also available to enhance flexibility as needs change. No matter where you are, you’ll have tools and resources to engage meaningfully with your global colleagues.",3.9,Morningstar,"Chicago, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,IL,40.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$108K
/yr","Feedzai is the world's first RiskOps platform for financial risk management, and the market leader in safeguarding global commerce with today's most advanced cloud-based risk management platform, powered by machine learning and artificial intelligence. Feedzai is securing the transition to a cashless world while enabling digital trust in every transaction and payment type. The world's largest banks, processors, and retailers trust Feedzai to protect trillions of dollars and manage risk while improving the customer experience for everyday users, without compromising privacy. Feedzai is a Series D company and has raised $282M to date. With a valuation of +$1.5B, the company's technology protects 900 million people in 190 countries.
The Data Science Team within Customer Success is highly engaged with our clients making use of their critical thinking skills with a business-focused mentality and customer-facing attitude. They activate, maintain, and support clients, develop models and rules, and train & enable them. In addition, they work cross-functionally with other departments (e.g., Research, Product, Marketing) in a collaborative team spirit spanning the globe to ensure we deliver best in class risk prevention solutions. Being on the frontline of fighting crime and protecting people from financial harm is incredibly inspiring to each of us. Join Us!
Your Day to Day:
Understanding the data which our clients provide to us;
Cleaning that data and validating that it is correct;
Preprocessing the data, usually by using a mixture of shell scripts and a programming language such as Python, Java, Scala, etc
Iteratively computing features and tuning parameters to improve the quality of the model;
Communicating your findings to the project manager and assisting him/her in decision making on the Data Science part of the project;
Work together with key stakeholders (data scientists, engineers, risk managers) from our clients;
Work with other parts of the organization (Product, Research, etc.) to improve processes, best practices and tooling.
You Have & You Know-how:
MSc or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related field;
We welcome candidates with a minimum of 2 years of experience, ranging up to senior-level professionals;
Proficient in Machine Learning (training and testing, avoiding overfit, etc.);
Knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Spark, Hadoop and related;
Proficiency in bash, Python and either Java or Scala;
Knowledge of resource monitoring and runtime optimization (both at JVM and OS level);
Knowledge of statistics or data visualization is a plus;
Knowledge of tree based algorithms (Random Forests, XGBoost, LGBM) is a plus;
Knowledge of Deep Learning algorithms is a plus;
Ability to communicate your findings in a clear way.
The Customer Success Team is responsible for delivering our product to our clients. This includes education, configuration, solution development, and risk strategy to enable our clients to address their pain points. We collaborate with our clients to ensure they have the right solution, build out a strategy and training plan for them, and then support them through each phase of our client lifecycle. We grow at a fast clip and believe no challenge is too big or too small. Therefore, we have an open environment that encourages us to lean in, try new things, and discover our potential. Join Us!
#LI-IP1 #LI-Hybrid
Your First 30-Days at Feedzai:
You will be immersed in our brand with training, connections, and one-on-one time with your manager. You may shadow your colleagues virtually or onsite at an office depending on where you work as you are supported through your Feedzai journey. In addition, you will have access to a ton of information to give you history, context, and all the knowledge you can handle about Feedzai and the team. Finally, you will start working on projects and collaborating on work currently being done. We can't wait to have you join the team!
Life at Feedzai Instagram
Feedzai Culture
Feedzai is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Feedzai does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies.
Feedzai will use the personal data you provide us with by filling out this form for reviewing your application and to potentially negotiate a contract with you. Your personal data will be retained by Feedzai for 24 months following your application. Please see our Privacy Notice available at https://feedzai.com/about-us/privacy/ for more information on how we process your personal data.",3.1,Feedzai,"Atlanta, GA",501 to 1000 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,108.0,GA,13.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$127K
/yr","Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.
Micron Technology is a world leader in innovating memory and storage solutions that accelerate the transformation of information into intelligence, inspiring the world to learn, communicate and advance faster than ever.
As a Data Scientist at Micron Technologies, you will play a crucial role in analyzing and extracting valuable insights from large datasets related to semiconductor manufacturing, process optimization, and quality control. You'll collaborate with multi-functional teams to develop innovative solutions that improve product performance, yield, and reliability.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Data Analysis: Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) on semiconductor manufacturing data, including wafer fabrication, yield, and defect rates.
Model Development: Develop predictive models using machine learning techniques (such as regression, classification, and clustering) to optimize manufacturing processes and improve product quality.
Feature Engineering: Extract relevant features from raw data, considering factors like material properties, process parameters, and environmental conditions.
Anomaly Detection: Identify anomalies and outliers in semiconductor production data, suggesting corrective actions to improve yield.
Collaboration: Work closely with engineers, physicists, and domain experts to understand semiconductor processes and translate business requirements into data-driven solutions.
Visualization: Build clear and informative visualizations to communicate findings and insights to collaborators.
Continuous Improvement: Stay up to date with industry trends, research advancements, and emerging technologies in data science and semiconductor manufacturing.
QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
Master’s or Ph.D. in Data Analytics, Data Science, or related field with practical experience with Virtual Metrology, AI, process control, yield improvement, quality control, semiconductor process engineering, image analytics, or related semiconductor field focus.
EXPERIENCE
Prior experience in semiconductor manufacturing, yield optimization, or process control is highly desirable.
Technical Skills:
Proficiency in Python,
Strong knowledge of machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques.
Familiarity with web application and reporting, Experience with SQL and database management
Technologies:
ML frameworks: Decision trees, Clustering, Regression, Neural Networks, NLP, Pytorch, Big Data, Tensorflow, Pandas, Streamlit
Tools and technologies:
Docker, Containerization, Kubernetes, Jenkins, Ansible, Elasticsearch, SSL, Microservices, data visualization tools (e.g., Streamlit, Tableau, PowerBI, etc.).
Cloud expertise:
Google Cloud Platform, OpenShift Container Platform
AI Skills:
AI specialization and Virtual Metrology/Modeling/Computation:
Python library sklearn, xgboost, pycaret, etc. with the ability to learn any new package.
Knowledgeable with the general process of data science work like data extraction, feature extraction, feature selection and modeling.
Familiar with the skills to deal with time series data (feature extraction, modelling, similarity measure of time series).
Image specialization:
Familiar with deep learning network CNN and package keras.
Frontend:
Languages: HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Typescript
Frameworks/Libraries: Angular, HighCharts, Plotly, AG Grid, BootStrap, Ngx Bootstrap, RxJS
Packaging: npm, Jenkins
Backend/API:
Languages: Python,
Preferred, but not required: Java, C#, PHP, Perl, C++
Frameworks: Flask, FastAPI, Experience with RESTful APIs, Minor experience with WSLs
Databases: MySQL, MSSQL, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, BigQuery SQL, Snowflake SQL, basic understanding of SSL
Tools:
Git, Bitbucket
Soft Skills:
Analytical approach and problem-solving abilities.
Strong communication skills to work effectively with teams from various functions.
Adaptability and willingness to learn new technologies and methodologies.
Project Skills:
AGILE, Waterfall, Scrum, Software Development Lifecycle, JIRA, Change management, Release management, Configuration management
Schedule: Ability to conduct and/or attend meetings when needed in the evening.
As a world leader in the semiconductor industry, Micron is dedicated to your personal wellbeing and professional growth. Micron benefits are designed to help you stay well, provide peace of mind and help you prepare for the future. We offer a choice of medical, dental and vision plans in all locations enabling team members to select the plans that best meet their family healthcare needs and budget. Micron also provides benefit programs that help protect your income if you are unable to work due to illness or injury, and paid family leave. Additionally, Micron benefits include a robust paid time-off program and paid holidays. For additional information regarding the Benefit programs available, please see the Benefits Guide posted on micron.com/careers/benefits.
Micron is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other factor protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws.
To learn about your right to work click here.
To learn more about Micron, please visit micron.com/careers
For US Sites Only: To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact Micron’s People Organization at hrsupport_na@micron.com or 1-800-336-8918 (select option #3)
Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.
Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron.",3.8,Micron,"Manassas, VA",10000+ Employees,1978.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,127.0,VA,46.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The CDC Foundation helps the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) save and improve lives by unleashing the power of collaboration between CDC, philanthropies, corporations, organizations and individuals to protect the health, safety and security of America and the world. The CDC Foundation is the go-to nonprofit authorized by Congress to mobilize philanthropic partners and private-sector resources to support CDC’s critical health protection mission. Since 1995, the CDC Foundation has raised over $1.9 billion and launched more than 1,300 programs impacting a variety of health threats from chronic disease conditions including cardiovascular disease and cancer, to infectious diseases like rotavirus and HIV, to emergency responses, including COVID-19 and Ebola. The CDC Foundation managed hundreds of programs in the United States and in more than 90 countries last year. Visit www.cdcfoundation.org for more information.

Job Highlights
Location: Remote, must be based in the United States
Salary Range: $92,700-$134,275 per year, plus benefits. Individual salary offers will be based on experience and qualifications unique to each candidate.
Position Type: Grant funded, limited-term opportunity
Position End Date: June 30, 2025
Overview
The Data Scientist will play a crucial role in advancing the CDC Foundation's mission by providing informatics expertise and performing health informatics activities for a public health organization, which require specialized knowledge and skills in both health and information technology, including health informatics, scientific analysis, data management, and security standards. This role is aligned to the Workforce Acceleration Initiative (WAI). WAI is a federally funded CDC Foundation program with the goal of helping the nation’s public health agencies by providing them with the technology and data experts they need to accelerate their information system improvements.

Working within North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office, the Data Scientist will plan and manage the development, implementation, and maintenance of data systems and informatics processes needed for data generation, storage, processing, and analysis. The Data Scientist will collaborate with data content experts, analysts, data scientists, data modelers, warehouse architects, IT staff and other organization staff to design and implement proposed solutions that meet the needs of the public health agency.

The Data Scientist will be hired by the CDC Foundation and assigned to the North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office. This position is eligible for a fully remote work arrangement for U.S. based candidates.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, select, test, implement, and evaluate new or modified informatics solutions, data structures, and decision-support mechanisms to support agency information management needs within various contexts.
Create and manage the systems and pipelines that enable efficient and reliable flow of data, including ingestion, processing, and storage.
Create new and update existing health integration engine (Rhapsody) routes to handle new data elements and formats creating the necessary output for upload into surveillance systems and databases as well as reporting to the CDC.
Develop, implement, and improve data analysis and visualization tools for use by organization staff, to provide timely, relevant information that informs decisions affecting the public’s health.
Analyze diverse datasets related to public health issues to identify trends, patterns, and correlations.
Apply statistical methods and machine learning algorithms to extract actionable insights.
Develop predictive models to anticipate disease patterns, assess risk factors, and guide intervention strategies.
Continuously optimize algorithms for enhanced accuracy and performance.
Create compelling visualizations and reports to communicate findings to partners and decision-makers.
Present data-driven insights in a clear and understandable manner to facilitate informed decision-making.
Collaborate with the public health organization and its partners to understand their data needs and objectives.
Provide data-driven support and guidance to inform public health policies and initiatives.
Knowledgeable about industry trends, best practices, and emerging technologies in informatics and data management, and incorporating the trends into the organization's data infrastructure.
Provide technical guidance to other staff.
Prepare and maintain system documentation and architecture diagrams for processes assigned (new and existing).
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Informatics, Computer Science, Information Technology, Data Science, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of relevant professional experience
Proficiency in programming languages commonly used in data engineering, such as Python, Java, Scala, or SQL. Candidate should be able to implement data automations within existing frameworks as opposed to writing one off scripts.
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Scikit-learn).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Strong analytical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to interpret complex datasets and derive meaningful insights.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Expertise with Rhapsody Integration Engine (Rhapsody Certification or ability to obtain certification preferred)
Experience with multiple health data types (i.e. HL7, ELR, eCR, FHIR)
Solid understanding of API-based architectures (including FHIR)
Ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical partners effectively.
Flexibility to adapt to evolving project requirements and priorities.
Professional certifications in data science, machine learning, or public health analytics preferred.
Outstanding interpersonal and teamwork skills; collegial; energetic; and able to develop productive relationships with colleagues, partners, and partners.
Demonstrated ability to work well independently and within teams
Experience working in a virtual environment with remote partners and teams
Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Special Notes
This role is involved in a dynamic public health program. As such, roles and responsibilities are subject to change as situations evolve. Roles and responsibilities listed above may be expanded upon or updated to match priorities and needs, once written approval is received by the CDC Foundation in order to best support the public health programming.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status, and all other characteristics protected by law.

We comply with all applicable laws including E.O. 11246 and the Vietnam Era Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 governing employment practices and do not discriminate on the basis of any unlawful criteria in accordance with 41 C.F.R. §§ 60-300.5(a)(12) and 60-741.5(a)(7). As a federal government contractor, we take affirmative action on behalf of protected veterans.

The CDC Foundation is a smoke-free environment.
Relocation expenses are not included.",4.3,CDC Foundation,North Dakota,1001 to 5000 Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,113.0,North Dakota,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Details
Position Details
Job Title
Data Scientist

Position Number
8150736

Job Category
University Staff

Job Type
Full-Time

FLSA Status
Exempt

Campus
Maywood-Health Sciences Campus

Department Name
PHYSIOLOGY

Location Code
PHYSIOLOGY (06240A)

Is this split and/or fully grant funded?
Yes

Duties and Responsibilities
The Data Scientist will perform detailed analyses of large bodies of heterogeneous omics and clinical data to discover new patterns and insights that impact patient health or augment human capabilities. The Data Scientist should have deep expertise in the methods used to analyze data and deep knowledge of data types, topics, and scientific challenges and approaches that will be used to help inform and define new products, experiences, and technologies. This position works in conjunction with basic and clinical scientists to create intelligence-driven systems to solve complex translational problems.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Participates in multidisciplinary teams to design, develop, and recommend new approaches for data-driven decision-making.
Leads discovery processes on pioneering Artificial Intelligence (“AI"")/Machine Learning (“ML”) based approaches to solve complex data problems across a variety of domains.
Provides strategic direction regarding data science and AI.
Guides and educates basic science and clinical teams to provide unbiased and accurate information, analysis, consultation, and recommendations to support strategic and operational data science initiatives.
Develops analytics tools that can be used by other staff with non-technical expertise.
Supports scientific projects under the supervision of the principal investigator.
Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis.


Minimum Education and/or Work Experience
Bachelor’s degree in related field required

Qualifications
BS, the position would not necessarily require a PhD, as considerable experience in the field would be acceptable.

Certificates/Credentials/Licenses
N/A

Computer Skills
Office Suite skills, AI/Machine Learning based approaches. Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Required operation of university owned vehicles
No

Does this position require direct animal or patient contact?
No

Physical Demands
None

Working Conditions
None

Open Date
10/01/2024

Close Date

Special Instructions to Applicants

Diversity and Inclusion Statement
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion

As one of the nation’s largest Jesuit, Catholic universities, Loyola University Chicago fosters a transformative cultural experience that honors diversity, equity, and inclusion. We are committed to not only recruiting, but also retaining a diverse, mission driven workforce and enabling a culture of inclusiveness in an environment that values service excellence, stewardship, personal well-being, and professional development for all of our employees. Loyola University Chicago supports its staff and faculty with a wide array of affordable, comprehensive and competitive benefits centered on health and wellness, financial security, equity, and work-life balance. We actively seek those who wish to join our faculty, staff, and students in a community of diverse opinions, perspectives, and backgrounds supporting our Jesuit mission and striving toward the same goal of being persons for and with others.


Quick Link for Posting
https://www.careers.luc.edu/postings/29300",3.8,Loyola University Chicago,"Maywood, IL",1001 to 5000 Employees,1870.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,105.0,IL,154.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$175K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 4 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 2 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$145,000/year to $204,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,175.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$93K
/yr","Job Overview:
Graham Tech is seeking a skilled and experienced Data Scientist to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing a set of techniques and analytics applications that transform raw data into meaningful insights, supporting strategic decision-making processes. This role will require proficiency in data-oriented programming languages, visualization software, and a deep understanding of data mining, data modeling, natural language processing, and machine learning.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement data-driven techniques and analytics applications to transform raw data into actionable insights.
Apply advanced data mining, data modeling, natural language processing (NLP), and machine learning (ML) techniques to extract and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets.
Visualize data findings using cutting-edge visualization tools, ensuring that data is presented clearly and effectively to stakeholders.
Interpret and report data analysis results, providing insights to inform decision-making processes.
Create and maintain dynamic data reports that offer real-time insights for business needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and implement strategies that leverage data analysis to solve complex business challenges.
Work independently to perform all functional duties and responsibilities in a fast-paced, results-driven environment.
Requirements:
Experience: 3-10 years of experience in data science, analytics, or a related field.
Education: BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field.
Technical Skills: Proficiency in data-oriented programming languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL) and visualization software (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, D3.js).
Strong expertise in data mining, data modeling, NLP, and ML techniques.
Experience working with large datasets, both structured and unstructured.
Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI (Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information) clearance required.
Additional Qualifications:
Strong analytical, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to present technical findings to non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to work independently and manage multiple projects in a high-pressure environment.
Compensation:
At Graham Technologies, we believe in treating every person the way we want to be treated - fairly. Our compensation package ensures everyone at Graham Technologies is given equal pay for equal work - regardless of race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, disability, religion, age, nationality, or even negotiation skills!
Most IT companies can probably offer many of the same services, but what sets us apart from the others is truly our people! We care about our employees and show it often with sincere appreciation and acknowledgment of not only the final work products but also the little steps taken along the way! In addition, our generous benefits package helps our team members live well and prosper.
Here are just a few highlights:
Four Week's Accrued PTO First Year
Ten Paid Federal Holidays
Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
401(k) Plan with Annual Employer Contributions
Flexible Schedules
Reimbursements for Continued Education and Training

Why Graham Technologies?
Our Core Values say it all!
Value our Customers
Care about our Employees
Passionate about Innovation
Believe in a Strong Work Ethic
Rely on Teamwork
Integrity Matters

Founded in 2007, GTech is a consulting services firm zealous about providing the best solutions to address our client's needs and maximize the value of their investments. One way we do this is by providing exceptional employees for our clients-whose range of expertise expands the entire IT industry! We've cultivated a family of individuals where integrity, commitment, and reliability are etched into the heart of our delivery teams.
In addition, we are equally zealous about caring for our employees - the lifeblood of our business! We've purposefully created a culture that is friendly, family-oriented, and all-inclusive. Our team members are encouraged to ""have a life,"" both in and out of the office, through flexible schedules (where available), continuing education, and support to pursue their passions!",4.4,Graham Technologies,"Tampa, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,93.0,FL,17.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist III, Analytics","$179K
/yr","Expedia Group brands power global travel for everyone, everywhere. We design cutting-edge tech to make travel smoother and more memorable, and we create groundbreaking solutions for our partners. Our diverse, vibrant, and welcoming community is essential in driving our success.
Why Join Us?
To shape the future of travel, people must come first. Guided by our Values and Leadership Agreements, we foster an open culture where everyone belongs, differences are celebrated and know that when one of us wins, we all win.
We provide a full benefits package, including exciting travel perks, generous time-off, parental leave, a global hybrid work setup (with some pretty cool offices), and career development resources, all to fuel our employees' passion for travel and ensure a rewarding career journey. We’re building a more open world. Join us.
Data Scientist III, Analytics
Are you excited by the opportunity to pioneer the future of travel? Do you want to redefine the way people plan, search for, and book their travel? At Expedia Group, we believe that travel brings the world together, and we are passionate about the endless possibilities.
The InsurTech team at Expedia is responsible for managing the InsurTech P&L and driving its strategy and business development efforts across the Expedia Group globally. We deliver millions of dollars of incremental revenue making a direct and meaningful impact to the company's bottom-line. At the same time, we increase customers’ confidence to book travel and make difference in their lives.
Introduction to team
This role is an excellent opportunity to join the InsurTech Analytics Team where we are passionate about delivering outstanding user experience! We power and deliver product analytics, user behavior analysis, experimentation, and visualization services that enable highly tailored and optimized experiences using the scientific methods and applied insights. We’re looking for a highly motivated individual to join our team to help us formulate business strategy and to deliver impactful analytics insights. If you enjoy using data to build business cases, solve business problems, improve ongoing business activities, and to work on a team that functions as the “business owner” you will fit right in. In this role, you will use your analytical and business skills to inspire product, engineering, finance and customer support, and our strategic partners to prioritize, implement and scale our product ideas
In this role, you will:
Provide strategic analysis and insights for the InsurTech business, while actively looking for opportunities to grow the business
Own end to end process in evaluating A/B or multivariate tests to improve learning; proactively uncover opportunities and recommend new features for test and learn; evaluate and apply alternative methods to supplement randomized testing
Performs advanced statistical analyses on experimental data to identify trends and derive actionable insights
Apply your expertise in data modeling, quantitative analysis, data mining, data visualization with a goal of improving customer experience and business results with a religious focus on impactful analytics, steward product team to drive insights
A high performing individual contributor who consistently applies and enhances the analytics capabilities, best practices and processes to solve complex business issues and identify opportunities
Function independently, assessing existing and upcoming business needs
Works with data engineers to ensure best practices are implemented through experimentation platform
Effectively communicates statistical findings and insights to stakeholders and collaborate with product development teams to integrate statistical insights into decision-making
Experience and qualifications:
Bachelor's, Masters or PhD degree in Mathematics, Science, Statistics, Engineering or 5+ years’ data analytics experience in a business context
Strong analytical/modeling skills with ability to convert raw data into measurable insights
Able to structure / work on data exploration problems, with innovative ways and solutions, bringing to bear strong reporting and data visualization skills
Strong hands-on experience in SQL
Proficient in building data visualizations (Tableau, Looker, etc.)
Intermediate (or better) knowledge of Statistics
Experience with R, python, or other coding language a plus
Experience with web analytics tools such as Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics a plus
Experience in modeling selection, building and evaluation
The total cash range for this position in Seattle is $137,500.00 to $192,500.00. Employees in this role have the potential to increase their pay up to $220,000.00, which is the top of the range, based on ongoing, demonstrated, and sustained performance in the role.
Starting pay for this role will vary based on multiple factors, including location, available budget, and an individual’s knowledge, skills, and experience. Pay ranges may be modified in the future.
Accommodation requests
If you need assistance with any part of the application or recruiting process due to a disability, or other physical or mental health conditions, please reach out to our Recruiting Accommodations Team through the Accommodation Request.
We are proud to be named as a Best Place to Work on Glassdoor in 2024 and be recognized for award-winning culture by organizations like Forbes, TIME, Disability:IN, and others.
Expedia Group's family of brands includes: Brand Expedia®, Hotels.com®, Expedia® Partner Solutions, Vrbo®, trivago®, Orbitz®, Travelocity®, Hotwire®, Wotif®, ebookers®, CheapTickets®, Expedia Group™ Media Solutions, Expedia Local Expert®, CarRentals.com™, and Expedia Cruises™. © 2024 Expedia, Inc. All rights reserved. Trademarks and logos are the property of their respective owners. CST: 2029030-50
Employment opportunities and job offers at Expedia Group will always come from Expedia Group’s Talent Acquisition and hiring teams. Never provide sensitive, personal information to someone unless you’re confident who the recipient is. Expedia Group does not extend job offers via email or any other messaging tools to individuals with whom we have not made prior contact. Our email domain is @expediagroup.com. The official website to find and apply for job openings at Expedia Group is careers.expediagroup.com/jobs.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. This employer participates in E-Verify. The employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.8,Expedia Partner Solutions,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1996.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,179.0,WA,28.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist / Data Resource Analyst II,"$78K
/yr","International Studies and Programs (ISP) supports MSU global learning and international engagement under the MSU Strategic Plan 2030 in the areas of research, teaching, and outreach. To fulfill its main objectives, ISP communicates key international data to university leadership and the public and serve as a campus-wide analytical resource. ISP manages MSU’s International Data Portals, which provide visualizations of MSU's Externally Funded International Projects, International Student Enrollment, Education Abroad, International Agreements Data, and International Research Collaboration. These dashboards utilize Tableau, Tableau Prep, and SQL Oracle to draw from MSU’s electronic data warehouse (EDW). International Studies and Programs (ISP) collaborates with units across campus to streamline and upgrade the international data plan.
ISP is seeking a Data Scientist who is curious, creative, and can see both the big picture and work with attention to detail. The successful candidate will have strong technical, interpersonal and communication skills to convey findings to various audiences and positively influence university leadership. The Data Scientist will need to articulate complex issues to a non-technical audience clearly and effectively. Daily activities may include development of data representations and visualizations, advising on predictive models and creating easy to understand reports and dashboards. This will be a full-time (100% FTE) 12-month fixed-term position funded for one year with the possibility of reappointments depending on funding and performance.
ISP is currently operating under a hybrid modality structure, with staff working three days in person and two days remote. ISP values individual and group differences and encourages applicants who will contribute to a culture of inclusion on campus.
Primary responsibilities include:
Data Analysis and Reporting
Analyze, interpret, summarize, and present data and findings in a clear, comprehensive, and effective manner
Conduct internal and external benchmarking analysis for ISP
Develop and design reports and dashboards in Tableau
Support Data-Driven Decision Making
Consult with and support ISP leadership and units by pulling and analyzing data
With ISP leadership, collaborate with other campus units on communicating, building, and evaluating data tools and streamlining data reporting
Provide analysis and decision support for university international initiatives, projects, and planning as needed
Provide training/capacity development support for ISP units in various data-related topics
Represent ISP on university-wide data-related committees
Keep apprised of trends and conversations about data in higher education and international education
Database Management and Development
Build custom SQL to meet reporting requirements and manage ISP International Data Portals
Perform query tuning and root cause analysis to optimize database performance and correct errors
Develop SQL to create database tables, views, and stored procedures to support data storage and report development
Provide targeted training on tools and platforms when necessary
Minimum Requirements
Master’s degree in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field including other degrees with a strong quantitative emphasis
Three to five years of post-graduate work experience in data mining, data warehousing, data science, data management, as well as data analysis and visualization
Experience writing advanced SQL queries; expertise with Oracle PL/SQL, expertise with Tableau
Experience using data retrieval and manipulation, and expertise in statistical tools (such as SAS, SQL, STATA, R, D3, Python) and data visualization tools (such as Tableau and Tableau Prep)
Demonstrated success in managing collaborative projects involving cross-functional and interdisciplinary teams
Excellent communication skills including presenting, editing, and writing, as well as ability to demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy
Desired Qualifications
Doctorate in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field with a strong quantitative emphasis
Proven excellence in program or project management
Experience working in a university setting and in-depth knowledge of university administrative organization, policies, procedures, and practices for institutional research-oriented roles
Experience managing higher education related data (student, research, business support systems)
Understanding of data warehouse technologies (Oracle preferred) and familiarity with data integration processes using enterprise ETL tools (DataStage preferred) and the role of data stewardship
Ability to model and analyze data in statistical tools (SPSS, R, SAS, Python, or similar) combined with experience integrating large datasets from a variety of sources; experience with ETL tools (DataStage, Informatica)
Ability to work closely with clients to build custom dashboards, conduct data analysis to support ISP centers and other units, as well as develop and streamline data reporting
Make data-informed recommendations to administrators to contribute to decision making
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, age, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Application Materials
Resume and cover letter
Work Hours
STANDARD 8-5
Description of End Date
one year from date of hire
Website
https://www.isp.msu.edu/
Bidding eligibility ends October 22, 2024 at 11:55 P.M.",4.3,Michigan State University,"East Lansing, MI",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,78.0,MI,169.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US; Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_113619
ABOUT US
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
OUR TEAM
Zynga’s Applied AI group focuses on developing innovative ways to tackle problems within the game development process, demonstrating directly the ways that AI can improve the creativity and productivity of team members across Zynga. Our team is multi-disciplinary, and includes Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers among others. We build cloud-based tools and technologies to support every aspect of the development process, from concept development through to LiveOps and publishing operations.
To be successful in this role you should have curiosity about the areas of Game Development, Artificial Intelligence and Computational Creativity, be a proactive learner, have good depth in technical skills, and a strong desire to build high quality software that delivers value and efficiency.
KEY ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Write well-crafted, efficient and testable code and algorithms
Design and build AI systems that solve computational creativity challenges
Implement and deploy solutions as part of a larger microservice architecture
Plan and implement tasks of small to medium scale independently
Excellent communication skills and comfort working in a collaborative inter-discipline environment
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Ph.D. or M.S. in Computer Science with specialization in AI, or equivalent experience
Experience building AI systems for games, procedural content generation, or computational creativity
Understanding of principles of AI, including ML
Familiarity with principles of game design and implementation
Familiarity with Python, and at least one of Typescript, C++, or Unity C#
Familiarity with containers and cloud infrastructure principles – AWS preferred
Desire to learn and share knowledge with peers, collaborate in a cross-functional team
WHAT WE OFFER YOU
Competitive salary, bonus plan and ESPP (Employee Stock Purchase Plan)
401K Company Match Contribution (US)
RRSP/DPSP company match contribution (Canada)
Health coverage, dental, disability, critical illness, EAP, and life insurance (Canada)
Medical, dental, vision, EAP, life insurance, and disability benefits (US)
Virtual mental health and neurodiversity support programs
Global Fitness reimbursement program
Global Wellbeing Program
Financial wellness program with unlimited access to certified financial planners
Discretionary Time Off policy for many employees
Family planning support program
Generous paid parental, pregnancy-related disability, caregiver, and compassionate leaves
Zynga happy hours and frequent employee events
Flexible working hours on many teams
Culture of diversity and inclusion including employee resource groups
Work with cool people and impact millions of daily player
This is a fully remote role that may be based anywhere in the United States. Below are the expected salary and wage ranges for applicants based in locations where the pay transparency law is in effect:
Colorado: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
California: $87,400 and $129,340 per year
New York State (inclusive of New York City): $98,400 and $145,620 per year
Washington: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
Base pay offered is based on market location, and may vary further depending on individualized factors for job candidates, such as job-related knowledge, skills, experience, and other objective business considerations. Subject to those same considerations, the total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a bonus and/or equity awards and eligibility to participate in our 401(K) plan, in addition to a full range of medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees will also receive 16 paid holidays per calendar year, unlimited discretionary time off, and will receive up to 6.5 sick days per calendar year. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation or benefit program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.
#LI-RK2
Zynga does not engage in financial exchanges during the recruitment or onboarding process. We do not conduct job interviews over third-party messaging apps such as Telegram, WhatsApp or others. We will never ask you for your personal or financial information over unofficial chat channels. Our in-house recruitment team only contacts individuals via official company email addresses (i.e., via a zynga.com or naturalmotion.com email domain).
If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you may wish to contact the authorities. In the United States, you may file a complaint with the FBI. More information is available here: https://www.ic3.gov.",4.2,Zynga,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,114.0,United States,17.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Type: Description:
Position: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
Duration: 12 months +
Job Description
Minimum Qualifications:
Have image processing background and a good understanding on image quality
Experience in data science and analytics, including statistical data analysis.
Strong programming skills, including python and Linux scripting for data processing and tool development.
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or related areas.
Good communication skill and positive working attitude
Expect to be self-motivated, proactive, and solution-oriented
Preferred Qualifications:
Hands-on experience with data batch processing and handling
Experience with deep learning network model training and inferencing
3 years of relevant work experience
Please send your resumes to gjose@sisinc.com (Max 3-4 pages)
Location San Diego , CA Min Experience (yrs): Required Education: Not Specified Benefits:",4.1,SIS,"San Diego, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1987.0,Company - Private,Film Production,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,CA,37.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$88K
/yr","Position Description:

Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead and support data processing and analysis tasks, such as building data pipelines, monitoring data quality, developing documentation, applying statistical and data science methods, and creating data visualizations. Our junior data scientists underpin our company's core offerings in program improvement and data science, which yield crucial evidence and information for policy and decision makers. This position will either work remotely or flexibly in one of our office locations.
This position focuses on health policy, which includes projects such as:
Enhancing knowledge management and library curation across all VRDC projects by developing Python scripts that leverage large language models for automated document classification.
Monitoring the impacts of an alternative payment model for primary care in terms of care quality, cost, and health outcomes for diverse beneficiaries, using claims from thousands of primary care practices across the country and predicting future hospital costs and behavior.
Developing and testing how claims and survey data from federal and state-level programs could be used to measure patients’ experience of care, quality of life, care coordination, and long-term outcomes for beneficiaries enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid.
Creating an interactive data visualization tool to help local policy and decision makers understand how social determinants of health are related to health outcomes in their county, using open-source data from public agencies and non-profits.
Specifically, this Data Scientist contributes to team-based projects by:
Co-developing analysis plans with a senior data scientist or researcher
Writing and maintaining programming systems in languages such as Python and R to obtain, combine, and transform datasets on cloud, internal, and client servers
Developing and maintaining documentation
Implementing quality assurance practices, such as version control and testing
Conducting analysis and communicating results, both to clients and internal teams, such as descriptive statistics, data visualizations, and model diagnostics
Leading and managing small teams and tasks with oversight from a senior staff member
Position Requirements:

Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree, with an academic record including courses in subjects such as statistics, data science, data analytics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, and/or social science; equivalent years of experience can be substituted
Demonstrated interest and/or experience using programming and data science and/or statistics to contribute to projects with a policy/social impact in academic and/or professional settings
At least three years of experience performing data cleaning and analysis using programming languages such as R, Python, or Julia in the academic, extra-curricular, or professional environment
Experience executing data science and statistics techniques including regression modeling, machine learning algorithms, network analysis, or natural language processing
Ability and desire to work independently as part of an interdisciplinary team that may be geographically dispersed. This includes being able to learn from and apply resources such as self-guided tutorials, package documentation, and academic articles and willingness to constantly learn and contribute to knowledge sharing with team members.
Experience with reproducible research principles, version control, interactive visualizations, and common packages/libraries for supporting data science work in R, Python, and/or Julia (e.g., tidyverse, R Shiny, R Markdown, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, MLJ.jl, DataFrames.jl, and/or Makie.jl).
Desired but not required: experience with healthcare datasets (for example, Medicare or Medicaid claims and enrollment data), production-quality machine learning applications, cloud computing environments, and algorithmic fairness and ethics
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $75,000- $100,000. This position is eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance. To apply, please submit a cover letter (optional), resume, code samples, and salary expectations.
Staff in our Health or Human Services units will eventually work with some of our largest clients, including the Centers for Medicaid & Medicare Services (CMS) and other agencies. Most staff working on these contracts will be required to complete a successful background investigation including the Questionnaire for Public Trust Position SF-85 (https://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/sf85p.pdf). Staff that are unable to successfully undergo the background investigation will need to be able to obtain work outside these contracts. Staff will work with their supervisor to get re-staffed, however if they are unable to do so it may result in employment termination due to lack of work.
STAFFING AGENCIES AND THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS: Mathematica is not accepting candidates for this role or any technical role from staffing agencies or third-party recruiters. Please do not contact technical or senior staff at Mathematica or share unsolicited resumes. All agency inquiries go through the talent acquisition team and will be routed accordingly.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ; Remote
#LI-AR1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1986.0,Company - Private,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,88.0,DC,38.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$192K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modeling project
At least 3 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, be able to work with cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $144000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,192.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","Recipient of the 2023 Exceptional PeopleFirst Workplace Award by IWPL, HelloGov® is an Artificial General Intelligence (AGI) company founded by ex-Machine Learning (ML) Researchers from OpenAI, Google, and the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), united by our shared patriotism and belief of advancing AI in the U.S. public sector to maintain global competitiveness. We conduct AGI research, solution development, and human capital resourcing with the declared intention of Democratizing AI for the Public Sector™.
HelloGov® was founded on the principles of nurturing our employees’ careers and wellness. We take pride in providing a work-life balance that stems from years of building companies in Silicon Valley. Our founders have pioneered some of the best AI technologies in the market and have always operated with humility and ambition. We operate with an award-winning people first mantra of:
Transparency.
Flexibility.
Work life balance.
Culture of sharing credit.
Empowering every employee, from the shop floor to the top floor.
Good company policies.
Investment in people.
Focus on ergonomics.
Fun traditions.
Benefits (Tier I Health/Vision/Dental insurance, 401K, EAP, Equity, Stipends, Investment in your wellness)
Equality in Compensation (i.e. every team member, from Junior to Executive staff, receives a Sign-On Bonus)
We are seeking a team of Data Scientists with 3+ years of experience in multi-intelligence and multi-domain systems, with a strong background in NLP, computer vision, statistical learning theory, and ML model development. Candidates should be proficient in Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++, and have experience communicating technical concepts to business, technical, and non-technical audiences. This role leverages advanced AI technology set to dominate the market for the next decade, supporting national biodefense through integrated biosurveillance (IB).
Major Duties:
Designs, configures, develops, tests, and supports informatics and data science solutions for a wide array of technical use cases;
Applies analytical methodologies to diagnose data-related challenges, implement solutions, and evaluate performance;
Documents and presents requirements, design alternatives, and findings to team members and clients;
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships; and
Experience with integrated development environments, data integration, data visualization, data mining, and analysis tools.
Maintains and guides the development of common libraries and tools used by multiple teams.
Aids in formulating a strategy on how to achieve rapid prototyping
Required Skills/Experience:
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory;
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models;
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility;
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models; and
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations.
LOCATION:
Falls Church, VA (Hybrid)
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATIONS:
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence, or related field required (Master's degree preferred).
CLEARANCE:
Top Secret (SCI eligible)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $138,997.00 - $189,983.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
No weekends
Experience:
Natural language processing: 3 years (Required)
AI models: 3 years (Required)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++: 5 years (Required)
large scale data handling + data mining: 5 years (Required)
GPU Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
DoD: 10 years (Preferred)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Falls Church, VA 22041",Not listed,HelloGov,"Falls Church, VA",-1,-1.0,-1,-1,-1,-1,0,1,164.0,VA,-1.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,1
DATA SCIENTIST,"$112K
/yr","Description
Applies knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to the development and improvement of processes. Identify limitations, or potential issues with datasets and data types that may impact performance from machine learning algorithms. Re-train models as needed to address new challenges, or novel goals. Aid investigators and stakeholders in the validation of results. Generate detailed reports and presentations. May mentor and train junior staff members.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Compile, manipulate, and analyze data using descriptive and inferential statistics to address a broad spectrum of research and administrative questions.
Use statistical software to create data analysis programs/syntax with appropriate documentation.
Understand and interpret data analysis programs/syntax written by others involved in data analysis in the department.
Explain complex statistical concepts in the form of presentations or written project reports/documentation
Write and/or review relevant portions of research study manuscripts and/or abstracts.
Effectively visualize and organize complex datasets for the production of high-quality figures and tables for reports, manuscripts, and presentations
Consult with various researchers or administrators regarding data analytic needs, feasibility of proposed analyses, sequential procedures, and project timelines
Perform other duties as assigned
Salary Range: $85,600 - $139,100

Qualifications
Doctorate degree in a related field OR Master's degree in a related field and two (2) years of related experience OR Bachelor's degree in related field and four (4) years of related experience required. Work experience may NOT substitute for education requirement.
UAB is an Equal Employment/Equal Educational Opportunity Institution dedicated to providing equal opportunities and equal access to all individuals regardless of race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, sex (including pregnancy), genetic information, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and veteran’s status. As required by Title IX, UAB prohibits sex discrimination in any education program or activity that it operates. Individuals may report concerns or questions to UAB’s Assistant Vice President and Senior Title IX Coordinator. The Title IX notice of nondiscrimination is located at uab.edu/titleix.

Primary Location: University
Job Category: Professional & Managerial
Organization: 312000000 Dept of Medical Education
Employee Status: Regular
Shift: Day/1st Shift
Work Arrangement (final schedule to be determined by the department/hiring manager): Onsite",4.0,University of Alabama at Birmingham,"Birmingham, AL",10000+ Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,AL,,0,0,0,0,0
Product Data Scientist,"$124K
/yr","The Company
PayPal has been revolutionizing commerce globally for more than 25 years. Creating innovative experiences that make moving money, selling, and shopping simple, personalized, and secure, PayPal empowers consumers and businesses in approximately 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy.

We operate a global, two-sided network at scale that connects hundreds of millions of merchants and consumers. We help merchants and consumers connect, transact, and complete payments, whether they are online or in person. PayPal is more than a connection to third-party payment networks. We provide proprietary payment solutions accepted by merchants that enable the completion of payments on our platform on behalf of our customers.

We offer our customers the flexibility to use their accounts to purchase and receive payments for goods and services, as well as the ability to transfer and withdraw funds. We enable consumers to exchange funds more safely with merchants using a variety of funding sources, which may include a bank account, a PayPal or Venmo account balance, PayPal and Venmo branded credit products, a credit card, a debit card, certain cryptocurrencies, or other stored value products such as gift cards, and eligible credit card rewards. Our PayPal, Venmo, and Xoom products also make it safer and simpler for friends and family to transfer funds to each other. We offer merchants an end-to-end payments solution that provides authorization and settlement capabilities, as well as instant access to funds and payouts. We also help merchants connect with their customers, process exchanges and returns, and manage risk. We enable consumers to engage in cross-border shopping and merchants to extend their global reach while reducing the complexity and friction involved in enabling cross-border trade.

Our beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We live each day guided by our core values of Inclusion, Innovation, Collaboration, and Wellness. Together, our values ensure that we work together as one global team with our customers at the center of everything we do – and they push us to ensure we take care of ourselves, each other, and our communities.
Job Description Summary: As a Data Scientist, you will spearhead our efforts to measure and enhance developer experience to integrate with PayPal's products. This role is central to our mission, offering you the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technology in a fast-paced environment. You will lead the data science projects for the initiatives that optimize features that are adopted by the external developer community, directly impacting PayPal's ability to offer seamless payment solutions to millions of users worldwide.
Job Description:
The Global Analytics and Data Science team is seeking a Data Scientist of PayPal’s SMB Analytics and ML Team to join us as exceptional problem solver with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus.
We are responsible to find opportunities and gaps in developer experience, product flows using statistical methods to strategize Product roadmap. This team empowers senior leadership with actionable insights for informed, data-driven decisions.
In this role, we are tackling the complex and fascinating challenge of optimizing the developer experience at PayPal. Developers go through a non-linear journey, from onboarding to integration, and it's crucial to understand their pain points at each stage. This includes analyzing what they search for, how they navigate the platform, when they begin integrating our APIs, and their activities during sandbox testing.
We aim to provide deep insights into these areas by applying advanced statistical methods and cutting-edge data science techniques. This allows us to uncover friction points and provide actionable recommendations to enhance the overall developer journey. Additionally, we leverage the latest generative AI tools to assist developers throughout their integration process. A key part of this role is to measure the efficacy and accuracy of these AI-driven solutions, ensuring they deliver value and improve the experience.
This is a unique opportunity to dissect the end-to-end developer journey, identify opportunities for product improvement, and collaborate with our product and engineering partners to drive innovation in developer tools and resources. The role goes beyond simple analytics, offering the chance to shape PayPal’s developer ecosystem and influence the tools that developers rely on to build seamlessly integrated solutions.
Your day to day:
Data Analysis and Decision Making:
Utilize large, complex datasets to drive improvements in developer KPIs.
Employ advanced analytical and statistical techniques to identify trends, issues, and opportunities.
Perform deep-dive analytics including Causal Inference analysis, Pre-Post analysis, Sensitivity analysis, financial projections, and additional ad-hoc exercises to provide holistic recommendations.
Strategic Influence: Develop and present insights and strategic recommendations to Product and Data Science leadership. Influence product direction and strategic decisions through data-driven insights.
Collaboration and Communication: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including product development, engineering, and marketing to implement data-driven improvements. Occasionally collaborate with developers to optimize their experiences. Mentor junior team members .
Innovation and Improvement: Lead initiatives to refine existing analytical processes and develop new approaches to business challenges. Promote a culture of continuous improvement and testing.
What do you need to bring
3+ years of experience in analyzing multi-dimensional datasets and creating actionable business solutions.
Strong educational background with a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Expertise in SQL, Excel, and visualization tools such as Tableau or Qlikview. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python is preferred.
Demonstrable experience with big data technologies such as Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, and BigQuery.
Knowledge of Python, Jupyter Notebooks, and SQL.
Exceptional communication skills to effectively articulate insights and influence cross-functional teams.
Prior experience in performing data science to fuel insights to drive Product within a high-tech environment.
Personal Attributes:
A data-driven decision maker, passionate about solving complex problems using analytical solutions.
A self-starter who is motivated to take initiative and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
A fun-loving team player who brings energy and enthusiasm to the workplace.
Comfortable with ambiguity and uncertainty in a dynamic business landscape.
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000
For the majority of employees, PayPal's balanced hybrid work model offers 3 days in the office for effective in-person collaboration and 2 days at your choice of either the PayPal office or your home workspace, ensuring that you equally have the benefits and conveniences of both locations.

Our Benefits:
At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.
We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:
To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.
Belonging at PayPal:
Our employees are central to advancing our mission, and we strive to create an environment where everyone can do their best work with a sense of purpose and belonging. Belonging at PayPal means creating a workplace with a sense of acceptance and security where all employees feel included and valued. We are proud to have a diverse workforce reflective of the merchants, consumers, and communities that we serve, and we continue to take tangible actions to cultivate inclusivity and belonging at PayPal.

Any general requests for consideration of your skills, please Join our Talent Community.

We know the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can get in the way of meeting spectacular candidates. Please don’t hesitate to apply.",3.7,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",10000+ Employees,1998.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,124.0,CA,26.0,1,0,0,0,1
Research Data Scientist,"$116K
/yr","Job ID
34394667
Category
Research and Development
Organization
University Library
Department
University Library Dept
Location
Main Campus - UCR
Salary
$81,500 - $150,100
Date Posted
October 10, 2024
Application Deadline
Open Until Filled
Schedule
8AM - 5PM
Full/Part Time
Full-time(100%)
Level of Supervision
General Supervision
Other Information
Qualifies for Employee Referral Bonus: No
UC Internal Job: No
Position Information
Reporting to the Director of Research Services, this position will be the driving force of the library's Data Science Initiative to support campus research through interdisciplinary collaboration on cutting-edge projects in STEM, Liberal Arts, and Social Sciences. Seeks opportunities to embed themselves in campus research teams to directly address UCR researchers' data and AI related needs through activities including but are not limited to: designing, developing and implementing infrastructure, systems, software and solutions; directly answering compute- and data- intensive research questions; contributing novel ideas, expertise, and methods to the teams' intellectual discourse and advancement; providing data/AI related consultation and instruction. In partnership with other library colleagues as well as UCR colleges, academic programs, and Research and Economic Development, Information Technology Services, and Research Computing, will continuously develop specialized and sought-after data science and AI expertise synergistic with UCR faculty's research agendas.

Candidates are encouraged to include a CV and/or portfolio link with examples of AI/Data related work, if available.

Finalists will be asked to conduct a presentation (including providing visual representation of work samples) as part of the interview process.

The full salary range for the Research Data Scientist is $81,500 - $150,100 annually. However, the expected pay scale for this position is up to $115,000 annually. We base salary offers on a variety of considerations, such as education, licensure and certifications, experience, and other business and organizational needs.

Applicants must have current work authorization when accepting a UCR staff position. Currently, we are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa for staff.

As a University employee, you will be required to comply with all applicable University policies and/or collective bargaining agreements, as may be amended from time to time. Federal, state, or local government directives may impose additional requirements.",4.2,"University of California, Riverside","Riverside, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,116.0,CA,,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Company Description
At Red Hat, we connect an innovative community of customers, partners, and contributors to deliver an open source stack of trusted, high-performing solutions. We offer cloud, Linux, middleware, and virtualization technologies, together with award-winning global customer support, consulting, and implementation services. Red Hat is a rapidly growing company supporting more than 90% of Fortune 500 companies.
Job Summary
Red Hat’s Global Engineering team is looking for an experienced data scientist to join the InstructLab team. In this role, you’ll contribute directly to Red Hat’s rapidly growing AI/ML (artificial intelligence and machine learning) family of products. You will be responsible for the investigation, evaluation, integration, and development of open source AI/ML systems and functionality to improve the overall development and operations of both Red Hat's downstream AI products and upstream open source AI projects. Qualified data scientists in this role regularly participate in design reviews and productization for major product features and bug fixes, and are experienced and comfortable working with Linux-based operating systems.

The ideal candidate will be a highly collaborative individual with a passion for working on complex projects in an open organization where contributions are valued and expected from all levels. This job role will require engaging in upstream open source communities. As this is a fast-moving area of opportunity for Red Hat, the ability to communicate productively and effectively with team members, stakeholders, and Red Hat leadership is critical.
This position reports directly to a Manager of Software Engineering for InstructLab. This position must have the ability to partner collaboratively in our Boston, MA office at least 3 days per week.
Primary Job Responsibilities
Develop innovative capabilities for open source platforms used for building, training, testing, and serving models for AI-enabled applications, carrying your work through all phases of software development and delivery, including: researching and conceptualization, team design review, writing the implementation, authoring a testing strategy and necessary automation, productizing and packaging the code, and supporting its deployment through to end-users.
Monitor and participate in upstream open source AI/ML communities, evaluating new AI/ML-related technologies in the space and considering potential integrations and collaborations upstream.
Regularly reading papers and keeping up with AI/ML developments, particularly in the Generative AI space.
Promote and foster Red Hat’s open-source value proposition as it pertains to AI/ML engineering and product infusion and development.
Contribute to the development of the open-source projects that comprise Red Hat’s AI family of products.
Take part in the shared responsibility of delivering and maintaining assigned products.
Regularly communicate with project stakeholders including other teams of Red Hat engineers, product managers, consultants, management, and senior leadership.
Take on the role of Subject Matter Expert, as needed, per domain and project.
Lead, coach and collaborate with junior engineers as they build AI/ML knowledge and skills.
Coordinate and collaborate with external teams, including IBM Research on key strategic vision and implementation details.
Share our experiments and learnings from an experienced position in the Data Science community through blogs, presentations, new ideas and existing work at various technical outlets and conferences.
Promote upstream acceptance and community building.

Required Skills
Bachelor's degree in computer science, data science, computer engineering or equivalent
5+ years of experience as a data scientist (or similar roles).
Extensive, advanced experience with Python development.
Experience with AI and Machine Learning platforms, tools, and frameworks, such as: Tensorflow, PyTorch, LLaMA.cpp, and Kubeflow.
Experience working with Kubernetes/OpenShift and containers, troubleshooting issues, and working with YAML.
Experience with Cloud Native Technologies and Platforms (e.g. Kubernetes)
Demonstrates knowledge of unit testing frameworks and methodologies
Demonstrates knowledge of machine learning relevant mathematics and statistics.
Strong self-motivation and organizational skills.
Demonstrates ability to context switch between multiple concurrent projects.
Excellent English written and verbal communication skills.
Collaborative attitude and willingness to share ideas openly.
Ability to quickly learn and use new tools and technologies.
Passion for developing open source software.
Nice to Haves
Familiarity with participating in an agile development team
Experience writing Kubernetes controllers and operators.
Experience creating Ansible automation scripts.
Experience with big data storage techniques, such as Parquet, Avro, and S3.
Experience with hardware accelerators, such as GPU, CUDA, and ROCm.
Understanding of DevOps methodology.
The salary range for this position is $127,890.00 - $211,180.00. Actual offer will be based on your qualifications.
Pay Transparency
Red Hat determines compensation based on several factors including but not limited to job location, experience, applicable skills and training, external market value, and internal pay equity. Annual salary is one component of Red Hat’s compensation package. This position may also be eligible for bonus, commission, and/or equity. For positions with Remote-US locations, the actual salary range for the position may differ based on location but will be commensurate with job duties and relevant work experience.
About Red Hat
Red Hat
is the world’s leading provider of enterprise
open source
software solutions, using a community-powered approach to deliver high-performing Linux, cloud, container, and Kubernetes technologies. Spread across 40+ countries, our associates work flexibly across work environments, from in-office, to office-flex, to fully remote, depending on the requirements of their role. Red Hatters are encouraged to bring their best ideas, no matter their title or tenure. We're a leader in open source because of our open and inclusive environment. We hire creative, passionate people ready to contribute their ideas, help solve complex problems, and make an impact.
Benefits
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Flexible Spending Account - healthcare and dependent care
Health Savings Account - high deductible medical plan
Retirement 401(k) with employer match
Paid time off and holidays
Paid parental leave plans for all new parents
Leave benefits including disability, paid family medical leave, and paid military leave
Additional benefits including employee stock purchase plan, family planning reimbursement, tuition reimbursement, transportation expense account, employee assistance program, and more!
Note: These benefits are only applicable to full time, permanent associates at Red Hat located in the United States.
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion at Red Hat
Red Hat’s culture is built on the open source principles of transparency, collaboration, and inclusion, where the best ideas can come from anywhere and anyone. When this is realized, it empowers people from diverse backgrounds, perspectives, and experiences to come together to share ideas, challenge the status quo, and drive innovation. Our aspiration is that everyone experiences this culture with equal opportunity and access, and that all voices are not only heard but also celebrated. We hope you will join our celebration, and we welcome and encourage applicants from all the beautiful dimensions of diversity that compose our global village.
Equal Opportunity Policy (EEO)
Red Hat is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer. We review applications for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, veteran status, genetic information, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

Red Hat does not seek or accept unsolicited resumes or CVs from recruitment agencies. We are not responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions, or any other payment related to unsolicited resumes or CVs except as required in a written contract between Red Hat and the recruitment agency or party requesting payment of a fee.
Red Hat supports individuals with disabilities and provides reasonable accommodations to job applicants. If you need assistance completing our online job application, email
application-assistance@redhat.com
. General inquiries, such as those regarding the status of a job application, will not receive a reply.",4.2,"Red Hat, Inc.","Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,1993.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,170.0,MA,31.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$163K
/yr","It's time to transform markets
Existing workflows within syndicated loan and CLO markets are painful for clients: they are outdated, overcomplicated, and time-consuming. It's time for a change.
Octaura is reimagining the way these markets trade, with efficiency, transparency and simplicity at the heart of what we do. We bring trading capabilities, data and analytics together for the first time on a digitized platform–fundamentally transforming the markets and streamlining workflows like never before.
At Octaura, everyone belongs
It's essential that Octaurians are confident in knowing they have the space to use their voice and talents. The world is diverse and we actively want our team to reflect this. We're a values-driven company and by engaging, solving and evolving together, we create a culture that is collaborative, transparent, impactful and innovative. And fun!
The role in a nutshell
As a Senior Data Scientist at Octaura, you'll be a key member of our Product team, playing a critical role in the development and growth of our Data and Analytics products. This is an early-stage opportunity to shape the future of our data science initiatives and make a significant contribution to the company's success.
What You'll Do
Drive the full product lifecycle: From ideation and market research to model development, deployment, and performance monitoring, you'll be involved in every stage of creating impactful data-driven solutions.
Develop advanced models: You'll leverage your expertise in machine learning and statistical modelling to extract valuable insights from large and complex datasets, building predictive models that fuel our product offerings.
Build scalable infrastructure: Design, implement, and maintain cloud-based infrastructure on AWS and/or Azure to support our data processing and model deployment needs.
Collaborate effectively: Work closely with the Go-to-Market team to understand client needs and market trends, and partner with the Technology team to build robust data pipelines.
Communicate insights: Clearly and effectively communicate your findings to stakeholders across the company, translating complex data into actionable insights
The Opportunity
Make a real impact: You'll have a direct and significant impact on the company's growth and success.
Early-stage opportunity: Shape the future of our data science products and be a part of building something truly innovative.
Collaborative environment: Work alongside a talented and passionate cross functional teams in a supportive and collaborative environment.
Growth potential: Ample opportunities for professional development and career advancement within a rapidly growing startup.
The Person
Advanced degree and experience: PhD (or MSc + 5 years of experience) in statistics, physics, mathematics, computer science, or a related field.
Strong programming skills: Proficiency in Python and experience with popular machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Proven modelling experience: A track record of building and deploying predictive models using machine learning algorithms.
Data analysis expertise: Strong analytical skills with the ability to analyse and interpret complex datasets, identify patterns, and draw meaningful conclusions.
Excellent communication: Exceptional written and verbal communication skills with the ability to explain technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Cloud proficiency: Experience with cloud-based architectures (AWS and/or Azure) is highly preferred.
Fintech/Financial Services experience is a plus: Experience in the financial services industry, particularly within the fixed income market, is a valuable asset.
If you are passionate about data science in finance, have a strong background in technical majors, and are excited about building predictive models and cloud-based infrastructure using AWS and Azure, we want to hear from you. As a startup, we offer a dynamic and entrepreneurial work environment, where you will have the opportunity to take ownership of your work and make a real impact on our business.
The base pay range for this position in New York is $150,000 - $175,000 annually. Pay may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Equity and year-end bonus may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and other benefits, dependent on the position offered. Applicants should apply via Octaura's internal or external careers site.

Octaura Work Perks
At Octaura, our people are our most valuable asset, and we are pleased to offer the following benefits to all full-time employees:
Competitive compensation and equity
Unlimited Paid Time Off
Competitive Parental Leave
Daily breakfast, coffee and snacks in the office
90% company-paid healthcare
Onsite gym & discounted membership
We're committed to equal opportunity employment
Octaura is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status.",5.0,Octaura,"New York, NY",1 to 50 Employees,2022.0,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,163.0,NY,2.0,1,0,0,1,1
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$193K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 18, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200573520

Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products, such as Siri and Search. Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products. This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.
Solid foundation in data science, machine learning, and evaluation, with hands-on experience in independently conducting and analyzing experiments. Ability to take ownership of smaller analytical projects and contribute effectively to larger initiatives.
Proficiency in critical thinking, problem-solving, and collaboration with cross-functional teams to address business needs. Strong communication skills for articulating and translating business questions into actionable insights using statistical techniques and available data.
Strong programming skills in Python for data processing, with expertise in SQL or Spark. Proficient in data wrangling, and able to assist in prototyping data quality and evaluation pipelines, working alongside engineering teams to help solve data challenges.
Some relevant internship or work experience for M.S. or Ph.D. candidates, or 3 years of relevant work experiences for people with other degrees in quantitative fields.

Preferred Qualifications
Experience in generative model and application development, with a focus on data, evaluation, and automation. Ability to adopt or implement established methodologies and apply statistical analysis in problem-solving.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $135,400 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,193.0,WA,48.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Monitoring Operations","$270K
/yr","About the Team
OpenAI’s mission is to ensure that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We believe that achieving our goal requires real world deployment and iteratively updating based on what we learn.
The Intelligence and Investigations team supports this by identifying and investigating misuses of our products – especially new types of abuse. This enables our partner teams to develop data-backed product policies and build scaled safety mitigations. Precisely understanding abuse allows us to safely enable users to build useful things with our products.
About the Role
As a Data Scientist on the Monitoring Operations team, you will be responsible for building systems to proactively identify abuse on OpenAI’s products. This includes ensuring we have robust monitoring in place for new products, and can sustain monitoring for existing products. You will also respond to critical escalations, especially those that are not caught by our existing safety systems. This will require expert understanding of our products and data, and involves working cross-functionally with product, policy, and engineering teams.
This role is based in our San Francisco office and includes participation in an on-call rotation that will involve resolving urgent escalations outside of normal work hours. Some investigations may involve sensitive content, including sexual, violent, or otherwise-disturbing material.
In this role, you will:
Scope and implement monitoring requirements for new product launches. This involves working with Product and Policy teams to understand key risks, and working with Engineering teams to ensure we have sufficient data and tooling.
Improve processes to sustain monitoring operations for existing products. This includes developing approaches to automate monitoring subtasks.
You might thrive in this role if you:
Have at least 4 years of experience doing technical analysis, especially in SQL and Python.
Have experience in trust and safety and/or have worked closely with policy, enforcement, and engineering teams
Have experience with basic data engineering, such as building core tables or writing data pipelines (not expected to build infrastructure or write production code)
Have experience scaling and automating processes, especially with language models
About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,270.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II,"$130K
/yr","Want a meaningful career where you can make a difference? Edward Jones sounds perfect for you.

Collaboration. Autonomy. Opportunity. Words our headquarters associates use when talking about working at Edward Jones. Words that describe what it's like being part of a firm where everyone is aligned toward a singular focus: serving the client. And everyone is working to make the firm better together - as they grow as individuals. If these words resonate with you, we should talk.

Job Overview

Position Schedule: Full-Time

Overview:
Come join us in Firm Strategy, where we strive to unleash the full potential of data and AI to address business challenges. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will design, develop and deliver data science solutions requiring advanced mathematical methods, statistical and machine learning models in support of data-driven strategies. You will combine data from multiple sources to develop innovative solutions to business problems and collaborate with business partners and other data scientists to develop tailored analytic solutions that inform and influence decisions across the firm.

Key Responsibilities:
Partner with business partners to design, develop and deploy solutions that enable hyper-personalized interactions.
Use machine learning, numerical optimization, and statistical modeling to discover and explain patterns in data.
Create features and develop models beyond standard toolset libraries to meet unique business challenges.
Proactively interpret and communicate findings and insights from the data to business partners. Clear communication without technical jargon is important to success.
Execute projects from design and data-gathering, through implementation, final delivery, and monitoring.
Define data needs and evaluate data quality for applicability to posed problems.
Rapidly optimize data and model inputs to increase predictiveness and relevance in response to changes in data availability, data quality, or business specifications.


Edward Jones' compensation and benefits package includes medical and prescription drug, dental, vision, voluntary benefits (such as accident, hospital indemnity, and critical illness), short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage. Short- and long-term disability, basic life, and basic AD&D coverage are provided at no cost to associates. Edward Jones offers a 401k retirement plan, and tax-advantaged accounts: health savings account, and flexible spending account. Edward Jones observes ten paid holidays and provides 15 days of vacation for new associates beginning on January 1 of each year, as well as sick time, personal days, and a paid day for volunteerism. Associates may be eligible for bonuses and profit sharing. All associates are eligible for the firm's Employee Assistance Program. For more information on the Benefits available to Edward Jones associates, please visit our benefits page.

At Edward Jones, we value and respect our associates and their contributions, and we recognize individual efforts through a rewards program that promotes a long-term career, financial security and well-being. Visit our career site to learn more about our total compensation approach, which in addition to base salary, typically includes benefits, bonuses and profit sharing. The salary range for this role is based on national data and actual pay is based on skills, experience, education, and other relevant factors for a potential new associate:

Hiring Minimum: $96471
Hiring Maximum: $164262

Read More About Job Overview

Skills/Requirements
Master of Science Degree in a quantitative field required. PhD degree desired.
5+ years professional experience.
Proficiency with one or more computing languages (Python, SQL).
Ability to deliver capabilities that derive insights or novel ideas from data and mathematical models using best data science practices. Connect insights to desired research or business outcomes.
Demonstrated ability and interest in learning new algorithms and tools, e.g. GenAI, machine learning, and optimization.
Proficiency with cloud computing platforms and distributed systems for large-scale data processing.

Please note: Candidates that live within a commutable distance from our Tempe, AZ and St. Louis, MO home office locations are expected to work in the office three days per week, with preference for Tuesday through Thursday.

Read More About Skills/Requirements

Awards & Accolades

At Edward Jones, we are building a place where everyone feels like they belong. We're proud of our associates' contributions to the firm and the recognitions we have received.

Check out our U.S. awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Check out our Canadian awards and accolades: Insights & Information Blog Postings about Edward Jones

Read More About Awards & Accolades

About Us

Join a financial services firm where your contributions are valued. Edward Jones is a Fortune 500¹ company where people come first. With over 8 million clients and 19,000 financial advisors across the U.S. and Canada, we're proud to be privately-owned, placing the focus on our clients rather than shareholder returns.

Behind everything we do is our purpose: We partner for positive impact to improve the lives of our clients and colleagues, and together, better our communities and society. We are an innovative, flexible, and inclusive organization that attracts, develops, and inspires performance excellence and a sense of belonging.

People are at the center of our partnership. Edward Jones associates are seen, heard, respected, and supported. This is what we believe makes us the best place to start or build your career.

View our Purpose, Inclusion and Citizenship Report.

1Fortune 500, published June 2023, data as of December 2022. Compensation provided for using, not obtaining, the rating.

Edward Jones does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, gender, religion, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, pregnancy, veteran status, genetic information or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.",3.7,Edward Jones,United States,10000+ Employees,1922.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,United States,102.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection","$170K
/yr","Proof is the world's first identity-assured transaction management platform and we are on a mission to digitize trust for all of life’s most critical transactions. Developed by the same market leaders and experts who brought notarization online with Notarize℠, Proof offers trust in a digital world by verifying identities and securing transactions to protect businesses and their customers. Since 2015, we’ve completed many of the world’s first digital commerce transactions, including the first online real estate closing, online mortgage closing, online auto sale, and online will and we're still just getting started!

We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to join our Fraud Tech product engineering team. As a member of this team, you will use your analytical skills to identify and prevent fraud risks. You will work with product and engineering partners, as well as risk and policy teams to build solutions that fit product needs.

Proof is a growing startup. You will get a chance to meaningfully contribute to building new products and services leveraging novel, data driven solutions, wear multiple hats, and closely collaborate within and outside of a small team.
What you’ll do as the Senior Data Scientist, Fraud Detection at Proof:
Leverage advanced analytics, machine learning, and statistical methods to detect and mitigate fraudulent activities on Proof platform
Contribute to large-scale analytical fraud research and implementation projects through all stages
Partner with product managers, engineers, operational and legal teams to envision and implement best in class data based solutions
Evaluate fraud cases holistically to identify areas of improvement
Analyze and incorporate additional signals that continuously improve fraud detection
Maintain knowledge and understanding of current trends and issues affecting the area of expertise
What we're looking for:
Master’s degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related field
5+ years of experience in data science with a focus on fraud detection or a similar domain
Traditional and advanced machine learning techniques and algorithms
Excellent quantitative and analytical skills; ability to derive patterns, trends and insights, and perform risk/reward tradeoff analysis
Deep understanding of data management such as data pipeline and data quality
Experience in building machine learning powered products
Analytic thought leadership; intellectual curiosity
Effective communication skills and experience presenting findings to stakeholders
$130,000 - $210,000 a year
This is the expected cash compensation range for this position. The salary offered within this range will be determined based on factors including but not limited to skills, qualifications, experience and location. The total compensation package for this role also includes benefits such as medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability coverage, flexible paid time off, Carrot Fertility, participation in a 401(k) with company match and more!
Proof is committed to building an inclusive environment for people of all backgrounds and everyone is encouraged to apply. We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We'd love to hear from you.",4.7,Proof.com,United States,1 to 50 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,170.0,United States,3.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II (NLP Required),"$90K
/yr","Job Summary:
The Data Scientist II is responsible for designing and validating predictive models, machine learning models, and artificial intelligence that inform and improve business processes across the organization (operational, clinical, financial, marketing, etc.).
Targeting a candidate fluent in NLP, generalized linear models, LLM, deep learning and predictive modeling.
Essential Functions:
Create, maintain, and communicate an analytical plan for each project
Mine and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets
Employ wide range of data sources to develop algorithms for predicting risk and understanding drivers, detecting outliers, etc.
Develop visualizations that demonstrate the efficacy of developed algorithms
Provide statistical validation and analysis of outcomes associated with clinical programs and interventions
Collaborate with other teams to integrate with existing solutions
Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders
Prepare code for operationalization of end-to-end model pipeline and deliverable for business consumption
Perform any other job duties as requested
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, other related field or equivalent years of relevant work experience is required
Minimum of three (3) years of experience in data analysis and/or analytic programming required
Experience with cloud services (such as Azure, AWS or GCP) and modern data stack (such as Databricks or Snowflakes) is preferred
Healthcare experience is preferred
Competencies, Knowledge, and Skills:
Proficient in SQL and at least one of the following programming languages: Python or R
Preferred beginner level of knowledge of developing reports or dashboards in Power BI or other business intelligence applications
Ability to perform basic statistical analyses and techniques including A/B testing, general significance testing, and sampling methodologies
Working knowledge of predictive modeling and machine learning algorithms such as generalized linear models, non-linear supervised learning models, clustering, decision trees, dimensionality reduction and natural language processing
Proficient in feature engineering techniques and exploratory data analysis
Familiarity with optimization techniques and artificial intelligence methods
Ability to analyze large quantities of information and identify patterns, irregularities, and deficiencies
Proficient with MS office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Access)
Demonstrated critical thinking, verbal communication, presentation and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and within a cross-functional team environment
Licensure and Certification:
None
Working Conditions:
General office environment; may be required to sit or stand for extended periods of time
Compensation Range:
$69,400.00 - $111,000.00
CareSource takes into consideration a combination of a candidate’s education, training, and experience as well as the position’s scope and complexity, the discretion and latitude required for the role, and other external and internal data when establishing a salary level. We are highly invested in every employee’s total well-being and offer a substantial and comprehensive total rewards package.
Compensation Type (hourly/salary):
Salary
Organization Level Competencies
Create an Inclusive Environment
Cultivate Partnerships
Develop Self and Others
Drive Execution
Influence Others
Pursue Personal Excellence
Understand the Business

This job description is not all inclusive. CareSource reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. CareSource is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are dedicated to fostering an inclusive environment that welcomes and supports individuals of all backgrounds.",3.7,CareSource,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,90.0,Remote,35.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","About Us
At Vast.ai, we value creativity, energy, drive and teamwork. We are looking for talented people who share these values to join as we grow our team. Our vision is to widely distribute AI computing to reshape our future for the good of humanity. Come join us. If witnessing the birth of AGI excites you, we can't wait to hear from you!
Vast.ai is a market based cloud computing platform focused on reducing the cost and friction of compute-intensive workloads, enabling anyone to easily leverage large-scale GPU liquidity. Vast.ai is the market leader for low cost GPU rentals. Our GPU marketplace powers AI projects and businesses all over the world.
NOTE: Currently hiring for on-site work in Westwood, Los Angeles.
About the Role
We're looking for a skilled Marketing Data Scientist to join our growing team. In this role, you'll be instrumental in applying advanced analytics to our marketing and sales funnels, driving growth and efficiency through data-driven insights. You'll work closely with our marketing, sales, and product teams to implement measurement tools, design and run A/B tests, and develop predictive models that inform our marketing strategies. This position offers a unique opportunity to apply your data science expertise in a dynamic startup environment at the forefront of AI technology.
Key Responsibilities
Develop and implement predictive analytics models for our marketing and sales funnels.
Design, implement, and analyze A/B tests to optimize marketing campaigns and user experiences.
Create SQL queries and custom analysis for production sales and website tracking data.
Develop innovative approaches using LLMs/AI for customer analysis.
Develop data-driven recommendations to inform marketing strategy and budget allocation.
Stay current with the latest data science techniques and marketing analytics trends.
You Are
A data-driven problem solver with a passion for marketing analytics.
Familiar with SQL and direct database manipulation.
Experienced in designing and implementing A/B tests and experimentation frameworks.
Proficient in statistical analysis and machine learning techniques.
An excellent communicator, able to present technical concepts to diverse audiences.
Proactive and self-motivated, with the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.
Qualifications
Master's degree or Ph.D. in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or a related field.
3+ years of experience applying data science in a marketing context.
Strong programming skills in Python or R, and proficiency with SQL.
Experience with marketing analytics tools (e.g., Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics) and A/B testing platforms.
Proven track record of implementing predictive models in a business setting.
Familiarity with machine learning libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Knowledge of digital marketing channels and metrics.
Bonus: Experience in the B2B SaaS or cloud computing industry.
Benefits
Full-Time, Monday - Friday.
Onsite at the Vast.ai HQ in Westwood, Los Angeles.
Health, dental, vision and life insurance coverage.
Matching 401K.
Ambitious, fast-paced startup environment.
Generous equity.",4.5,Vast.ai,"Los Angeles, CA",201 to 500 Employees,2021.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,CA,3.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$154K
/yr","The Microsoft AI (Artifical Intelligence) Web Data team is looking for a Data Scientist II to help us build the next generation platform for Bing and Microsoft AI. In Web Data, we are on a mission to build the most vast and accurate model of the Web to power search and AI. We are pushing frontiers of scalability and index quality by creating models and systems for discovering, storing, processing Web content, and operating AI solutions. Our core set of engineering challenges includes:
Discovering diverse content on the Web quickly and efficiently by understanding the structure and dynamics of the Web and optimizing crawl scheduling.
Building Big Data pipelines, creating ML(Machine Learning) and AI models for index selection, and determining document quality.
Designing and implementing models and pipelines for near-real time (NRT) indexing and content freshness.
Designing and implementing methods for leveraging AI in platform and backend solutions.
This is a great opportunity for someone who loves to tackle deep technical challenges and strives for industry-wide impact. At this role, you'd be dealing with and learning how to do data collection, analysis and cleaning, building Big Data pipelines, making decision based on data, doing model training and deployment, and working with LLMs both for prompt engineering and fine-tuning.

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
Acquire the data necessary for your project plan and use querying, visualization, and reporting techniques to describe that data. You’ll also explore data for key attributes and collaborate with others to perform data science experiments using established methodologies.
Understand modeling techniques, select the correct tool and approach to complete objectives, and evaluate the output for statistical and business significance. You’ll also analyze model performance and incorporate customer feedback into its evaluation.
Understand the current state of the industry, including current trends, so that you can contribute to thought leadership best practices.
Write efficient code for a specific feature, and develop a working expertise of proper debugging techniques.
Understand each customer’s business goals and learn best practices for identifying growth opportunities.
Examine projects through a customer-oriented focus, and manage customer expectations regarding project progress.
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 2+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical tec
OR equivalent experience.
1+ year(s) customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ year(s) data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR equivalent experience.
Data Science IC3 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $98,300 - $193,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $127,200 - $208,800 per year.

Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until October 21, 2024.

#Bing
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,"Redmond, WA",10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,154.0,WA,49.0,0,0,0,1,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Overview:
At LMI, we’re reimagining the path from insight to outcome at The New Speed of Possible™. Combining a legacy of over 60 years of federal expertise with our innovation ecosystem, we minimize time to value and accelerate mission success. We energize the brightest minds with emerging technologies to inspire creative solutioning and push the boundaries of capability. LMI advances the pace of progress, enabling our customers to thrive while adapting to evolving mission needs.
Responsibilities:
Frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available visualization and dashboard tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to research questions.
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications:
Pursuit of a bachelor’s degree from a HBCU or MSI in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline
Previous experience or internships at a government consulting or technology consulting firm is required
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
Preferred experience with data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics; additional preferred qualifications include working with unstructured text and natural language processing
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Applicants for this position may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Please note that only US citizens are eligible to obtain security clearances.",4.1,Logistics Management Institute,"Tysons Corner, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1961.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,105.0,VA,63.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","The Data Lab team seeks a talented data scientist - with experience in data engineering, data analysis and documentation, workflow management, and web development - to lead the team’s technical priorities. Following is an overview of key duties:

Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,131.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","ABOUT THIS POSITION
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist. The data scientist role involves solving data-driven Healthcare problems using various machine learning and predictive modeling methods. This person will primarily work as part of the larger Data Science team interacting Product Management and Application teams to conduct analysis and experimentation to maximize the utility of predictive modeling and data driven strategies across Waystar. applying machine learning, predictive modeling, and analytic components to maximize operational outcomes for healthcare providers. The ideal candidate for this position will have exposure to the healthcare revenue cycle, can approach problem-solving challenges independently, has a strong attention to detail, and enjoys working in a fast-paced, collaborative, and team-based environment.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
Must be a quick-learner with the ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Presentation abilities and the ability to communicate with all levels of the Business.
Comfortable working in ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability are key skills.
Competent communication and interpersonal skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Bachelor’s degree in the fields of Computer or Data Science, Statistics, or Mathematics is required. Additional experience and/or education in healthcare, business operations or other areas is preferred.
An aptitude for medical informatics is preferred
ABOUT WAYSTAR
Through a smart platform and better experience, Waystar helps providers simplify healthcare payments and yield powerful results throughout the complete revenue cycle.
Waystar’s healthcare payments platform combines innovative, cloud-based technology, robust data, and unparalleled client support to streamline workflows and improve financials so providers can focus on what matters most: their patients and communities. Waystar is trusted by 1M+ providers, 1K+ hospitals and health systems, and is connected to over 5K commercial and Medicaid/Medicare payers. We are deeply committed to living out our organizational values: honesty; kindness; passion; curiosity; fanatical focus; best work, always; making it happen; and joyful, optimistic & fun.
Waystar products have won multiple Best in KLAS® or Category Leader awards since 2010 and earned multiple #1 rankings from Black Book™ surveys since 2012. The Waystar platform supports more than 500,000 providers, 1,000 health systems and hospitals, and 5,000 payers and health plans. For more information, visit
waystar.com
or follow
@Waystar
on Twitter.
WAYSTAR PERKS
Competitive total rewards (base salary + bonus, if applicable)
Customizable benefits package (3 medical plans with Health Saving Account company match)
Generous paid time off starting at 3 weeks + 13 paid holidays including 2 personal floating holidays
Paid parental leave (including maternity + paternity leave)
Education assistance opportunities and free LinkedIn Learning access
Free mental health and family planning programs, including adoption assistance and fertility support
401(K) program with company match
Pet insurance
Employee resource groups
Waystar is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We celebrate, value, and support diversity and inclusion. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws.
This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",4.2,Waystar,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1999.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,126.0,GA,25.0,0,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Our mission is to open the door to the life-changing impact of education and help make education accessible for all. As a nimble growth stage start-up, we've emerged as the leading online education platform helping over 30 million learners and educators each month. Study.com has earned numerous awards and it has been recognized as one of the most transformational companies in EdTech, living up to our commitment to all learners: Breakthroughs Start Here. From students and educators in over 9,000 school districts that use Study.com, to working adults striving to complete their college degree or gain professional certifications, we empower them to reach their full potential. Our product is our impact! Across our college programs alone we have saved students over $200M in tuition and enabled tens of thousands to become nurses, teachers, accountants and more. Additionally, as part of our mission we've donated over $27 million across social impact programs to learners and educators.
As an education technology leader, Study.com owes much of its success to its data-driven approach. We help over thirty million learners and instructors on Study.com each month, improving their user experience and driving growth by collecting, storing, and presenting massive amounts of data that are crucial to everyday business decisions.
We're looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing team. The ideal candidate is passionate about all aspects of data – digging deep to explain observations or gain business insights, turning complex data into intuitive visualizations, transforming it to simplify future tasks and building machine learning models to provide the business with accurate predictions.
This role is based in our Mountain View, CA office and is hybrid in office Mondays, Wednesdays, and Thursdays.
What You'll Do:
Share ownership and maintenance responsibilities of our entire data warehouse, including 50-100 million events coming through a Kafka queue each day, a 20 node Cassandra cluster, a 15 TB relational database, and an integration with Google BigQuery.
Monitor and analyze the team's A/B tests and proactively communicate key insights within your team and to external stakeholders.
Be the voice of data by supporting the team's product owner in finding business opportunities, defining KPIs, and setting team goals.
Provide leadership with data pulls, analyses and deep dives that significantly influence important company decisions.
Create and update ETLs as our source data and data needs evolve
Build data visualizations and reports using Tableau
Build, maintain, and improve machine learning models (neural networks, logistic regressions, boosted trees, k-means clustering, etc.)
Innovate! We're a team that likes to stay on the cutting edge. Everyone is expected to always be looking for ways to leverage the latest technology to improve our processes and drive better results.
What You'll Bring To The Role:
3-5 years of experience in a Data Science or related role (experience with web analytics is a plus)
BS in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field (master's degree or PhD a plus)
Strong proficiency in SQL (Google BigQuery and MySQL)
Experience writing code (Python and Java/Groovy)
A willingness to work in a face-paced, dynamic environment while juggling multiple projects
A passion for innovation and learning with a driven mindset
Excellent communication skills
Nice To Have:
Experience creating complex data visualizations with Tableau
Hands-on experience with advanced statistical concepts, such as cluster analysis, singular value decomposition, gradient descent, etc.
Knowledge of web analytics software and best practices
Strong ability to use Generative AI (e.g. ChatGPT, copilot, etc.) to assist with technical tasks
The salary range for this position is $120,000 - $150,000 per year. Pay and is dependent upon factors including skills, work experience, business needs, and market demands.
At Study.com, we know that strong communities are built on the power of our diversity, and we respect and strive to understand for the diverse identities, race, ethnicities, backgrounds, and perspectives of our team members. Our work and company culture have been consistently recognized, including:
Inc. Best Place to Work
Fortune Great Places to Work – Best Workplaces in the Bay Area
Golden Bridge Awards – Gold Winner, Corporate Social Responsibility
San Francisco Business Times & Silicon Valley Business Journal – Best Places to Work
Study.com provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran or disability status. In addition to federal law requirements.
Study.com complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. Additionally, qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records will be considered for the position in accordance with applicable state and local laws.",3.0,Study.com,"Mountain View, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2002.0,Company - Private,Education & Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,135.0,CA,22.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","This Opportunity
WSP is currently initiating a search for a Data Scientist for our Baltimore, MD office. Be a member of our Planning Advisory Team a growing organization that meets our client’s objectives and solves their challenges. This position will be working full-time for our client The Maryland Transit Administration, Office of Performance Management/Office of Customer Experience (OPM/OPX) requiring on-site work in the client’s office in Baltimore’s Inner Harbor 2-3 days per week.
As a Data Scientist, you will work on a scrum team with other embedded Data Scientists, the Manager of Data Science, and the Manager of Performance Programs and Data Analytics. Your work will fall into two categories: building and maintaining technical artifacts, and building and refining processes and policies. The Data Science Team is currently working to expand its capacity, and you will contribute to that effort by building data pipelines in our Data Lake to support enterprise intelligence products, building data services that drive institutional goals, and conducting various analyses to answer specific questions for stakeholders. You will also help develop internal processes and policies by writing and updating pages in our team handbook, building Github actions and unit tests, and collaborating with team members to solve recurring technical problems.
Your Impact
Support efficient and effective operations by analyzing data in R and/or Python programming languages and delivering clear answers to specific questions.
Support the data analyst's Power BI products by designing, building, and modifying data models and data
pipelines in a manner consistent with the data science team's data governance policy.
Maintain transparency and minimize technical debt by using Git DevOps platforms to commit code, submit
merge requests, and track your work using issues and epics in a manner consistent with the data science team's DevOps policy.
Prioritize performance management projects by working with the Data Analytics team to define enterprise
objectives, user stories, and data stories.
Promote teamwork by making meaningful contributions to our team handbook, creating and modifying policies and procedures to enhance productivity.
Honor the data science team's warranty on artifacts in production by debugging and solving programming and data problems.
Identify new opportunities to improve MTA customer experience by conducting self-guided exploratory work or as part of assigned tasks.
Who You Are
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in Math, Data Analysis, Accounting, Finance or related field.
1 to 3 years of relevant post education experience working as a data scientist/analyst.
A passion for improving public transportation through the effective use of data analytics.
The ability to construct complex queries in SQL involving multiple joins, sub-queries, case when statements, etc.
R and Python programming skills.
Ability to problem-solve independently using Google searches, Stack Overflow, Chat GPT, and other similar
resources.
Ability to communicate clearly and respectfully to technical and non-technical staff of differing backgrounds and experience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with version control such as Git, and cloud-based services such as GitHub.
Experience working on a scrum team.
Prior experience within the engineering consulting industry is preferred.
#LI-MH4



About WSP
WSP USA is the U.S. operating company of WSP, one of the world's leading engineering and professional services firms. Dedicated to serving local communities, we are engineers, planners, technical experts, strategic advisors and construction management professionals. WSP USA designs lasting solutions in the buildings, transportation, energy, water and environment markets. With more than 15,000 employees in over 300 offices across the U.S., we partner with our clients to help communities prosper.
www.wsp.com
WSP provides a flexible and agile workplace model while meeting client needs. Employees are also afforded a comprehensive suite of benefits including medical, dental, vision, disability, life, and retirement savings focused on providing health and financial stability throughout the employee’s career.
At WSP, we want to give our employees the challenges they seek to grow their careers and knowledge base. Your daily contributions to your team will be essential in meeting client objectives, goals and challenges. Are you ready to get started?
WSP USA (and all of its U.S. companies) is an Equal Opportunity Employer Race/Age/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disability or Protected Veteran Status.
The selected candidate must be authorized to work in the United States.
NOTICE TO THIRD PARTY AGENCIES:
WSP does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters, employment agencies, or other staffing services. Unsolicited resumes include any resume or hiring document sent to WSP in the absence of a signed Service Agreement where WSP has expressly requested recruitment/staffing services specific to the position at hand. Any unsolicited resumes, including those submitted to hiring managers or other business leaders, will become the property of WSP and WSP will have the right to hire that candidate without reservation – no fee or other compensation will be owed or paid to the recruiter, employment agency, or other staffing service.",3.7,WSP,"Baltimore, MD",10000+ Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,102.0,MD,,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$130K
/yr","About the Role

Houzz is looking for a world-class Data Scientist to join our Industry Solutions data science team. This team is focused on uncovering critical insights and delivering models to leverage those findings thus powering intelligent business decisions. As a Data Scientist here at Houzz you are on the front line of uncovering insights to directly impact Houzz Revenue.
What You'll Do
Collaborate with leadership, product, data, and engineering teams to identify, define, and launch strategic and operational data science initiatives to improve growth performance
Define key metrics (KPIs) to guide business decision-making across various aspects of our site
Manage the key metrics of the business and product efficiently
Design product experiments, interpret results to draw detailed and impactful conclusions, and conduct root cause analysis
Work with data infrastructure/product engineering teams to define the data collection needs
Provide recommendations to assist quick product ideation and feature launch decisions
Develop and maintain data products to serve real-time business insights or to be used in production environments
Build and maintain dashboards and reports that provide actionable insights for finance, product, and sales
At a Minimum, We'd Like You to Have
Bachelors/Masters Degree with 2+ years of experience working within an analytical role in a high-growth tech company
Proficiency in writing complex SQL queries such as using aggregate functions and all types of joins using Hadoop, Hive and Presto. Strong programming skills in Python or R
Strong in problem-solving and analytical thinking to take an open business question from exploratory data analysis to actionable insights and guided execution recommendations
Proficiency in using Tableau for visualization
Proficiency in advanced experimental designing, testing, and analysis
Strong communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
A passion for analytics and product development
Self-motivated, independent, and eager to learn
Ability to have fun!
Ideally, You'll Also Have
An advanced degree in a technical field such as Statistics, Operations Research, or Engineering
Experience with subscription-based analytics, web/app user engagement, and funnel conversion
Ability to learn and act quickly, making decisions and drawing conclusions in the face of ambiguity
Experience with statistical modeling
Experience working with remote teams with a time zone difference
Compensation, Benefits and Perks

This role has an annual starting salary range of $120,000 - $140,000. In addition to salary, you’re eligible for competitive benefits that support you and your family as part of your total rewards package at Houzz. Also, depending on the role, you could be eligible for an equity award. Actual compensation is influenced by a wide array of factors, including, but not limited to, skills, experience, and specific work location.

Benefits and perks include:
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Home internet stipend
Medical, dental, and vision benefits
Maternity/paternity leave program
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Professional Development Reimbursement Program
401(k) retirement savings plans (Pre-Tax and Roth)
- Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA) - Medical & Dependent Care
Health Savings Account (HSA) with company contribution
Healthy at Houzz program

Houzz is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. When applying for a role at Houzz, we guarantee your application will be considered regardless of your sex; race; color; gender; national origin; height or weight; ancestry; physical or mental disability; medical condition; genetic information; marital status; registered domestic partner status; age; sexual orientation; military and veteran status; or any other basis protected by federal, state or local law or ordinance or regulation.

We embrace and celebrate the value that diversity brings to an organization. Diverse backgrounds and different points of view help Houzz provide the best experience for our community. Houzz is committed to fostering an inclusive environment through projects and initiatives, such as employee resource groups, that support Houzzers’ efforts to be themselves and share their lives at work.

If you would like assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please email us at accommodations@houzz.com. This information will be treated as confidential and used only for determining an appropriate accommodation for the interview process.

Houzz is an Equal Opportunity Employer. M/F/Disability/Veterans
__________________

Be Who You Are and Do What You Love at Houzz

About Houzz
When founders Adi and Alon remodeled their home, they were frustrated by the lack of resources and inspiration to help them articulate a vision and select the right pro to make it a reality.

So they built Houzz.

Houzz is now the leading platform for home remodeling and design, providing an all-in-one software solution for industry professionals and tools for homeowners to update their homes from start to finish. Using Houzz, people can find ideas and inspiration, hire professionals, and shop for products. Houzz Pro (houzz.com/pro) provides home industry professionals with a business management and marketing SaaS solution that helps them to win projects, collaborate with clients and teams, and run their business efficiently and profitably.

Our Mission and Core Values
We're proud to say there's no one quite like us. Houzz is a community-centric, innovative tech company that continues to disrupt the home renovation and design industry. Our mission-driven culture is rooted in our core values, and we’re all here for one purpose: make the home remodeling and design process more fun and productive for everyone.

Our Mission
To create the best experience for home renovation and design.

Our Core Values
We’re a Community
We put our community of Houzzers, industry professionals and homeowners first. We approach our work with care, humility and respect. We deliver value to our community through our products and services.

We Build the Future
We are visionaries who challenge the status quo. We are creative, innovative and curious. We embrace change and different ideas to drive our industry forward.

We Make Things Happen
We are solution-seekers and self-starters. We listen, move fast and empower our teams to deliver extraordinary results and products. We play to win.

By applying for a job with us, you acknowledge and agree to the terms of our Job Applicant Privacy Notice.

Roles listing ‘Remote - US’ as a location are not currently available in the following states: Alaska, Hawaii, Louisiana and Montana.

#LI-Remote",3.8,Houzz,United States,501 to 1000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,130.0,United States,15.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$117K
/yr","Overview:
The Data Scientist will create data science and data engineering products that include data models, data ingestion/transform, analytics which may include machine learning, and some form of output as either a machine-readable format (e.g. file output, database output, standard/streaming output) or a user interface or dashboard.
Responsibilities:
Demonstrated experience with the following:
Python programming
REST APIs and microservices.
Demonstrated experience performing the extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) of structured and unstructured data
Demonstrated experience modeling, structuring, cleaning, and conditioning data from multiple sources and in multiple different formats, languages, and encodings.
Demonstrated experience with cloud services, such as AWS.preferred",2.3,SilverEdge,"Chantilly, VA",Unknown,,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,117.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,0
Associate Data Scientist,"$86K
/yr","Requisition ID: R10174460
Category: Research and Sciences
Location: Chandler, Arizona, United States of America
Clearance Type: None
Telecommute: No- Teleworking not available for this position
Shift: 1st Shift (United States of America)
Travel Required: No
Positions Available: 1
At Northrop Grumman, our employees have incredible opportunities to work on revolutionary systems that impact people's lives around the world today, and for generations to come. Our pioneering and inventive spirit has enabled us to be at the forefront of many technological advancements in our nation's history - from the first flight across the Atlantic Ocean, to stealth bombers, to landing on the moon. We look for people who have bold new ideas, courage and a pioneering spirit to join forces to invent the future, and have fun along the way. Our culture thrives on intellectual curiosity, cognitive diversity and bringing your whole self to work — and we have an insatiable drive to do what others think is impossible. Our employees are not only part of history, they're making history.
Space Systems is looking for an Associate Data Scientist to join the Launch Vehicles business unit within the Mission Assurance team located in Chandler, AZ.
This position requires the incumbent to work on-site at our Chandler campus that features engineering, office and state-of -the-art manufacturing space.
You will be part of a team that supports all of Launch Vehicles, its sibling business units and sector level initiatives. Work may vary with shifting priorities based on business needs.
The Associate Data Scientist will:
Create data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.
Conduct Analysis utilizing many applications to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization. Requires strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Create/maintain documentation of all aspects or work duties, applications, charts, training, etc. related to any tasks within the scope of responsibilities or assignment.
Generate monthly CAB metrics, Supplier Scorecards, support QA Call Board.
Create and maintain digital solutions that support Chandler/Space Sector initiatives for digital transformation.
Able to work/collaborate with a team to develop/maintain existing products/applications and supporting documentation
Able to innovate new solutions and applications from ground up to full implementation.
Must be able to take verbal feedback and determine how to implement it into the tools/applications to provide desired results to requestors
Must be able to analyze data, determine causes for discrepancies or areas of improvement, offer alternative solutions and implement them
Works primarily with immediate supervisor, project leaders, and other professionals in the section or group. May be called in to groups or meetings with high level participants. Communication of applications, skills, supporting documentation and demonstration of tools may be required.
Typical work week is 9/80A schedule. General hours are day shift, core hours of 9:00AM to 3:00PM. Hours for monthly metric generation and review will need to be flexible and could require flex schedule some evenings.
Basic Qualifications:
This position requires a Bachelor's degree with 1 year of related work experience.
Intermediate level experience in Tableau and Excel is required.
Experience using SQL databases and tools to extract necessary information for Tableau charts required.
U.S. Citizenship is required.
No clearance is required to start.
Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science with 2 years of experience is preferred.
Ability to code in Python/SQL a plus.
Salary Range: $68,500 - $102,700
The above salary range represents a general guideline; however, Northrop Grumman considers a number of factors when determining base salary offers such as the scope and responsibilities of the position and the candidate's experience, education, skills and current market conditions.
Employees may be eligible for a discretionary bonus in addition to base pay. Annual bonuses are designed to reward individual contributions as well as allow employees to share in company results. Employees in Vice President or Director positions may be eligible for Long Term Incentives. In addition, Northrop Grumman provides a variety of benefits including health insurance coverage, life and disability insurance, savings plan, Company paid holidays and paid time off (PTO) for vacation and/or personal business.
The application period for the job is estimated to be 20 days from the job posting date. However, this timeline may be shortened or extended depending on business needs and the availability of qualified candidates.
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit. U.S. Citizenship is required for all positions with a government clearance and certain other restricted positions.",4.0,Northrop Grumman,"Chandler, AZ",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,86.0,AZ,85.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$102K
/yr","Software Bloc LLC, Plano, TX
Technologies –Proficient in Python and R with experience in SQL, GitHub (not a deal breaker), and AWS/Azure and cloud storage related experience.
Full Time

JOB DESCRIPTION

Your role will work to inform the business on strategic recommendations on data collection, integration, and retention requirements incorporating business needs and knowledge of best practices
Work on improvements to methods and algorithms, developing innovative and effective approaches to solve businesses’ analytical problems and communicate these results and methodologies to our teams
Support recommendations of ongoing improvements that lead to findings, including new information, in collaboration with our Lead Data Scientist
QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field
3+ years in a related field is preferred
Skills to communicate well in a global environment",Not listed,Software Bloc,"Plano, TX",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,102.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","DESCRIPTION:
The Data Scientist may be responsible for any of the following tasks: Analyzing data that is collected in our current and future products and services, Develop statistical and machine learning models using state of the art Machine Learning and AI technologies, Visualize insights for business actions and collaborate with Software Developers to implement into our products and services. The Data Scientist would need to be able to apply the data analysis, models, and software to the markets our products are in for us to better serve our customers. The Data Scientist must have good communication and organization skills, along with a working knowledge of day-to-day operations and priorities within their department and the company. Assume other duties as assigned.
Now offering a 4.5-day workweek!




QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Statistics or Mathematics preferred or any other quantitative discipline
Strong proficiencies in the languages, development tools, and frameworks of Python, R, SQL and Tableau
Ability to gain knowledge of the products and customers of the Auction and Heavy Equipment industries
Technical understanding regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques
General understanding of Machine Learning and AI tools and frameworks
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Knowledge of Data Ops and Data Management tools, such as Docker, Jenkins and Spark.
Adept at generating reports and presenting findings in an understandable manner
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Able to work independently and communicate within a team environment
Results oriented
Flexible and open to change
Stable and progressive work history
Professional appearance and demeanor
Ability to travel by air and ground - valid driver’s license required
Able to work with minimal supervision
In Office Position. 4.5 day regular work week. Ability to commute daily to local office is required.",3.1,"Sandhills Global, Inc.","Lincoln, NE",1001 to 5000 Employees,1978.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,111.0,NE,46.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$109K
/yr","This Data Scientist position at Mimecast is the advanced analytical engine of the Business Intelligence team, focused on solving high-value business problems using cutting-edge AI/ML tools and techniques. This role involves building and enhancing machine learning models, collaborating with stakeholders to develop new Generative AI tools, and transforming the business with actionable insights. We prioritize providing exceptional user experiences and taking on projects with game-changing potential. At Mimecast, we deliver the right data to the right people at the right time, supporting data-driven decisions with self-service dashboards, custom alerts, and executive presentations. As the company grows, so does our appetite for data, analysis, and insights.
What You'll Do:
Work cross-functionally with stakeholders across the business to evaluate, prioritize, and develop new Machine Learning and Generative AI powered solutions to solve business problems.
Own, maintain, and optimize existing Machine Learning models, as required
Work collaboratively with analysts, data engineers, and analytics engineers to bring data science and machine learning powered solutions to life.
Partner directly with functional teams to bring data and analytics expertise to our decision-making processes.
Contribute to the Data Science team’s capabilities as an internal expert on machine learning and advanced analytics.
Foster stakeholder partnerships, and work to create a culture of collaboration and data literacy to increase the company’s analytics maturity.
Present findings and technically challenging topics to a diverse group of technical and non-technical business stakeholders.
What You'll Bring:
A minimum of 3 years of work experience in data science, analytics or directly related area, during which both technical and analytical capabilities have been clearly demonstrated.
Prior success deploying machine learning solutions based on complex datasets at scale in production environments with an emphasis on creating impact to business outcomes.
Proven ability to extract actionable insights from statistical and machine learning powered models.
Strong knowledge of the underlying mathematical foundations of machine learning algorithms including linear regression, classification methods, clustering algorithms, Random Forests, time series analysis, and deep learning.
Demonstrated excellence in using Python and SQL to develop data science workflows usings tools such as scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Snowflake, and dbt.
Strong communication and presentation skills with the ability to explain complex concepts in a simple manner to colleagues & stakeholders.
Demonstrated experience collaborating and working cross-functionally with teams and stakeholders to design and implement machine learning powered solutions.
Strong understanding of best practices and KPIs around e-commerce, transactional and subscription-based products is a plus.
Experience with building solutions and utilizing tools in AWS is a plus.
Familiarity with generative AI techniques (LLMs, GANS, VAEs) and their applications in business operations is highly desirable.
What We Bring:
We’re fast thinking. We go big to reach our cyberattack-disrupting goals. And we do what we need to protect the world of business from getting important (and potentially compromising) data stolen. We never leave anyone behind. We deliver quickly – and outstandingly. We’re big on honesty because it makes us better. We’re empowered by our mission. And if cybercriminals have a good day, we work twice as hard to make the rest of their days a nightmare. That’s The Mimecast Way. And the Mimecast way is also a hybrid-working way. We empower our people to balance their time between home and the office in a way that works best for them, their team, and our stakeholders Become a Mimecaster and put corporate data under your protection. Fill our teams with respect. And bring cybercrime-obstructing energy to your work. Be passionate. Be powerful. Be alive with purpose.
#LI-ND1
DEI Statement
Cybersecurity is a community effort. That’s why we’re committed to building an inclusive, diverse community that celebrates and welcomes everyone – unless they’re a cybercriminal, of course.
We’re proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, and we’d encourage you to join us whatever your background. We particularly welcome applicants from traditionally underrepresented groups.
We consider everyone equally: your race, age, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, ability, marital status, nationality, or any other protected characteristic won’t affect your application.
If you require any adjustments or accommodations due to a disability, or any other reason that may help you in your interview process, please let us know by emailing careers@mimecast.com.
Due to certain obligations to our customers, an offer of employment will be subject to your successful completion of applicable background checks, conducted in accordance with local law.",4.0,Mimecast,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,109.0,MA,21.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","Role: Data Scientist, Senior Consultant/Consultant
Location: Miami/South Florida

Please note: This role is not eligible for 100% remote work. Employees must live within a commutable distance of the Miami Metro Area and must be willing to be onsite at the client and/or Slalom Florida office up to 5 days a week.

Who You’ll Work With
As a modern technology company, we've never met a technical challenge we didn't like. We enable our clients to learn from their data, create incredible digital experiences, and make the most of new technologies. We blend design, engineering, and analytics expertise to build the future. We surround our technologists with interesting challenges, innovative minds, and emerging technologies. Our Florida Data & Analytics practice is looking to add a Data Scientist Consultant to our locally based team.

What You’ll Do
Apply fundamental and advanced quantitative methods, including machine learning and statistical modeling, to solve complex business problems and enable data-driven decision-making (e.g., build statistical and machine learning models for trend analysis and forecasting to predict future business outcomes for a Fortune 100 company)
Collaborate with client data science teams to enhance, scale, and operationalize existing models
Communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Provide thought leadership on the latest ML/AI technologies and applications to client industry and use cases
Lead and participate in solutioning sessions, working hand-in-hand with businesses/clients, translating business objectives into actionable machine learning/data science use cases
What You’ll Bring
Production-level experience with core quantitative analysis techniques (e.g., predictive modeling, machine learning, artificial intelligence, or natural language processing) in a consulting environment
Quantitative background with relevant experience using data to solve problems and answer questions
Strong proficiency in Python, R, SQL, and experience with libraries/frameworks such as PyTorch, TensorFlow, and Scikit-learn
Experience with cloud and modern data science tools and platforms such as Databricks MLFlow, GCP BigQuery, AWS SageMaker, Kubeflow, and Azure ML
Experience using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Qlik, or Power BI
Knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practices
About Us
Slalom is a purpose-led, global business and technology consulting company. From strategy to implementation, our approach is fiercely human. In six countries and 43 markets, we deeply understand our customers—and their customers—to deliver practical, end-to-end solutions that drive meaningful impact. Backed by close partnerships with over 400 leading technology providers, our 11,000+ strong team helps people and organizations dream bigger, move faster, and build better tomorrows for all. We’re honored to be consistently recognized as a great place to work, including being one of Fortune’s 100 Best Companies to Work For seven years running. Learn more at slalom.com.
Compensation and Benefits
Slalom prides itself on helping team members thrive in their work and life. As a result, Slalom is proud to invest in benefits that include meaningful time off and paid holidays, parental leave, 401(k) with a match, a range of choices for highly subsidized health, dental, & vision coverage, adoption and fertility assistance, and short/long-term disability. We also offer additional benefits such as a yearly $350 reimbursement account for any well-being related expenses as well as discounted home, auto, and pet insurance.

Slalom is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices. Actual compensation will depend upon an individual’s skills, experience, qualifications, location, and other relevant factors.

Application Deadline:
The anticipated application deadline for this role is 11/1/2024

EEO and Accommodations
Slalom is an equal-opportunity employer and is committed to inclusion, diversity, and equity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veterans’ status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. Slalom will also consider qualified applications with criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. Slalom welcomes and encourages applications from individuals with disabilities. Reasonable accommodations are available for candidates during all aspects of the selection process. Please advise the talent acquisition team if you require accommodations during the interview process.",3.8,Slalom Consulting,"Miami, FL",10000+ Employees,2001.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,118.0,FL,23.0,1,0,0,1,0
Senior Clinical Data Scientist,"$131K
/yr","As the Senior Clinical Data Scientist, you will partner with a broad range of stakeholders across the organization. You will be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data that will drive critical growth decisions and positive outcomes.

What you’ll do
Define and demonstrate clinical, operational and financial excellence of Best Buy Health products and services
Lead collaborative relationships with external partners and conduct analyses to produce peer-reviewed scientific evidence about the economic value and return on investment for care at home programs
Identify data sources, gaps in data, and metrics of value, considerations for preprocessing data, and potential internal improvements
Maintain industry knowledge to support Best Buy Health as a subject matter expert and ensure we are considering the latest trends in data and clinical research (e.g. experimental design, HEOR methodologies)
Contribute and demonstrate knowledge of ‘bread and butter’ data science techniques within, and outside of, the team

Basic qualifications
Master’s Degree in health economics, health service research, data science, epidemiology, public health or a closely related field
5+ years conducting comprehensive data analysis and research studies
3+ years of relevant experience within a healthcare / health technology setting
Publication track record in clinical field
Preferred qualifications
PhD
5+ years of experience leading data science strategy in a healthcare or health technology setting
3+ years of health economics and outcomes research experience
Strong relationship-building skills
Strong communication skills, including executive presence

Best Buy Health is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer dedicated to creating an inclusive environment that values the diversity of our employees and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant. We are committed to equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees, without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic under applicable law. Learn more about our Affirmative Action Policy Statement HERE.

Reasonable Accommodation

Best Buy Health will make reasonable accommodations for employees and applicants for their religious beliefs and practices, mental or physical disabilities, and pregnancy, childbirth and related conditions. If you need a reasonable accommodation in the application process - to access job postings, to apply for a job, for a job interview, for pre-employment testing or with the onboarding process - please contact Talent Acquisition at talent.acquisition@bestbuy.com.

To learn more about, view the “Know Your Rights” poster and Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision HERE.
Position Type: Full time",3.6,Best Buy Health,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,131.0,Remote,6.0,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Caterpillar Inc. seeks Data Scientist II at its facility located at 500 N. Morton Ave., Morton, IL 61550. Lead large/complex projects within a systems process area. Serve as subject matter expert for global team for all key metric reporting and tools. Define requirements for system processes for major releases or emergency changes. Test accountability for systems processes for major releases or emergency changes. Manage and coordinate work for team in Bangalore. Provide guidance to other members on the global team. Perform deep-dive analysis. Generate ad-hoc reporting. Execute medium and high complexity data requests. Develop medium and high complexity PowerBI reporting. Develop medium and high complexity SAS programs and reports. Independent contributor to multi-person analytic teams. Work is typically directed by a direct supervisor, project, or team lead through a review of results. Make decisions on routine, medium risk issues that may affect the project team, suppliers, or internal customers. Mentor and develop the capabilities and organizational knowledge of more junior information scientists I & II. REQS: This position requires a Bachelor's, degree, or foreign equivalent, in Civil Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Supply Chain, Business Management or a related field and 4 years Professional experience in supply chain industry or IT. Additionally, the applicant must have employment experience with: (1) SAS; (2) SQL; (3) Datawarehouse applications Snowflake and Microsoft Power BI; (4) Python; (5) Supply Chain experience with a focus on Inventory Management; (6) Project Management; and (7) Microsoft Office tools. Telecommuting: 4 days/week. Applicants who are interested in this position should apply via www.caterpillar.com/careers , search [Data Scientist II / Reference # R0000278409]. #LI-DNI
Posting Dates:
October 14, 2024 - February 10, 2025
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Morton, IL",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,IL,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","CHEP helps move more goods to more people, in more places than any other organization on earth via our 300 million pallets, crates and containers. We employ 11,000 people and operate in more than 55 countries. Through our pioneering and sustainable share-and-reuse business model, the world’s biggest brands trust us to help them transport their goods more efficiently, safely and with less environmental impact.

What does that mean for you? You’ll join an international organization big enough to take you anywhere, and small enough to get you there sooner. You’ll help change how goods get to market and contribute to global sustainability. You’ll be empowered to bring your authentic self to work and be surrounded by diverse and driven professionals. And you can maximize your work-life balance and flexibility through our
Hybrid Work Model
.
Job Description
POSITION PURPOSE
To assist in developing tools and technologies that leverage data from a variety of sources to increase supply chain efficiencies and provide value to our customers.
MAJOR / KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
Responsible for experimenting with and implementing machine learning techniques on internal/external customer projects
Responsible for learning new data science techniques/programming languages and exploring their viability on current projects
Will contribute to data science team discussions, providing insight as needed on current approaches and methods
MEASURES
Successful application of data science principles
Successful completion of projects
AUTHORITY / DECISION MAKING
Data science model selection and implementation
Working autonomously
KEY CONTACTS
Internal: Other data scientists, data science manager, project stakeholders
External: Project stakeholders
QUALIFICATIONS
BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems and/or equivalent formal training
Proficient with machine learning and statistics
Proficient with Python, deep learning frameworks, Spark
Excellent communication skills
Desirable Qualifications:
1-2 years work experience in data science position
Proficient with Go, C/C++, other languages
Proficient with cloud computing environments, Kubernetes, etc.
Software development experience
EXPERIENCE
Participated in numerous data science projects
Utilized several data science methodologies
Have worked autonomously and delivered results on schedule
Have presented results to non-data scientist audience
SKILLS AND KNOWLEDGE
Strong programming skills (Python, R, etc.)
Knowledge of major data science topics, models, and methods (from logistic regression to advanced neural networks)
Strong analytical skills
Preferred Education
Bachelors
Preferred Level of Work Experience
1 - 3 years
Remote Type
Hybrid Remote
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, and we are committed to developing a diverse workforce in which everyone is treated fairly, with respect, and has the opportunity to contribute to business success while realizing his or her potential. This means harnessing the unique skills and experience that each individual brings and we do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state, or local protected class.
Individuals fraudulently misrepresenting themselves as Brambles or CHEP representatives have scheduled interviews and offered fraudulent employment opportunities with the intent to commit identity theft or solicit money. Brambles and CHEP never conduct interviews via online chat or request money as a term of employment. If you have a question as to the legitimacy of an interview or job offer, please contact us at recruitment@brambles.com.",4.4,Brambles Group,"Santa Clara, CA",10000+ Employees,1875.0,Company - Public,Shipping & Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,125.0,CA,149.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist III,"$151K
/yr","Our Opportunity:
Do you want to build a model that impacts the company's bottom line? Do you want to see how your ideas, insights, recommendations, and experiments affect top-level decision-makers? If so, Chewy is looking for a Data Scientist III to join our Merchandising Data Science Team. In this role, you will combine deep understanding of machine learning, advanced data analysis, statistical testing, and the ability to communicate insights effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders. As a Data Scientist III, you will play a crucial part in designing, implementing, and deploying machine learning models to solve complex problems for our Retail Operations business partners.
The ideal candidate will operate as a full stack data scientist who should have expertise in both machine learning and cloud technologies. In this role, they will have the opportunity to develop and implement sophisticated data models and analytics solutions to support strategic decision-making across the organization.
What you'll do:
Design, develop, and implement machine learning models for various applications, including but not limited to predictive analytics, natural language processing, and computer vision.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms to address specific business challenges.
Analyze large, complex data sets to extract actionable insights and identify trends, patterns, and opportunities.
Oversee data collection, cleansing, and validation processes to ensure data integrity and reliability.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data scientists, software engineers, and domain experts, to understand requirements and deliver effective solutions.
Document code, algorithms, and processes to facilitate knowledge sharing and ensure reproducibility.
Provide technical guidance in best practices for model development to the data science team.
Effectively communicate complex technical concepts and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
What you'll need:
Candidate must possess a Graduate Degree (MS/PhD) in Data Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, Mathematics, or related discipline.
6+ years of experience in developing and deploying advanced machine learning models and algorithms in a production environment.
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, machine learning, and deep learning techniques.
Expertise in programming languages such as Python.
Advanced proficiency with SQL
Proficiency with version control systems (e.g., Git) and collaborative coding practices.
Good understanding of cloud platforms such as AWS.
Strong problem-solving skills and the ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast-paced environment.
Excellent oral and written communication skills including the ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time
Chewy is committed to equal opportunity. We value and embrace diversity and inclusion of all Team Members. If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or similar law, and you need an accommodation during the application process or to perform these job requirements, or if you need a religious accommodation, please contact CAAR@chewy.com.

If you have a question regarding your application, please contact HR@chewy.com.

To access Chewy's Customer Privacy Policy, please click here. To access Chewy's California CPRA Job Applicant Privacy Policy, please click here.",3.4,Chewy,"Boston, MA",10000+ Employees,2011.0,Company - Public,Pet & Pet Supplies Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,151.0,MA,13.0,1,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist I,"$116K
/yr","JOB DESCRIPTION:
Apply statistical modeling, data transformation, data mining and machine learning to develop predictive models, attributes, alerts and indicators to improve Identity Access Management and Point of Contact processes for insurance carriers. Execute database queries to extract and aggregate LN’s data assets into attributes used for predictive modeling, reporting and analysis. Analyze client data to prepare for analysis. Identifies data quality concerns and opportunities (i.e. performance indicators, scores, approval/declination indicators, etc.) and clearly communicate these concerns to stakeholders. Explore and mine new data sources to help optimize and validate existing models. Review product results and communicate findings to internal and external stakeholders. Ideate, research and design new analytics and data science methodologies on large scale and complex data assets. Store, archive, index, transfer and analyze large and complex datasets (structured and unstructured data). Create and enhance Python/R or GUI-based reporting tools that allow team members to gain insights about LexisNexis data assets. Enforce data quality testing best practices. Perform other duties as needed.
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s or foreign equivalent degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Information Systems, or a related field required.
3 years of experience in job offered or related occupations required.
Also required is: 2 years of experience: in advanced ECL Programming (HPCC Systems); with Record Linking for Insurance Header files; creating product dashboards using PowerBI; and batch LexID assignment for customer records.
Employee reports to LexisNexis Risk Solutions, Inc. office in Alpharetta, GA, but may telecommute from any location within the U.S.
Experience can be concurrent.
#LI-DNI
#ICT
LexisNexis, a division of RELX, is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. We are committed to providing a fair and accessible hiring process. If you have a disability or other need that requires accommodation or adjustment, please let us know by completing our Applicant Request Support Form:
https://forms.office.com/r/eVgFxjLmAK
, or please contact 1-855-833-5120.
Please read our
Candidate Privacy Policy
.",4.2,RELX,"Alpharetta, GA",10000+ Employees,1880.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,116.0,GA,144.0,1,0,0,0,0
Junior Data Scientist,"$91K
/yr","Orbis Operations is seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Junior Data Scientist to support our growing team in the collection, transformation, and analysis of open source data. In this role, you will be responsible for building data pipelines, cleaning and organizing datasets, and providing data-driven insights to support government missions. While experience with AI and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, this role focuses primarily on open source data collection and processing, offering an excellent opportunity for career growth in the data science field.
Key Responsibilities
Duties/Responsibilities
Assist in the collection, preprocessing, and transformation of large-scale open source datasets from various structured and unstructured sources.
Develop and maintain data pipelines to ensure efficient data flow and integration across different platforms.
Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) to uncover patterns and insights in open source data that align with mission objectives.
Collaborate with data engineers, software developers, and mission stakeholders to understand data requirements and deliver tailored solutions.
Write clear, well-documented code to automate data processing tasks and streamline workflows.
Generate reports and visualizations that communicate findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Stay up to date with trends in open-source data tools, technologies, and methodologies to continuously improve data collection and pipelining processes.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This position has no supervisory responsibilities
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, or related field, or equivalent work experience.
1-3 years of experience working in data science, with a focus on open source data collection, cleaning, and pipelining.
Strong programming skills in Python, with familiarity in libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and requests for data manipulation and processing.
Experience working with APIs and web scraping tools to collect and integrate data from open source platforms.
Understanding of data cleaning, transformation, and storage best practices.
Strong problem-solving skills, with an ability to manage multiple tasks and projects simultaneously.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to work effectively in a team and present findings to non-technical audiences.
ACTIVE Security Clearance TS SCI w POLY
Preferred Qualifications
Experience working with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) for data storage and processing.
Familiarity with SQL or NoSQL databases for querying and managing datasets.
Knowledge of data visualization tools such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, or Power BI.
Experience with natural language processing (NLP) and Large Language Models (LLMs) is a plus, but not required.
Prior experience working on government or public sector projects.
Physical Requirements
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer.
Routine video conference and/or in-person meetings.
Ability to attend planned meetings within the Washington Metro Area region.
We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

Location
McLean, VA",3.9,Orbis Operations Management Company,"McLean, VA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,91.0,VA,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$160K
/yr","Snapshot
We are a highly innovative AI startup that builds products and solutions from the ground up while using cutting-edge technology. We are seeking a data scientist with machine learning and Python experience to work with our team to develop our products for predictive maintenance (PMX) and digital signals processing (DSP).
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in a quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
2+ years of experience in Python data science stack: NumPy, Pandas, scikit-learn, TensorFlow/PyTorch, PySpark, Dask, Matplotlib, Seaborn, Bokeh, etc.
A strong sense of ownership and accountability; eagerness to learn skills as needed by business focus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable with public speaking and presenting to executives
Responsibilities
Build innovative data analytics and machine learning pipelines.
Become an expert in predictive maintenance (PMX) or signals processing products. Attend conferences and assess competitive products.
Meet with domain experts and present to stakeholders regularly.
Salary range: $140,000-$180,000",4.3,PUTNAM RECRUITING GROUP,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Private,Staffing & Subcontracting,Human Resources & Staffing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,160.0,Remote,,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$118K
/yr","At Similarweb, we are revolutionizing the way businesses interact with the digital world by revealing to them everything that happens online.
Our unique data and solutions empower over 4,300 customers globally, including industry giants like Google, eBay, and Adidas, to make game-changing decisions that drive their digital strategies.
In 2021, we went public on the New York Stock Exchange, and we continue to reach new heights! Come work alongside Similarwebbers across the globe who are bright, curious, practical and good people.
We're looking for a Data Analyst / Data Scientist to partner with our consulting team by delivering best-in-class data analysis for research projects for prospective and existing clients, and driving value for clients' strategic business needs.
This role will report to the Research Analytics Manager of Data Labs.
Why is this role so important at Similarweb?
Similarweb is more than just a data provider. We develop long-term and collaborative partnerships with our clients, and are constantly striving to help them make better business decisions using our data. One of the ways we do this is through our advisory services.
As a Data Analyst, you will work with our team of Advisory Services Consultants and Data Engineering team, to create customized data analyses using Similarweb data.
Your data analysis will support our prospective clients' and existing clients' strategic business needs, and help the business increase and retain customers.
So, what will you be doing all day?
Your role as part of the Data Labs Team means your daily responsibilities may include:
Partnering with our in-house consultants and GTM teams to scope out custom data analysis projects for client
Building models and utilizing sophisticated technology such as web scraping and AI to enrich datasets to target client pain points
Collaborating with Data Engineering to ensure the existence of use-case specific data, and estimating the availability and effort required to produce specific custom reports
Preparing and communicating customized data analysis to advisory services consultant, to ensure successful delivery to clients
This is the perfect job for someone who:
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in data analysis (Python, Excel, Tableau, SQL)
Can use their analytical skills to drive business impact
Has a general understanding of digital marketing trends
Has experience in client-facing roles (preferred)
Has experience working collectively with other teams and stakeholders to accomplish business goals
Is able to apply relevant industry knowledge to solve specific client business needs, and demonstrate value within individual client use cases
**At Similarweb, collaborating with our colleagues in-office creates a more connected, unified culture. Our best work is a product of our face-to-face collaboration, with the ability to work partially from home.**
Why you'll love being a Similarwebber:
You'll actually love the product you work with: Our customers aren't our only raving fans. When we asked our employees why they chose to come work at Similarweb, 99% of them said ""the product."" Imagine how exciting your job is when you get to work with the most powerful digital intelligence platform in the world.
You'll find a home for your big ideas: We encourage an open dialogue and empower employees to bring their ideas to the table. You'll find the resources you need to take initiative and create meaningful change within the organization.
We offer competitive perks & benefits: We take your well-being seriously, and offer competitive compensation packages to all employees. We also put a strong emphasis on community, with regular team outings and happy hours.
You can grow your career in any direction you choose: Interested in becoming a VP or want to transition into a different department? Whether it's Career Week, personalized coaching, or our ongoing learning solutions, you'll find all the tools and opportunities you need to develop your career right here.
Diversity isn't just a buzzword: People want to work in a place where they can be themselves. We strive to create a workplace that is reflective of the communities we serve, where everyone is empowered to bring their full, authentic selves to work. We are committed to inclusivity across race, gender, ethnicity, culture, sexual orientation, age, religion, spirituality, identity and experience. Our culture of equality and mutual respect also helps us better understand and serve our customers in a world that is becoming more global, more diverse, and more digital every day.
We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here, as applicable: https://www.similarweb.com/corp/legal/applicant-privacy-policies/
* Please note: We're unable to sponsor employment visas at this time.*
#LI-DC #LI-Hybrid

We will handle your application and information related to your application in accordance with the Applicant Privacy Policy available here.",3.9,Similarweb,"Burlington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,118.0,MA,16.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$120K
/yr","Job Overviews
Location:
Salt Lake City, UTAH
Job Title:
Data Engineer
Experience:
9 Years
Employement:
Full Time
Job Code:
998163

Job Details
The Data Scientist will be responsible for utilizing advanced analytics and statistical modeling techniques to extract valuable insights from complex data sets. S/he will play a pivotal role in developing innovative solutions, optimizing business operations, and driving data-driven decision-making processes. S/he will possess a strong background in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling, and exceptional problem-solving and communication skills. The Data Scientist will use various methods to transform raw data into useful data systems. S/he will create algorithms and conduct statistical analysis. Overall, you’ll strive for efficiency by aligning data systems with business goals.
Job Responsibilities
Identify, collect, and analyze large volumes of structured and unstructured data from various sources, including internal databases, external APIs, and third-party vendors.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure its quality, integrity, and suitability for analysis.
Conduct exploratory data analysis to identify patterns, trends, and anomalies that can provide actionable insights.
Develop and implement advanced statistical models and machine learning algorithms to solve complex business problems, such as demand forecasting, customer segmentation, or anomaly detection.
Apply state-of-the-art machine learning techniques, including deep learning, natural language processing, and computer vision, to extract meaningful information from diverse data types.
Evaluate and optimize models for accuracy, performance, and scalability.
Create visually appealing and intuitive data visualizations to effectively communicate findings and insights to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Prepare clear and concise reports, presentations, and dashboards that summarize analytical results and provide actionable recommendations.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to deliver data-driven insights and contribute to evidence-based decision-making processes.
Collaborate with IT teams to identify and implement appropriate data infrastructure and tools, such as data lakes, data warehouses, or cloud-based solutions.
Develop and maintain robust data pipelines and workflows for efficient data ingestion, processing, and storage.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries and manage database performance and scalability.
Job Requirements
Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, including software engineers, data engineers, business analysts, and product managers, to define project requirements and deliverables.
Mentor and provide guidance to junior data scientists and analysts, fostering a culture of learning and growth.
Work with stakeholders, including the Executive, Product, Data, and Design teams, to support their data infrastructure needs and assist with data-related technical issues.
Collect, manage, and convert raw data into information that can be interpreted by data scientists and business analysts.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, assembling large, complex data sets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements.
Implement server-side logic and database integration using programming languages like Python, Java, or Node.js.
Design and optimize database schemas, write efficient SQL queries, and manage database performance and scalability.
Conduct unit testing, integration testing, and troubleshooting issues to ensure the overall quality and reliability of software applications.
Identify and resolve performance bottlenecks in both front-end and back-end systems to ensure optimal user experience.
Create and maintain technical documentation, including system architecture, API documentation, and user guides.
Continuously research and evaluate emerging technologies, tools, and frameworks to improve development practices and enhance the software stack.
Skill & Experience
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or Information Systems, or Progressive experience in Computer Science with experience in the development of applications.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or Scala, along with familiarity with data manipulation libraries (e.g., pandas, NumPy) and machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Strong knowledge of statistical analysis, machine learning techniques, and data modeling.
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI) and proficiency in SQL and working with databases.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving abilities, with the capability to interpret complex data sets and derive actionable insights.
Outstanding communication skills, with the ability to effectively present complex ideas and findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.",5.0,CloudBerg Tec,"Salt Lake City, UT",Unknown,,Unknown,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,UT,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist II,"$132K
/yr","About Direct To Consumer (DTC)
Disney’s Direct to Consumer team oversees the Hulu and Disney+ streaming businesses within Disney Entertainment helping to bring The Walt Disney Company’s best-in-class storytelling to fans and families everywhere.
The Walt Disney Company Direct to Consumer’s (DTC) Data Science team combines deep data analysis and research of our rich user data to present a compelling vision around user retention and preferences across the vast ecosystem of our product offerings and content. We are the insights and modeling partners for the content, marketing, product, and engineering teams at Disney+, Hulu and ESPN+.
As Data Scientists, we use data to empower decision-makers with information, predictions, and insights that ultimately influence the experiences of millions of users worldwide. If you are someone who loves to work cross-functionally, build models, perform statistical analysis, and create visualizations to provide scalable and iterative capabilities, then this is a fantastic role for you!
What You'll Do
Modeling: Apply state of the art machine learning and statistical analysis to develop models related to opportunity sizing, targeting, and optimization.
Deep analysis: Analyze user behavioral data to identify patterns, uncover opportunities, and create common understanding of how people are interacting with the service and content.
Visualization of Insights: Development of prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, and robust analytics leading to impactful insights communicated clearly and visually.
Partnership: Partner closely with business stakeholders to identify and unlock opportunities, and with other data teams to improve platform capabilities around data modeling, data visualization, experimentation and data architecture.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related field
3+ years related experience with developing machine learning models and conducting statistical analysis
Deep understanding of machine learning concepts and statistical methods
Ability to draw insights and conclusions from data to inform model development and business decisions
Desire to collaborate with other data scientists, data analysts, and key business partners
Proficient in analyzing data and developing ML models using Python (with ML frameworks like tensorflow, scikit-learn, etc.)
Capable of reading and writing Object-Oriented code to review and implement modeling pipelines (Airflow, Luigi, etc.)
Understanding of SQL and distributed data technologies (Hive, Spark)
Preferred Qualifications
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, Physics or related quantitative field (e.g. Econometrics, Mathematics, Operations Research)
Working knowledge of Bayesian modeling and familiarity with probabilistic programming packages/language such as Stan, PyMC
Experience fully integrating data science solutions into the business and operationalizing ML models
Additional Information
#DISNEYTECH

The hiring range for this position in the Los Angeles, CA area is $112,600-$151,000. The base pay actually offered will take into account internal equity and also may vary depending on the candidate’s geographic region, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience among other factors. A bonus and/or long-term incentive units may be provided as part of the compensation package, in addition to the full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits, dependent on the level and position offered.",3.9,Disney Direct to Consumer,"Santa Monica, CA",10000+ Employees,1923.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,132.0,CA,101.0,1,0,1,0,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$177K
/yr","Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the team
The Data Science team of the Tech and Product department at TikTok USDS is responsible for building high-quality and timely data solutions for the business as the single source of truth and for building easy-to-use and scalable data products to support business growth. You will have the exciting opportunity to:
Conduct product analytics to provide product recommendations that drive product growth
Deep dive into data sources, understand their limitations, and communicate complex data insights through exploratory analysis and research to suggest improvement
Design and monitor core metrics; understand root causes of metric movements
Design and build advanced analytical solutions and models to deliver superior business outcomes
In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.
Qualifications
Previous internship(s) or 1-2 years of full-time experience
Experience with SQL, Python, or R
Experience navigating and working with large data sets using SQL
Self-motivated, detail-oriented, learn autonomously, and highly organized
Ability to conduct rigorous analysis and communicate conclusions to both technical and non-technical audiences
BS/MS in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Statistics, or other science and engineering fields
Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States. This position is not eligible for visa sponsorship or support.

TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at https://shorturl.at/ktJP6

This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $114000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,177.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$185K
/yr","Job ID:
13443

Location:
Newport News, VA

Category:
Computer

Division:
CST Division

Position Type:
Regular

Education:
Masters Degree

Experience Required:
12+ years

Relocation Provided:
Position Description

Come join our team at Jefferson Lab, where great minds matter .

Posting Date: 10/17/24
Salary Range: $133,200 - $236,000 (SSCS)
Work Location Type: Hybrid (combination of on-site and remote work based on business need)

What your job will be like:
The incumbent will be responsible for developing, implementing and leading new data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory's data science capabilities in alignment with the overall mission to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and take leadership roles in future DOE data science initiatives.

In this role you will:
Be responsible for developing, implementing and leading data science projects. Contribute to the strategy and direction for the laboratory’s data science capabilities in alignment with strategic plans to ensure that the Lab is well-positioned to achieve research goals and contribute significantly to future DOE data science initiatives.
Provide key contributions to the data sience department program development efforts, including contributing to on-going AI/ML in support of the 12 GeV science program, the Electron Ion Collider (EIC) detector design, and the High Performance Data Facility (HPDF).
Guide and provide ultimate direction as the Lab’s Subject Matter Expert and technical resource for data science program and projects.
Be responsible for developing competences in operational and/or applied mathematics data science core in order to support the program.
Be responsible for attracting external funding in data science projects.

Qualifications We Require:Education:
Master's Degree in Computer Science or other relevant field required.
Ph.D. preferred.

Experience:
12 or more years related experience with considerable work specific to developing scientific computing applications and/or data science.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Recognized technical expertise in data science with recognized expertise in one or more additional areas of scientific computing.
Demonstrated knowledge of computational infrastructure and applications applicable to large scale experimental facilities.
Demonstrated experience with strategic planning and implementation of a data science portfolio aligned with overall institutional objectives.
Ability to interact across organizational levels including senior leadership and effectively form partnerships with external partners.
Must possess exceptional written and oral communication skills.
Successful history in attracting funding.
Prior experience in DOE or National Lab environment is highly desired.

About Jefferson Lab

Join a community with a common purpose of solving the most challenging scientific and engineering problems of our time. The Jefferson Lab campus is located in southeastern Virginia amidst a vibrant and growing technology community.

A career at Jefferson Lab is more than a job. You will be part of “big science” and work alongside top scientists and engineers from around the world unlocking the secrets of our visible universe. Managed by Jefferson Science Associates, LLC; Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility is entering an exciting period of mission growth and is seeking new team members ready to apply their skills and passion to have an impact. You could call it work, or you could call it a mission. We call it a challenge. We do things that will change the world.

Total Rewards at Jefferson Lab

At Jefferson Lab, we believe that a comprehensive employee benefits program is an important and meaningful part of the compensation employees receive. Our benefits program includes, but is not limited to:

Medical, Dental, and Vision Care Plans
Flexible Spending Accounts
Paid Time-off and Leave Programs (Paid Parental, vacation, holidays, and sick leave)
401(k) Plan – 9% Lab Contribution; 100% vested
Flexible Work Arrangements (Remote & Alternate Work Schedules available)
Tuition Assistance, Training and Professional Development Programs
Live near the waterways of the Chesapeake Bay region with access to nearby beaches, mountains, and all major metropolitan centers on the East Coast

Jefferson Science Associates, LLC (JSA) manages and operates the Thomas Jefferson National Accelerator Facility (Jefferson Lab). JSA is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of race, color, religion, ethnicity, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, disability, or veteran status or on any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. As part of the JSA’s equal employment opportunity policy, we also take affirmative action as called for by applicable laws and Executive Orders to ensure that minority group individuals, females, disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, other protected veterans, Armed Forces, and qualified disabled persons are introduced into our workforce and considered for promotional opportunities.

JSA is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities (unless doing so will result in an undue hardship). If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to employment @ jlab.org or call (757) 269-7598 to provide the nature of your request. Reasonable accommodations are considered on a case-by-case basis.

Employment with JSA is conditional upon DOE approval if at any time during your employment you are participating in a Foreign Government Talent Recruitment Program or Affiliated activity. Generally, such programs/activities include any foreign-state-sponsored attempt to acquire U.S.-funded scientific research through programs run or funded by the government that target scientists, engineers, students, academics, researchers, and entrepreneurs of all nationalities working or educated in the United States. This includes positions or appointments, both domestic and foreign, titled academic, professional, or institutional appointments whether or not remuneration is received and whether full-time, part-time or voluntary.",4.2,Jefferson Lab,"Newport News, VA",501 to 1000 Employees,1984.0,Government,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,185.0,VA,40.0,0,0,0,1,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$175K
/yr","AirDNA began with a big dream in a balmy California garage in 2015. Since then, the technology startup has grown into the leading provider of data and business intelligence for the billion-dollar travel and vacation rental industry—with offices in Denver and Barcelona. Our self-serve MarketMinder platform eliminates guesswork and equips Airbnb hosts with smart and competitive insights needed to succeed in the ever-evolving short-term rental landscape. We also arm enterprise clients with customized reports and in-depth dashboards to ensure they can scale and invest strategically. These customers include hundreds of top financial institutions, real estate companies, vacation rental managers, and destination marketing organizations around the world. We track the daily performance of over 14 million Airbnb, Vrbo, & Booking.com properties across 120,000 global markets. We also collect data from over thousands partner properties. This marriage of scraped and source data, enhanced by our proprietary algorithms, makes our solutions the most accurate and comprehensive in the world. We’re firm believers that data isn’t the destination; it’s the starting point. The launchpad. The bedrock for any future-forward business.

The AirDNA Team:
At AirDNA, we’re a team of data nerds on a mission to empower our customers to smartly grow their businesses. And we’re on the hunt for a team leader who can take an agile approach to help us build sophisticated and scalable acquisition strategies. In short: Life is never boring here. And we genuinely live and breathe our company values: Happy, Hungry and Honest. People who are ready to exemplify these values are especially encouraged to apply. We invite you to apply even if you are unsure about whether you meet every single requirement in this posting. We carefully consider every application, not just those that check off all the boxes.

The Role:
As a Senior Data Scientist working on software for short-term rental hosts, you will play a key role in leveraging data-driven insights to design, develop, and maintain software solutions that enable our hosts to effectively invest in short-term rentals, manage their properties, streamline operations, optimize pricing, and deliver exceptional guest experiences. At AirDNA, models are at the heart of all of our systems. A Senior Data Scientist is responsible for setting and implementing strategies to continuously improve our algorithms in a fast-changing industry. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams, including product managers, engineers, and designers, to create user-friendly and impactful tools that empower hosts and maximize their potential.
Here's what you'll get to do:
Guide the strategy for creating or improving ML systems that empower short-term rental hosts to make better decisions, such as estimating revenue potential, pricing optimization, dynamic inventory management, demand forecasting, guest profiling, and review sentiment analysis.
Utilize advanced data analysis, statistical modeling, and machine learning techniques to extract actionable insights from complex and diverse datasets, including host performance data, guest behavior data, and market trends.
Work closely with product managers, engineers, and designers to define product requirements, prioritize features, and ensure the successful delivery of software tools that meet the needs of short-term rental investors and hosts.
Develop predictive models, algorithms, and optimization techniques to empower hosts in making data-driven decisions regarding, comp sets, pricing strategies, occupancy rates, availability management, and revenue maximization.
Drive the implementation and integration of data science models and algorithms within the software infrastructure, ensuring scalability, reliability, and performance.
Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in data science, machine learning, and software development, and apply emerging technologies and methodologies to enhance the capabilities and impact of our software tools.
Create and implement strategies to source and utilize short-term rental training data at scale.
Create processes to continuously monitor and improve the performance of our models.
Here's what you'll need to be successful:
Bachelors, Master's or Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, or a related quantitative field.
Minimum of 5 years of professional experience as a Data Scientist, with a focus on software development and advanced analytics.
Proven track record of designing, developing, and deploying successful software solutions powered by data science and analytics.
Experience in short-term rental investment, revenue management, price optimization, time-series or forecasting is a strong plus.
Strong expertise in programming languages such as Python, with proficiency in data manipulation and analysis libraries (e.g., Pandas, Scikit-learn, XGBoost, PyTorch or TensorFlow).
Proficiency in SQL and database management systems.
Expertise working with large data sets in distributed systems such as pyspark and snowflake.
Experience in ML engineering, cloud-based deployment and model lifecycle management.
Here's what you can expect from us:
Competitive cash compensation and benefits, the salary range for this position is $170,000 - $180,000 per year.
Colorado Salary Statement: The salary range displayed in specifically for those potential hired who will work or reside in the state of Colorado if selected for this role. Any offered salary is determined based on internal equity, internal salary ranges, market data/ranges, applicant’s skills and prior relevant experience, certain degrees and certifications.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, and vision packages to meet your needs
Unlimited vacation policy; take time when you need it
Eligible for Company’s annual discretionary bonus program
401K with employer match up to 4%
Continuing education stipend
16 weeks of paid parental leave
New MacBooks for employees

Benefits for Denver Office employees:
Commuter/RTD benefit
Quarterly team outings
In-Office Lunch 3 Days a Week
We have a great office located just a few blocks away from Union Station in the heart of Denver’s historic LoDo neighborhood–high ceilings, exposed brick, a fully stocked kitchen (snacks, espresso, etc.), and plenty of meeting rooms and brainstorming nooks
Pet-friendly!
AirDNA seeks to attract the best-qualified candidates who support the mission, vision and values of the company and those who respect and promote excellence through diversity. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, age, national origin, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, physical or mental disability, marital, familial or parental status, genetic information, military status, veteran status or any other legally protected classification. The company complies with all applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment and prohibits unlawful harassment based on any of the aforementioned protected classes at every location in which the company operates. This applies to all terms, conditions and privileges of employment including but not limited to: hiring, assessments, probation, placement, benefits, promotion, demotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leave of absence, compensation, training and development, social and recreational programs, education assistance and retirement.

We are committed to making our application process and workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Upon request, AirDNA will reasonably accommodate applicants so they can participate in the application process unless doing so would create an undue hardship to AirDNA or a threat to these individuals, others in the workplace or the company as a whole. To request accommodation, please email compliance@airdna.co. Please allow for 24 hours to process your request.",3.5,AirDNA,Remote,51 to 200 Employees,2015.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,Remote,9.0,1,0,1,1,1
Data Scientist II - Experimentation,"$156K
/yr","Welcome to Warner Bros. Discovery… the stuff dreams are made of.
Who We Are…
When we say, “the stuff dreams are made of,” we’re not just referring to the world of wizards, dragons and superheroes, or even to the wonders of Planet Earth. Behind WBD’s vast portfolio of iconic content and beloved brands, are the storytellers bringing our characters to life, the creators bringing them to your living rooms and the dreamers creating what’s next…
From brilliant creatives, to technology trailblazers, across the globe, WBD offers career defining opportunities, thoughtfully curated benefits, and the tools to explore and grow into your best selves. Here you are supported, here you are celebrated, here you can thrive.
The Job

As a Data Scientist II on the WBD Experimentation Data Science team, this individual will leverage large datasets to extract insights and guide decision-making throughout the full lifecycle of product development for our streaming platform, MAX. You will be responsible for setting up best practices around experiment design and advanced analysis. You will work with product stakeholders from various areas in the video streaming business including search personalization, merchandising and growth, etc. Your work will be essential to drive growth for MAX and come join us if you are passionate about video streaming platform and analytics!

The Daily
Support the design, monitor and deep dive analysis of A/B tests in various business settings. Work end to end with product stakeholders from idea initiation, experiment design/monitoring to sharing results analysis for decision making.
Study and fully understand WBD data sources and develop metrics for measuring platform performance in A/B tests.
Write efficient queries to pull data for KPIs and metrics to diagnose changes observed in experiments and work with engineering and product partners to resolve potential issues.
Perform advanced statistical tests to real world A/B test datasets to measure impacts of new product features.
Apply causal model to investigate cause-effect relationship between KPIs and key product changes.
Perform research to acquire best in class data science techniques and best practices to improve the rigor and efficiency in product experimentation.
Capture business requirements for data science solutions and communicate data science output and recommendations to inform business strategies.
Present analysis to business partners and senior leadership and make product launch recommendations.
How We Get Things Done…
This last bit is probably the most important! Here at WBD, our guiding principles are the core values by which we operate and are central to how we get things done. You can find them at www.wbd.com/guiding-principles/ along with some insights from the team on what they mean and how they show up in their day to day. We hope they resonate with you and look forward to discussing them during your interview.
Championing Inclusion at WBD
Warner Bros. Discovery embraces the opportunity to build a workforce that reflects the diversity of our society and the world around us. Being an equal opportunity employer means that we take seriously our responsibility to consider qualified candidates on the basis of merit, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
If you’re a qualified candidate with a disability and you require adjustments or accommodations during the job application and/or recruitment process, please visit our accessibility page for instructions to submit your request.
In compliance with local law, we are disclosing the compensation, or a range thereof, for roles in locations where legally required. Actual salaries will vary based on several factors, including but not limited to external market data, internal equity, location, skill set, experience, and/or performance. Base pay is just one component of Warner Bros. Discovery’s total compensation package for employees. Pay Range: $109,200.00 - $202,800.00 salary per year. Other rewards may include annual bonuses, short- and long-term incentives, and program-specific awards. In addition, Warner Bros. Discovery provides a variety of benefits to employees, including health insurance coverage, an employee wellness program, life and disability insurance, a retirement savings plan, paid holidays and sick time and vacation.
If you’re a qualified candidate with an arrest or conviction record, please know that your application will be considered in accordance with the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act.",3.5,Warner Bros. Discovery,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,2022.0,Company - Public,Film Production,Media & Communication,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,156.0,CA,2.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist - Product,"$151K
/yr","Position at Confluent Inc
With Confluent, organizations can harness the full power of continuously flowing data to innovate and win in the modern digital world. We have a purpose that drives us to do better every day – we're creating an entirely new category within data infrastructure - data streaming. This technology will allow every organization to create experiences and use the power of data in ways that profoundly impact the way we all live. This impact is our purpose and drives us to do better every day.
One Confluent. One team. One Data Streaming Platform.
Data Connects Us.
About the Role:
The mission of the Data Science team at Confluent is to serve as the central nervous system of all things data for the company: we build analytics infrastructure, metrics, insights, and models. Our outputs enable data-driven thinking and help optimize every part of the business. There are limitless opportunities for an ambitious data scientist to make an immediate and meaningful impact within a high-growth company.
As a Product Data Scientist at Confluent, you will be a key player in helping define the experiences and driving product strategy at Confluent. You will collaborate with our Product leadership team and cross-functional partners across the Data organization. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s challenges, unlocking growth of our product adoption funnel. This role requires a strong blend of technical skills, strategic thinking and communication skills to influence product strategy and investment decisions.
What You Will Do:
Collaborate with product managers, product engineers, and other stakeholders to define and measure success metrics for product features and initiatives.
Develop and maintain dashboards, reports, and visualizations to communicate key metrics and insights to stakeholders.
Utilize data to uncover trends, identify opportunities for growth, drive strategic product decisions, and shape product roadmaps.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to improve product experience
Share actionable insights and recommendations with leadership at various levels, playing a pivotal role in determining Product strategy
Collaborate with other data scientists across our organization to share best practices, learn new analytical techniques, and champion an organizational culture where data is central to decision making
What You Will Bring:
Strong stakeholder management skills with the ability to influence and build relationships at all levels of the organization.
3+ years of experience in Product Data Science/Analytics
Excellent communication skills, and ability to collaborate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders
Exceptional problem solving skills and analytical skills
Strong proficiency in data manipulation with data querying languages (e.g. SQL). Proficiency in scripting languages (e.g. Python) preferred.
Proficiency in data visualization and building dashboards with tools such as Tableau
Experience and familiarity with A/B testing and experiment best practices
Bachelor or advanced degree in a quantitative discipline: computer science, engineering, statistics, economics, etc.
What Gives You an Edge:
Experience and knowledge of causal inference, machine learning and other advanced analytical methods
Experience in SaaS/Product-led Growth companies

Come As You Are
At Confluent, equality is a core tenet of our culture. We are committed to building an inclusive global team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, beliefs, and experiences. The more diverse we are, the richer our community and the broader our impact. Employment decisions are made on the basis of job-related criteria without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other classification protected by applicable law.
At Confluent, we are committed to providing competitive pay and benefits that are in line with industry standards. We analyze and carefully consider several factors when determining compensation, including work history, education, professional experience, and location. This position has an annual estimated salary of $139,230 - $163,620, an annual bonus, and a competitive equity package. The actual pay may vary depending on your skills, qualifications, experience, and work location. In addition, Confluent offers a wide range of employee benefits.",3.7,Confluent,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,151.0,United States,10.0,1,0,0,0,1
Fraud Risk Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Do the best work of your career as a champion for small and mid-size businesses.
BILL is a leader in financial automation software for small and midsize businesses (SMBs). As a champion of SMBs, we are dedicated to automating the future of finance so businesses can thrive. Hundreds of thousands of businesses trust BILL solutions to manage financial workflows, including payables, receivables, and spend and expense management. With BILL, businesses are connected to a network of millions of members, so they can pay or get paid faster. Through our automated solutions, we help SMBs simplify and control their finances, so they can confidently manage their businesses, and succeed on their terms.
BILL is a trusted partner of leading U.S. financial institutions, accounting firms, and accounting software providers. We have operations in San Jose, CA, Draper, UT, and are continuing to expand into other geographic locations. If you’re looking for a place that helps you do the best work of your career, look no further than BILL.
Make your impact within a rapidly growing Fintech Company
We are looking for a detail oriented, enthusiastic and dedicated Risk Data Scientist to join Bill’s Risk Data Innovation team with a focus on fraud and credit risk. The incumbent will be working on data science projects related to key risk department initiatives. The data scientist will own key projects associated with predictive fraud detection, transaction risk modeling, credit underwriting, portfolio monitoring and loss mitigation (fraud) to support new payment products. This individual will also design experiments to understand the impact of customer experience when leveraging machine learning in complex risk strategy changes. This position requires a person who has experience with developing machine learning models and performing advanced analytics preferably in the risk domain.
We’d love to chat if you have:
Minimum 2 years of industry experience in data science and machine learning, preferably in risk, payments or financial services domain.
It is preferred this person has an advanced degree (M.S., PhD.) with 2+ years of experience or a Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years of experience, preferably in Statistics, Physical Sciences, Computer Science, Economics, Mathematics, or a related technical field
Strong track record of performing data analysis and statistical modeling using Python, SQL or similar tools
Good understanding of a wide range of Machine Learning techniques, tools, and methodologies with a demonstrated capability to apply them to a broad range of business problems and data sources
Machine learning techniques include clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural nets, anomaly detection etc.
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical experts, business partners, and executives
Comfortable with ambiguity and yet able to steer analytics projects toward clear business goals, testable hypotheses and action-oriented outcomes
Experience solving problems related to risk using data science and analytics
Experience working with cross functional teams including product, engineering and operations and leading organization-wide initiatives spanning multiple team
Ability to proactively find the pain points in the current process flows and make business suggestions that are sustainable and able to have long term impact by leveraging strategic thinking, and independently provide solutions to business problems with the solid technical skills and problem solving skills
The estimated salary range for this role is noted below for our San Jose based role. Our ranges for each role and job level are based on a variety of factors including candidate experience, expertise, and geographic location and may vary from the amounts listed above. The role is also eligible for a competitive benefits package that includes: medical, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, 401(k) retirement plan, flexible spending & health savings account, paid holidays, paid time off, and other company benefits.
San Jose pay range
$110,200—$132,100 USD
Let’s talk about benefits
100% paid employee health, dental, and vision plans (choose HMO, PPO, or HDHP)
HSA & FSA accounts
Life Insurance, Long & Short-term disability coverage
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
11+ Observed holidays and wellness days and flexible time off
Employee Stock Purchase Program with employee discounts
Wellness & Fitness initiatives
Employee recognition and referral programs
And much more
For positions that are in office we support a hybrid work environment with on-site and remote work days. Check out our LinkedIn Life Page for each location and discover BILL.
We live our culture and values every day
At BILL, we’re different by design—it's our culture. Our CEO is a trusted entrepreneur who lives our cultural values: Humble, Authentic, Passionate, Accountable, and Fun. People here love being their authentic selves, contributing unique experiences, sharing ideas, perspectives, and intellectual curiosity. We celebrate our diversity as the heart and soul of how we work, grow, and succeed together. Inspiring people with meaningful career experiences they love really does make the dream work and our successes just keep getting better. There’s no limit to what we can build and where we can go from here. We’d love you to join us.

BILL is proudly an Equal Opportunity Employer where everyone is welcome. Our innovation and technology are inspired by an inclusive culture unlike any other. Everyone brings a different personal story and perspective and this diverse mix of minds, backgrounds, and experiences is where our greatest ideas come from. We welcome people of all races, ethnicities, ages, religions, abilities, genders, and sexual orientations to make us an even more vibrant company. We want everyone to bring their authentic selves here, to share our values, shape our vision, drive innovation, and become part of a culture we celebrate every day.
Our promise to our candidates is to be transparent, diligent, and engaging while guiding individuals through each step of our hiring process. At BILL we strive to achieve an inclusive and positive candidate experience that aligns with our core values and focuses on diversity.
If you require a reasonable accommodation for your application, interviews, or another aspect of the hiring process, please contact interviewaccommodations@hq.bill.com.
BILL Culture:
Humble - We check our egos at the door. We are curious. We listen, accept feedback.
Authentic - We earn and show trust by being real—embracing our authentic selves.
Passionate - We care deeply about each other and our customers.
Accountable - We are duty-bound to each other, our customers, and society.
Fun - We wrap it all together by building connections and enjoying time spent together.",3.6,Bill.com,"San Jose, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2006.0,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,121.0,CA,18.0,1,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$133K
/yr","Total Wine & More is seeking a Senior Data Scientist with expertise in all aspects of data science and data analysis, to join our Data Services team. The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for leveraging advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive business value across all of Total Wine & More’s departments. We are looking for an individual who is skilled in all facets of the Analytics Lifecycle, including data gathering, data analysis, variable creation & selection, model building & selection, and visualization. This individual will work closely with the business, software development and support teams, infrastructure, and security staff and will enjoy learning and problem-solving in a fast-paced environment. The Total Wine & More Data Services team is growing, and we are driving business value through technology across all aspects of our business. You will report to the Director of Data Science and Analytics.
You will
Use a wide range of advanced statistical models and machine learning to drive Total Wine & More business
Build and manage machine learning and forecasting models through all phases of development from design, through training, validation, deployment, monitoring and measurement
Scope technical solutions on large amounts of data that leverage data analysis and predictive modeling based off business needs
Integrate scalable solutions into necessary applications and data pipelines
Champion best practices in ML/AI domain across Total Wine & More. Communicate effectively with stakeholders of various tech skillsets about project implementation, results and evolutions of project
Be proactive and take ownership of the projects and tasks assigned
You will come with
Bachelor's degree from four-year College or university in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related field. Master’s or PhD preferred
4+ years of experience in data science, predictive analytics, econometrics or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
4+ years of experience in software engineering, data engineering, or related fields or 3+ years with Master’s degree
Strong background in Applied Mathematics and Statistics
Advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or related field) is a plus
Proven track record in building impactful solutions using predictive & prescriptive modeling
Experience in the use of machine learning, econometrics, predictive modeling
Experience in leveraging the cloud in the application of advanced analytics
Experienced with general programing, statistical languages, and deep learning packages used to manipulate data and build statistical and machine learning models at a large scale, such as Python, Spark, PyTorch, Tensorflow, Keras, SQL, and SQL-like query languages for NoSQL databases
Understanding of data science-related technology landscape, processes and design principles
Familiarity with data architecture, data engineering, data management, and data analysis tools and techniques
Passionate about data, data science, and insight generation
Familiar with retail, wholesale, planning and allocation systems, or supply chain operations, preferred
Strong analytic skills, attention to detail, ability to multi-task, troubleshoot and problem solve along with the ability to make recommendations based on analysis are extremely important
We offer
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Generous store discounts
Health care plans (medical, prescription, dental, vision)
401(k), HSA, FSA, Pre-tax commuter benefits
Disability & life insurance coverage
Paid parental leave
Pet insurance
Critical illness and accident insurance
Discounted home and auto insurance
College tuition assistance
Career development & product training
Consumer classes
& More!
Grow with us
Total Wine & More is the country's largest independent retailer of fine wine, beer and spirits, and we continue to grow our footprint year over year. Total Wine offers exciting and unique career opportunities across the country and in our corporate office. Our strength is our people. We have a commitment to training and career growth, all in an environment that values new ideas and teamwork. If you share our entrepreneurial spirit and a passion for providing best-in-class customer experience, take a moment to apply or learn more at www.TotalWine.com/About-Us/Careers!
The exempt compensation range for this position is $101,900 - $165,000. Compensation may vary based on a number of factors including, but not limited to, market location, job-related knowledge, skills and/or experience. Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation. Estimated salaries determined by third parties have not been validated by Total Wine & More.
Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation
Total Wine & More is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. Total Wine & More makes reasonable accommodations during all aspects of the employment process, including during the interview process. Total Wine & More is a Drug Free Workplace.
The information provided above indicates the general nature and level of work required of the position and is not a comprehensive list of all responsibilities or qualifications. Benefits list is only a highlight of some of the benefits offered to team members; eligibility for certain benefits apply.",3.4,Total Wine & More,"Bethesda, MD",5001 to 10000 Employees,1991.0,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,133.0,MD,33.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior Healthcare Data Scientist,"$152K
/yr","Job Description
Are you passionate about using data to take on business challenges? Do you have experience in healthcare specific data analytics and applied statistics? Are you looking for an opportunity to address interesting business questions in the life sciences and grow your skillset by working on a collaborative team? You might be the person we are looking for.

Our corporate data science, data engineering and product team is looking for a data scientist with experience in Healthcare Real-World Data (RWD), machine learning, statistics, and a real passion for addressing business needs through data analysis and solutions. You will work on a highly collaborative, centralized team of data scientists, engineers, and strategists to deliver analytical insights and data products that drive value and impact for our highest priority business needs. You’ll work side-by-side with internal partners across development, clinical, commercial, and general and administrative areas to develop creative solutions that contribute meaningfully to our business and patients.

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with a centralized team of data scientists/engineers/strategists and cross-functional partners to conceptualize, develop, and deploy data science solutions for highest priority business problems and to design and execute A/B tests to quantify the value of these solutions
Be the primary technical lead focused on creative use of diverse data sources to solve business problems, such as clinical operations data, Electronic Health Record (EHR), insurance claims data, and/or other provider and patient-level data
Build and deliver compelling data visualizations and outputs to communicate findings to technical collaborators, non-technical audiences, and business leaders
Participate in the broader data science community to stay current with methodology, software, and data development and availability
Bring an entrepreneurial and ethical mindset, openness, transparency, and collegiality to your work
Minimum Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Epidemiology, Health Economics, Computer Science, Clinical/Biomedical Informatics or a related computational and quantitative discipline, or a Master’s degree (scientific field of study) and 3+ years of relevant experience.
Domain knowledge in clinical data, Real-World Data (EHR, insurance claims, e.g. Clarivate DRG, MarketScan, IQVIA, TriNetX, Optum, Premier), and/or related data sources
Expertise in programming languages (e.g. Python, R, SQL, JavaScript), version control, and other data science related tools (e.g. D3, AWS, dbt)
Extensive experience with statistical/analytical methodologies and machine learning algorithms (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, feature selection/engineering, deep learning, time-series analysis, network analysis, hypothesis testing)
Comfortable working with both technical and non-technical staff in a fast-paced environment to come up with solutions/algorithms and create working prototypes
Ability to build and manage relationships with various cross-functional collaborators and stakeholders across the company
Exceptional communication skills and ability to present findings to non-technical audiences with effective data visualization approaches
Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge of the biopharma or healthcare industry
Experience with LLM prompt engineering and familiarity with creating LLM-based solutions and architectures such as retrieval-augmented generation
Experience with developing advanced data visualizations and dashboards (e.g. Dash, Streamlit, R Shiny and front-end frameworks such as Flask and Angular) in business settings
Familiarity with data product UX/UI design and testing
Flex Designation:
Hybrid-Eligible Or On-Site Eligible
Flex Eligibility Status:
In this Hybrid-Eligible role, you can choose to be designated as:
1. Hybrid: work remotely up to two days per week; or select
2. On-Site: work five days per week on-site with ad hoc flexibility.
Note: The Flex status for this position is subject to Vertex’s Policy on Flex @ Vertex Program and may be changed at any time.
Company Information
Vertex is a global biotechnology company that invests in scientific innovation.
Vertex is committed to equal employment opportunity and non-discrimination for all employees and qualified applicants without regard to a person's race, color, sex, gender identity or expression, age, religion, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, disability, veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, marital status, or any characteristic protected under applicable law. Vertex is an E-Verify Employer in the United States. Vertex will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.
Any applicant requiring an accommodation in connection with the hiring process and/or to perform the essential functions of the position for which the applicant has applied should make a request to the recruiter or hiring manager, or contact Talent Acquisition at ApplicationAssistance@vrtx.com",4.2,Vertex Pharmaceuticals,"Boston, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1989.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,152.0,MA,35.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Senior Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$253K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Provide guidance to junior analysts and data scientists
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modelling project
At least 5 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, capable of working independently in a dynamic, fast-paced environment, and delivering projects from end to end
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
Experience collaborating with cross-functional teams while managing and prioritizing multiple projects
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $176355 - $329333 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,253.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist II (REMOTE),"$110K
/yr","For more than 170 years, The Hanover has been committed to delivering on our promises and being there when it matters the most. We live our values every day, demonstrating we CARE through our values, ESG initiatives and IDE journey.

Our Data Science team is currently seeking a Data Scientist II in our Worcester, MA location or remote work arrangement.

This is a full time, exempt role.

POSITION OVERVIEW:
The Data Scientist II designs, implements, and evaluates advanced statistical models, machine learning algorithms, and tools for application in the business’s most complex issues. The Data Scientist builds econometric and statistical models for various problems inclusive of projections, classification, clustering, pattern analysis, sampling, simulations, and so forth.

In this capacity, the Data Scientist II researches new ways for predicting and modeling end-user behavior as well as investigating data summarization and visualization techniques for conveying key applied analytics findings.

The Data Scientist II also performs ad-hoc data mining and exploratory statistics tasks on very large data sets related to the business’s strategies. The Data Scientist II will also prepare reports and presentations for senior data scientists and relevant stakeholders that will give insights for departmental as well as business-wide decision making.

IN THIS ROLE, YOU WILL:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Collaborate with product management and the LOB’s to understand company needs and devise possible solutions
Keep up-to-date with the latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision-makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and solution design
Usually works with minimum supervision, conferring with business partners on data/reporting requests
Documents the development and the design of the solutions built
Conducts reviews for the work of less senior team members.
Handle multiple projects simultaneously
Begin to work on more complex projects with minimal supervision.
WHAT YOU NEED TO APPLY:
Minimum of 4+ years of related experience and a bachelor’s degree, Master’s, or Ph.D. degree is preferred.
Must be eligible to work in the US without requiring sponsorship now or in the future (IE: US Citizen or green card required)
Ability to drive larger more complicated projects independently
Insurance experience is preferred
TECHNICAL SKILLS:
Practical (Advanced) experience with R, and/or Python
(Advanced) SQL, Data Management, and Documentation
Experience with ETL (Azure Data Factory, SSIS, etc.)
Experience in various modeling techniques
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience in data mining and complex statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Experience in more complex Machine Learning techniques such as deep learning, neural networks, natural language processing.
Model Governance, Metadata Management
Experience with unstructured data and document-based systems (NoSQL, Data Lakes)
Azure DataBricks experience is preferred.
Experience with Agile data science life cycle management and related concepts like MLOps for Continuous deployment, integration, quality, and delivery is preferred.
CAREER DEVELOPMENT:
It’s not just a job, it’s a career, and we are here to support you every step of the way. We want you to be successful and fulfilled. Through on-the-job experiences, personalized coaching and our robust learning and development programs, we encourage you – at every level – to grow and develop.

BENEFITS:
We offer comprehensive benefits to help you be healthy, build financial security, and balance work and home life. At The Hanover, you’ll enjoy what you do and have the support you need to succeed.

Benefits include:
Medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance
401K with a company match
Tuition reimbursement
PTO
Company paid holidays
Flexible work arrangements
Cultural Awareness Day in support of IDE
On-site medical/wellness center (Worcester only)
Click here for the full list of Benefits
EEO statement:
The Hanover values diversity in the workplace and among our customers. The company provides equal opportunity for employment and promotion to all qualified employees and applicants on the basis of experience, training, education, and ability to do the available work without regard to race, religion, color, age, sex/gender, sexual orientation, national origin, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information, ancestry or any other status protected by law.

Furthermore, The Hanover Insurance Group is committed to providing an equal opportunity workplace that is free of discrimination and harassment based on national origin, race, color, religion, gender, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, marital status, veteran status, genetic information or any other status protected by law.”

As an equal opportunity employer, Hanover does not discriminate against qualified individuals with disabilities. Individuals with disabilities who wish to request a reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, or to perform essential job functions, should contact us at: HRServices@hanover.com and include the link of the job posting in which you are interested.

Privacy Policy:
To view our privacy policy and online privacy statement, click here.

Applicants who are California residents: To see the types of information we may collect from applicants and employees and how we use it, please click here.",4.1,The Hanover Insurance Group,"Worcester, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1852.0,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,110.0,MA,172.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist - Cybersecurity,"$108K
/yr","Cybersecurity is seeking a Sr Data Scientist to join the Cybersecurity Artificial Intelligence team. This position will use machine learning, data engineering, automation, and Data Science principles to solve enterprise problems and advance our mission. This role is a key contributor to our team and will be directly responsible for design, development, deployment, and automation. The successful candidate will work closely with key stakeholders to rapidly advance the use of traditional and generative AI for cybersecurity. We are seeking candidates with passion to lead the implementation of cutting-edge technology and methodologies while establishing strong partnerships with data owners and stakeholders across Cybersecurity. The Sr Data Scientist will have demonstrated experience as a problem-solver, working alongside IT and business partners, and act as a trusted consultant.

Key Responsibilities and Duties
Structure business problems and drive viable, data-driven hypotheses in collaboration with business partners
Ability to skillfully enumerate a business problem, quantify its impact, size relevant data, and document applicable sources
Devise, develop and disseminate actionable intelligence from disparate data sources using advanced data analytics tools and techniques
Proficiency in evaluating and comparing data science models using a diverse range of metrics to enable informed decision-making and optimal model selection
Ability to perform in depth data analysis including but not limited to -
Machine Learning
Generative AI,
RAG frameworks, & NLP Token and sequence classification
Classification Optimization
Time Series analysis
Pattern Recognition
Able to work proactively and take initiative without being specifically directed Ability to extract & aggregate data from disparate data sources
Ability to communicate complex topics and visualize data in an easy-to-understand manner when presenting to management
Educational Requirements
Bachelor's Degree Required
Work Experience
3+ Years Required; 5+ Years Preferred
Physical Requirements
Physical Requirements: Sedentary Work

Career Level
7IC
Required Skills

3+ years of experience in a Data Science or Data Engineering related role
2+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Professional experience using at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)

Preferred Skills

3+ years of experience developing solutions in Python
Experience in building Generative AI solutions for business problems
3+ years of experience developing solutions using SQL
2+ years of experience with at least one cloud provider (AWS, GCP, Azure, etc.)
1+ year of experience in Cybersecurity
1+ year of experience in Splunk SPL
Experience with modern data engineering utilizing APIs
Experience applying agile SDLC
M.S. or PhD in a Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics (STEM) or Economics related field of study
Related Skills
Business Acumen, Data Preprocessing, Data Science, Innovation, Machine Learning, Market/Industry Dynamics, Predictive Modeling, Programming, Statistics
Anticipated Posting End Date:
2024-11-15
Base Pay Range: $88,400/yr. - $126,800/yr.
Actual base salary may vary based upon, but not limited to, relevant experience, time in role, base salary of internal peers, prior performance, business sector, and geographic location. In addition to base salary, the competitive compensation package may include, depending on the role, participation in an incentive program linked to performance (for example, annual discretionary incentive programs, non-annual sales incentive plans, or other non-annual incentive plans).
_____________________________________________________________________________________________________
Company Overview
TIAA is the leading provider of financial services in the academic, research, medical, cultural and government fields. We offer a wide range of financial solutions, including investing, banking, advice and education, and retirement services.
Benefits and Total Rewards
The organization is committed to making financial well-being possible for its clients, and is equally committed to the well-being of our associates. That’s why we offer a comprehensive Total Rewards package designed to make a positive difference in the lives of our associates and their loved ones. Our benefits include a superior retirement program and highly competitive health, wellness and work life offerings that can help you achieve and maintain your best possible physical, emotional and financial well-being. To learn more about your benefits, please review our
Benefits Summary
.
Equal Opportunity
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment regardless of age, race, color, national origin, sex, religion, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other protected status.

Accessibility Support
TIAA offers support for those who need assistance with our online application process to provide an equal employment opportunity to all job seekers, including individuals with disabilities.
If you are a U.S. applicant and desire a reasonable accommodation to complete a job application please use one of the below options to contact our accessibility support team:
Phone: (800) 842-2755
Email:
accessibility.support@tiaa.org",3.7,TIAA,"Frisco, TX",10000+ Employees,1918.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,108.0,TX,106.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Spatial Omics","$129K
/yr","The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid

The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop analytical approaches as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up-to-date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal candidate will have a PhD degree in computer science, quantitative science, bioinformatics, data science, Genomic, Biostatistics, Biomedical Informatics, Engineering or related field experience and:

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Expertise in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Experience with containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments is a plus.

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-



PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-



COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Three years experience in scientific software or industry development/analysis. With Master's degree, one years experience required. With PhD, no experience required.

Preferred: With Master's degree 5 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration. With PhD, 3 years with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170805
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 103,000
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 129,000
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 155,000
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid",4.2,MD Anderson Cancer Center,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1941.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,83.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$161K
/yr","At Accenture Federal Services, nothing matters more than helping the US federal government make the nation stronger and safer and life better for people. Our 13,000+ people are united in a shared purpose to pursue the limitless potential of technology and ingenuity for clients across defense, national security, public safety, civilian, and military health organizations.
Join Accenture Federal Services to do the work you love in an inclusive, collaborative, and caring community, where you can be empowered to grow, learn and thrive through hands-on experience, certifications, industry training and more.
Join us to drive positive, lasting change that moves missions and the government forward!

Job Description:
Accenture Federal Services is seeking a data scientist who is excited about assessing problems, developing solutions, and solving national security related problems. Our team leverages technological advances for better performance in all mission areas—collection, analysis, and operations—while protecting against technological threats to the security of the customer's information. We are a cadre of information management, data science, and technology experts dedicated to revolutionizing the way we ""do data"", while upholding proper protection, accessibility, and release mandates. The objective of our efforts is to accelerate the development and application of data science capabilities – including artificial intelligence and machine learning – to the customer's core missions.
Here's what you need:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 7 years of experience; or
a Master's degree in computer science or related field and a minimum of 5 years of experience or equivalent work experience
5+ years experience as a Data Scientist or similar role
5+ years experience with machine learning or statistics
5+ years experience developing briefings, dashboards, reports, and other deliverables using data science tools and techniques
Knowledge of analytic methods and methodological tools such as: applied mathematics, computer programming, and/or visualization
Knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git, Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, and/or Unix commands
Bonus points if you have:
Proficiency in Python and other software/tools such as R, SQL, Git, Tableau
Experience with Python libraries such as Pandas, numpy, scikit-learn
Demonstrated experience working large volumes of data
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information
Experience working directly with customers to identify and develop functional requirements
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with Polygraph

What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture Federal Services has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture Federal Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.

Los Angeles County Information Only
If you live in or expect to work from Los Angeles County if hired for this position, please review below for important additional information.

Criminal history may have a direct, adverse, and negative relationship with some of the material job duties of this position. These include the duties and responsibilities listed in the job posting, as well as the abilities to adhere to company policies, exercise sound judgment, effectively manage stress and work safely and respectfully with others, exhibit trustworthiness, meet client expectations, standards, and accompanying requirements, and safeguard business operations and company reputation. Pursuant to the California Fair Chance Act, Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers, Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance, and San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture Federal Services is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture Federal Services and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you are being considered for employment opportunities with Accenture Federal Services and need an accommodation for a disability or religious observance during the interview process or for the job you are interviewing for, please speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture Federal Services or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",4.1,Accenture Federal Services,"Chantilly, VA",10000+ Employees,1989.0,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,161.0,VA,35.0,1,0,1,0,0
Senior AI Data Scientist,"$187K
/yr","Empowering players to create is an exciting future for the gaming industry. At Electronic Arts we have many examples of players creating content, whether it be a skateboard park in Skate or fantastical mansions in the Sims 4. The future definitely has our players being more empowered to create with their imagination being the only limit.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to help shape the future of content creation and gameplay with AI. If you have the right expertise and are interested we want to hear from you!
As a Senior AI Data Scientist you will:
Build, fine-tune and implement AI and machine learning models to solve challenging problems
Ensure AI and machine learning production pipelines are scalable, repeatable and cloud agnostic
Apply current and emerging techniques in deep learning, natural language processing and other machine learning areas
Collect, clean, manage, analyze and visualize large sets of data using multiple data platforms, tools and technique
Work in partnership with game teams to integrate AI solutions into products and services.
Optimize and fine-tune AI models for performance and scalability. Analyze and interpret data to extract meaningful insights and improve AI models.
Document and present findings and solutions to stakeholders.
Desired qualifications and experience:
A minimum of 3+ years of experience in data science
PhD or MSc in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related field
Strong expertise in deep learning, fluent in Python and SQL
Expertise in automating machine learning models and building end to end products
Experience with devops tools and principles (Git, CI/CD, Docker)
Effective within Cloud environments (GCP, AWS)
Understanding of containerization and orchestration technologies (Docker, Kubernetes, etc.
Ceci ne s’applique pas au Québec.

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

The base salary ranges listed below are for the defined geographic market pay zones in these locations. If you reside outside of these locations, a recruiter will advise on the range and benefits for your specific location.

EA has listed the base salary ranges it in good faith expects to pay applicants for this role in the locations listed, as of the time of this posting. Pay offered will be determined based on numerous relevant business and candidate factors including, for example, education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, geographic location, and business or organizational needs.



BASE SALARY RANGES

California (depending on location e.g. Los Angeles vs. Sacramento):
º $161,100 - $239,700 USD Annually
New York (depending on location e.g. Manhattan vs. Buffalo):
º $142,900 - $239,700 USD Annually
Jersey City, NJ :
º $187,400 - $239,700 USD Annually
Colorado (depending on location e.g. Denver vs. Colorado Springs):
º $153,100 - $206,200 USD Annually
Washington (depending on location e.g. Seattle vs. Spokane):
º $142,900 - $230,000 USD Annually
British Columbia (depending on location e.g. Vancouver vs. Victoria):
º $133,400 - $193,200 CAN Annually

Base salary is just one part of the overall compensation at EA. In the US, we offer a package of benefits including paid time off (3 weeks per year to start), 80 hours per year of sick time, 16 paid company holidays per year, 10 weeks paid time off to bond with baby, medical/dental/vision insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, and 401(k) to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity. For British Columbia, we offer a package of benefits including vacation (3 weeks per year to start), 10 days per year of sick time, paid top-up to EI/QPIP benefits up to 100% of base salary when you welcome a new child (12 weeks for maternity, and 4 weeks for parental/adoption leave), extended health/dental/vision coverage, life insurance, disability insurance, retirement plan to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity.

Electronic Arts creates next-level entertainment experiences that inspire players and fans around the world. Here, everyone is part of the story. Part of a community that connects across the globe. A place where creativity thrives, new perspectives are invited, and ideas matter. A team where everyone makes play happen.",4.1,Electronic Arts,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1982.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,187.0,WA,42.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,WA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Astronomical Data Scientist II,"$96K
/yr","Astronomical Data Scientist II
The Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is a multi-mission science operations center for finding stars and galaxies in the universe. Our world-class astronomical research center is based on the Johns Hopkins University Homewood campus in Baltimore, Maryland. Learn more about our missions - https://www.stsci.edu/what-we-do.
Description:
The Data Management Division (DMD) at the Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) is seeking an astronomical data scientist to support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST). MAST is the public data archive for more than 20 missions spanning more than 30 years. The DMD is responsible for a multi-petabyte astronomical data archive that maintains Hubble Space Telescope (HST), James Webb Space Telescope (JWST), Kepler, GALEX, TESS, and the future Nancy Grace Roman Space Telescope (Roman) Mission data.
Job Summary:
This candidate will lead archive activities and science data exploration related to large scale astronomical dataset, provide scientific guidance on catalog development efforts and support the Mikulski Archive for Space Telescopes (MAST) data products, tools, and interfaces.
This position can support hybrid work. This position can support hybrid work. Candidates must reside in or be willing to relocate to our local market. (MD, DE, VA, PA, DC & WV). Relocation assistance provided.
This position requires US Citizenship or Permanent Residence in order to meet ITAR requirements.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Regular:
Participate in the design and development of cloud-based solutions for storing, processing and managing astronomical catalogs and services that support community usage of catalogs
Maintain and support mission source catalogs such as Roman Source Catalog(s) to ensure the integrity, accessibility, and security of astronomical datasets.
Participate in cloud tool development for massive catalog dataset exploration
Support catalog data searching across multiple archive centers
Answer help desk questions from scientific users, especially for those related to astronomical catalogs
Requirements:
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in astronomy or astrophysics
Expertise (minimum of three years or equivalent knowledge level) in the scientific use of catalogs
Experience in Python scripting, including the use of common Python-based astronomy packages
Familiarity with AWS Cloud related tools/services
Effective communication skills and the ability to describe astronomical data to a broad science community
Ability to maintain effective working relationships with other scientific, technical, and administrative staff
Ability to analyze and solve problems independently, as well as work collaboratively and communicate effectively with multi-disciplinary teams and leadership
Preferred Qualifications:
Expertise in one (or both) of the following fields of study:
Extragalactic astrophysics
Time domain and multi-messenger (TDAMM) astrophysics
Experience working with and analyzing/processing massive catalogs
Experience with Git or other similar software version control tools
Experience applying machine learning algorithms/tools to produce/analyze astronomical catalogs
Experience with database SQL scripts
Required Education:
Ph.D. in Astronomy or equivalent field.
NOTE: Substitution of additional relevant education or experience for stated qualifications may be considered.
Salary range is $86,000 - $106,000.
Compensation is commensurate with education and experience. Our excellent benefits include:
Employer retirement contribution – direct STScI contribution of 10% of your salary from your first day
12 days sick leave, up to 24 days’ vacation, and 10 paid holidays
Flexible work schedule with healthy work/life balance
Comprehensive medical/dental/vision/prescription plans, and more!
TO APPLY: Please upload a resume, cover letter and online application using this link: Astronomical Data Scientist II
Applications received by 10/30/2024 will receive full consideration. Applications received after this date will be considered until the position is filled.
Explore all career opportunities at www.stsci.edu/opportunities
STScI offers a flexible and welcoming workspace for all. STScI embraces the diversity of our staff as a strategic priority in creating a first-rate community. We strongly encourage women, ethnic minorities, veterans, and disabled individuals to apply for these opportunities. Veterans, disabled individuals, or wounded warriors needing assistance with the employment process can contact us at careers@stsci.edu EOE/AA/M/F/D/V.
As a leader in the astronomical community, AURA is committed to diversity and inclusion. AURA develops and supports programs that advance our organizational commitment to diversity, broaden participation, and encourage the advancement of diversity throughout the workforce www.aura-astronomy.org/diversity.asp
As a recipient of U.S. Government funding, AURA is considered a government contractor subject to Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action regulations. As an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer, AURA and all of the centers do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity/gender identity expression, lawful political affiliations, veteran status, disability, and any other legally protected status under applicable federal, state, and local equal opportunity laws. The statements below, as well as the requests for self-identification, are required under these regulations. We encourage your participation in meeting these federal reporting requirements for protection and assisting us in our record-keeping and reporting. Your responses are kept strictly confidential.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.5,"Assn of Univ for Res in Astronomy, Inc.","Baltimore, MD",1001 to 5000 Employees,1957.0,Company - Private,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,MD,67.0,1,0,0,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$103K
/yr","Overview:
In today’s rapidly evolving technology landscape, an organization’s data has never been a more important aspect in achieving mission and business goals. Our data exploitation experts work with our clients to support their mission and business goals by creating and executing a comprehensive data strategy using the best technology and techniques, given the challenge.

At Steampunk, our goal is to build and execute a data strategy for our clients to coordinate data collection and generation, to align the organization and its data assets in support of the mission, and ultimately to realize mission goals with the strongest effectiveness possible.

For our clients, data is a strategic asset. They are looking to become a facts-based, data-driven, customer-focused organization. To help realize this goal, they are leveraging visual analytics platforms to analyze, visualize, and share information. At steampunk you will design and develop solutions to high-impact, complex data problems, working with the best and data practitioners around.
Contributions:
We are looking for an Associate Data Scientist to work with our existing team of Data Architects and Developers to develop strategies, create ML/AI solutions, and deliver results. We are looking for a more than just an ""Associate Data Scientist"", but a technologist with excellent communication and customer service skills and a passion for data and problem solving.
Experience modeling on structured and unstructured data sets
Experience with exploratory data analysis
Experience in feature engineering
Experience in data visualization
Experience with Deep Learning methodology and state of the art libraries
Knowledge of data collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information and make decisions
Support an Agile software development lifecycle
Qualifications:
Ability to hold a position of public trust with the US government.
0-5 years industry experience developing ML/AI solutions and a passion for solving complex problems.
0-5 years direct experience in Data Modeling and Data Solution Development
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information systems, engineering, business, or a scientific or technical discipline
Demonstrated experience manipulating structured and unstructured data for analysis
Strong programming skills in SQL, Python, R, Scala, Java, or similar language
Experience using Python to manipulate large data sets
Demonstrated experience with TensorFlow, Keras, or other Deep Learning tools and frameworks
Demonstrated experience in big data systems including Hadoop, Spark, Scala
Data visualization skills in Tableau, Power BI, D3, ArcGIS, or similar
Knowledge of DBOps and MLOps framework is a plus
Experience with Solr, Elasticsearch, or similar tool is a plus
About steampunk:
Steampunk relies on several factors to determine salary, including but not limited to geographic location, contractual requirements, education, knowledge, skills, competencies, and experience. The projected compensation range for this position is $75,000 to $130,000. The estimate displayed represents a typical annual salary range for this position. Annual salary is just one aspect of Steampunk’s total compensation package for employees. Learn more about additional Steampunk benefits here.

Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.3,Steampunk,"El Paso, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2003.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,TX,21.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist II - Operations Analytics,"$107K
/yr","Description

A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions which determine the source of disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety.

In North America we have more than 5,000 team members across 11 sites or subsidiaries, including Salt Lake City-based BioFire Diagnostics and one subsidiary in Montreal, Canada. Come be a part of our team and our mission as a Data Scientist!

bioMérieux - Salt Lake City is looking for a talented and engaged Data Scientist to play an integral role in the support of cutting-edge, life-saving medical devices. You will be joining a team that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and a healthy work life balance.
The candidate will be knowledgeable in various aspects of data analytics, and responsible for building and maintaining analytic dashboards, developing robust data pipelines, and performing complex mathematical and/or statistical analysis for projects to support the BioFire manufacturing departments. The candidate must have strong analytic and programming skills. The candidate will be embedded in the Data Science department but will have close collaboration with the Software Development, Production, and Engineering teams at bioMérieux. Therefore, the candidate must have strong communication skills and desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.

Studies and Experience:
A minimum of a B.S. in a quantitative discipline: Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Computational Biology
2+ years industry experience as a data scientist, mathematician, or statistician, or 0 years industry experience with a M.S. or PhD in a quantitative discipline.
Programming proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, MATLAB, C++, C#, or SQL

Skills and Qualifications:
Good communication, writing, and presentation skills
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Practical experience in any of the following: data visualization, data analytics platforms (e.g., Tableau), data pipelines, data cleaning and processing, probability, statistics, machine learning, image analysis, linear algebra, and optimization methods",4.0,bioMerieux SA,"Salt Lake City, UT",10000+ Employees,1963.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,107.0,UT,61.0,1,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$106K
/yr","Operations Analyst – Data Scientist
Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.2,IFC Systems Corporation,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1956.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,106.0,DC,68.0,1,0,0,1,0
Sr Data Scientist,"$129K
/yr","Role : Sr Data Scientist
Location : Dallas TX ( Hybrid role - In office REQIUIRED )
Overview: Blue Yonder is a Leading AI-driven Global Supply Chain Solutions Software Product Company and one of Glassdoor’s “Best Places to Work”
Seeking an expert individual that has a strong technical foundation with the additional ability to be hands-on with the broader engineering team as part of the development/deployment cycle, and deep knowledge of industry best practices, Data Science and Machine Learning experience with the ability to implement them working with both the platform, and the product teams.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Technical Environment
Operate within a sophisticated technical landscape, utilizing Python 3.* and frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, BigQuery, Apache Beam,
Apache Spark, Kubeflow, Dataflow, Kubernetes, Kafka, Pub/Sub, and Flask. Our application architecture follows a scalable, resilient, reactive, event-driven
, and secure multi-tenant Microservices design, hosted on Google and Azure Cloud.
Responsibilities:
As the Sr Data Scientist, you will:
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to execute data enrichment, cleansing routines, and feature selection.
Evaluate candidate models, select the final model, and report on test performance.
Ensure proper runtime deployment of models and implement runtime monitoring for continued model stability.
Drive collaboration with product, sales, and engineering teams to shape the final solution.
Utilize data to understand patterns, formulate and test hypotheses, and iterate as needed.
Play a key role in preparing sales materials and estimating hardware requirements.
Lead client meetings, both online and onsite, to discuss new and current functionality.
If you are a seasoned data scientist with a passion for leadership, ready to guide a team in implementing impactful initiatives, we invite you to lead innovation at Blue Yonder.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or any other related field is required
Min 7 years of experience with strong foundation in data science and deep learning principles.
Proficient in Python programming with a solid understanding of data structures.
Experience with frameworks and libraries like Pandas, NumPy, Keras, TensorFlow, Jupyter, Matplotlib, etc.
Expertise in a database query language, preferably SQL.
Familiarity with Big Data technologies like Snowflake, Apache Beam/Spark/Flink, and Databricks.
Solid experience with major cloud platforms, preferably Azure and/or GCP.
Knowledge of modern software development tools and best practices, including Git, Github Actions, Jenkins, Docker, Jira, etc.
Familiarity with deep learning, time series, NLP, reinforcement learning, and combinatorial optimization.
Proven experience in team leadership, mentoring junior data scientists in an official or unofficial capacity.
Desired knowledge of Kafka, Redis, Cassandra, etc.
LI-LOCAL
LI-SR1
-
The salary range for this position is $114,103.81 - $143,896.18
The salary range information provided, reflects the anticipated base salary range for this position based on current national data. Minimums and maximums may vary based on location. Individual salary will be commensurate with skills, experience, certifications or licenses and other relevant factors. In addition, this role will be eligible to participate in either the annual performance bonus or commission program, determined by the nature of the position.
At Blue Yonder, we care about the wellbeing of our employees and those most important to them. This is reflected in our robust benefits package and options that includes:
Comprehensive Medical, Dental and Vision
401K with Matching
Flexible Time Off
Corporate Fitness Program
A variety of voluntary benefits such as; Legal Plans, Accident and Hospital Indemnity, Pet Insurance and much more
At Blue Yonder, we are committed to a workplace that genuinely fosters inclusion and belonging in which everyone can share their unique voices and talents in a safe space. We continue to be guided by our core values and are proud of our diverse culture as an equal opportunity employer. We understand that your career search may look different than others, and embrace the professional, personal, educational, and volunteer opportunities through which people gain experience.
Our Values

If you want to know the heart of a company, take a look at their values. Ours unite us. They are what drive our success – and the success of our customers. Does your heart beat like ours? Find out here:
Core Values
Diversity, Inclusion, Value & Equity (DIVE)
is our strategy for fostering an inclusive environment we can be proud of. Check out Blue Yonder's inaugural
Diversity Report
which outlines our commitment to change, and our
video
celebrating the differences in all of us in the words of some of our associates from around the world.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.",4.1,Blue Yonder,"Dallas, TX",5001 to 10000 Employees,1985.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,129.0,TX,39.0,1,0,1,0,0
Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine,"$128K
/yr","Job Description
Grow your career at Cedars-Sinai!
Data is vital to advance clinical knowledge across a spectrum of medical and surgical fields. Are you ready to transform data discoveries into valuable information, which will empower tomorrow's medicine?
Dr. Jason Moore is looking for a Research Data Scientist to join a diverse team!
To learn more about the department - Computational Biomedicine | Cedars-Sinai
The Research Data Scientist participates in biomedical research projects using programming, data-mining, statistics, machine learning, and visualization techniques to develop, evaluate, and/or apply algorithms and software for data analysis.
Responsibilities include querying databases, data processing, supervised and unsupervised machine learning, deploying production models, and communication of scientific findings via peer-reviewed publications and scientific conferences. Writes clean, performant, reusable code managed on GitHub to perform repeatable analyses and to train and deploy models to multiple environments.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Assists with the development, evaluation, and/or application of computational and statistical methods including artificial intelligence and machine learning algorithms and software for the analysis of biomedical data.
Assists with the presentation and communication of scientific results through laboratory meetings, scientific conferences, and peer-reviewed publications.
Creates database-to-deployment pipelines for models using the necessary programming languages (primarily R, Python, SQL).
Creates sustainable data science infrastructure and adheres to data analysis/machine learning best practices.
Performs exploratory data analysis to gauge the need for or appropriateness of advanced analytical methods.
Works with senior or lead data scientists and principal investigators to identify areas where data science can best be applied to answer biomedical research questions.
Tests and validates code to ensure robustness of data applications with version control through GitHub.
Performs all other duties as assigned.

Qualifications
Educational Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline required.

Master's Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied mathematics, econometrics, statistics, engineering, physics, or related discipline preferred.
Experience:
2 years of professional experience in healthcare or pharmaceutical industries working with biomedical data.
2 years - Experience in programming at an intermediate skill level with a high-level programming language such as R or Python. College projects may be acceptable.
2 years - Experience in programming at a basic to intermediate proficiency level in SQL preferred
Experience in biomedical machine learning is preferred
Physical Demands:
Standing, Walking, Sitting, Lifting 50 lbs. Carrying 50 lbs. Pushing 50 lbs. Pulling 50 lbs. Reaching, Handling, Grasping, Feeling, Talking, Hearing, Repetitive Motions, Eye/Hand/Foot Coordination

Req ID : 5630
Working Title : Research Data Scientist - Computational Biomedicine
Department : Computational Biomedicine
Business Entity : Cedars-Sinai Medical Center
Job Category : Information Technology
Job Specialty : Bus Intelligence/Reporting
Overtime Status : EXEMPT
Primary Shift : Day
Shift Duration : 8 hour
Base Pay : $94,764 - $161,096",3.9,CEDARS-SINAI,California,10000+ Employees,1902.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,128.0,California,122.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","The Bioanalytics Systems & Technologies Group focuses on driving analytics to take advantage of vast and rapidly expanding biological datasets to address national security needs. The Group’s efforts include developing software architectures and systems, bioinformatics tools, and AI algorithms to further the nation’s efforts in chemical and biological defense, biosecurity, public and global health and warfighter performance.

Job Description

Our group is seeking a highly motivated data scientist to join our diverse and multi-functional team. As a Technical Staff member, you may be responsible for contributing to technical solutions as well as working with the sponsor, understanding their needs, translating them to a technical roadmap, and leading multidisciplinary teams to bring that to fruition. We are looking for an individual who has a strong background a technical field and who will further the Group’s mission by developing and applying state-of -the-art data science technologies that can help us address key national stakeholder needs. Example areas of effort include, but are not limited to, assessing the AI data readiness of systems, prototyping reference data science architectures, and leveraging multi-omics, clinical, and imaging data to provide insights for therapeutic suitability for a range of diseases. As a Technical Staff member, you will be a principal investigator for projects, lead teams, define research plans, and provide technical and management oversight.

Requirements

Ph.D. in Data Science, Mathematics, Physics, Computational Biology, Biomedical Engineering, or related scientific field or equivalent experience in technical analysis. In lieu of a Ph.D., a master’s degree with 5+ years of directly related experience will be considered.
Demonstrated ability to derive actionable information from multi-modal data.
Ability to work collaboratively and lead highly interdisciplinary teams.
Demonstrated skills in scientific writing, as well as development and clear presentation of technical materials to a wide spectrum of technical and non-technical audiences.
Occasional travel (<10%) with optional opportunities for travel.

At MIT Lincoln Laboratory, our exceptional career opportunities include many outstanding benefits to help you stay healthy, feel supported, and enjoy a fulfilling work-life balance. Benefits offered to employees include:
Comprehensive health, dental, and vision plans
MIT-funded pension
Matching 401K
Paid leave (including vacation, sick, parental, military, etc.)
Tuition reimbursement and continuing education programs
Mentorship programs
A range of work-life balance options
... and much more!
Please visit our Benefits page for more information. As an employee of MIT, you can also take advantage of other voluntary benefits, discounts and perks.
Selected candidate will be subject to a pre-employment background investigation and must be able to obtain and maintain a Secret level DoD security clearance.
MIT Lincoln Laboratory is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran status, disability status, or genetic information; U.S. citizenship is required.

Requisition ID: 41544",4.4,MIT Lincoln Laboratory,"Lexington, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1951.0,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,MA,73.0,0,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$184K
/yr","We are the Web and Work Experiences team within M365 Core, focused on creating the best AI Copilot Web and Work Experiences for commercial users. Our team develops engaging, modern chat solutions for information workers and enterprise users, delivering exceptional Web and Work Copilot experiences. To help us reach our goals and collaborate with key partners in design, research, product management, and data science, we are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to shape the future of M365 Copilot.

In this role as a Senior Data Scientist you will have the opportunity to work with teams across Microsoft and globally, developing innovative AI solutions for enterprise users across all commercial platforms within Microsoft. You’ll contribute to components integrated into applications across the Microsoft 365 ecosystem, spanning both desktop and mobile platforms. If you are passionate about building scalable, fault-tolerant services and developing components that are accessible and inclusive of all users, we encourage you to apply for this exciting opportunity!

Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
We are seeking a talented and motivated Data Scientist with a strong Data Scientist with a passion for analyzing large scale data to identify insights to grow business and improve user experience. In this role, you will have the opportunity to collaborate with teams across Microsoft, leverage state-of-the-art technology and contribute to exciting products like Copilot.
Build a solid understanding of the business and the metrics that drive performance
Process and analyze big data using Statistical, Machine Learning modeling, to identify opportunities, patterns, pain points in users’ journey and provide insights to the leadership teams to help in driving user experience and product growth.
Research, propose and implement innovative solutions to enhance our tools, processes, and analytics capabilities.
Collaborate with PMs, data scientists, developers and partner teams.
Work with Product teams on roadmap, define KPI, forecast and measure product goals.
Embody our Culture and Values
Qualifications
Required Qualifications:
Doctorate in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 1+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
OR Master's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 3+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results)
o OR Bachelor's Degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Computer Science, or related field AND 5+ years data-science experience (e.g., managing structured and unstructured data, applying statistical techniques and reporting results))
o OR equivalent experience.
2+ years customer-facing, project-delivery experience, professional services, and/or consulting experience.
Other Requirements:

Ability to meet Microsoft, customer and/or government security screening requirements are required for this role. These requirements include but are not limited to the following specialized security screenings:
Microsoft Cloud Background Check: This position will be required to pass the Microsoft Cloud background check upon hire/transfer and every two years thereafter.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proven experience building and deploying machine learning models in real-world scenarios.
Experience working with both structured and unstructured data.
Excellent problem-solving and critical thinking abilities.
Strong communication skills with the ability to convey complex data concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Self-starter with the ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Continuous learning mindset and a passion for staying updated on the latest industry trends.
Ability to mentor and guide data analysts, providing technical oversight and ensuring best practices.
Solid analytical skills with a track record of solving complex problems.
Knowledge of big data tools such as Hadoop, Spark, or similar.
Experience in Chat bot domain, online service, app, or Web site for millions of users.
Data Science IC4 - The typical base pay range for this role across the U.S. is USD $117,200 - $229,200 per year. There is a different range applicable to specific work locations, within the San Francisco Bay area and New York City metropolitan area, and the base pay range for this role in those locations is USD $153,600 - $250,200 per year. Certain roles may be eligible for benefits and other compensation. Find additional benefits and pay information here: https://careers.microsoft.com/us/en/us-corporate-pay

Microsoft will accept applications for the role until November 1, 2024

#M365CORE #MSAI
Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.",4.2,Microsoft,United States,10000+ Employees,1975.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,184.0,United States,49.0,0,0,1,1,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$150K
/yr","About Us
Capital Bank N.A. is headquartered in Maryland, and has been serving our communities since 1999. We stand as a publicly traded company (NASDAQ: CBNK) with over $2 billion in assets. We offer commercial and consumer banking services to clients in Maryland, DC, and Northern Virginia, alongside two nation-wide lending brands; Capital Bank Home Loans and OpenSky, a credit card division that offers and services credit cards across all states. Our personalized approach to banking, paired with cutting-edge technology solutions and a comprehensive suite of products and services, fuels our growth, and enables us to support our customers at every stage in their financial journey.

OpenSky, a division of Capital Bank, NA, is an issuer of secured credit cards. We provide an entry-level credit product for consumers with a need to build or establish a credit history. The business is going through a phase of investment and rapid growth. OpenSky is a dynamic and entrepreneurial environment where you are limited only by your imagination. Being a data-driven business, OpenSky is building out a robust analytics team.

Come join a bank where our employees thrive and are engaged in meaningful work. For the last 4 out of 5 years, Capital Bank was named one of the ""Best Banks to Work For"" in the U.S. by American Banker.

Position Purpose
The Senior Data Scientist will build and maintain customer valuation models, as well as analyze and optimize customer acquisition and retention strategies. You will be constantly seeking opportunities to improve response rates, lower acquisition costs, reduce process cycle times and optimize revenue. This role will analyze the strategic landscape to find areas where we should be competing, including financial product offerings, service offerings and technologies.

Position Responsibilities
Build and maintain customer valuation models
Analyze customer segments for targeting purposes
Analyze current customer base for retention programs and cross-sell opportunities
Analyze business intelligence data and provide insights that drive potential new tactics and strategies
Partner across the organization and with external vendors to initiate, prioritize, scope, design and deliver new programs
Minimum Education and Experience
4 to 8 years work experience in an analytical environment
High aptitude for problem solving
Ability to connect analysis to business solutions
Proven analytical and critical thinking skills, with extreme attention to detail
Capacity to prioritize and manage multiple tasks simultaneously without sacrificing quality
Must be an entrepreneurial spirit and thinker, capable of working in a highly fluid, fast-paced environment
Technical Knowledge and Skills
“Data Fluent” with exposure or basic skills in SQL and / or other data tools
Advanced Excel user, including Pivot Tables, Lookups, Formulas, Graphs
Experience in building financial and valuation models
Education
Bachelor’s degree
Working Arrangements
This is a hybrid role expected to work in office Monday, Tuesday, Thursday, and Friday. You will be able to work remotely on Wednesday.
Compensation
Base Salary Range: $120,335 - $180,502 annually. Final determination of where you are at in the salary range is based on numerous factors such as relevant experience, skill set, education, and ability to meet qualifications within the job description.
Additional Compensation: This role will include a yearly annual target bonus based on individual performance.

Why Join Us?
Join a growing company with a culture that fosters an entrepreneurial spirit
Comprehensive benefits package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Company Paid Life Insurance, Disability Insurance, and more!
Company Contributions to your 401k - Regardless of your contribution
Employee Perks: Paid Parental Leave, Employee Recognition Program, Leadership Program, Tuition Reimbursement Program, Employee Bank Checking Account, and much more!
Generous Paid Time Off and Paid Holidays – Including Paid Charity Hours to support volunteer opportunities

Supporting Businesses. Helping People. Strengthening Communities.
Capital Bank, N.A. is an Affirmative Action, E-Verify, and Equal Opportunity Employer.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Capital Bank, N.A.","Rockville, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1999.0,Company - Public,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,150.0,MD,25.0,0,0,0,0,1
Operations Analyst – Data Scientist,"$101K
/yr","Job #:
req29933

Organization:
IFC

Sector:
Research & Quantitative Analysis

Grade:
GE

Term Duration:
3 years 0 months

Recruitment Type:
International Recruitment

Location:
Washington, DC,United States

Required Language(s):
English

Preferred Language(s):

Closing Date:
11/6/2024 (MM/DD/YYYY) at 11:59pm UTC


Description
IFC — a member of the World Bank Group — is the largest global development institution focused on the private sector in emerging markets. We work in more than 100 countries, using our capital, expertise, and influence to create markets and opportunities. Our mission is to leverage the power of the private sector to end extreme poverty and boost shared prosperity on a livable planet.
Within IFC, the Corporate Portfolio Management (CPM) Department, under the IFC Global Industries Vice President, is responsible for: (i) providing corporate and strategic level reports and reviews of IFC’s investment pipeline, program and portfolio, including granular data and historical and forward looking analytics of trends, risks, and profitability; (ii) providing thought leadership on how IFC can create a portfolio that balances profitability, risk and development impact; (iii) systematically capturing lessons of experience, with the goal of these being incorporated into IFC’s strategy and new investments, in order to improve IFC’s performance and outcomes; (iv) developing, and supporting the management of, portfolio systems as well as portfolio related knowledge tools.
To meet IFC’s 2030 ambitions as outlined in the capital increase commitments and the IFC 3.0 strategy, it is essential that IFC Operations possess the necessary tools, processes, and systems to ensure top-quality delivery to clients and maximize internal efficiencies. To achieve this, the CPM Core Operational Systems (CPMCO) vertical is dedicated to continuous business process improvement, operational systems, risk management, and change management. One of their flagship programs, Phoenix, aims to replace IFC’s legacy operations systems (iDesk/iPortal) for Project Processing and provide tools for business development and external client interactions. COSR is a unified program with a phased delivery approach, integrating Client Portal, Client Management, and Project Processing into one cohesive system.
CPMCO is seeking a self-starter, entrepreneurial data scientist to provide leadership in the adoption of AI/ML in IFC operations. As part of Phoenix, CPMCO aims to include AI/ML for various activities, such as self-paced guides, policy and procedures self-help, and content recommendations.
Note: If the selected candidate is a current Bank Group staff member with a Regular or Open-Ended appointment, s/he will retain his/her Regular or Open-Ended appointment. All others will be offered a 3-year term appointment.
Duties and Accountabilities
The data scientist role will play a critical entrepreneurial role and will be responsible for developing advanced analytics and deep insights from IFC operations, as CPMCO’s representative in the pan-CPM “Portfolio Intelligence” initiative, consisting of data scientists and analysts from all CPM units. Focus for this initiative is gathering and developing AI/ML solutions for data and analytics challenges both internally for CPM as well as for operations staff across IFC. As such, you will work closely with the network of data scientists in the World Bank group, IT department, process owners and business stakeholders to deliver impactful data science solutions. You will have the opportunity to do your best work every day and deliver disruptive innovation by tapping into new datasets, leveraging the latest cloud technologies, and being supported by a robust analytics and IT team.
Specifically, the position will:
Assist in Stakeholder Collaboration: Support senior team members in working with business and technical stakeholders to understand and formulate problem statements addressing their pain points,
Data Preparation and Analysis: Help in gathering, cleaning, and preprocessing structured and unstructured data for analysis and modeling purposes.
Model Development Support: Assist in developing, training, and evaluating machine learning models for analytics under the guidance of senior data scientists.
Feature Extraction and Engineering: Perform basic feature extraction and engineering tasks, such as tokenization, stemming, and vectorization, to prepare data for modeling.
Documentation and Reporting: Document methodologies, experiments, and results, and assist in preparing reports and visualizations to communicate findings.
Learning and Development: Stay updated with the latest advancements in text analytics and NLP and participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance skills.
Ad Hoc Analysis and Support: Handle ad hoc queries and provide support for various analytics tasks as needed, including user testing and basic application maintenance.
Selection Criteria
Candidates should be professionals with experience in data science skills and technical knowledge of portfolio and asset management related topics, ideally in the private sector. The candidate should meet the following criteria:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering or related field. Master’s degree would be preferred, as well as equivalent combination of education (e.g. Bachelors in Computer science disciplines and a Master’s in business (e.g., Business Administration, Finance, Economics).
Minimum of 2-3 years prior experience working with text analytics, natural language, and non-structure AI/ML analysis.
Demonstrated understanding of financial concepts, and application of data science in financial, corporate or investment operations domains.
Strong analytical skills to critically evaluate gathered data and ability to link or associate with other datasets and data needs.
Knowledge and experience in scripting and programming with Python, R and SQL.
Knowledge and experience with relevant technologies, preferably in cloud environment and tools provided within Azure and AWS.
Aptitude for learning and applying new technologies related to Data Science and Data Management.
Demonstrated self-starter with a high degree of responsiveness and proactivity.
Strong written and spoken communications skills in English; ability to communicate ideas clearly and confidently, articulate issues and recommend solutions.
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,101.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist IV,"$151K
/yr","About the company
Albertsons Companies is at the forefront of the revolution in retail. With a fixation on raising the bar with innovation and building belonging through our culture, our team is rallying our company around a unique purpose : to create joy around each table and inspire a healthier tomorrow for every community.
Albertsons Companies is one of the largest food and drug retailers in the United States, with over 2,200 stores in 34 states and the District of Columbia. Our well-known banners include Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen, Carrs, Kings Food Markets, and Balducci's Food Lovers Market. We support our stores with 22 distribution centers and 19 manufacturing plants.
Placing a premium on adaptability, safety and family well-being, our work model, Presence with a Purpose, offers a hybrid work environment between remote work and office time. A one-size-fits-all approach does not apply to everyone, and teams are empowered to make decisions best for them.
Bring your flavor
Building the future of food and well-being starts with you. Join our team and bring your best self to the table.
#bringyourflavor
#LI-ST4
What you will be doing

The Data Science team at Albertsons Companies is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work for the most transformational food and drug retailers in the United States. Albertsons operates over 2,300 stores under 19 well-known banners including Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen and Carrs. The company reported revenue of over $60 billion from over 34 million weekly shoppers and is the third largest private company in the country.
Data Science at Albertsons is inspired to build best in class customer experience and revolutionize the food and drug retail industry. We are looking for people who are excited in re-imagining the grocery experience by harnessing the power of AI and digital technologies. The Data Science team collects and relies on big data from existing stores and customer interactions at the 2300 nationwide stores and beyond. We are a highly driven team that applies data science to delight our customers, to improve store operations, to optimize supply chain and to proactively improve product lifecycle.
You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into business impacts on regular basis. You will work closely with other data scientists and business partners in identifying and defining data science projects, building machine learning algorithms and models on top of existing data platforms. The candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field with experience working with large data sets and applying data-driven decision making. A successful candidate will be both technically strong and business savvy, with a passion to make an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. You are a self-starter, smart yet humble, with a bias for action.
This position is primarily located in Pleasanton, California, but the candidate can work virtually from anywhere in the US. Our other affiliated teams are located in Phoenix, AZ; Boise, ID; Plano, TX; Vancouver, BC. We can offer additional location options upon request.
Main responsibilities

Collaborate with business teams to develop production grade machine learning models on large-scale datasets and improve customers’ overall shopping experience
Use machine learning to solve real problems, power the next generation experience for large scale applications.
Be a thought partner in the area of Experimentation and drive end to end process in designing and running complex experiments (A/B tests, Pre-Post, Interleaving), proactively see new opportunities.
Develop statistical and machine learning projects in experimentation using a wide variety of methodologies, including causal inference techniques, Bayesian framework
Identify key drivers for customer satisfaction and opportunities to delight customers through mining complex data
Apply machine learning to enhance recommendation engines and deliver personalized user experience on ecommerce website and loyalty mobile app
Build models and algorithms to fuel growth initiatives for Digital, Merchandising, Marketing and Loyalty teams
Apply predictive modeling techniques to optimize the forecasts for planning needs
Scale up prototypes and implement reliable automated production workflow for models
Collaborate with software development engineers to integrate models
The salary range is $131,600 to $171,080 annually. Starting salary will vary based on criteria such as location, experience, and qualifications. There may be flexibility for exceptional candidates.

What we are searching for

Master’s or PhD degree in quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, Math, Statistics or related fields
2+ years of industry experience in applying data science and modeling methodologies: regression model, survival model, ensemble modeling, NLP, recommendation algorithm, clustering, deep learning algorithm, experimental design (Multivariate/A-B testing) and nonparametric Bayesian modeling etc.
2+ years of experience and proficiency in SQL, Python and/or Spark-ML
2+ years of SQL development skills writing queries, transforming data, mining structured and unstructured data.
2+ years of hands-on experience in building data science solutions and production-ready systems on big data platforms such as Snowflake, Spark, Hadoop
Strong teamwork and communication skill
Ability to write production-level code in Python
Experience with Snowflake, Azure Databricks is a strong plus
What is it like at Albertsons?
Our 290,000 associates have a passion for great service and building lasting relationships with our customers. Through a companywide focus on innovation, we are continually enhancing our digital and product offerings, making it easy for customers to get what they need, wherever they are.
Albertsons is an Equal Opportunity Employer
This Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer, and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ethnicity, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, or on any other basis prohibited by law. Consistent with applicable state and local law, the Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We endeavor to make this site accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact us at 1-888-255-2269(option #4).",3.4,Albertsons Companies,"Pleasanton, CA",10000+ Employees,1939.0,Company - Public,Grocery Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,151.0,CA,85.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$112K
/yr","Career Area:
Business Technologies, Digital and Data
Job Description:
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.
Our common values and focus on inclusion and respect drive the decisions made by our company, teams and people. This is why we are committed to hiring and building diverse teams representative of the customers we serve globally. When you join our team, you can apply your unique life and job experiences and work in an environment where your ideas are heard, your contributions are celebrated, and your whole-self matters.
When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.
About Cat Financial
Cat Financial is a subsidiary of Caterpillar Inc., the world’s leading manufacturer of construction and mining equipment, off-highway diesel and natural gas engines, industrial gas turbines and diesel-electric locomotives. For more than 40 years, Cat Financial has provided a wide range of financing solutions to customers and Cat® dealers for machines, engines, Solar® gas turbines, genuine Cat parts and services. Headquartered in Nashville, Tennessee, Cat Financial serves customers globally with offices and subsidiaries located throughout North and South America, Asia, Australia, Europe and Africa. Visit cat.com to learn more about Cat Financial.
Role Definition
Performs analytical tasks and initiatives on large datasets to support data-driven business decisions, with focus on modeling of credit risk for loan origination and credit allowance.
Responsibilities
Support the team’s development, implementation and management of scoring, probability of default and loss given default data, models and methodologies utilized for the Allowance Process, as well as for Auto Decisioning processes globally.
Collect and curate data from various systems for use in model development, validation, and inference.
Use various data visualization technologies to produce reports and dashboards for management.
Conduct literature research on models and methodologies, capturing industry best practices and market and regulatory trends
Provide analytics expertise and promote innovation and process automation.
D e g r e e Requirement
A 4-year college or university degree in a business or quantitative discipline, preferably in Data Science, Statistics or Computer Science. A minimum of 3 years of relevant experience and an advanced degree in a quantitative discipline are strongly preferred
S k il l Descriptors
B us i n e s s Statistics: Knowledge of the statistical tools, processes, and practices to describe business results in measurable scales; ability to use statistical tools and processes to assist in making business decisions.
Understands basic statistical concepts such as sample size, various statistical distributions, joint and conditional probabilities, hypothesis testing, and goodness of fit tests.
Works with various statistical software tools.
Explains reasons for common statistical errors, misinterpretations, and misrepresentations.
A cc u racy and Attention to Detail: Understanding the necessity and value of accuracy; ability to complete tasks with high levels of precision.
Evaluates and makes contributions to best practices.
Processes large quantities of detailed information with high levels of accuracy.
Productively balances speed and accuracy.
Implements a variety of cross-checking approaches and mechanisms.
Demonstrates expertise in quality assurance tools, techniques, and standards.
A n a l y t i c a l Thinking: Knowledge of techniques and tools that promote effective analysis; ability to determine the root cause of organizational problems and create alternative solutions that resolve these problems.
Approaches a situation or problem by defining the problem or issue and determining its significance.
Makes a systematic comparison of two or more alternative solutions.
Uses logic and intuition to make inferences about the meaning of the data and arrive at conclusions.
M a c h i n e Learning: Knowledge of principles, technologies and algorithms of machine learning; ability to develop, implement and deliver related systems, products and services.
Completed specific tasks and initiates utilizing machine learning technologies.
Utilizes specific tools and techniques to process descriptive and inferential statistics.
Applies specific computing languages and tools in machine learning, such as R and Python.
Explores to use machine learning to make business improvements.
Conducts data mining and cleaning initiatives.
P rogramming Languages: Knowledge of concepts and capabilities of programming; ability to use tools, techniques and platforms in order to write and modify programming languages.
Works with low-code/no-code tools, e.g. Alteryx, PowerApps, etc.
Participates in the implementation and support of specialized programming languages.
Conducts basic reviews on writing a specific programming language within a specific platform.
Follows an organization's standards, policies and guidelines for structured programming specifications.
Diagnoses and reports minor or routine programming language problems.
Q u e ry and Database Access Tools: Knowledge of data management systems; ability to use, support and access facilities for searching, extracting and formatting data for further use.
Defines, creates and tests queries by using associated command language in a specific environment.
Applies appropriate query tools used to connect to the data warehouse.
Obtains and analyzes query results.
Employs tested query statements to retrieve, insert, update and delete information.
Works with advanced features and functions.
#LI-Hybrid
Relocation is available for this position.Visa Sponsorship is not available for this position. This employer is not currently hiring foreign national applicants that require or will require sponsorship tied to a specific employer, such as, H, L, TN, F, J, E, O. As a global company, Caterpillar offers many job opportunities outside of the U.S which can be found through our employment website at www.caterpillar.com/careers.
Posting Dates:
October 15, 2024 - October 22, 2024
Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen.
EEO/AA Employer. All qualified individuals - Including minorities, females, veterans and individuals with disabilities - are encouraged to apply.
Not ready to apply? Join our Talent Community .",4.1,Caterpillar,"Nashville, TN",10000+ Employees,1925.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,112.0,TN,99.0,1,0,0,0,0
"AIML - Data Scientist, Data and ML Innovation","$209K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 12, 2024

Weekly Hours: 40

Role Number:200571863

Would you like a chance to be part of a diverse team driving product impact using meticulous measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to create innovative technologies, methodologies, and research to enable amazing user experiences and advance the frontier of machine learning. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product and methodology evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with various engineering teams to improve product quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Apple user facing products with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that product engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data collection and quality control, requirements specification, processing and presentations. Use data from multiple types of sources including human annotation data. Build and prototype analysis pipelines and visualizations iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of product data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with product engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and user experience evaluations. You should be passionate about building outstanding products using rigorous and innovative ways with the data at hand. You are determined to making and sharing impactful work through methodological development and articulate and persuasive communication.
Experience in data science, machine learning, and analytics, including statistical data analysis and A/B testing.
Using Foundation Models for data science: prompt engineering and fine-tune foundational models for specific tasks.
Strong communication skills and the ability to naturally explain difficult technical topics to everyone from data scientists to engineers to business partners.
Strong programming skills, including data-querying skills (SQL) and experience with Python scripting language for data processing and development. Be able to translate ideas/methods into code and dashboards without hesitation.
M.S in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Operations Research or related areas.

Preferred Qualifications
Ph.D. in machine learning, computer science, statistics, operations research or related areas.
Experience with large language models, leveraging LLM for evaluation and product improvement.
Worked in areas intersecting Responsible AI and Generative AI
Worked with methods that account for variability in human annotation data
Some comfort in the use of JavaScript frameworks to design UI mock ups.

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $166,600 and $250,600, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,209.0,WA,48.0,1,0,0,0,0
Health Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) has an immediate need for a ealth Data Scientist t provide mid-level support related to the surveillance of arboviral diseases for our government customer located in Fot Collins, Colorado. o
tion may include periodic travel and need for flexible work schedule to accommodate alternate time zones. DE
IPTION OF RESPONSIBILITIES: Pro
mid-level support related to the surveillance of arboviral diseases. Support
e Surveillance and Epidemiology Team Lead (or designee). Data mana
ent of ADB surveillance system. Ensure that
propriate state partners maintain access to the surveillance system. Perform routi
data downloads to the central database. Run SAS program
identify any abnormal findings in the data (e.g., clinical symptoms do not match reported clinical syndrome; arbovirus in new area not previously documented, pregnant male, etc.). Will communicate with appropriate partner at state health department to resolve and/or investigate issues. Generate surveill
e reports using data management and visualization software. Generate routine re
ts during the transmission season using statistical data and visualization tools such as SAS, R, MS Excel, ArcGIS, and Tableau. Analyses are primarily descriptive. Surveillance reports
include: 1) PDF reports are emailed to all state partners and state epidemiologists; 2) updating CDC websites and dashboards with preliminary and final year data; and 3) internal surveillance data reports used for presentations and publications. Responding to internal
external surveillance data requests. Reconciling surveillance
a with state and local health partners. Participate in regular conf
nce calls; provide subject matter expertise related to the ArboNET surveillance system; confirmation of message transmissions; run diagnostics to confirm that messages are correctly transmitted; help jurisdictions and other CDC staff troubleshoot when problems are identified. Participating in meetings and
nference calls by preparing and presenting data and data and answering technical questions. Support public health response
research activities related to viral vector-borne pathogens and related diseases. CDC Emergency Response: Support p
ic health emergency response, including remote and field- based deployments to assist with responding to pandemics and other emerging threats. Provide administrative and logistical support for CDC Emergency Operations Center activities. This may occur through Incident Management Structure teams or direct support to state and local health departments. Will be expected to maintain high d
quality standards and will be responsible for maintaining standard operational procedures for all data management activities. Will work closely with SET staff and
ormatics staff to address technical issues related to reporting and assist with activities related to CDC’s ongoing efforts to strengthen and modernize the national disease surveillance system. REQUIRED DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATI
Must have a Bachelors in Biologics, Mi
ology, or related discipline. Preferred a MS in Statistics, Applied Anal
cs, Data Science, Business Analytics REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE: Strong SA
kills/experience - writing SAS
and debugging SAS code. Experience with large data sets; experience spe
ically with public health surveillance data a plus. DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE: Strong data visu
zatn skills desired. Competent
ing with Tableau or PowerBI a major plus. REQUIRED CITIZENSHIP AND CLEARANCE: Must be a US Citi
. Must be able to pass a NACI backg
check. The Alaka`ia
ndation Family of Companies (FOCs) is a fast-
owing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries. Eligible full-time employees enjoy a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 11 paid holidays. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We ar
roud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees. The Ak`ina oundation Family of Companies (FOCs) is comprised of
dustry-recognized government service firms designated as Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO)-owned and 8(a) certified businesses. The Family of Companies (FOCs) includes Ke`aki Technologies, Laulima Government Solutions, Kūpono Government Services, and Kāpili Services, Po`okela Solutions, Kīkaha Solutions, LLC, and Pololei Solutions, LLC. Alaka`ina Foundation activities principally benefit the youth of Hawaii through charitable efforts which includes providing innovative educational programs that combine leadership, science & technology, and environmental stewardship. For additional information, please visit www.alakainafoundation.com",3.8,Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies,"Fort Collins, CO",1001 to 5000 Employees,,Government,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,113.0,CO,,0,0,0,0,1
Advanced Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Advance Data Scientist
Advance Data Scientist for Honeywell International, Inc. in Atlanta, GA

Responsibilities:
Develop data modeling, mining, pattern analysis, data visualization and machine learning solutions to address customer needs.
Provide technical leadership by guiding the team to drive optimization and efficiency across scalable solutions.
Foster relationships with business team members by being proactive, displaying a thorough understanding of the business processes and by recommending innovative solutions.
Communicate project output in terms of customer value, business objectives, and product opportunity.
Promote data science methods and processes across functions.
Work with our businesses and infrastructure teams to develop a strategy that will clearly outline how our enterprise platforms can enable business growth & productivity.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Location: Atlanta, GA
40 hours/week
Employee Referral Fee: $1500
If offered employment must have legal right to work in U.S. EOE.
YOU MUST HAVE:
Qualified applicants must have a Master’s degree or foreign equivalent in Computer Science, Information Science, Operation Research, Engineering, Mathemetics, Statistics, or a related field, and over 2 years of experience in Data Science. Full term of experience must include: Data Science and Analytics; Machine learning engineering, Microsoft Azure; Databricks; Natural Language Processing (NLP); and coding in Python, Jupyter Notebooks. Telecommuting permitted up to two (2) times per week.
Additional Information
JOB ID: req467879
Category: Engineering
Location: 715 Peachtree Street, N.E.,Atlanta,Georgia,30308,United States
Exempt
Honeywell is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, religion, or veteran status.",4.0,Honeywell,"Atlanta, GA",10000+ Employees,1885.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,123.0,GA,139.0,1,0,0,0,0
Sr. Data Analyst,"$108K
/yr","Take a leap and join our team!
At Gesa, we believe in the power of our people. Coming from all walks of life, our team members individual stories and unique experiences are our most valuable asset. But its how we come together, igniting our collective compassion and commitment to empowering our communities, that makes us succeed. Because we know we go further when we go together.
Here you can join a team who is passionate about serving others, has a desire to do good, and shares a deep love of people. You can engage in meaningful work that impacts your community. You can challenge yourself and grow in your career. And, you can rest assured that your wellbeing and prosperity are our priority.
Get to know us:About - Gesa Credit Union
Role Summary:
Under the general supervision of the Data Integrity & Business Intelligence Manager/Team Leader, a Senior Data Analyst is responsible for supporting the business intelligence and data governance needs of the Credit Union. Primary duties shall include the maintenance and validation of the Credit Unions data governance system, development of business intelligence tools, and creation of business intelligence reporting to meet the needs of stakeholders within the Credit Union to further their ability to make quality, data driven decisions. As a member of the Risk and Performance Team, a Senior Data Analyst will be an integral part of the ongoing strategic planning and monitoring process for the Credit Union.
What You Will Be Doing:
Act as a team lead within the Risk and Performance Department. Represent Risk and Performance in projects and committees as assigned.
Lead the development, maintenance, and support of accurate analytical models, Business Intelligence/reporting systems, and data warehouse solutions to meet the business intelligence needs of the Credit Union and its stakeholders.
Work with internal stakeholders to identify new reporting, dash boarding, and analytical opportunities in furtherance of the Credit Unions business and strategic goals. Lead the implementation of identified opportunities and work with stakeholders to drive adoption.
Support the ongoing validation and maintenance of the Credit Unions data sources in support of the Credit Unions data governance framework.
Design, develop, and maintain the Credit Unions Data Warehouse and other databases in furtherance of the business intelligence goals of the Credit Union.
Assist with various data validation, balancing, and business intelligence projects.
Develop and maintain business intelligence systems and capabilities that support the needs of a diverse group of Credit Union stakeholders. Lead the training of stakeholders throughout the organization on the Credit Unions business intelligence systems.
Monitor indicators of performance and quality metrics and ensure compliance with data related policies, standards, roles and responsibilities, and adoption requirements. Provide suggestions for improved performance and adherence when appropriate.
Lead evaluations of the Credit Unions quality control systems and report findings along with recommendations for improvements as needed.
Lead the training of new team members within the Credit Unions Business Intelligence team with a focus on the tools and methods utilized by the team to accomplish their essential job functions.
Develop and maintain an expert level of knowledge regarding the Credit Unions core operating systems, data warehouse solutions, and business intelligence systems and software solutions.
Identify and troubleshoot data-related problems and make maintenance or modification suggestions.
Assist with the Credit Unions annual budgeting and forecasting processes along with other major Risk & Performance Team initiatives as assigned.
Must understand and perform Bank Secrecy Act (BSA) functions as applicable to job responsibilities.
Attend Credit Union training sessions, conferences, or seminars as approved by Management.Maintain awareness of policies and regulations related to duties and responsibilities.
Maintain and protect all sensitive data utilizing the highest standard of confidentiality and professionalism. Consistently display respect for all areas of diversity and levels of knowledge.
Display mutual respect, trust and dignity. Act in the best interest of the Credit Union; lead by example by displaying solid ethics and integrity at all times. Control risk and manage duties and tasks in a safe and sound manner.
Maintain a general knowledge of all Credit Union products and services, as well as the activities of departments.
About You:
Ability to maintain thorough knowledge of Credit Union business lines, processes, and products.
Strong analytical, quantitative, and modeling skills.
Ability to quickly grasp and adapt to changes in business models and new technologies.
Strong knowledge of relational databases, data mining techniques, and business intelligence tools.
Ability to write complex queries using tools such as SQL for reporting, analytics, and business intelligence.
Excellent interpersonal and listening skills.
Demonstrate commitment to continual process improvement.
Ability to work jointly and successfully in a team environment.
Able to successfully and professionally communicate both orally and in writing.
Able to prioritize tasks and projects with varying deadlines and priorities.
What You Will Need:
Four-year degree in Mathematics, Economics, Accounting, Finance, Data Analysis, Statistics; or equivalent training, coursework, and experience.
A minimum of eight years of similar or related experience; financial institution environment experience preferred.
High level of proficiency with business intelligence tools and large-scale data management.
Ability to interpret, validate, and balance large amounts of financial data with relative ease.
Proficient with standard office equipment, word processing and reporting.
Our Team Member Value Proposition:
In exchange for bringing your talent to Gesa, here are a just a few of the benefits and perks we offer:
Competitive Pay
Medical, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
20 days/year of Paid Time Off Plus 10 Paid Holidays!
401(k) Match
Incentive Program
Tuition Assistance and Student Loan Repayment
Commuter Benefits
Paid Time Off to Volunteer in the Community
Product discounts
Engaging Work Environment
Rewards and Recognition Programs
Salary Range:
$86,586.54 - $129,879.81
Get wise to whats possible with a career at Gesa. Join us!
We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact the HR Department at (509) 378-3100 or hrmail@gesa.com to request an accommodation.
Gesa Credit Union reserves the right to revise or change the job description as the need arises. This job description is not all inclusive of total job responsibilities nor does it constitute a written or implied contract of employment.
Selected candidate(s) must be able to pass a pre-employment credit/background check.
Gesa Credit Union is an Equal Opportunity Employer and strong advocate of workforce diversity. Race/Color/Gender/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Religion/National Origin/Disability/Veteran.
Equal Employment Opportunity (gesa.com)",4.7,Gesa Credit Union,"Richland, WA",501 to 1000 Employees,1953.0,Nonprofit Organization,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,108.0,WA,71.0,0,0,0,0,1
Homeless & Community Development Data & Research Scientist,"$110K
/yr","Description:
The Cloudburst Group is a unique small business working at the intersection of domestic and international development to strengthen government programs that benefit low-income and vulnerable populations.
As part of its compensation package, The Cloudburst Group offers a robust benefits program to full-time, part-time, and intermittent employees based on their eligibility, which includes paid time off, health insurance, life insurance, retirement savings, flexible spending accounts, and voluntary supplemental benefits.
The expected compensation range for this position is: $100,000 to $120,000, yearly
The Cloudburst Group is seeking a Senior Data and Research Scientist to join its Homeless Assistance Team and support other domestic research projects. Cloudburst has a growing portfolio of data analysis, research, and evaluation projects with state, local, and federal government clients, including funding from HUD’s Office of Special Needs Assistance Programs to support local communities to effectively use data to drive strategic decision-making.
We’re looking for someone to provide leadership in the execution of current projects, liaise with clients to scope and manage work, and drive strategic growth through organic and new business development. Cloudburst is looking for someone who:
Is passionate about finding solutions to homelessness and reducing disparities in housing outcomes.
Is grounded in the data, evidence, and research on solutions to prevent and end homelessness.
Is a collaborative problem solver and analytic thinker with experience harnessing the power of data and/or evaluation to measure program effectiveness.
Homelessness disproportionately impacts Black, Indigenous, and People of Color as a result of structural and institutional racism. Cloudburst believes that effective solutions to homelessness are created with communities historically impacted by the systems we are attempting to transform. We strongly encourage applications from people who are representative of the culturally and ethnically diverse communities we work with, as well as from those with lived experience of homelessness.
RESPONSIBILITIES
This position will lead a variety of data analysis, evaluation, and applied research projects. It will require flexibility, self-motivation, and the willingness to work and collaborate in remote settings.
Specific responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Designing data-driven improvement strategies for homeless continuums of care (CoCs), leveraging community Homeless Management Information System (HMIS) and other data to help guide community planning
Assisting in collecting, managing, and analyzing data from homelessness or other social service programs for a variety of research and evaluation projects.
Supporting research and other initiatives on issues of concern to Cloudburst at the intersection of housing, homelessness, gender-based violence, disaster resilience and response, community, and economic development that center persons with lived experience.
Designing collaborative research, theories of change, and key research questions to address client’s needs; including presenting results and findings in easy-to-understand presentations with actionable recommendations.
Providing leadership, coaching, staff, and contractor supervision as well as quality assurance oversight of projects.
Establishing and maintaining positive client relationships that foster organic growth and inform new business pursuits.
Identifying strategic growth opportunities and contributing to new business pursuits, especially in the areas of program evaluation.
Requirements:
Master's degree or higher (PhD preferred) in a related field and a minimum of 15 years of relevant work experience, or significant life experience in the field of homelessness or housing.
Experience with impact and performance evaluations; data collection and analysis, including both qualitative and quantitative research. Academic experience is acceptable, on-the-job experience is preferred.
Proficiency with Excel (e.g., pivot tables, VLOOKUP) and GIS analysis is required. Experience with NVIVO, Stata, or other data analysis software is preferred.
Strong writing and analysis skills.
Familiarity with Google G-Suite products.
Experience with data visualization software (e.g., PowerBI) is preferred.
Knowledge of HUD homelessness programs and Homeless Management Information Systems is preferred.
COMPANY INFORMATION
The Cloudburst Group (Cloudburst) is a mission-driven Women-Owned Small Business whose staff strives to create impact, empower communities, and build resiliency. Cloudburst works at the intersection of domestic and international development with the goal of improving the effectiveness of programs and investments targeted to build social, economic, and environmental resilience in the U.S. and abroad.
Cloudburst’s work is guided by a mission to improve economic, social, and environmental resilience. To this end, many of the populations and communities we work with focus on addressing structural and institutional racism that disproportionately impacts Black, Indigenous, and other people of color. Cloudburst believes that effective services and solutions are created with communities historically impacted by the systems we are attempting to transform. We strongly encourage applications from people who are representative of the culturally and ethnically diverse communities we work with.
The Cloudburst Group is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. Cloudburst will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.",4.3,The Cloudburst Group,Maryland,Unknown,,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,110.0,Maryland,,0,0,0,0,1
"Senior Data Scientist, Analytics & Data","$138K
/yr","About the Team:
At Williams Sonoma, our brand promise is to nourish people's lives. This mission inspires us, informs our strategy, and makes us special. You will engage our customers as part of the Marketing Strategy, Data Science, & Analytics team through insights, analysis, data reporting, modeling, machine learning and AI development. Our team ensures that we are engaging with our customers at the right time and in the right place by always measuring and improving upon our success. You will love working with incredible marketers and strategists across the company.
About the Role:
This role works closely with the other senior data scientists on the team to enhance our products, develop new tools, and create actionable recommendations. You will also collaborate with cross-functional teams in an omnichannel marketing organization and be exposed to various technology stacks (MarTech, AdTech, FinTech, etc.). The day-to-day work will include data modeling, developing machine learning/AI algorithms, data mining, analysis and presentation of your work to the team(s). This role requires an individual to have a healthy amount of intellectual curiosity, creativity, and an innovative mindset.
You're excited about this opportunity because you will…
Take ownership of data models, datasets, manage data integrity, preparation, cleansing, and final delivery of your work for senior leadership
Own data quality assurance and management protocols/processes
Develop ML/AI applications, maintain dashboards, documentation, and reporting
Stay updated with current ML/AI trends to improve and advance existing processes with more automation
Support production models and enrich existing ML/AI framework to improve performance accuracy and reduce costs of ML/AI systems
Test, learn, and run machine learning/AI experiments comparing different techniques and algorithms
Scale and automate analyses for marketing across 8 brands
Support adhoc and recurring requests for multiple cross-functional teams
We're excited about you because you have...
Bachelors’ Degree or higher education in Applied ML/AI, Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Analytics, Economics, or related technical field
Excel, SQL, R, Python Required; Other programming/scripting languages a plus
3+ years of professional experience or equivalent academic course work in Machine Learning/AI, statistical modeling, data analytics, market research, or other data centric role
Understanding, knowledge, and experience or equivalent academic work in Long Short Term Memory with Attention (LSTM-a), Markov Chain Monte Carlo (MCMC) algorithms, Deep Learning Neural Network, Prophet/NeuralProphet, Regression (Bayesian, SARIMA, ARIMA), A/B testing, and other methodologies or algorithms
Proficient using Databricks, TensorFlow, Keras, Jupyter Notebook, Ubuntu and/or other data science tools
Experience with Marketing Mix Modeling and/or Multi-Touch Attribution a huge plus
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills are a must
Strong attention to details and problem-solving abilities
Ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
About Williams-Sonoma, Inc.:
Founded in 1956, Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is the premier specialty retailer of high-quality products for the kitchen and home in the United States. Our family of brands are Williams-Sonoma, Pottery Barn, Pottery Barn Kids, PBteen, West Elm, Williams-Sonoma Home, Rejuvenation, and Mark and Graham. These brands are among the best known and most respected in the industry. We offer beautifully designed, stylish and functional products for every area of the home, including the kitchen, living room, bedroom, home office, closet, laundry room and even outdoor spaces. We've seen some big changes since our first brick-and-mortar store opened more than half of a century ago. What hasn't changed is our passion for high-quality products, functional design, outstanding customer service, and enhancing the lives of our customers and the communities where we operate. Today, we're a multi-brand, multi-channel, global enterprise supported by state-of-the-art technology and some of the most talented teams in retailing - and we're always looking for new energy and ideas.
WSI will not now or in the future commence an immigration case or ""sponsor"" an individual for this position (for example, H-1B or other employment-based immigration. This role is not eligible for relocation assistance.
Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Williams-Sonoma, Inc. will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, or other applicable state or local laws and ordinances.
The expected starting pay range for this position is $130,000 - $145,000 annually. Applicable pay ranges may differ across markets. Actual pay will be determined based on experience and other job-related factors permitted by law. In addition to competitive pay, compensation may include a variety of other components like benefits, paid time off, merit, and bonus opportunities.

Our Company

Founded in 1956, Williams-Sonoma, Inc. is the premier specialty retailer of high-quality products for the kitchen and home in the United States. Our family of brands are Williams Sonoma, Williams Sonoma Home, Pottery Barn, Pottery Barn teen, pottery barn kids, Rejuvenation, Mark & Graham, west elm, or Outward. These brands are among the best known and most respected in the industry. We offer beautifully-designed, stylish and functional products for every area of the home, including the kitchen, living room, bedroom, home office, closet, laundry room and even outdoor spaces. We've seen some big changes since our first brick-and-mortar store opened more than half of a century ago. What hasn't changed is our passion for high-quality products, functional design, outstanding customer service, and enhancing the lives of our customers and the communities where we operate. Today, we're a multi-brand, multi-channel, global enterprise supported by state-of-the-art technology and some of the most talented teams in retailing - and we're always looking for new energy and ideas.",3.3,Williams Sonoma,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,1956.0,Company - Public,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail & Wholesale,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,138.0,CA,68.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Purpose:
The successful candidate will be based in our Austin, TX facility and will support numerous research & development and test & evaluation projects related to defense, forensics, and national security. The candidate will be based in our Austin, TX headquarters within the Quality Assurance & Data Science Business Area. The candidate must be motivated to contribute in a team environment, collaborate across multiple scientific and technical disciplines, and be excited to develop new skills. The candidate must have the flexibility to balance multiple on-going tasks while operating efficiently with minimal supervision. As needed, the candidate should be able to direct others to accomplish project tasks. The candidate must be detail oriented and be able to appropriately document their work. Job functions will include performing data analytics and statistical analyses, training and optimizing machine learning and predictive models, generating visualizations, and developing automated data processing pipelines on chemical, biological, radio frequency (RF), visual (imagery), and text-based data.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities:
Performs data analytics, specifically data clean-up, data processing, machine learning modeling, statistical analysis, multivariate data analysis, and/or data visualization, as related to scientific data.
Applies technical skills to plan and execute assigned project work including development of data pre-processing routines, data summarizations, data visualizations and plotting, development and application of machine learning and artificial intelligence models, development of detection algorithms, and development and deployment automated processing pipelines.
Maintains operational capabilities of computational assets as needed by project requirements.
Leads meetings with company clients by preparing and presenting materials in meetings.
Appropriately annotates developed computer code/scripts with comments and through user guides/manuals.
Performs maintenance and updates of scripts/code for routine data analysis.
Presents technical results through the drafting of technical reports and presentation materials.
Presents experimental results and recommended actions at internal project meetings.
Supports business development efforts as needed by drafting technical sections of proposals, providing proposal review, assessing levels of effort required to complete proposed work, and brainstorming technical solutions to client problems.
Other duties as assigned.
Performance of all job duties is intended to be completed under limited direct supervision of their supervisor.

Required Knowledge,Skills,& Abilities:
Required
Proficiency in performing data analytics, predictive analytics, machine learning, multivariate data analysis, and data mining as it relates to scientific data
Software programming/scripting proficiency in R, Python, Java, and/or MATLAB
Experience and proficiency with Microsoft Excel, Word, and Powerpoint
Strong analytical, organizational, and problem-solving abilities are required
Ability to lead group of co-workers in execution of a task
Working knowledge of statistics, experimental error, and quantification as it applies to scientific data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to communicate technical information to non-technical audiences
Competent in using Linux/Unix operating system command line interface
Ability to work independently and to interact effectively with individuals on multi-disciplinary teams
Team player with a positive attitude

Preferred
Experience in analytical chemistry or biochemistry including chromatography, mass spectrometry, spectroscopy, hyperspectral imaging, proteomics, metabolomics, RF signal processing, genomics, or other biochemical analysis methods
Experience in developing proteomics or metabolomics data analysis pipelines
Experience with NextFlow, SnakeMake, or similar workflow/pipeline management systems
Experience in developing natural language processing (NLP) and/or machine vision models
Previous research and development experience related to chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, and/or explosive (CBRNE) threats
Working knowledge of good software development practices such as version control systems (e.g., Git) and Agile development (e.g., workflows, sprints)
Ability to develop and query relational databases (MySQL or similar)
Familiarity with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Google Cloud Platform, or Microsoft Azure cloud computing
Ability to think creatively, demonstrate curiosity, and lead research teams
Sufficient business knowledge to support marketing, and bids and proposal efforts

Education/Experience:
Successful candidate must have a Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Chemistry, Biochemistry, Biology, or a related scientific discipline with at least 3-5 years of professional experience; or a Ph.D. or Master's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Chemistry, Biochemistry, Biology, or a related scientific discipline. Successful candidate must have significant experience in software programming/scripting for scientific data analysis and machine learning modeling.

Clearance:
Candidate must be willing to seek and maintain government security clearance at the SECRET level following hire. Candidates with current DoD SECRET or other clearance will be given preference.

Working Conditions/Equipment:
Ability to sit for long periods of time at desk/computer.",3.5,"Signature Science, LLC","Austin, TX",51 to 200 Employees,,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,105.0,TX,,1,0,0,1,1
"Data Scientist, Stanford Law School","$69K
/yr","ONE-YEAR FIXED TERM POSITION
JOB PURPOSE:
The Deborah L. Rhode Center on the Legal Profession at Stanford Law School is looking for a Data Scientist to work across our research programs. This role will collaborate closely with teams of research fellows and students on projects the civil court system, access to justice, and transparency in state and federal courts. Under the direction of Rhode Center associated faculty and research affiliates, the role manage and analyze data critical to the Center’s data-science research agenda focused on expanding access to justice and transparency in U.S. Courts. This position will report to Professor David Engstrom.
CORE DUTIES*:
In collaboration and under the direction of Rhode Center research team members, lead the Center’s ongoing efforts to collect, manage, and structure large datasets from public sources.
Use cutting-edge natural language processing and machine learning tools to label high volumes of unstructured data and prepare for empirical analysis.
Conceptualize suitable empirical methodologies and models.
Develop algorithms to convert PDFs to analyzable data at scale. Conduct statistical analyses of complex datasets and interpretation of results.
Contribute original writing explaining data sources, analyses, and interpretation.
Where appropriate, have the opportunity to receive co-authorship on research papers.
Use reports and analyses to identify conflicting interpretations, make corrections/suggest solutions and determine root cause for data problems.
Collaborate with faculty and research staff on data collection and analysis methods.
Provide documentation based on audit and reporting criteria to faculty and research staff.
Communicate with government officials, grant agencies and industry representatives.
- Other duties may also be assigned
Education & Experience:
Bachelor's degree or a combination of education and relevant experience. Experience in a quantitative discipline (e.g., computer science, data science, statistics, engineering, mathematics, economics, or a related field).
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Substantial experience with MS Office and analytical programs.
Strong writing and analytical skills.
Ability to prioritize workload.
Programming experience in Python, R, SQL, and/or other languages
Prior experience working with large datasets on remote servers or cloud services is preferred
Prior experience working with machine learning, especially involving classifiers, is preferred
Outstanding academic credentials and intellectual creativity
Eagerness to take initiative and solve intricate problems
Excellent time-management skills and ability to work effectively with minimal supervision
Exceptional research, analytical writing, and communication skills
Prior research experience and coursework in the empirical social sciences is preferred, but not required
- Consistent with its obligations under the law, the University will provide reasonable accommodation to any employee with a disability who requires accommodation to perform the essential functions of the job.
WORK STANDARDS:
Interpersonal Skills: Demonstrates the ability to work well with Stanford colleagues and clients and with external organizations.
Promote Culture of Safety: Demonstrates commitment to personal responsibility and value for safety; communicates safety concerns; uses and promotes safe behaviors based on training and lessons learned.
The expected pay range for this position is $82,468 to $106,256 per annum (Stanford Region).
The expected pay range for this position is $54,763 to $83,636 per annum (Remote Region).
Stanford University provides pay ranges representing its good faith estimate of what the university reasonably expects to pay for a position. The pay offered to a selected candidate will be determined based on factors such as (but not limited to) the scope and responsibilities of the position, the qualifications of the selected candidate, departmental budget availability, internal equity, geographic location and external market pay for comparable jobs.
At Stanford University, base pay represents only one aspect of the comprehensive rewards package. The Cardinal at Work website (https://cardinalatwork.stanford.edu/benefits-rewards) provides detailed information on Stanford’s extensive range of benefits and rewards offered to employees. Specifics about the rewards package for this position may be discussed during the hiring process.
Stanford is an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
The job duties listed are typical examples of work performed by positions in this job classification and are not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, tasks, and responsibilities. Specific duties and responsibilities may vary depending on department or program needs without changing the general nature and scope of the job or level of responsibility. Employees may also perform other duties as assigned.
Stanford Law School seeks to hire the best talent and to promote a safe and secure environment for all members of the university community and its property. To that end, new staff hires must successfully pass a background check prior to starting work at Stanford University.",4.3,Stanford University,"Stanford, CA",10000+ Employees,1891.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,69.0,CA,133.0,1,0,0,0,1
IS Data Scientist,"$135K
/yr","Description
Overview
Identifies and integrates new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities, and work closely with the engineering team in the development of data products. Drives business results through data-based insights by leveraging variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations.
The successful applicant will work within a commutable radius of our Voorhees, NJ and report to the office on a hybrid basis (monthly, as needed). The annual salary range for this position is based on location with an annual discretionary incentive opportunity targeting up to 20% of salary.
Voorhees, NJ - $130,000 - $140,000
Philadelphia, PA - $130,000 - $140,000
New York City, NY - $145,000 - $155,000
Piscataway, NJ - $135,000 - $145,000
Named one of the 50 best non-profits to work for by the Non-Profit Times, our employees enjoy rewarding careers in a fast-paced, results-driven environment. We offer a competitive compensation package, including incentives. Eligible employees also participate in a comprehensive benefits program that includes medical, dental, orthodontia, vision coverage, student loan repayment, 403(b) retirement plan with substantial company match, discounted pet insurance, and generous paid-time-off benefits.
Responsibilities
Execute analytical experiments to help solve problems across various domains and divisions.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for business needs, collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables. Clean and transform data to eliminate irrelevant, incomplete, or inaccurate information.
Analyze raw data to identify patterns, trends, and insights. Develop statistical and predictive models to run against the data sets. Correlate similar data to find actionable results.
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes as well as to make predictions or automate decision-making.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes, analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Create data-driven products and features that can be incorporated into business processes and workflows.
Communicate findings and insights to stakeholders, providing recommendations on business strategies, and aiding in data-driven decision-making by creating data visualizations, dashboards and reports.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including engineering, IT, and business units, to understand needs and devise possible solutions.
Ensure data quality and integrity. Uphold privacy and data protection standards, considering ethical implications of data usage.
Stay updated with the latest technology trends, learning about new tools and technologies, and developing new skills. Research new techniques and best practices within the field of data science.
Demonstrates regular, reliable, and predictable job attendance.
Attends on-site and in-person meetings and training sessions.
Qualifications

Education & Experience: Master’s, PHD, or Bachelor’s Degree required in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field; and 7 or more years of professional experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, Proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis. Advanced experience in pattern recognition and predictive modeling; or an equivalent combination of education and work experience.
Communications Abilities: (Verbal) Expresses oneself clearly in conversations and interactions with others; tailors speech to the level and experience of the audience; uses appropriate grammar and choice of words; expresses ideas in a concise, organized manner; maintains eye contact when speaking with others; (Written) Expresses oneself clearly and concisely in writing; tailors written communications to effectively reach an audience; uses graphics and other aids to clarify complex or technical information; spells correctly; writes using concrete, specific language; uses punctuation correctly; writes grammatically.
Mathematical Skills: Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals; ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs; ability to understand and interpret statistical reports, data charts and graphs.
Technology Skills: Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc. Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc. Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc. Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using Tableau. Experience with machine learning and AI.
The American Arbitration Association is an equal opportunity employer (EEO) and considers all employees and applicants for positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, marital status, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.9,American Arbitration Association Inc.,"New York, NY",501 to 1000 Employees,1926.0,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,135.0,NY,98.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$208K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
A minimum of 6 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 4 years with a Ph.D.)
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$173,000/year to $242,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,208.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","In a world of possibilities, pursue one with endless opportunities. Imagine Next!
When it comes to what you want in your career, if you can imagine it, you can do it at Parsons. Imagine a career working with intelligent, diverse people sharing a common quest. Imagine a workplace where you can be yourself. Where you can thrive. Where you can find your next, right now. We’ve got what you’re looking for.
Job Description:
Parsons is looking for an amazingly talented Data Scientist to join our team! In this role you will be collaborating with headquarters and local customers to develop analytic capabilities. You will be a critical member on a small team, responsible for bringing your high-level analytic and data science skills to bear on a critical national security mission.
What You'll Be Doing:
Evaluate statistical models and other AI/ML products to determine the validity of analyses, implement evaluated models into production by collaborating with software developers, periodically re-evaluate and refine machine learning models being used in production
Perform/use statistics, machine learning and analytic approaches to answer key intelligence questions, producing results and re-usable products that provide real value to USCYBERCOM.
Apply machine learning techniques to identify and transform data features, find hidden patterns and trends, build and optimize classifiers, create automated anomaly detection systems, and automate steps of a process
Curate and collect the data from a variety of traditional and non-traditional sources: extract data from sources, transform and integrate data in line with existing data, and load data into data stores for access by others
Collaborate with other Data Scientists and other customer organizations to develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Effectively communicate ideas, design, and results to key decision makers, and other stakeholders
Develop and implement a configuration management plans for data sets and analyses to ensure thorough documentation of all processes, models, and activities
Research latest data science, AI tradecraft and technology
What Required Skills You'll Bring:
TS/SCI w/ Polygraph
Python or other relevant programming language
Minimum 5 years of experience with data science, AI, and/or analytics
Bachelor's Degree (or higher) in related field

What Desired Skills You'll Bring:
Deep understanding of the customer mission and established relationships that would enable effective cross-functional collaboration
Experience working with customer data
Experience with data extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) processes within cloud-based environments (AWS, Azure)
Minimum Clearance Required to Start:
Top Secret SCI w/Polygraph
This position is part of our Federal Solutions team.
Our Federal Solutions segment delivers resources to our US government customers that ensure the success of missions around the globe. Our diverse, intelligent employees drive the state of the art as they provide services and solutions in the areas of defense, security, intelligence, infrastructure, and environmental. We promote a culture of excellence and close-knit teams that take pride in delivering, protecting, and sustaining our nation's most critical assets, from Earth to cyberspace. Throughout the company, our people are anticipating what’s next to deliver the solutions our customers need now.
Salary Range:
$117,000.00 - $210,600.00
We value our employees and want our employees to take care of their overall wellbeing, which is why we offer best-in-class benefits such as medical, dental, vision, paid time off, 401(k), life insurance, flexible work schedules, and holidays to fit your busy lifestyle!
Parsons is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity, equity, inclusion, and accessibility in the workplace. Diversity is ingrained in who we are, how we do business, and is one of our company’s core values. Parsons equally employs representation at all job levels for minority, female, disabled, protected veteran and LGBTQ+.
We truly invest and care about our employee’s wellbeing and provide endless growth opportunities as the sky is the limit, so aim for the stars! Imagine next and join the Parsons quest—APPLY TODAY!",4.0,Parsons,Maryland,10000+ Employees,1944.0,Company - Public,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,164.0,Maryland,80.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$175K
/yr","Company Description

ATPCO is the foundation of flight shopping, providing pricing and retailing data, tools, and services to 500+ airlines, global distribution systems, sales channels, and technology companies. In addition, ATPCO links the entire airline community together, collaborating to develop industry standards for airline distribution and end-to-end technology solutions. As a result, ATPCO solutions work seamlessly across existing, new, and evolving technologies and methods from shopping to settlement. Airline-owned and reliably supporting air travel for more than 55 years, ATPCO is everywhere people buy flights.
We consider qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, gender, age, color, religion, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, disability, sexual orientation, protected military/veteran status, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, or any other legally protected factor.

Job Description

The Research Data Scientist will drive understanding, evaluation, and adoption of AI innovations relevant to ATPCO's data products and solutions. This role will provide strategic guidance, research, and domain expertise to shape ATPCO's AI strategy and airline industry engagement.
Responsibilities
Advise product teams on the models and tools our airline customers' will need to power their AI-driven dynamic offer creation, including airfare, pricing, ancillary pricing, and product selection.
Provide data science leadership in product-led engagements with airlines and tech vendors to identify customers’ problems that can be solved by models trained on ATPCO data
Lead in evaluation and design of potential AI-based ATPCO products, including around customer segmentation and impacts of external shocks (e.g., political, environmental, economic) on airline offer creation
Advise data engineers on AI tools to create efficiency in data ingestion and synthetic data creation
Collaborate with data engineering and infrastructure teams on how to optimize data for AI/ML
Monitor and research AI innovations, techniques, and use cases relevant to airline industry and ATPCO product portfolio
Promote AI adoption by presenting at industry events and creating content (or supporting presentations and created content)
Requirements
PhD / MA in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or closely-related field with specialization in AI/ML, or 10+ years professional experience
3+ years experience developing AI/ML solutions and prototypes
Strong verbal and written communication skills; ability to distill complex topics
Self-directed and curious, able to explore innovations on the frontier of AI.
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
Salary Range: $165,000 - $185,000
*The disclosed range estimate has not been adjusted for applicable geographic differential associated with the location*",3.8,ATPCO,"Herndon, VA",201 to 500 Employees,1965.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,175.0,VA,59.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Sr Data Scientist, Spatial Omics","$150K
/yr","The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Senior Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop computational tools as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up to date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal Candidate will have:

Background

Ph.D. degree in computer science, quantitative science, data science, bioinformatics, biostatistics, or a related field.

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Proficiency in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Proficiency in containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments are a plus.

Onsite Presence: Is Not Required

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-




PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-




COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's or PhD in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Five years of experience in scientific software or industry programming with a concentration in scientific computing. With Master's degree, three years experience required. With PhD, one year of experience required.

Preferred: Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170806
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 119,500
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 149,500
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 179,500
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid

The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center has the potential to unlock the power of data by further developing and investing in talent, team science and infrastructure to optimize multidimensional data integration, analysis and application for the benefit of patients with cancer. The Institute for Data Science in Oncology (IDSO) is a signature priority program aimed at transforming the patient experience, enhancing quality of life and accelerating scientific breakthroughs via advanced, data-driven approaches to cancer care. IDSO will enable teams to search for, learn from and apply as much information as possible gathered from every patient MD Anderson has seen or will see. By growing a data-centric culture and advancing data management and analytics maturity, we provide better, state-of-science and state-of-data-science care for patients while exploring areas of cancer research and treatment currently unknown to clinical communities.

The IDSO recruits, positions and enables best-in-class data scientists to unravel seemingly insoluble problems in cancer and work toward meaningful solutions for patients. Our aims include reducing the time between diagnostic procedures and treatment decisions, advancing drug discovery efforts and bringing new, precise medicines to bedsides sooner. The IDSO centralizes our focused institutional investment in data science, as well as enables partnerships with other world-leading organizations, to operate and enhance an unprecedented oncological ""data supply chain"" designed to accelerate research and treatment innovation. Comprised of the best minds in a myriad of scientific and data-driven fields, the IDSO facilitates a culture grounded in our innovative ""team-data science"" principles, such as shared motivation, shared learning, provenance linking insights to observations and integrated data governance.

One of the five focus areas IDSO has prioritized is Focus Area 2 - Single Cell Spatial Omics to Unveil Cancer Complexity, which is co-led by Dr. Linghua Wang, an Associated Professor in the department of Genomic Medicine at MD Anderson Cancer Center and a recognized computational biologist and leader in single-cell spatial research in cancer. Our goal is to build a world-class data science hub for single-cell and spatial omics studies to accelerate the discovery and translation of cancer research at MD Anderson and beyond.

We are seeking multiple highly motivated and enthusiastic Senior Data Scientists with a strong computational background and expertise in programming and bioinformatics pipeline development. The successful candidate will lead the development and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines for commonly employed platforms, including spatial transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, genomic, microbiome, antigen receptor profiling, tissue and molecular imaging, and other related omics platforms. The candidates will also be responsible for providing regular updates and organizing efforts for advancing pipeline development.

Dr. Linghua Wang and her group will provide guidance and support, assisting the candidates in brainstorming workflow decisions and optimizing the pipeline development process. With our significant expertise in the field, we are committed to supporting each candidate achieve excellence in their role.

JOB SPECIFIC COMPETENCIES

Technical-specific:

Participate in the design, development, and optimization of spatial multi-omics pipelines.

Benchmark computational methods and toolkits to ensure best practices and excellence in data processing and analysis.

Develop computational tools as needed for new technologies and integrate them with existing platforms.

Ensure scalability and efficiency of the pipelines to handle large and complex datasets.

Conduct rigorous testing and validation of computational tools to ensure accuracy and reproducibility.

Develop interactive web portals for effective data exploration and visualization.

Collaboration and Communication:

Meet with teams and collaborators regularly to discuss projects, communicate results, and provide computational expertise. Effective collaboration is a strong component of this role.

Work with teams to integrate data and metadata, assisting postdocs and students in analyzing and resolving issues related to data analysis as needed.

Lead hands-on training workshops, courses, and seminars.

Research and Publication:

Assist with code submission and distribute analytical methods and codes to the scientific community.

Assist with manuscript and grant preparation and presentations, and present at lab meetings, departmental and institutional seminars, and appropriate scientific conferences.

Other Duties:

Attend collaborator meetings and team working group meetings. Prioritize and manage multiple projects in a timely and resource-effective manner.

Stay up to date with relevant literature, gather information systematically, and confer with the supervisor regarding new procedures.

Ideal Candidate will have:

Background

Ph.D. degree in computer science, quantitative science, data science, bioinformatics, biostatistics, or a related field.

Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

Demonstrated ability to develop, optimize, and maintain bioinformatics pipelines.

Technical Proficiency:

Proficiency in at least two or more programming languages, such as R and Python.

Proficiency in modern workflow languages, such as Nextflow, WDL, or CWL for scalable, reproducible bioinformatics pipelines.

Proficiency in containerization technologies, including Docker, Docker Swarm, and Kubernetes, for creating reproducible and scalable environments.

Proficiency in version control systems (e.g., Git, and GitHub) and Linux system administration.

Familiarity with FAIR principles (Findable, Accessible, Interoperable, and Reusable) for data and tool development to ensure reproducibility and accessibility of scientific workflows.

Soft Skills:

Must be honest, highly motivated, reliable, responsible, and well-organized.

Strong attention to detail, with the ability to multi-task and a willingness to learn new methods and technologies.

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Ability to work effectively in a collaborative and interdisciplinary team environment (strong plus).

Additional Qualifications:

Familiarity with cloud computing platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure) is a plus.

Knowledge of high-performance computing (HPC) environments are a plus.

Onsite Presence: Is Not Required

WORKING CONDITIONS




Frequency



Deadlines
-




PHYSICAL DEMANDS




Frequency

Weight



Sitting
Keyboarding
Carrying
Lifting
Standing
Pushing/Pulling
Reaching

Constant 67-100%
Constant 67-100%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
Occasionally 11-33%
Occasionally 11-33%
Seldom 3-10%
-
-
10-20 lbs.
10-20 lbs.
-
10-20 lbs.
-




COGNITIVE DEMANDS


Analytical Ability
Attention to detail
Interpersonal Skills
Oral Communication
Working Alone
Written Communication




EDUCATION:
Required: Bachelor's degree in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

Preferred: Master's or PhD in Biomedical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Physics, Applied Mathematics, Science, Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Computational Biology, or related field.

EXPERIENCE:
Required: Five years of experience in scientific software or industry programming with a concentration in scientific computing. With Master's degree, three years experience required. With PhD, one year of experience required.

Preferred: Experience with best practices in spatial omics data analysis, including multimodal data integration.

It is the policy of The University of Texas MD Anderson Cancer Center to provide equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by institutional policy or by federal, state or local laws unless such distinction is required by law. http://www.mdanderson.org/about-us/legal-and-policy/legal-statements/eeo-affirmative-action.html

Additional Information
Requisition ID: 170806
Employment Status: Full-Time
Employee Status: Regular
Work Week: Days
Minimum Salary: US Dollar (USD) 119,500
Midpoint Salary: US Dollar (USD) 149,500
Maximum Salary : US Dollar (USD) 179,500
FLSA: exempt and not eligible for overtime pay
Fund Type: Soft
Work Location: Hybrid Onsite/Remote
Pivotal Position: Yes
Referral Bonus Available?: Yes
Relocation Assistance Available?: Yes
Science Jobs: Yes

#LI-Hybrid",4.2,MD Anderson Cancer Center,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1941.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,150.0,TX,83.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$126K
/yr","Security Clearance required:
Able to obtain Public Trust
Do you want to make a difference?
Cognosante employees are passionate about improving people’s lives. With an innovative mindset and an unwavering commitment to those we serve, we partner with healthcare, civilian and defense agencies to deliver exceptional public services and programs. Our multi-faceted technology and customer experience (CX) solutions achieve program outcomes, solve critical challenges and create meaningful change. Whether we are helping Veterans access healthcare faster, ensuring that members of the military complete their missions safely, or helping people obtain health insurance, our work touches millions of people. Are you ready to make a difference?


What is the position?
Cognosante is seeking a Data Scientist with a proven track record of leveraging data to drive actionable insights and optimize business outcomes. The Data Scientist will apply expertise in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling to design and implement solutions that tackle complex challenges and uncover opportunities for improvement across diverse IT projects. This role is 100% remote.

What will I get to do?
Meet with clients or management to understand data requirements and needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including data engineers and business analysts, to define data requirements and ensure data-driven decision-making.
Develop and refine data collection strategies to ensure the availability of high-quality, relevant data for analysis.
Employ advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify patterns, and develop predictive models that support data-driven decision-making.
Design and implement rigorous evaluation frameworks to assess the effectiveness of operating programs and business processes, utilizing both qualitative and quantitative data.
Transform complex data into clear and compelling visualizations that effectively communicate insights and recommendations to stakeholders at all levels.
Identify opportunities to enhance business processes through data-driven analysis, proposing and implementing solutions that improve efficiency and effectiveness.
Maintain detailed documentation for data engineering processes and best practices.
Develop best practice, processes, and standards for effectively carrying out data strategy activities.


What qualifications do I need?
A minimum of 3-5 years of IT experience
A Bachelor's degree a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or a related discipline (or 8 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education)
Proficiency in Python, R, or other relevant programming languages for data analysis and machine learning.
Strong understanding of various machine learning algorithms and techniques, with hands-on experience in their application.
Proficiency in utilizing data visualization tools and techniques to communicate complex information in a clear and impactful manner.
Demonstrated ability to approach complex problems with a structured and analytical mindset.
Experience with AWS cloud offerings (S3, Redshift, etc.)
Strong knowledge of SQL and database management systems (e.g., PostgreSQL, MySQL, or NoSQL databases).
Must be able to achieve a moderate (Tier 2) VA position of trust.


What additional characteristics will help me thrive?
Familiarity with healthcare and supply chain inventory data and supply chain industry-specific challenges.
Familiarity with client specific solution components, such as Databricks, Talend, etc.
Automated Engineering Management System/Medical Equipment Reporting System (AEMS/MERS), Equipment/Turn-In Request (EQUIP), Maximo Enterprise Asset and Work Management System (EAWM), Point of Use Family of Systems (PoU FoS), Real Time Location Systems (RTLS), and Strategic Equipment Planning Guide (SEPG)/Enterprise Equipment Request (EER) experience a plus
Experience working in the Federal Government, Veteran's Administration (VA) experience a plus
Active clearance for Public Trust Position
What We Offer
Our mission is to provide comprehensive and competitive pay, benefits, services, and programs to eligible employees and their dependents that:
Ensure optimal health and productivity of our employees
Support employee retention and attraction
Provide work/life balance to ensure our employees succeed inside and outside of the office
Compensation
$96,760.98 - $154,817.56
The pay range for this job is determined by various factors, including but not necessarily limited to location, responsibilities of the job, and alignment with market data. When determining a salary for this role, the following factors may be taken into consideration - contract-specific affordability, education, knowledge, skills, competencies and experience. The estimate displayed represents the salary range for this position and is just one component of Cognosante’s total compensation package for employees. It is not necessarily reflective of actual compensation that may be earned, nor a promise of any specific pay for any specific employee.
Cognosante will not provide sponsorship for employment-based immigration benefits for this position.
What We Promise
Cognosante employees are inspired by our bold mission to improve lives. To achieve this mission, we put our people first. No matter where they're located around the nation, our innovative workplaces enable individuals to apply their skills and experience to work toward a greater good.
We foster a winning culture of solution creators built on innovation, collaboration, flexibility, and work-life balance. And we invest in the next generation of diverse talent to foster an inclusive, progressive, adaptable workplace that prioritizes advancement for all. As an affirmative action employer, we are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.

Your safety during your job search is important. Recruiting communications will always be sent through one of the following corporate domain emails (@cognosante.com or @accurate.com).
We will never send communications through any other domain, including @cognosantecareers.com, @gmail.com or @yahoo.com). We will never request payment from you, nor will we send payment to you, prior to your start date. If you have been asked to send or receive any payment, or if you have any doubt about whether you have been contacted by a Cognosante employee, please contact us at
jobs@cognosante.com",3.5,"Cognosante, LLC",United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,126.0,United States,16.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist - Mid,"$120K
/yr","Join the Nalley Consulting team as a Data Scientist at Reston, VA.

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACTIVE TOP SECRET SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIRED FOR CONSIDERATION.
Positions: Data Scientist - Scientific Support (DCP 1) and Data Scientist - DSS (DCP 2)
LCAT: Mid
Location: Reston, VA
Clearance: TS/SCI and CI poly required

Desired experience: At least 8 years of experience relevant to the specific labor category, with at least a portion of the experience within the last 2 years.

Desired Education: Bachelor’s degree in an area related to the labor category
Qualifications:

Conducts data analytics, data engineering, data mining, exploratory analysis, predictive analysis, and statistical analysis, and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products, enabling more informed analytic decisions.

Proactively retrieves information from various sources, analyzes it for better understanding about the data set, and builds AI tools that automate certain processes.

Duties typically include: creating various ML-based tools or processes, such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems.

Performs statistical analysis, applies data mining techniques, and builds high quality prediction systems.

Should have prior experience with large data Multi-INT analytics, ML, and automated predictive analytics.

Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications, including:
Microsoft Office (Power BI) and Tableau.
Major data science languages, such as R and Python.
Managing and merging of disparate data sources, preferably through R, Python, or SQL.
Statistical analysis.
Data mining algorithms.
Other qualifications:
Understanding of chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, or missile programs.
Demonstrated ability to produce and comply with IC tradecraft standards.
Demonstrate ability to define comprehensive, new, or unique research approaches that enable rigorous assessments to address and contribute to high-level tasks.
Demonstrate in-depth analysis of analytic operations and knowledge management issues across organizational and intra-IC boundaries and clearly articulates key findings.
ABOUT NALLEY CONSULTING
Nalley Consulting is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business working with prime partners to staff Department of Defense and Intelligence Community positions. Created by a U.S. Navy intelligence veteran, Nalley Consulting has grown to include multiple IDIQ vehicles in several states.
Nalley Consulting fringe benefits include:
Excellent medical, dental, and vision benefits
PTO
11 paid federal holidays
Tuition assistance
Paid military-reserve leave
Paid parental leave for birth or adoption
401k matching up to 5 percent of the base salary
Flex time
Company-paid short-term disability, long-term disability, and life insurance.
ZIUW8NSJ7V",5.0,Nalley Consulting,"Reston, VA",1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,120.0,VA,,1,0,0,0,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$179K
/yr","Vimeo AI team is actively seeking a talented and experienced Data Scientist to join our AI applications team. The AI applications team is working as an end to end unit, delivering product solutions from the very beginning of an idea towards the final user experience, where the main expertise is around products that require AI abilities.
You will work alongside a team of passionate engineers and researchers dedicated to transforming the way video is accessed, visualized, and shared.
What you'll do:
Design and develop advanced AI-based video analysis that incorporates multimodal content (audio, visual, and text), tailored specifically for video applications.
Conduct algorithmic research and prototyping, from conceptualizing and evaluating various AI methods to implementing production-ready solutions.
Optimize algorithms and solutions for real-time, large-scale inference capabilities, ensuring peak performance and efficiency.
Stay ahead of the latest advancements in AI/ML technologies and integrate relevant innovations into the development process.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including product management and design, to define and prioritize the AI-related product roadmap. Ensure alignment of AI development goals with broader business objectives.
Skills and knowledge you should possess:
Academic degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or a related field.
4+ years of experience in machine learning, AI, or related fields.
Expertise in natural language processing, deep learning, LLMs and generative models.
Familiarity with engineering operation tools, such as Docker, Jenkins, cloud platforms and services (e.g., AWS, GCP, Azure).
Strong programming skills in Python, ability to write and review production-level code and experience with ML/AI frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, or similar)
Outstanding analytical and problem-solving skills. Ability to understand and work with weakly defined problems, refine definitions and come up with actionable solutions.
Good communication skills and ability to work in a cross-functional team.
Bonus points (nice skills to have, but not needed):
Experience with video analysis.
Targeted Base Salary Range: $142,200 to $216,500
The base salary range listed above is for candidates located in the U.S., including the New York City metro area.
At Vimeo, we strive to hire and nurture amazing talent across the globe. Actual salaries will vary depending on factors including but not limited to experience, specialized skills, internal alignment and a candidate's home base.
Base salary is just one component of Vimeo's total rewards philosophy. We offer a wide range of benefits and perks that appeal to the variety of needs across our diverse employee base! Other rewards may include bonus or commission, Restricted Stock Units (RSUs), paid time off, generous 401k match, wellbeing resources, and more.
#LI-MM1
About Us:
Vimeo (NASDAQ: VMEO) is the world's most innovative video experience platform. We enable anyone to create high-quality video experiences to better connect and bring ideas to life. We proudly serve our community of millions of users – from creative storytellers to globally distributed teams at the world's largest companies – whose videos receive billions of views each month. Learn more at www.vimeo.com.
Vimeo is headquartered in New York City with offices around the world. At Vimeo, we believe our impact is greatest when our workforce of passionate, dedicated people, represents our diverse and global community. We're proud to be an equal opportunity employer where diversity, equity, and inclusion is championed in how we build our products, develop our leaders, and strengthen our culture.",3.7,Vimeo,Remote,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,179.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,CA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II – Engineering R&D Support,"$97K
/yr","Description

A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions which determine the source of disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety.

In North America we have more than 5,000 team members across 11 sites or subsidiaries, including Salt Lake City-based BioFire Diagnostics and one subsidiary in Montreal, Canada. Come be a part of our team and our mission as a Data Scientist!

bioMérieux - Salt Lake City is looking for a talented and engaged Data Scientist to play an integral role in the support of cutting-edge, life-saving medical devices. You will be joining a team that values collaboration, continuous improvement, and a healthy work life balance.
The candidate will be knowledgeable in various aspects of data science, and responsible for performing complex mathematical and/or statistical analysis for projects to support the BioFire Engineering departments. The candidate must have strong analytic and programming skills. The candidate will be embedded in the Data Science department but will have close collaboration with the Software Development and Engineering departments at bioMérieux. Therefore, the candidate must have strong communication skills and a desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.

Studies and Experience:
A minimum of a B.S. in a quantitative discipline: Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Computational Biology
2+ years industry experience as a data scientist, mathematician, or statistician, or 0 years industry experience with a M.S. or PhD in a quantitative discipline.
Programming proficiency in one or more of the following: R, Python, MATLAB, C++, C#, or SQL

Skills and Qualifications:
Good communication, writing, and presentation skills
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Practical experience in any of the following: data visualization, data analytics platforms (e.g., Tableau), data pipelines, data cleaning and processing, probability, statistics, machine learning, image analysis, linear algebra, and optimization methods.",4.0,bioMerieux SA,"Salt Lake City, UT",10000+ Employees,1963.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,97.0,UT,61.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Description
Looking for the opportunity to work on problems that matter, with colleagues that share your interest and expertise in AI and Machine Learning?
The Leidos Corporate Financial Planning & Analysis (FP&A) team is looking for an experienced Data Scientist with an entrepreneur’s mindset to support a new team working on projects to improve our Enterprise financial analytics and forecasting. The position will report to, and collaborate with, the SVP and VP of FP&A in building a Data & Analytics Team within Finance. The position is funded and an immediate fill opportunity.
You should be strongly experienced in Python coding and visualization building skills and have knowledge of commonly used ML libraries (SciKit-learn). Data engineering and ML Ops experience is a plus. We are looking for someone who is intellectually adaptive, likes to collaborate, inquisitive, and capable of conducting original science.
The FP&A Data & Analytics team will collaborate closely with Leidos’ AI Accelerator team which includes junior and senior research/data scientists and data engineers with expertise in information retrieval, UI development, information science, machine learning and artificial intelligence, and statistics.
The Data Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings. The Scientist will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations. The data scientist will partner with business and operational leaders to provide an impact by leveraging data and analytical tools, strategic thinking, and hypothesis-based analysis on machine learning (ML)-based projects. The data scientist is responsible for modeling complex business problems through statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques. Further, they will support senior leadership by creating business insights, reports, and analyses to aid in the decision-making process.
Additional Responsibilities:
Translates business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Performs large-scale experimentation and builds data-driven models to answer business questions
Proactively mines data warehouses to identify trends and patterns and generates insights for business units and senior leadership
Performs large-scale experimentation to identify hidden relationships between variables in large datasets
Researches and implements cutting-edge techniques and tools in machine learning/deep learning/artificial intelligence to make data analysis more efficient
Designs and conducts data analyses with the highest standard of rigor and scientific accuracy; this includes study design, methodology, algorithms, and statistical modeling
Analyzes data provided to identify trends, inform decisions
Supports developmental plans based on data findings related to program, personnel, training needs
Supports development and maintenance of primary program database and run interval reporting
Implements appropriate modeling and data science strategies required to address customer needs
Communicates results and methods for solutions to internal and external stakeholders
Designs, builds, trains, and evaluates machine learning models
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science or related field and over 6 years of relevant experience, Masters with 4 years of experience, or PhD with 2 years of experience.
Strong experience with Python as well as fluency in multiple programming languages and statistical analysis tools such as C++, JavaScript, R, SAS, Excel, SQL, MATLAB, SPSS
Experience /familiarity with frequentist statistics and probability including predicative modeling
Experience with data repositories and reporting tools
Good understanding of machine learning algorithms, tools and platforms
Experience with AI/ML tools, such as common Python packages (e.g., scikit-learn, NumPy, Pandas) and Jupyter notebooks
Experience with time series modeling, causal inference, or probabilistic forecasting models.
Experience with tabular data analysis using languages such as SQL, R, and/or Python
Experience with statistical modeling and data analysis
Understanding of transformers and foundation models
Self-starter with high intellectual curiosity
Great communication skills, able to explain model results to a non-technical audience
Proficient in data exploration techniques and tools
Ability to work in a cross functional team as this position will be under the Finance function but have opportunity to collaborate with the AI Accelerator team
US citizenship is required and able to obtain security clearance if needed
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with data visualization libraries such as Plotly, Streamlit, and matplotlib
Experience with building LLM and other Generative AI applications
Willing to learn new skills and platforms to support data analytics
Candidates will ideally have a specialization in ML or AI
Original Posting Date:
2024-10-04
While subject to change based on business needs, Leidos reasonably anticipates that this job requisition will remain open for at least 3 days with an anticipated close date of no earlier than 3 days after the original posting date as listed above.
Pay Range:
Pay Range $81,250.00 - $146,875.00
The Leidos pay range for this job level is a general guideline only and not a guarantee of compensation or salary. Additional factors considered in extending an offer include (but are not limited to) responsibilities of the job, education, experience, knowledge, skills, and abilities, as well as internal equity, alignment with market data, applicable bargaining agreement (if any), or other law.",3.9,Leidos,Virginia,10000+ Employees,1969.0,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,114.0,Virginia,55.0,1,0,0,0,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$119K
/yr","Sr Data Scientist
Job Description:
***Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. ; Sponsorship is not available for this position.***
Senior Data Scientist, Supply Chain (Technical Demand Planning)
WE CREATE EMPOWERED LEADERS!
Milwaukee Tool is seeking an experienced Senior Data Scientist to join our growing Business Analytics team in Milwaukee, WI. Milwaukee Tool is known for its strong business culture, which is centered around several core values. One of the most important of these values is a focus on innovation and technology. Milwaukee Tool is constantly pushing the boundaries of what is possible with business insights, and the company encourages its employees to think outside the box and come up with new and creative solutions to problems.
Your Role on Our Team
The Senior Data Scientist of Supply Chain is a pivotal role that combines technical expertise in data science to enhance the demand planning process. This role focuses on designing and implementing advanced demand planning tools, leveraging internal and external data to improve forecast models, and automating processes to enhance the overall efficiency and accuracy of the supply chain.
Key Responsibilities:
Enabling and Automating Demand Planning (40%)
Design, develop, and maintain advanced demand planning tools to enable the demand planning team to create accurate forecasts over a rolling 24-month horizon.
Perform ongoing analysis and monitoring of the performance of these tools, identifying significant variances, taking corrective actions, and documenting key assumptions.
Collaborate with sales, marketing, supply chain planning, and other stakeholders to ensure the tools meet their needs and achieve a consensus demand plan.
Support strategic initiatives to improve forecast quality and close identified gaps by enhancing the tools and methodologies used.
Implement and share best practices in demand planning tool development and usage.
System & Data Management (30%)
Implement data-driven solutions using Python (or other tools) and deploy them into production environments.
Perform data cleansing, exploratory data analysis, and data visualization to ensure high-quality inputs for forecasting models.
S&OP Process (20%)
Support the S&OP cycle by providing critical forecasting tools and distributing relevant forecast information to sales and supply chain planning for review.
Publish the consensus demand plan with clear explanations of forecast changes, key business drivers, risks, opportunities, and assumptions.
Develop solutions to connect the demand plan to the supply plan and optimize inventory
Analysis & Reporting (10%)
Provide timely and accurate responses to demand and forecast-related inquiries across the organization.
Develop critical planning tools, key reports, and provide analytical support to Senior Leadership for decision-making.
Complete special projects and ad-hoc requests as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s Degree in Business, Supply Chain Management, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field.
5+ years of experience in planning/forecasting, data science, or a combination thereof.
Demonstrated proficiency in statistical modeling, forecasting methods, and machine learning algorithms.
Strong programming skills in Python, with experience in training and deploying models into production.
Familiarity with Spark and parallel cloud computation.
Proficient in Microsoft Office, especially Excel.
Strong communication and collaboration skills, with the ability to explain complex analyses to technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Experience with data intelligence solutions including reports, dashboards, scorecards, and data visualizations.
Excellent problem-solving skills with a data-driven approach to decision-making.
Experience in manufacturing or similar industries is a plus.
Understanding of DevOps for CI/CD is a plus.
Personal Attributes:
Persuasive communication and interpersonal skills to effectively interact with cross-functional teams.
Strong leadership and facilitation skills to drive consensus and actionable items.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and adapt to changing business needs.
High level of analytical thinking and critical decision-making skills.
Passion for continuous improvement and innovation in demand planning and data science.
This role offers a unique opportunity to blend supply chain expertise with advanced data science techniques to drive significant improvements in forecast accuracy and supply chain efficiency. If you are a proactive and technically skilled professional looking to make a substantial impact, we encourage you to apply.",4.1,Milwaukee Electric Tool Corporation,"Milwaukee, WI",10000+ Employees,1924.0,Company - Public,Consumer Product Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,119.0,WI,100.0,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist - PECNA,"$96K
/yr","Overview: We are proud to announce the establishment of a state-of-the-art Li-ion battery factory, set amidst the beautiful Kansas City Metro. This groundbreaking green-field factory will serve as a pioneering hub for innovation in sustainable energy solutions. Responsibilities:
Summary: We are proud to announce the establishment of a state-of-the-art Li-ion battery factory, set amidst the beautiful Kansas City Metro. This groundbreaking green-field factory will serve as a pioneering hub for innovation in sustainable energy solutions.
If you are enthusiastic about contributing to a sustainable future and being part of a dynamic team shaping the electric vehicle revolution, this opportunity is tailor-made for you. We are seeking dedicated individuals to join us as full-time, on-site team members at our new, ultramodern factory located in the thriving city of DeSoto, Kansas.
Job Summary: The Data Scientist acts as the data analytical expert at the company, creating processes for data modeling and identifying business problems based on highly technical use of all datasets. The Data Scientist will apply advanced statistical methods and modeling to proactively explore key datasets based on business need. This role will define the statistical modeling standards and assist with educating other analyst team members on best practices. Additionally, the Data Scientist will identify gaps in existing data that would lead to further meaningful data insights for business use.
Essential Duties:
Collaborate with other internal and external team members to identify business cases for new analytical model creation.
Create and implement strategy for analytical modeling from start to end based on business need (data access, processing and aggregation and model creation, deployment, and verification)
Develop and implement machine learning models to solve business problems and improve processes.
Apply advanced statistical methods and data modeling processes to create algorithms based on business cases.
Translate ontology-based data contextualization into business benefits.
Verify data models with subject matter experts and monitor the model’s efficacy in production.
Define standard processes for modeling data and train fellow scientists and analysts on best practices for data model creation.
Function as subject matter expert for advanced analytical techniques (statistical analytics, machine learning, deep learning, etc.)
Explore areas of gaps in existing datasets for kickstarting new data acquisition projects based on business case.
Research and monitor new related technologies and systems and develop strategies for implementing advanced analytical modeling for business use.
Ensure data analysis and reporting processes comply with industry standards and regulations related to battery manufacturing and safety.
Personal Protective Equipment (PPE) Requirements:
To ensure the health and safety in the workplace and for the protection of our employee’s, wearing PPE is a possibility and may include equipment such as a full Tyvek suit, safety shoes, gloves, safety glasses, face mask, bump cap, and a full hazmat suit that includes a respirator.
The foregoing description is not intended and should not be construed to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, skills and efforts or work conditions associated with the job. It is intended to be an accurate reflection of the general nature and level of the job.
Qualifications: Requirements - Required and/or Preferred
Education:
Basic/Required: Bachelor’s Degree in quantitative field (Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Information Systems, etc.).
Preferred: Masters degree
Essential Qualifications:
Minimum of 5+ years of professional experience in Data science, Machine Learning, or related field
Experience working with big datasets in the following stages: acquisition, aggregation, analysis, and visualization at semiconductor/manufacturing industry.
Expert understanding and knowledge in algorithms and advanced statistics
Experience with advanced analytical techniques (statistical analytics, machine learning, deep learning, etc.)
Experience with Big Data technologies: Hadoop, Spark, or similar.
Programming skills for data science required (SQL, Python, R, Java, etc.)
Familiarity with machine learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, or scikit-learn.
Knowledge of cloud platforms: AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud.
Experience with developing data modeling processes and critical thinking mindset
Must be able to learn and understand equipment capabilities, operation flow, and data flow logics.
Excellent oral and written communication skills required, ability to describe technical theory to technical and non-technical audience.
Preferred Qualifications:
Able to work independently and in a team environment, as well as with cross-functional groups.
Resilient, self-motived and able to work well under pressure.
Alignment to Panasonic’s seven (7) core principles (contribution to society, fairness and honesty, cooperation and team spirit, untiring effort for improvement, courtesy and humility, adaptability, gratitude)
Knowledge of manufacturing, smart factories.
Preferred License(s):
None
Preferred Certification(s):
None
Physical Demands:
Physical Activities: (Percentage of time (equaling 100%) during the normal workday the employee is required to)
Sit: 20%
Walk: 50%
Stand: 20%
Lift: 10%
Required Lifting and Carrying: (Required frequency is: Not required (0%), Occasional (1-33%), Frequent (34-66%, Continuous (67-100%)
Up to 10 lbs.: Occasional
Up to 20 lbs.: Occasional
Up to 35 lbs.: Occasional
Team-lift only (over 35 lbs.): Occasional
About Us: At the heart of this visionary project, Panasonic is committed to manufacturing innovative cylindrical lithium-ion cells that will power the future of electric mobility. These cells will be meticulously crafted to meet the growing demands of the automotive industry, supporting various electric vehicle manufacturers in their quest for eco-friendly transportation solutions.
This role presents a unique chance to be at the forefront of innovation, working within a forward-thinking organization that is committed to environmental responsibility and the advancement of green technology. Be a part of our mission to power the future and make a difference in the world of electric mobility with Panasonic!
Supplemental Information: Pre-employment drug testing is required. Due to the high volume of responses, we will only be able to respond to candidates of interest. All candidates must have valid authorization to work in the U.S. without restriction.
Panasonic is an Equal Opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by law. All qualified individuals are required to perform the essential functions of the job with or without reasonable accommodation.
Thank you for your interest in Panasonic Energy Corporation of North America.",3.7,PECNA Panasonic Energy Corporation of North America,"De Soto, KS",1001 to 5000 Employees,1918.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,96.0,KS,106.0,1,0,1,1,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","About Rivian:
Rivian is on a mission to keep the world adventurous forever. This goes for the emissions-free Electric Adventure Vehicles we build, and the curious, courageous souls we seek to attract.

As a company, we constantly challenge what’s possible, never simply accepting what has always been done. We reframe old problems, seek new solutions and operate comfortably in areas that are unknown. Our backgrounds are diverse, but our team shares a love of the outdoors and a desire to protect it for future generations.
Role Summary:
The Sr. Data Scientist will be responsible for designing and developing dashboards to monitor and analyze factory quality metrics. This role will involve collecting, processing, and interpreting data to identify trends, issues, and opportunities for improvement. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in data engineering, experience with data visualization tools, and a passion for driving quality improvements in a manufacturing environment.
Responsibilities:
Dashboard Design and Development:
Design, develop, and maintain interactive and visually appealing dashboards to monitor factory quality metrics.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand their requirements and translate them into effective data visualizations.
Ensure dashboards provide actionable insights for decision-makers at various levels of the organization.
Data Collection and Processing:
Gather data from various sources, including factory equipment, ERP systems, and quality control processes.
Clean, preprocess, and transform data to ensure accuracy and reliability.
Develop and maintain ELT (Extract, Load, Transform) pipelines to streamline data integration.
Analysis and Reporting:
Analyze quality metrics to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Generate reports and presentations to communicate findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Provide ongoing support and updates to dashboards based on user feedback and changing requirements.
Collaboration and Change Management:
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including production, quality control, and software teams, to drive improvements based on data insights.
Advocate for data-driven decision making and foster a culture of continuous improvement.
Provide training and support to users to maximize the effectiveness of dashboards and reports.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Engineering, or a related field.
5+ years proven experience as a Data Engineer or similar role, with a focus on data visualization and dashboard development.
Proficiency in data visualization tools such as Hex, Tableau, Power BI, or similar platforms.
Familiarity with ELT tools and processes.
Strong SQL skills; Knowledge of programming languages such as Python or R is a plus.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong communication and collaboration abilities.
Experience with vehicle software, connected systems and/or manufacturing environments is preferred but not required.
Company Statements:
Equal Opportunity
Rivian is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information or characteristics, physical or mental disability, marital/domestic partner status, age, military/veteran status, medical condition, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Rivian is committed to ensuring that our hiring process is accessible for persons with disabilities. If you have a disability or limitation, such as those covered by the Americans with Disabilities Act, that requires accommodations to assist you in the search and application process, please email us at candidateaccommodations@rivian.com.
Candidate Data Privacy
Rivian may collect, use and disclose your personal information or personal data (within the meaning of the applicable data protection laws) when you apply for employment and/or participate in our recruitment processes (“Candidate Personal Data”). This data includes contact, demographic, communications, educational, professional, employment, social media/website, network/device, recruiting system usage/interaction, security and preference information. Rivian may use your Candidate Personal Data for the purposes of (i) tracking interactions with our recruiting system; (ii) carrying out, analyzing and improving our application and recruitment process, including assessing you and your application and conducting employment, background and reference checks; (iii) establishing an employment relationship or entering into an employment contract with you; (iv) complying with our legal, regulatory and corporate governance obligations; (v) recordkeeping; (vi) ensuring network and information security and preventing fraud; and (vii) as otherwise required or permitted by applicable law.

Rivian may share your Candidate Personal Data with (i) internal personnel who have a need to know such information in order to perform their duties, including individuals on our People Team, Finance, Legal, and the team(s) with the position(s) for which you are applying; (ii) Rivian affiliates; and (iii) Rivian’s service providers, including providers of background checks, staffing services, and cloud services.

Rivian may transfer or store internationally your Candidate Personal Data, including to or in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, and the European Union and in the cloud, and this data may be subject to the laws and accessible to the courts, law enforcement and national security authorities of such jurisdictions.

Please see our Candidate Data Privacy Notice for more information.

Please note that we are currently not accepting applications from third party application services.

To any candidates interested in a position with Rivian, please be aware of recruiting phishing scams impersonating Rivian. As a general practice, Rivian recruiting does not conduct interviews or communicate with candidates over Microsoft Teams.

Please visit Rivian’s Careers page for career opportunities at Rivian. If you believe you may have been a victim of identity theft because of the phishing scam impersonating Rivian, please go to www.IdentityTheft.gov where you can report and recover from identity theft. For more information about recommended computer security practices, please go to resources on the FTC’s consumer information site where you can learn how to protect yourselves online and avoid phishing attacks.",3.4,Rivian,"Normal, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,2009.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,125.0,IL,15.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Science / AI Engineer,"$133K
/yr","Introduction
ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market, and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.
Job Mission
The EUV Source team in San Diego operates in a fast-paced, uniquely innovative, and challenging environment to deliver new-to-industry products supporting the commercialization of EUV technology by ASML. The Data Science/AI Engineer will be part of the EUV Source Performance team within ASML San Diego. Due to high complexity of the EUV light source, we, as Source Performance, are a dedicated team with the mission to validate and ensure that EUV sources meet or exceed customer performance requirements and expectations. In order to execute this mission, EUV Source Performance acts as the critical enabler of knowledge acquisition and transfer throughout the products development process, via:
Substantive participation in the technology development and system definition process for products in definition and early development stage.
Ensuring quality of the module to sub-system to system-level performance testing and validation for the products in integration phase.
Driving technology improvements enabling new products field release and refinement of system specifications based upon deep understanding of factory and field performance.
The creation and delivery of analytic tooling, action plans and procedures to drive maximum solving power of our customer support organizations for sustaining products.
The Data Science/AI Engineer will be an individual contributor on a team responsible for extracting the highest business value possible from the data available. This person will also refine requirements towards the data engineering team to ensure a rich and complete dataset is available for consumption and may be required to execute some data engineering work themselves. This role is part of a team aiming to further develop the site’s data science and AI competence. The person in this role will be responsible for executing the data science and AI work needed to further advance ASML’s capability to learn quickly and advise product changes that benefit the overall performance of the EUV light source. These projects include physics based model development, machine learning, Gen-AI, reduced order models, and the development of digital twins representing the EUV source, its sub-components, and the factory.
The role requires a willingness to develop a deep understanding across multiple engineering disciplines beyond data science in order to be effective. To be successful, the candidate must combine strong technical skills, problem solving and numerical analysis skills, and desire for life-long learning. In addition, to be effective in the role, candidates must possess interpersonal skills to cross functional boundaries and to build constructive and effective relationships across the organization and promote cross-functional and cross-sector collaboration.
Duties and Responsibilities
Contribute towards the technical roadmap representing the data science and AI activities of the site that supports the product roadmap and aligns with business objectives
Participate in the end-to-end AI and data science lifecycle, from data collection and preprocessing to model deployment and monitoring. Collaborate with other engineers in the best applications of data science solutions for various complex problems we are trying to resolve.
Apply theoretical models, concepts, methods, and novel experimental techniques to quantitatively interpret performance of EUV source systems across a wide range of issues and multiple technical disciplines.
Produce clear, concise technical documentation in defined company formats, present results and align with cross-functional teams.
Work closely with cross-functional groups (systems engineering, development engineering, scientists, IT, global customer support personnel, manufacturing personnel, senior management, marketing, external customers) to set clear technical direction and achievable milestones.
Travel as required to both customer sites and other ASML sites for the purposes of reporting, alignment, and collaboration.
Complete service, expense reports, and other administrative responsibilities in accordance with ASML’s procedures and with supervisor’s approval.
Other duties as assigned.
Education and experience
MS in Computer Science, Data Science, or Machine Learning. PhD preferred. Candidates with a degree in Physics that have specialized their careers in data science will also be considered.
Must have a minimum of 3 years’ experience in a similar role.
Experience in the semiconductor industry a plus.
Skills
Must have significant experience working in the following cloud and development environments: Azure Kubernetes Service (AKS), Google Distributed Cloud Edge (GDCE), Apache Spark, Azure Databricks, Python, MATLAB, and related technologies. Additionally, proficiency with MLFlow for managing the end-to-end machine learning lifecycle, including experimentation, reproducibility, and deployment, is required.
The ideal candidate will have extensive experience in designing and implementing machine learning and deep learning architectures. This includes:
Developing and optimizing neural network architectures using frameworks such as TensorFlow and PyTorch.
Implementing scalable machine learning models and algorithms in a cloud-based environment.
Experience with Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision, and other AI domains.
Knowledge of model deployment and serving strategies, including the use of containerization technologies such as Docker and Kubernetes.
Proficiency in using GPU and TPU hardware accelerators for deep learning training and inference.
Experience in monitoring and maintaining the performance of deployed models to ensure they meet business and technical requirements.”
Understanding of the concept of large complex system integration and practices.
Understanding of the concepts of optics and lasers, plasma generation, and control systems.
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills.
Excellent inter-personal and customer service skills, with an advanced understanding of customer relationship building.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to reduce large amounts of data, create a concise summary, and effectively report results through written and/or graphical formats.
Ability to define and execute tasks based on project descriptions with minimum or no supervision.
Other Information
This position is located in San Diego, CA. It works on a hybrid schedule of 3 days onsite/2 days remote. It requires onsite presence to attend in-person work-related events, trainings and meetings and to further ensure teamwork, collaboration and innovation.
Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability
Potential candidates will meet the education and experience requirements provided on the above job description and excel in completing the listed responsibilities for this role. All candidates receiving an offer of employment must successfully complete a background check band any other tests that may be required.
The current base annual salary range for this role is currently:
$0-0
Pay scales are determined by role, level, location and alignment with market data. Individual pay is determined through interviews and an assessment of several factors that that are unique to each candidate, including but not limited to job-related skills, relevant education and experience, certifications, abilities of the candidate and pay relative to other team members.
The Company offers employees and their families, medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees are able to participate in the Company’s 401k plan. Employees will also receive eight (8) hours of vacation leave every month and (13) paid holidays throughout the calendar year. For more information, please contact the Recruiter or click on this link Compensation & Benefits in the US.
All new ASML jobs have a minimum application deadline of 10 days.
This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the United States Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
Diversity and inclusion
ASML is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values and respects the importance of a diverse and inclusive workforce. It is the policy of the company to recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job titles without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, or gender identity. We recognize that diversity and inclusion is a driving force in the success of our company.
Need to know more about applying for a job at ASML? Read our frequently asked questions.
Request an Accommodation
ASML provides reasonable accommodations to applicants for ASML employment and ASML employees with disabilities. An accommodation is a change in work rules, facilities, or conditions which enable an individual with a disability to apply for a job, perform the essential functions of a job, and/or enjoy equal access to the benefits and privileges of employment. If you are in need of an accommodation to complete an application, participate in an interview, or otherwise participate in the employee pre-selection process, please send an email to USHR_Accommodation@asml.com to initiate the company’s reasonable accommodation process.
Please note: This email address is solely intended to provide a method for applicants to initiate ASML’s process to request accommodation(s). Any recruitment questions should be directed to the designated Talent Acquisition member for the position.",4.1,ASML,"San Diego, CA",10000+ Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,133.0,CA,40.0,1,0,1,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$125K
/yr","Become a part of our caring community and help us put health first
Growth Analytics & AI within Humana is dedicated to transforming members’ journeys and Humana’s services using technology and analytics. We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist who will utilize cutting-edge AI, NLP, GenAI techniques, build predictive modeling, test rigorous hypotheses, design studies, and turn data into actionable insights. Being part of a talented team of Data Scientists with broad skills and applications, the Senior Data Scientist will work cross-functionally and collaboratively with teams across the enterprise through innovative AI, machine learning, and R&D platforms. The scope of our work includes forecasting, predictive modeling, designing business experiments, and ROI studies. The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience with healthcare data, demonstrated innovative, and creative methods for overcoming testing constraints, as well as successfully applying AI, NLP, GenAI, and machine learning techniques to address business needs.
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The Senior Data Scientist’s work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
The Senior Data Scientist develops, maintains, and collects structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting. Creates reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics. Exercises considerable latitude in determining objectives and approaches to assignments.

Use your skills to make an impact
This is a unique opportunity for a motivated individual to influence Humana’s vision to provide coordinated, integrated member journey via multiple innovative solutions. The Senior Data Scientist creates reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics. This role influences department’s strategy, contributes to the decision making on complex issues regarding technical approach for project components, and works on model building use cases with minimal supervision. Exercises considerable latitude in determining objectives and approaches to assignments. As a Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Develop and validate machine learning and statistical models, predictions, reports, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
Develop, maintain, and collect structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
Research and evaluate innovative analytical methodologies, approaches, and solutions
Collaborate with analytics and data teams to set objectives, approaches, and work plans
Interpret and communicate analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners
Understand department, segment, and organizational strategy and operating objectives, including their linkages to related areas
Compile and present regular and ad-hoc project status reports
Follow established guidelines/procedures
Required Qualifications
Master’s Degree in a quantitative discipline, such as Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related quantitative field
3+ years of experience in advanced data analytics
Demonstrated experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors with Python, R, SAS, SQL, DataRobot or similar statistical and scripting tools
Experience developing and validating machine learning and statistical forecasting models or predictive models, including Random Forest, Gradient Boosting, Neural Networks, cluster analysis, regression analysis, time series, and forecasting
Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
Experience interpreting and communicating analytic results to analytical and non-analytical business partners
Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
Naturally curious and comfortable with ambiguity and demonstrate critical thinking
Clear and concise verbal and written communication skills, with a proven ability to translate complex methodologies and analytical results to non-technical business insights
Strong interpersonal and consulting skills
Preferred Qualifications
PhD in a quantitative discipline, such as Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics or Statistics and/or related quantitative field
Healthcare or managed care experience
Experience in Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Experience developing and tuning LLM applications, utilizing GPT, LLAMA, or other models
Experience in health economics, test & learn, and/or experiment design
Experience building large-scale predictive models
Experience building visualization and reports using Tableau or Power BI
Experience in Big Data environment specifically PySpark and/or Databricks
Experience in cloud computing, Azure or AWS
Experience in deep learning and recommendation
Experience in cost of care and trend analysis
Actuarial background or experience
Work-At-Home Requirements
To ensure Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees’ ability to work effectively, the self-provided internet service of Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees must meet the following criteria:
At minimum, a download speed of 25 Mbps and an upload speed of 10 Mbps is recommended; wireless, wired cable or DSL connection is suggested
Satellite, cellular and microwave connection can be used only if approved by leadership
Employees who live and work from Home in the state of California, Illinois, Montana, or South Dakota will be provided a bi-weekly payment for their internet expense.
Humana will provide Home or Hybrid Home/Office employees with telephone equipment appropriate to meet the business requirements for their position/job.
Work from a dedicated space lacking ongoing interruptions to protect member PHI / HIPAA information
#LI-WG1
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Pay Range
The compensation range below reflects a good faith estimate of starting base pay for full time (40 hours per week) employment at the time of posting. The pay range may be higher or lower based on geographic location and individual pay will vary based on demonstrated job related skills, knowledge, experience, education, certifications, etc.
$104,800 - $144,300 per year
This job is eligible for a bonus incentive plan. This incentive opportunity is based upon company and/or individual performance.
Description of Benefits
Humana, Inc. and its affiliated subsidiaries (collectively, “Humana”) offers competitive benefits that support whole-person well-being. Associate benefits are designed to encourage personal wellness and smart healthcare decisions for you and your family while also knowing your life extends outside of work. Among our benefits, Humana provides medical, dental and vision benefits, 401(k) retirement savings plan, time off (including paid time off, company and personal holidays, volunteer time off, paid parental and caregiver leave), short-term and long-term disability, life insurance and many other opportunities.

About us
Humana Inc. (NYSE: HUM) is committed to putting health first – for our teammates, our customers and our company. Through our Humana insurance services and CenterWell healthcare services, we make it easier for the millions of people we serve to achieve their best health – delivering the care and service they need, when they need it. These efforts are leading to a better quality of life for people with Medicare, Medicaid, families, individuals, military service personnel, and communities at large.

Equal Opportunity Employer
It is the policy of Humana not to discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability or veteran status. It is also the policy of Humana to take affirmative action to employ and to advance in employment, all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability or protected veteran status, and to base all employment decisions only on valid job requirements. This policy shall apply to all employment actions, including but not limited to recruitment, hiring, upgrading, promotion, transfer, demotion, layoff, recall, termination, rates of pay or other forms of compensation and selection for training, including apprenticeship, at all levels of employment.

Not Specified
0",3.8,Humana,Remote,10000+ Employees,1961.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,125.0,Remote,63.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Duties
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Develop and oversee computational algorithms and statistical methods to analyze data and find relationships and patterns in large volumes of data.
Analyze unique and highly specialized datasets using a variety of data analytic tools.
Ensure software architecture and data pipeline usage is in compliance with Federal requirements and regulations.
Recommend algorithms or tools to support the design and build of scalable data pipelines.
Develop, modify, and provide recommendations on data visualization, scientific and technical Artificial Intelligence (AI), and other data science tools (e.g., machine learning
Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a U.S. Citizen or National.
This employer participates in the e-Verify program.
If you are a male applicant born after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. See www.sss.gov.
If selected, your appointment may be subject to a suitability or fitness determination, as determined by a completed background investigation.
If selected, you may be required to complete a one year probationary period.
These positions are to be filled under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Inflation Reduction Act or Scientific, Technical, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) direct hire authority.
A preliminary background check must be completed before a new employee can begin work. Current Federal employees or other individuals with an existing completed background investigation may not be required to undergo another background check.
This position is included in a Bargaining Unit.
Qualifications
BASIC REQUIREMENT:
Degree: Mathematics, statistics, computer science, data science or field directly related to the position. The degree must be in a major field of study (at least at the baccalaureate level) that is appropriate for the position.
OR
Combination of education and experience: Courses equivalent to a major field of study (30 semester hours) as shown in paragraph A above, plus additional education or appropriate experience.


GS-12 SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level GS-11 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as meeting 2out of 3 of the following:
Identifying and analyzing advancements in application development concepts, techniques, and tools;
Utilizing data tools and techniques to process large, datasets into structured formats for matching, analysis, or estimation;
Assisting with coding in various programming languages (such as Python or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
GS-13 SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower grade level GS-12 in the Federal service. Specialized experience for this position is defined as meeting 2out of 3 of the following:
Designing and developing data analytics/science related products using techniques such as machine learning, natural language processing, robotics process automation, and artificial intelligence;
Conducting analysis using software and/or programming languages such as Python or Java to test hypotheses and predict outcomes;
Using data tools and techniques to process large datasets into structured formats for matching, analysis, or estimation

""Experience"" refers to paid and unpaid experience. Examples of qualifying unpaid experience may include: volunteer work done through National Service programs (such as Peace Corps and AmeriCorps); as well as work for other community-based philanthropic and social organizations. Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills; and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

CTAP/ICTAP candidates: To be considered ""well qualified"" you must meet all of the requirements as described in this section.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date of this announcement.
Education
This vacancy has a positive education requirement. In order to be rated as qualified, you must provide copies of your college transcripts. Failure to provide copies of your college transcripts may result in a rating of ""Ineligible"". Education must be obtained from an accredited institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. Foreign education must be reviewed by an organization recognized by the U.S. Department of Education. For special instructions pertaining to foreign education and a list of organizations that can evaluate foreign education, see the Department of Education website.
Additional information
The U.S. Department of Energy fosters a diverse and inclusive workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
This job opportunity announcement may be used to fill additional similar vacancies across DOE.
For general information on government-wide Telework polices visit: www.telework.gov
Hiring incentives may be authorized in accordance with agency policy and if funding is available.
EEO Policy: https://www.energy.gov/justice/eeo-complaint-process
Reasonable Accommodation Policy: https://www.energy.gov/hc/department-energy-reasonable-accommodation-program
Veterans Information: https://www.energy.gov/careers/veterans-military-spouses
Selective Service Registration: http://www.sss.gov/
The Fair Chance Act prohibits specific inquiries concerning an applicant's criminal or credit background unless the hiring agency has made a conditional offer of employment to the applicant. An applicant may submit a complaint to the agency within 30 calendar days of the date of alleged noncompliance by completing the Fair Chance Act Intake Form and submitting it to the Administrative Investigations Program at AdministrativeInvestigations@hq.doe.gov.

Benefits
A career with the U.S. government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
This position is announced under a government-wide Direct-Hire Authority (DHA) for Data Scientist positions in the 1560 series. Under the DHA, applicants who meet the Education and Qualification requirements listed in this announcement will be referred for consideration. Veteran's Preference, category rating, and traditional rating and ranking of applicants do not apply under the DHA process.
Appointments made under the DHA are processed as ""new"" appointments. Current Federal employees may be required to serve a new probationary period (5 CFR 315.802(b).
Successful candidates will possess the following competencies (knowledge, skills, abilities and other characteristics):
Data Management
Database Administration
Reasoning
Research
Technology Application


Career Transition Assistance Programs: If you are eligible for career transition assistance, such as ICTAP or CTAP, you must meet the Education and Qualification requirements to be referred for consideration.

Shared Certificates: The Department of Energy shares lists of applicants among its internal Departmental Elements and organizations. You may be referred for consideration to other DOE Hiring Managers throughout the Department for more than one position based on this application. By applying to this announcement, you understand your application materials may be shared with multiple Hiring Mangers throughout DOE. If additional positions are filled from this announcement conditions of employment may differ. You will be notified if you are referred for additional positions.

You must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date (11/07/2024) of this announcement.

To preview the Assessment Questionnaire, click https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/12576965
Benefits
A career with the U.S. government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Required Documents
As a new or existing federal employee, you and your family may have access to a range of benefits. Your benefits depend on the type of position you have - whether you're a permanent, part-time, temporary or an intermittent employee. You may be eligible for the following benefits, however, check with your agency to make sure you're eligible under their policies.
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:
Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement.Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted. Do not provide photos or list a Social Security Number or date of birth on any attachment.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
How to Apply
Please read the entire announcement and all the instructions before you begin an application. To apply for this position, you must complete the initial online application, to include submission of the required documentation specified in the Required Documents section. A complete application package must be submitted by 11:59 PM (EST) on the announcement closing date to receive consideration. The application process is as follows:
Click the Apply Online button.
Answer the questions presented in the application and attach all required and supporting documentation.
Click the Submit Application button prior to 11:59 pm (ET) on 11/07/2024.
To update your application, including supporting documentation: During the announcement open period, return to your USAJOBS account, find your application record, and click Edit my application. This option will no longer be available once the announcement has closed.


To verify the status of your application, during and after the announcement open period, log into your USAJOBS account; applications will appear on the Welcome screen. The Application Status will appear along with the date your application was last updated. For information on what each application status means, visit: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/how-to/application/status/.

If you need help with login.gov or USAJOBS (e.g., account access, Resume Builder) visit the USAJOBS Help Center: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/

If you experience difficulty applying on USAJOBS, after clicking the Apply Online button, or you are experiencing a significant hardship hindering your ability to apply online, the Agency Contact listed in the announcement can assist you during normal business hours. If you receive any system error messages, take screenshots if possible, to aid technical support.
Agency contact information
Kelsey Hince
Phone
240-220-4551
Email
kelsey.hince@hc.doe.gov
Address
Office of Science - Office of Scientific and Technical Information
Department of Energy
Human Capital Shared Service Center
1000 Independence Ave, SW
Washington, DC 20585
US
Next steps
Once you submit your online application, you will receive a confirmation notification by email that your submission was successful. After the closing of the announcement, if your self-assessment responses place you as an eligible candidate for referral, we will refer your name to the hiring official, you may be contacted directly for a possible interview. We will notify you of the status of your Application Package at the time candidates are referred for consideration, and when the selection process is complete.

If you are interested in being added to our Schedule A or 30% or more Disabled Veterans repository, please submit your information by using the below links.

https://www.usajobs.gov/job/789178500 - 30 Percent or More Disabled Veteran Repository 2024 for Department of Energy

https://www.usajobs.gov/job/789179000 - Schedule A Repository 2024 for Department of Energy
Fair and Transparent
The Federal hiring process is set up to be fair and transparent. Please read the following guidance.
Criminal history inquiries
Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Policy
Financial suitability
New employee probationary period
Privacy Act
Reasonable accommodation policy
Selective Service
Signature and false statements
Social security number request
Required Documents
To apply for this position, you MUST provide a complete application package which includes:
Your RESUME showing all relevant work experience (paid and unpaid) including: duties performed; full name and address of the each employer; start and end dates (month/day/year); work schedule (part-time, full-time, number of hours if intermittent); salary; and any completed education and training (program title, subject area, number of hours completed, and completion date).
Cover Letter, optional, expressing additional information not covered in your resume.
Transcripts, if specific educational requirements are indicated in this job announcement.Unofficial transcripts or any report listing institution, course title, credits earned (semester or quarter hour) and final grade is acceptable. It is your responsibility to provide adequate proof that you meet the educational requirements.
Career Transition Assistance Program/Interagency Career Transition Assistance Program documentation, if applicable(e.g., Certification of Expected Separation, Reduction-In-Force Separation Notice, or Notice of Proposed Removal; SF-50 that documents the RIF separation action; and most recent performance appraisal.) For more information see the OPM Guide to Career Transition.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted. Do not provide photos or list a Social Security Number or date of birth on any attachment.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.

Help
This job is open to
The public
U.S. Citizens, Nationals or those who owe allegiance to the U.S.
Military spouses
Clarification from the agency
U.S. citizens or U.S. Nationals; no prior Federal experience is required. Please read this Public Notice in its entirety prior to submitting your application for consideration.",4.3,US Department of Energy - Agency Wide,"Oak Ridge, TN",10000+ Employees,1977.0,Government,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,111.0,TN,47.0,1,0,0,0,0
"Analyst, Data Scientist","$97K
/yr","FS Investments is looking for a motivated Data Scientist to join our Data Strategy team. The selected candidate will be a member of the Data Strategy team, which is responsible for supporting the firm's Investment Management, Distribution & Marketing organizations. This role will have a focus on analytical modeling, working with key business stakeholders to derive value from various data sources.
Data Strategy is an interdisciplinary team that spans FS Investments. Made up of data science, analytics, and business domain experts, we are at the forefront of implementing data-driven strategies across the organization. We focus on delivering the platforms, analytical solutions and services that enhance User productivity and maximize business value.
**This is an on-site role with a minimum of 4 days in-office. Must be able to commute within the greater Philadelphia area.
The successful candidate is expected to:
Work as an integral part of the Data Strategy team, by learning to leverage our platform to perform analysis and derive key insights from our data.
Use statistical and machine learning (ML) techniques to create robust investment and distribution solutions.
Develop skills and participate in training to become proficient with our data science platform.
Participate in the evolution of the strategic vision for ML/AI at FS Investments.
Research and implement relevant ML and statistical approaches.
Contribute to the development and improvement of existing codebases, pipelines, and models.
Document code, algorithms, and processes for effective knowledge sharing and reproducibility.
Stay connected and current with the latest developments in data science and present findings to team members.
Work closely with key business stakeholders, data scientists, and analytics professionals to understand project requirements, develop ML models and algorithms, and contribute to the translation of prototypes into production systems.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in math, physics, logic, philosophy, or a related scientific discipline with a minimum of 2-4 years of practical experience in data science; an advanced degree in data science is a plus.
Basic understanding of data cleaning, feature engineering, model development and evaluation.
Familiarity with common ML frameworks and libraries, such as TensorFlow/Pytorch, Scikit-learn, Numpy, Pandas, etc.
Solid programming skills in Python and the ability to write clean, efficient, and well-documented code.
Experience working in an Agile environment.
Self-motivated team-player, good communicator, embraces challenges, and keen to learn.
Preferred understanding of ML methods and Statistics, including MLOps lifecycle and associated challenges at each stage of development.
Preferred knowledge and hands on experience with deep learning architectures and frameworks.
Passionate about learning new AI/ML skills and staying updated with the latest developments in the field.

FS Investments: 30 years of leadership in private markets
FS Investments is an alternative asset manager dedicated to delivering attractive returns across private equity, private credit and real estate. Following its 2023 acquisition of Portfolio Advisors, FS Investments now manages over $80 billion for both institutional and wealth management clients around the world, drawing on 30 years of experience and more than 500 employees operating across nine global offices.
The firm's investment professionals manage a wide range of differentiated strategies across private markets and collectively manage relationships with 300+ sponsors. FS Investments' active partnership model creates a virtuous cycle of superior market insights and deal flow, which inform the underwriting process and help to generate strong returns.
FS is an Equal Opportunity Employer.

FS Investments does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or search firms. Any resume or referral submitted in the absence of a signed agreement is property of FS Investments and no fee will be paid.",4.0,FS Investments,"Philadelphia, PA",201 to 500 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,97.0,PA,17.0,1,0,0,0,0
Senior AI Data Scientist,"$187K
/yr","Empowering players to create is an exciting future for the gaming industry. At Electronic Arts we have many examples of players creating content, whether it be a skateboard park in Skate or fantastical mansions in the Sims 4. The future definitely has our players being more empowered to create with their imagination being the only limit.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to help shape the future of content creation and gameplay with AI. If you have the right expertise and are interested we want to hear from you!
As a Senior AI Data Scientist you will:
Build, fine-tune and implement AI and machine learning models to solve challenging problems
Ensure AI and machine learning production pipelines are scalable, repeatable and cloud agnostic
Apply current and emerging techniques in deep learning, natural language processing and other machine learning areas
Collect, clean, manage, analyze and visualize large sets of data using multiple data platforms, tools and technique
Work in partnership with game teams to integrate AI solutions into products and services.
Optimize and fine-tune AI models for performance and scalability. Analyze and interpret data to extract meaningful insights and improve AI models.
Document and present findings and solutions to stakeholders.
Desired qualifications and experience:
A minimum of 3+ years of experience in data science
PhD or MSc in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or related field
Strong expertise in deep learning, fluent in Python and SQL
Expertise in automating machine learning models and building end to end products
Experience with devops tools and principles (Git, CI/CD, Docker)
Effective within Cloud environments (GCP, AWS)
Understanding of containerization and orchestration technologies (Docker, Kubernetes, etc.
Ceci ne s’applique pas au Québec.

COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

The base salary ranges listed below are for the defined geographic market pay zones in these locations. If you reside outside of these locations, a recruiter will advise on the range and benefits for your specific location.

EA has listed the base salary ranges it in good faith expects to pay applicants for this role in the locations listed, as of the time of this posting. Pay offered will be determined based on numerous relevant business and candidate factors including, for example, education, qualifications, certifications, experience, skills, geographic location, and business or organizational needs.



BASE SALARY RANGES

California (depending on location e.g. Los Angeles vs. Sacramento):
º $161,100 - $239,700 USD Annually
New York (depending on location e.g. Manhattan vs. Buffalo):
º $142,900 - $239,700 USD Annually
Jersey City, NJ :
º $187,400 - $239,700 USD Annually
Colorado (depending on location e.g. Denver vs. Colorado Springs):
º $153,100 - $206,200 USD Annually
Washington (depending on location e.g. Seattle vs. Spokane):
º $142,900 - $230,000 USD Annually
British Columbia (depending on location e.g. Vancouver vs. Victoria):
º $133,400 - $193,200 CAN Annually

Base salary is just one part of the overall compensation at EA. In the US, we offer a package of benefits including paid time off (3 weeks per year to start), 80 hours per year of sick time, 16 paid company holidays per year, 10 weeks paid time off to bond with baby, medical/dental/vision insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, and 401(k) to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity. For British Columbia, we offer a package of benefits including vacation (3 weeks per year to start), 10 days per year of sick time, paid top-up to EI/QPIP benefits up to 100% of base salary when you welcome a new child (12 weeks for maternity, and 4 weeks for parental/adoption leave), extended health/dental/vision coverage, life insurance, disability insurance, retirement plan to regular full-time employees. Certain roles may also be eligible for bonus and equity.

Electronic Arts creates next-level entertainment experiences that inspire players and fans around the world. Here, everyone is part of the story. Part of a community that connects across the globe. A place where creativity thrives, new perspectives are invited, and ideas matter. A team where everyone makes play happen.",4.1,Electronic Arts,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1982.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,187.0,WA,42.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$143K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 2 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 1 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.
Currently has, or is in the process of obtaining a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience. Degree must be completed prior to joining Meta.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$114,000/year to $171,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,143.0,WA,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Risk Data Scientist,"$120K
/yr","Thank you for your interest in a career at Regions. At Regions, we believe associates deserve more than just a job. We believe in offering performance-driven individuals a place where they can build a career --- a place to expect more opportunities. If you are focused on results, dedicated to quality, strength and integrity, and possess the drive to succeed, then we are your employer of choice.

Regions is dedicated to taking appropriate steps to safeguard and protect private and personally identifiable information you submit. The information that you submit will be collected and reviewed by associates, consultants, and vendors of Regions in order to evaluate your qualifications and experience for job opportunities and will not be used for marketing purposes, sold, or shared outside of Regions unless required by law. Such information will be stored in accordance with regulatory requirements and in conjunction with Regions’ Retention Schedule for a minimum of three years. You may review, modify, or update your information by visiting and logging into the careers section of the system.

Job Description:
At Regions, the Risk Data Scientist researches, models, implements, and validates algorithms (predictive and prescriptive) to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes.

The position at this level works with multiple teams of data scientists, analysts, and visualization experts contributing independently to solve business problems with high complexity and enable effective risk management. Additionally, the position at this level requires in-depth knowledge in quantitative analytical methods, data management, visualization, and programming skills suitable to drive data-driven decisions.

Primary Responsibilities
Works with large, structured, and un-structured datasets
Uses quantitative and analytical techniques to accelerate profitable growth and monitor and mitigate risk - unlocking value across all functional areas of business
Uses Big Data tools (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, H2O, CDSW, Domino Labs, etc.) to build data analytics solutions
Builds machine learning and Artificial Intelligence (AI) models from development through testing and validation
Designs rich data visualizations to communicate complex ideas to business leaders and executives
Communicates outcomes and proposed business solutions to senior Risk Data Scientists
Draws insights from data to make quick, well informed decisions with available information
Demonstrates ability to continuously learn and provide value in a dynamic environment
Understands all phases of the model lifecycle, ensuring that models and associated documentation comply with model validation expectations

This position is exempt from timekeeping requirements under the Fair Labor Standards Act and is not eligible for overtime pay.

This position may be filled at a higher level depending on the candidate's qualifications and relevant experience

This position will work a hybrid schedule with a combination of in-office and remote work

Requirements
Bachelor's degree and six (6) years of related experience
Or Master's degree and four (4) years of related experience
Or Ph.D. and two (2) years of related experience in a quantitative/analytical/STEM field
One (1) year of hands-on experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, Impala, Spark, or Kafka
Two (2) years of working experience with statistical and predictive modeling concepts and approaches such as machine learning, clustering and classification techniques, and artificial intelligence
Two (2) years of working programming experience analyzing large, complex, and multi-dimensional datasets using a variety of tools such as SAS, Python, Ruby, R, Matlab, Scala, or Java

Preferences
Background in banking and/or other financial services
Experience in Agile Software Development
May require experience in libraries such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, or Keras
Knowledge in Google Analytics and/or Adobe Digital

Skills and Competencies
Advanced Structured Query Language (SQL) skills
Comfortable with both relational databases and Hadoop-based data mining frameworks
Deep understanding of statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques, and recommendation and optimization algorithms
Expertise in analyzing large, complex, multi-dimensional datasets
Proficient in visualization tools like Power Business Intelligence (BI) and Tableau
Strong business acumen with the ability to communicate with both business and Information Technology (IT) leaders
Strong communication skills through data visualizations as well as written and oral presentations

Position Type Full time

Compensation Details
Pay ranges are job specific and are provided as a point-of-market reference for compensation decisions. Other factors which directly impact pay for individual associates include: experience, skills, knowledge, contribution, job location and, most importantly, performance in the job role. As these factors vary by individuals, pay will also vary among individual associates within the same job.

The target information listed below is based on the Metropolitan Statistical Area Market Range for where the position is located and level of the position.

Job Range Target:
Minimum: $98,467.60 USD
Median: $141,780.00 USD

Incentive Pay Plans:
Benefits Information
Regions offers a benefits package that is flexible, comprehensive and recognizes that ""one size does not fit all"" for benefits-eligible associates. Listed below is a synopsis of the benefits offered by Regions for informational purposes, which is not intended to be a complete summary of plan terms and conditions.
Paid Vacation/Sick Time
401K with Company Match
Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits
Disability Benefits
Health Savings Account
Flexible Spending Account
Life Insurance
Parental Leave
Employee Assistance Program
Associate Volunteer Program

Please note, benefits and plans may be changed, amended, or terminated with respect to all or any class of associate at any time. To learn more about Regions’ benefits, please click or copy the link below to your browser.

https://www.regions.com/welcometour/benefits.rf

Location Details Riverchase Complex North Building
Location: Hoover, Alabama

Bring Your Whole Self to Work

We have a passion for creating an inclusive environment that promotes and values the differences that make each of us stand out as unique individuals and help provide valuable perspective that makes us a better company and employer. More importantly, we recognize that creating a workplace where everyone, regardless of background, can do their best work and thrive is the right thing to do.

OFCCP Disclosure: Equal Opportunity Employer/Disabled/Veterans

Job applications at Regions are accepted electronically through our career site for a minimum of five business days from the date of posting. Job postings for higher-volume positions may remain active for longer than the minimum period due to business need and may be closed at any time thereafter at the discretion of the company.",3.6,Regions,"Nashville, TN",10000+ Employees,1971.0,Company - Public,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,120.0,TN,53.0,1,0,1,1,0
"Senior Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$240K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Provide guidance to junior analysts and data scientists
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modelling project
At least 5 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, capable of working independently in a dynamic, fast-paced environment, and delivering projects from end to end
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
Experience collaborating with cross-functional teams while managing and prioritizing multiple projects
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $167537 - $312866 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,240.0,WA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$169K
/yr","3+ years of data science experience with a Bachelor's degree in quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Business Analytics, Data Science, Mathematics, Economics, Engineering or Computer Science).
Expertise in using SQL for data analysis, reporting, and dashboarding.
Expertise with visualization tools like Tableau or Quicksight.
Experience with a scripting language such as Python or R.
Comfort with data warehouses and big data technologies at consumer scale such as Redshift, Snowflake, Big Query, etc.
If you are interested in this position, please apply on Twitch's Career site https://www.twitch.tv/jobs/en/

About Us:
Twitch is the world’s biggest live streaming service, with global communities built around gaming, entertainment, music, sports, cooking, and more. It is where thousands of communities come together for whatever, every day.

We’re about community, inside and out. You’ll find coworkers who are eager to team up, collaborate, and crush (or elegantly solve) problems together. We’re on a quest to empower live communities, so if this sounds good to you, see what we’re up to on LinkedIn and X, and discover the projects we’re solving on our Blog. Be sure to explore our Interviewing Guide to learn how to ace our interview process.

About the Role:
We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to support our central analytics and finance disciplines at Twitch. Bringing to bear a mixture of data analysis, dashboarding, and SQL query skills, you will use data-driven methods to answer business questions, and deliver insights that deepen understanding of our viewer behavior and monetization performance. Reporting to the Head of Finance, Analytics, and Business Operations, your team will be located in San Francisco. While there is a preference for the San Francisco Bay Area.

You Will:
Create actionable insights from data related to Twitch viewers, creators, advertising revenue, commerce revenue, and content deals.
Develop dashboards and visualizations to communicate points of view that inform business decision-making.
Create and maintain complex queries and data pipelines for ad-hoc analyses.
Author narratives and documentation that support conclusions.
Collaborate effectively with business partners, product managers, and data team members to align data science efforts with strategic goals.
Master’s or Doctorate degree in a quantitative field (e.g. Statistics, Business Analytics, Data Science, Mathematics, Economics, Engineering, or Computer Science)
Experience in gaming or digital media
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at Twitch. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status, or other legally protected status.

Los Angeles County applicants: Job duties for this position include: work safely and cooperatively with other employees, supervisors, and staff; adhere to standards of excellence despite stressful conditions; communicate effectively and respectfully with employees, supervisors, and staff to ensure exceptional customer service; and follow all federal, state, and local laws and Company policies. Criminal history may have a direct, adverse, and negative relationship with some of the material job duties of this position. These include the duties and responsibilities listed above, as well as the abilities to adhere to company policies, exercise sound judgment, effectively manage stress and work safely and respectfully with others, exhibit trustworthiness and professionalism, and safeguard business operations and the Company’s reputation. Pursuant to the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Our compensation reflects the cost of labor across several US geographic markets. The base pay for this position ranges from $125,500/year in our lowest geographic market up to $212,800/year in our highest geographic market. Pay is based on a number of factors including market location and may vary depending on job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. Amazon is a total compensation company. Dependent on the position offered, equity, sign-on payments, and other forms of compensation may be provided as part of a total compensation package, in addition to a full range of medical, financial, and/or other benefits. For more information, please visit https://www.aboutamazon.com/workplace/employee-benefits. This position will remain posted until filled. Applicants should apply via our internal or external career site.",3.6,"Twitch Interactive, Inc.","San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,1994.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,169.0,CA,30.0,1,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$170K
/yr","Role located onsite in Fremont, CA.
As an employee of Boehringer Ingelheim, you will actively contribute to the discovery, development, and delivery of our products to our patients and customers. Our global presence provides opportunity for all employees to collaborate internationally, offering visibility and opportunity to directly contribute to the companies' success. We realize that our strength and competitive advantage lie with our people. We support our employees in several ways to foster a healthy working environment, meaningful work, diversity and inclusion, mobility, networking, and work-life balance. Our competitive compensation and benefit programs reflect Boehringer Ingelheim's high regard for our employees.
The Senior Data Scientist will execute data science projects at US Biopharma Fremont with the purpose of solving non-routine business problems by applying advanced methods including artificial intelligence, machine learning, causal inference, advanced statistics, natural language processing and other related techniques.
The Senior Data Scientist is highly experienced in delivering successful data science projects and will work in close collaboration with different business units (e.g., Biopharma sites in Vienna and Biberach) to develop applications which utilize data for smart decision making.
The role will include the responsibility for designing and building computational models, discovering insights, and identifying opportunities using statistical and algorithmic methods (for instance machine learning) as well as data visualization techniques. The Senior Data Scientist will utilize their experience to manage small and medium-sized projects, potentially including external support and to develop and mentor more junior colleagues.
Duties & Responsibilities
Delivering successful data science projects:
Understands business problems and design end-to-end data science use cases.
Collaborates across the business to understand data, and business constraints.
Prioritizes, scopes, and measures the corresponding Key Performance Indicators (KPIs)/ Objectives and Key Results (OKRs) for success.
Collaborates with developers to implement and deploy scalable solutions.
Establishes best data operational practices and maintain all compliance requirements.
Establishes the monitoring of data science models in production.

Achieving high analytical quality of delivered projects:
Applies strong expertise in data science to design, prototype, and build the next-generation analytics engines and services.
Generates hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process together with domain experts.
Identifies, evaluates, and implements the most appropriate algorithm for the specific challenge.

Establishing close collaborations across different departments to transform towards smart data-driven decision making:
Guides the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence (AI)/data science.
Actively networks on a regular basis with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Quickly develops extensive domain knowledge in various topics.
Trains and coaches other business and staff on basic data science principles and techniques.

Successful management of communities and partnerships:
Actively networks on a regular basis with internal and external partners.
Promotes collaboration and knowledge exchange with other data science teams within and outside the organization.
Provides thought leadership by researching best practices, conducting experiments, and collaborating with industry leaders.
Requirements
BS degree, with six-plus (6+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
MS degree with four-plus (4+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
PhD degree with two-plus (2+) years relevant industry experience.
Scientific degree in quantitative discipline such as theoretical physics, mathematics, computer Science, bioinformatics etc.

Technical Skills:
Deep technical expertise in at least one relevant field.
Experienced in handling unusual data sets such as unstructured data or big data.
Broad understanding of current technologies and technological developments including ability to evaluate potential technological benefits for data science projects.
Five-plus (5+) years’ experience in relevant computing languages such as R, Python and C++.
Experienced in handling UNIX environments.
Understanding of ETL processes and experience with various data formats.
Experienced in handling various types of data bases including data base operations and understanding of data base concepts and architectures.
Well-developed understanding of data hygiene as well as data enrichment.
Experienced in handling data bases including ability to run queries.
Sound knowledge in scripting languages such as PHP, Perl, Bash.
Experience with Large Language Models and/or mechanistic models is a plus.

Analytical Skills:
Ability to rapidly develop analytical problem-solving approaches to complex problems, including external constraints such as resource limitations, feasibility topics, consumption by business, change management aspects, etc.
High level of expertise to design, set up and execute validation and experimentation of data science outcomes in business and market environments.
High level of expertise in relevant methods and skills such as machine learning, advanced statistics, algebra, data visualization, artificial intelligence, natural language processing, classification methods, feature extraction, dimensionality reduction, data handling algorithms, regression methods, time-series analysis, predictive modelling, causal inference methods, Bayesian networks, Markov random fields, text analysis, etc.

Business Skills:
Ability to successfully manage different and potentially conflicting interests of various stakeholders in the framework of data science projects.
High expertise in change management demonstrated through several projects that involved a high degree of business transformation.
Ability to build relationships with business partners, operational managers, and colleagues.
Ability to handle multiple priorities under set deadlines.
Ability to constantly adapt to a fast-paced multidisciplinary changing environment (e.g., with regards to new data types or changes in competitive landscape).

Eligibility Requirements :
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without restriction.
Must be willing to take a drug test and post-offer physical (if required).
Must be 18 years of age or older.
Data Scientist II
Requirements
BS degree, with four-plus (4+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
MS degree with two-plus (2+) years relevant industry experience.
AND/OR
PhD degree with zero to two (0-2) years relevant industry experience.
Scientific degree in quantitative discipline such as data science, mathematics, computer science, bioinformatics, etc.",4.2,BI Fremont,"Fremont, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1885.0,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,170.0,CA,139.0,1,0,0,0,0
"R&D Data Scientist - Minneapolis, MN","$99K
/yr","Job Description:
General Mills is seeking a Data Scientist to join the Data Science & Modeling team within the Innovation, Technology, and Quality (ITQ) function. The ITQ function is the center of science innovation, product development, and quality activities for the company.

In this role, you will be a key player on a team that is solving business problems within a data-rich science and engineering environment. You will have the opportunity to blend computer science, statistics, mathematics, modeling, and technology to transform data into actionable insights that drive business results.

You will join a successful, multi-talented, functional analytics team and collaborate with partners inside and outside General Mills to further the growth and impact of data science on our business.

KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
Work with teams to solve a wide range of problems using data
This includes an emphasis on product development, quality in manufacturing, nutrition science, consumer and market research, and other scientific domains of ITQ
Consult with scientists and engineers to translate and summarize complex analyses into actionable insights and recommendations that directly solve problems and influence business decisions
Develop statistical and machine learning models with Python, R, or other languages and tools
You will have the opportunity to scale analytics solutions for big data using Google Cloud Platform, working with a wide range of open-source tools
Train, validate, and deploy deep learning algorithms to deliver new measures and data outcomes that drive deeper understanding for consumer liking, product & package design performance and product quality
Partner to build Generative AI-enhanced software applications to unlock actionable insights on ITQ data

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Ph.D. in Statistics, Data Science, or Computer Science with a dissertation focus in analytics
M.S. in Statistics, Data Science, or Computer Science and 1-2 years work experience in analytics
Demonstrated ability to define problems and deliver solutions proactively against business or technical challenges
Good communication skills, with the ability to collaborate and build relationships in-person and virtually
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform data into advanced analytic solutions
Proficiency in SQL scripting languages, and experience with relational databases such as Big Query and Oracle
Experience with an analytics programming language (e.g., R or Python), and with source code repositories such as Git

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience working within a global team
Familiarity with a cloud enterprise data and computing platform (GCP, AWS, Azure)
Experience working with in an R&D or scientific organization, or experience with food industry applications

ADDITIONAL CONSIDERATIONS
This position is located in Minneapolis, MN and will not consider remote working arrangements
International relocation or international remote working arrangements (outside of the US) will not be considered
Applicants for this position must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis as General Mills will not sponsor applicants for this position for work visas
Company Overview:
We exist to make food the world loves. But we do more than that. Our company is a place that prioritizes being a force for good, a place to expand learning, explore new perspectives and reimagine new possibilities, every day. We look for people who want to bring their best — bold thinkers with big hearts who challenge one other and grow together. Because becoming the undisputed leader in food means surrounding ourselves with people who are hungry for what’s next.",4.1,General Mills,"Golden Valley, MN",10000+ Employees,1866.0,Company - Public,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,99.0,MN,158.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","DEPARTMENT: Analytics
JOB TITLE: Data Scientist
REPORTS TO: Director of Analytics

WHO WE ARE: Nuvative is a parent company that is helping businesses meet their goals through innovative technology and impactful employees. To recruit and retain top-notch talent, we consciously work to make and keep Nuvative an employer of choice. We provide our employees with a culture of kindness, fairness, learning and development, contribution, collaboration, diversity, innovative and fun.
JOB PURPOSE: We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our Wichita office who will develop and implement advanced analytics for analyzing data problems surrounding the day-to-day business and provide solutions across a range of functions. This includes customer segmentation, optimization, predictive analytics, and machine learning based decision making. They will also utilize machine learning solutions, along with advanced statistical math and algorithms, to provide accurate and timely data support, analysis, and maintenance on a variety of models, reports, and projects. The Data Scientist works closely with the other Data Scientists on analysis and prediction of trends while supporting cross-functional teams on the day-to-day delivery of projects and initiatives.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Contribute using SQL and R or Python languages to the design, development, and maintenance of ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc. to drive key business decisions.
Find, clean, and integrate data into usable and helpful information.
Identifies and utilizes machine learning, data analysis, and measurements effectively to identify performance trends, shortfalls.
Identify campaigns, strategies, and processes that drive highest results.
Turn data into insight: segment, cluster, model and mine to better understand behaviors and trends.
Analyze why things happened and predict what could happen in the future based on data.
Identify gaps in current data systems, drive and contribute to development of systems to bridge gap.
Plans and executes ongoing strategies including maximization of technologies and processes.
Responding with urgency to high priority requests from senior business leaders.
Adhere to professional conduct standards as defined by company guidelines.
Take initiative to make things better and provide solutions for challenges.
Demonstrate commitment to continued personal and professional improvement.
Supports management and advocates in day-to-day operations.
Anticipate operational needs based on volume/expansion and make recommendations.
Drive change – produce clear, understandable visualizations and reports to share with Senior Management.
Any other duties as assigned.",3.4,"Nuvative, Inc.","Wichita, KS",1 to 50 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Banking & Lending,Financial Services,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,96.0,KS,17.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist-ESI Solutions,"$136K
/yr","Job Family:
Data Science Consulting

Travel Required:
Up to 10%

Clearance Required:
Ability to Obtain Public Trust
** Please note that this job posting is for a proposal of a potential client and is not reflective of an awarded job. In addition, we are only collecting resumes and interviewing based off the skillset and qualifications listed. ***
What You Will Do:
Our consultants on the ESI Solutions - Data and Analytics team help clients maximize the value of their data and automate business processes. This high performing team works with clients to implement the full spectrum of data analytics and data science, from data architecture and storage to data engineering and querying, to data visualization and dashboarding, to predictive analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence as well as intelligent automation. Our services enable our clients to define their information strategy, enable mission critical insights and data-driven decision making, reduce cost and complexity, increase trust, and improve operational effectiveness.
Our team supports Federal Civilian, State and Local, and Energy Provider clients through performing data science, analytics, data wrangling, statistical analysis, and machine learning. We focus on client services, while also supporting business development, internal firm initiatives, and ongoing professional development.

What You Will Need:
U.S. citizenship and ability to obtain a Public Trust clearance
Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative and computational discipline (e.g., data science, business analytics, economics, statistics, computer science, etc.) AND 3+ years of experience performing data science and analytics (e.g., data visualization, statistical analysis, predictive analysis, and machine learning) with special emphasis on data aggregation/synthesis, data wrangling, prepping data for model consumption; Or
Masters degree in a highly quantitative and computational discipline AND 2+ years of experience performing data science and analytics (e.g., data visualization, statistical analysis, predictive analysis, and machine learning) with special emphasis on data aggregation/synthesis, data wrangling, prepping data for model consumption
Proficiency using open source programming such as R or Python
Proficiency using Power BI, Tableau, Qlik, or Elastic X-Pack for data visualization and developing dashboards
Ability to design and deliver solutions with autonomy, working collaboratively as part of a team
Strong communication/presentation skills and ability to explain technical topics to non-technical audiences
Strong consulting skills: identifying and addressing client needs, building relationships, driving initiatives forward
Ability to travel as needed
Candidates must be local to the DMV area and capable of working onsite in Guidehouse office 1x per week

What Would Be Nice To Have:
Knowledge of or experience with cloud solutions for data science, such as Azure or AWS
Demonstrated work experience supporting Federal Civilian, State and Local Government, or Energy Provider clients
Ability to support business development including RFP/RFQ/RFI responses involving data science / analytics
The annual salary range for this position is $109,100.00-$163,700.00. Compensation decisions depend on a wide range of factors, including but not limited to skill sets, experience and training, security clearances, licensure and certifications, and other business and organizational needs.

What We Offer:
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Student Loan PayDown
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program
Mobility Stipend
About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",3.6,Guidehouse,"McLean, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,136.0,VA,6.0,1,0,0,1,0
Social Research Associate II - Population Health Data Scientist,"$72K
/yr","WELCOME TO CHATHAM COUNTY'S APPLICATION PROCESS.
To Apply: Become a part of the best local government in North Carolina click ""Apply"" in the top right corner.
All sections of the application, including work experience, MUST be completed. Please include the last ten (10) years of employment history. Incomplete applications may be rejected. Applications are stored on a secure site accessible only by authorized personnel. Your application can be saved and used to apply for more than one (1) job opening.
Chatham County is an equal opportunity employer and will consider reasonable accommodations as required by law. Chatham County participates in E-Verify and will provide the federal government with your Form I-9 information to confirm that you are authorized to work in the U.S.
Chatham County does not offer sponsorship of job applicants for employment-based visas or any other work authorization for our positions at this time.
Please Note: After submitting your application:
Log into your GovernmentJobs account daily. You will receive emails and notices from hiring managers asking you to complete tasks. You do not want to miss these.
The references you provided will be asked to complete a form. This does NOT mean you will be interviewed. It is an automated process in NeoGov.
We recommend you sign up for text message alerts when you create your account.
If you have issues with submitting your application, please contact Neogov Applicant Support at 1-855-524-5627.
Return to the Chatham County Homepage.
Job Description
Do you possess strong organizational skills and a data-driven mindset? Are you passionate about public health and the trends that influence it? Are you looking for an organization that recognizes your individuality and encourages personal development alongside a balanced work-life environment? If your answer is yes, seize this opportunity!

The primary purpose of this position is to develop and organize an in-house system of collecting, monitoring, analyzing, and reporting data on local health status, factors affecting health, and health department services, drawing on resources both within the department as well as from state and other resources. Evaluation of health status indicators, mortality and morbidity trends, and variables affecting health in preparation for communicating findings to community leaders, decision-makers, and government officials are essential components of this position. The position supports the needs of all divisions of the agency in collecting and analyzing data to support programmatic needs, and works with communicable disease, environmental health, health promotion staff, and community partners to collect, analyze, and present data through reports, presentations, and online resources, such as data dashboards. The position is responsible for overseeing the Community Assessment process and composing the report, as well as the Chatham Community Cohort Assessment and State of the County Health Reports. It also leads the Epi Team and assists with the coordination of the Chatham Health Alliance and subcommittees.
Essential Functions
Identifies and accesses a variety of health data resources;
Maintains a standardized data collection method to identify county health indicators and evaluate Health Department services;
Analyzes data collected to assess progress toward goals/objectives and identification of gaps;
Maintains records and prepares reports and correspondence related to data analysis;
Develops systems for collecting and organizing raw data into forms suitable for analysis;
Assures quality control of data;
Monitors county-wide health data indicators and variables affecting health;
Assesses progress toward the Healthy People 2030 goals and updates statistics as necessary;
Provides leadership in developing and implementing the community assessment using a multi-agency team, surveys, and qualitative approaches;
Organizes results of data analysis into written form for publication, presentation, and dissemination;
Produces the community assessment report;
Produces and distributes an annual report card on Chatham County's health status;
Develops and updates data dashboards with current Community Assessment data;
Supports and assists the Health Department staff in developing and implementing an evaluation plan for services/divisions of the Health Department;
Designs and uses data collection instruments, such as survey forms and questionnaires;
Develops and conducts systematic reviews of leading health indicators;
Designs data collection instruments for evaluation of current and new programs;
Trains other staff on data entry and quality control when appropriate;
Responsible for assuring comparability of statistics across divisions within the Health Department;
Serves as data and assessment resource for the broader community and community partners, representing the Health Department on steering committees or other groups as they relate to assessment;
Oversees and coordinates Epi Team, including planning meetings, and developing the agenda with Epi Team members;
Manages Epi Team strategic plan;
Works with Epi Team members to track data and develop reports;
Monitors emerging threats to public health and recommends strategies to respond to and prevent them;
Serves on health department committees, as needed;
Support the Emergency Preparedness & Response program, including leading tasks as needed;
Performs other duties as assigned.
Minimum Qualifications
Master’s degree in public health or public health work with a major in public health and two years of experience in public health education; Bachelor’s degree with a major in public health; or an equivalent combination of education and experience which may include one year of experience in gathering, editing, and analyzing data for social research; or an equivalent combination of education and experience. Graduate coursework in an area related to the work to be performed may be substituted for experience.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities
Knowledge of and ability to evaluate surveillance systems;
Ability to design and conduct epidemiological, health behavior, and attitude studies;
Knowledge and experience with statistical software;
Ability to interpret and evaluate surveillance data;
Effective oral and written communication skills;
Ability to prepare clear and concise reports;
Ability to take initiative and work semi-independently;
Skilled in data editing, data analysis, and report writing using PC-based applications such as Excel, Microsoft Word, and Access;
Knowledge of design methodology and statistical methods used in epidemiological studies;
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with County officials, department heads, peers, associates, and the general public.

Physical Requirements
This work requires the occasional exertion of up to 10 pounds of force; work regularly requires sitting, speaking, hearing and repetitive motions, frequently requires touching or feeling and occasionally requires standing, walking, climbing, balancing, reaching, pushing, pulling and lifting; work has standard vision requirements; work requires vocal communication to express or exchange ideas orally; work requires hearing to perceive information at normal spoken levels; work requires preparing and analyzing written or computer data; work has no exposure to environmental conditions; work is generally performed in a moderately noisy location (e.g. business office, light traffic).

Special Requirements
Must possess a valid North Carolina driver's license.
Chatham County is fully committed to equal employment opportunity (EEO) principles and issues this anti-discrimination/EEO compliance clause to support and maintain employee’s rights and responsibilities relating to equal employment. The core of equal employment opportunity is the right to work and advance on the basis of merit, ability, and potential, free from prejudice or discrimination. In accordance with the applicable anti-discrimination statutes, executive orders, and other authorities, Chatham County protects employees against discrimination, to the fullest extent of law, on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, political affiliation, whistleblower activity, parental status, and military service (past, present, or future), and against retaliation for participation in EEO activity or opposition to discrimination.",5.0,"Chatham County, NC","Pittsboro, NC",Unknown,,Government,Municipal Agencies,Government & Public Administration,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,72.0,NC,,0,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$103K
/yr","About DMI:
DMI is a leading global provider of digital services working at the intersection of public and private sectors. With broad capabilities across IT managed services, cybersecurity, cloud migration and application development, DMI provides on-site and remote support to clients within governments, healthcare, financial services, transportation, manufacturing, and other critical infrastructure sectors. DMI has grown to over 2,100+ employees globally and has been continually recognized as a Top Workplace in both regional and national categories.
About the Opportunity:
DMI, LLC is seeking a Data Scientist to join us. As a Data Scientist on our team, you will be responsible for designing and implementing advanced data models, analytics solutions, and machine learning algorithms that enable us to deliver accurate, actionable insights from large telecom datasets. You will leverage your deep understanding of data science, statistical analysis, and machine learning to solve complex business problems, such as telecom expense optimization, billing reconciliation, and usage forecasting. Your work will directly impact product innovation, improving the decision-making process for both our internal teams and external customers.

In this role, you will collaborate with cross-functional teams, including Database Administrators, Developers, Product Managers, and Customer Success Teams. You will also have the opportunity to shape the data strategy that powers the next generation of features within our Telecom Expense Management platform.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Data Analysis and Modeling:
Analyze large-scale datasets, primarily telecom billing and usage data, to uncover insights and develop data-driven strategies for improving expense management and customer outcomes.
Build, deploy, and refine predictive models using machine learning techniques such as regression, classification, clustering, and time series forecasting, to support customer cost optimization and forecasting needs.
Design advanced statistical models and algorithms to automate error detection and anomaly recognition, improving the accuracy and efficiency of billing reconciliations.
Machine Learning and Predictive Analytics:
Develop machine learning models that can forecast telecom usage patterns, identify cost-saving opportunities, and detect billing discrepancies.
Continuously improve and retrain machine learning models to enhance accuracy, performance, and scalability.
Create robust systems for identifying patterns in telecom data, such as fraud detection, usage anomalies, and outlier identification to mitigate risks for our clients.
Data Infrastructure and Pipeline Development:
Work closely with the Database Administrator and Development Teams to design, build, and maintain data pipelines that efficiently process telecom data from multiple sources, ensuring data quality and integrity.
Collaborate on the architecture of large-scale ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes, ensuring the efficient handling of high-volume telecom billing and usage data.
Use cloud-based tools and services, primarily in AWS, to automate and optimize data workflows, ensuring seamless integration with the platform.
Business Intelligence and Reporting:
Develop intuitive and insightful dashboards, reports, and visualizations using tools like Tableau, Power BI, or Python-based libraries to translate complex data into actionable insights for both internal stakeholders and external clients.
Provide insights and recommendations to drive product decisions, such as enhancements to cost analytics and telecom optimization tools, based on data trends and user behavior.
Collaborate with the Product and Customer Success teams to tailor data-driven solutions to customer needs, improving the overall user experience of the TEM platform.
Collaboration and Thought Leadership:
Partner with cross-functional teams, including Engineering, Product Management, and Service Delivery, to ensure data solutions align with customer needs and business objectives.
Provide guidance to junior data scientists or data engineers, fostering a culture of learning and innovation within the team.
Stay up to date with the latest trends and advancements in data science, machine learning, and the telecom industry to keep the company at the forefront of innovation.
Innovation and Data Strategy:
Identify and explore new opportunities for leveraging advanced data science techniques to expand and improve the platform’s features and capabilities.
Influence the company’s overall data strategy by recommending new ways to enhance data processing, integration, and analytics, contributing to long-term product innovation.
Lead initiatives to explore and evaluate emerging technologies in data science, cloud computing, and AI that could bring a competitive advantage to the platform.
Qualifications:
Education and Years of Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related field. Master’s Degree in a relevant field is preferred but not required.
Certifications: Relevant certifications in Data Science, Machine Learning, or AWS Cloud Services are highly desirable.
Experience: 3+ years of experience as a Data Scientist, Data Analyst, or similar role, working with large-scale data and developing data models.
Required and Desired Skills/Certifications:
Python Proficiency: Proficiency in Python and relevant libraries (e.g., Pandas, NumPy, Scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch) for data analysis, model development, and machine learning.
SQL Proficiency: Strong SQL skills, with the ability to write and optimize complex queries for data extraction, aggregation, and transformation from relational databases.
Machine Learning: Hands-on experience with machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, clustering, time series forecasting) and tools such as Scikit-learn, XGBoost, and LightGBM.
Data Visualization: Proficiency in using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Power BI, or Domo to create clear and impactful data visualizations.
Statistical Analysis: Strong background in statistical methods, probability theory, hypothesis testing, and multivariate analysis.
Cloud (AWS): Experience working with AWS services such as S3, Redshift, SageMaker, and Lambda to build and deploy models in the cloud.
Telecom Industry: Familiarity with telecom data and experience working with billing, usage records, and cost analysis in the telecom space is a strong plus.
Big Data: Experience working with big data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, or Kafka to manage and process large datasets.
Advanced Machine Learning: Experience with deep learning frameworks like TensorFlow or PyTorch and knowledge of advanced topics such as natural language processing (NLP) and reinforcement learning is a plus.
DevOps and Automation: Experience integrating machine learning models into production environments using DevOps pipelines and automation tools.
Data Governance: Familiarity with data governance best practices, including data quality, data privacy, and compliance standards.
Agile Methodology: Experience working in Agile development environments, participating in sprint planning, and collaborating in cross-functional teams.
Min Citizenship Status Required: Must be a U.S. Citizen

Physical Requirements:
Ability to work in an office environment.
Ability to sit for long periods of time.
Ability to utilize a keyboard and mouse.
Ability to work in front of a computer screen for long periods of time.
Location: Cincinnati, OH

Working at DMI
DMI is a diverse, prosperous, and rewarding place to work. Being part of the DMI family means we care about your wellbeing. We offer a variety of perks and benefits that help meet various interests and needs, while still having the opportunity to work directly with several of our award-winning, Fortune 1000 clients. The following categories make up your DMI wellbeing:
Convenience/Concierge - Virtual visits through health insurance, pet insurance, commuter benefits, discount tickets for movies, travel, and many other items to provide convenience.
Development – Annual performance management, continuing education, and tuition assistance, internal job opportunities along with career enrichment and advancement to help each employee with their professional and personal development.
Financial – Generous 401k matches both pre-tax and post-tax (ROTH) contributions along with financial wellness education, EAP, Life Insurance and Disability help provide financial stability for each DMI employee.
Recognition – Great achievements do not go unnoticed by DMI through Annual Awards ceremony, service anniversaries, peer-to-peer acknowledgment, employee referral bonuses.
Wellness – Healthcare benefits, Wellness programs, Flu Shots, Biometric screenings, and several other wellness options.
Employees are valued for their talents and contributions. We all take pride in helping our customers achieve their goals, which in turn contributes to the overall success of the company. The company does and will take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals with disabilities and protected veterans, and to treat qualified individuals without discrimination based on their physical or mental disability or veteran status. DMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minority/Female/Veterans/Disability. DMI maintains a drug-free workplace.

***************** No Agencies Please *****************

Applicants selected may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. US citizenship may be required for some positions.

#LI-EK1",3.6,DMI,"Cincinnati, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,2002.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,103.0,OH,22.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist,"$76K
/yr","JOB DESCRIPTION AND POSITION REQUIREMENTS:
The Department of Plant Science is seeking a Data Scientist to join GROW a dynamic research and extension network for integrated weed management. GROW conducts research on several IWM and ecological weed management tactics including cover crops and harvest-time weed seed control across a range of environments and is engaged in development of real-time weed and crop mapping systems using computer vision and artificial intelligence.
Primary responsibilities will include analyzing data, writing, and publishing research results in scholarly peer-reviewed journals and extension publications. This responsibility requires management and analysis of large agronomic and weed ecology datasets generated from multi-state GROW research projects and long-term datasets generated from cropping systems experiments. The successful candidate will benefit from significant professional networking opportunities by playing a central role in the GROW project, which is national in scope.
This is a limited term position funded for one year from date of hire with good possibility of refunding.
Location and mentoring structure : This position will be remote or located at The Pennsylvania State University , University Park, PA and will be principally advised by John Wallace. Occasional travel to Beltsville, MD may be necessary to engage with scholarship generated within the USDA-ARS-BARC Sustainable Agricultural Systems Laboratory.
Background and Qualifications : Minimum requirements for this position include a Bachelor's Degree and 1 or more years of relevant experience, or an equivalent combination of education and experience . We are looking for candidates with excellent organizational and quantitative skills, a demonstrated record of research productivity documented with peer-reviewed publications, and expertise in any of the following areas: weed ecology and population dynamics, multi-tactic weed management, agronomic crop production, agroecology, data science, and statistics. A M.Sc. is required in Weed Science, Agronomy, Soil Science, Plant Ecology, Environmental Sciences, Precision Agriculture, or related fields. Must pass a Federal background check.
This position requires that you operate a motor vehicle as a part of your job duties. A valid driver’s license and successful completion of a motor vehicle records check will be required in addition to standard background checks.
Application materials: Applications will require a resume (CV), letter of interest, and names and contact information of three references. Potential candidates should contact Dr. John Wallace (jmw309@psu.edu) to express interest and apply online at https://hr.psu.edu/careers under REQ_0000061338.
Review of Applicants and Start Date: Review will begin immediately and will remain open until a suitable candidate is identified. Starting date is negotiable.
Salary will commensurate with education and experience. Penn State offers competitive benefits to full-time employees, including medical, dental, vision and retirement plans, in addition to generous vacation time, sick time, and paid holidays.
The Pennsylvania State University is committed to and accountable for advancing diversity, equity, and inclusion in all of its forms. We embrace individual uniqueness, foster a culture of inclusive excellence that supports both broad and specific diversity initiatives, leverage the educational and institutional benefits of diversity, and engage all individuals to help them thrive. We value inclusive excellence as a core strength and an essential element of our public service mission.
The salary range for this position, including all possible grades is:
$61,800.00 - $89,600.00
Salary Structure - additional information on Penn State's job and salary structure.
CAMPUS SECURITY CRIME STATISTICS:
Pursuant to the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act and the Pennsylvania Act of 1988, Penn State publishes a combined Annual Security and Annual Fire Safety Report (ASR). The ASR includes crime statistics and institutional policies concerning campus security, such as those concerning alcohol and drug use, crime prevention, the reporting of crimes, sexual assault, and other matters. The ASR is available for review here .
Employment with the University will require successful completion of background check(s) in accordance with University policies.
EEO IS THE LAW
Penn State is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer, and is committed to providing employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please contact 814-865-1473.",4.2,Penn State University,"University Park, PA",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,76.0,PA,169.0,0,0,0,0,1
Sr Data Scientist,"$137K
/yr","Data Science is at the core of our business. Our Data Scientists have dedicated themselves to excellence in applied quantitative disciplines such as mathematics, statistics and physics. We are seeking Senior Data Scientists to join us in our attempt to solve the extremely challenging problem of modeling and predicting the financial markets using sophisticated machine learning techniques. If you are passionate about collaborating with a world-renowned team of Data Scientists, Engineers and Researchers Voloridge could be the home for you.
You will work alongside prominent Data Scientists, Kaggle Grandmasters and a KDD cup winner at an award-winning investment management firm managing over $7B in assets. We reward our employees with an exceptional compensation package that includes wealthy benefit plans and profit-sharing bonuses. Our office in beautiful Jupiter, Florida has water views, fully stocked kitchens with fresh fruit, snacks and salad bars, lounge and gaming areas, onsite massage rooms, free garage parking and more. We seek out only the best of the best talent to join our brilliant, collaborative, and hard-working team and boast a retention rate of 92%.
Job Responsibilities
Building and evaluating modern numerical/modeling techniques
Working daily with complex, large-scale datasets
Collaborative research projects requiring deep thinking, technical skills, and ingenuity
Keeping abreast of the latest research related to data science
Minimum Requirements
Deep understanding of modern machine learning techniques and algorithms
Must demonstrate exceptional aptitude in descriptive and inferential statistics
Extremely detail-oriented and self-motivated
Experience with time series data
Extensive experience working with large data
Creative thinker and self-learner, able to demonstrate extraordinary critical thinking and analytical skills
Competent skills in programming languages such as Python, R, C/#/++
Ability to communicate actionable results with present senior leadership
Advanced degree in Physics, Statistics, Mathematics or other quantitative disciplines or equivalent experience
Ability to work onsite in our Jupiter, FL office
Preferred Skills and Previous Experience
Outstanding achievements such as Math competitions, Kaggle – Grandmaster/Master, exceptional scores on SAT/GRE/LSAT, Chess Grandmaster, etc.
Experience with relational SQL databases
Compensation and Benefits

Relocation assistance available for the right candidate
Highly competitive base salary
Profit sharing bonus
Health, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance
401K
Licenses Required None required
Additional Information

Voloridge Investment Management is an SEC registered investment advisor. A private investment company founded in 2009, our mission is to deliver superior risk-adjusted returns for qualified investors, using advanced proprietary modeling technology, conservative investment tactics and sophisticated risk management. Our market neutral equities strategy takes both long and short positions in the most actively traded equities, and is designed to capture alpha while limiting exposure to directional markets risks. Our futures strategy takes both long and short positions in the most actively traded global futures and is also built to maximize alpha captured across all futures markets traded while capping exposure to any sector at a given time.
Voloridge Investment Management is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants are encouraged to apply and will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other legally protected characteristic or status.",4.6,Voloridge Investment Management,"Jupiter, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2009.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,137.0,FL,15.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product","$315K
/yr","About the Team
Earlier in 2022, we introduced DALL-E 2, AI that creates images from text. In 2021 we launched Copilot, powered by Codex, in partnership with GitHub – and developers love it. In 2020 we introduced GPT-3 which the MIT Technology Review listed as one of its 10 Breakthrough Technologies of the year (alongside mRNA vaccines).Our product team is bringing OpenAI technologies to consumers and businesses around the world. We recently launched ChatGPT and ChatGPT Enterprise.
About the Role
As an early member of our Data Scientist team on the Applied Product team, you will establish the data-driven product development culture for either consumer products or developer platform at OpenAI. You should expect to define our north-star metrics, design our first A/B tests, and establish source-of-truth dashboards that the entire company can use to answer their own product questions. Most importantly, you should expect to be a core member of the product development team building our first party offerings.This role is based in our San Francisco HQ. We offer relocation assistance to new employees.
In this role, you will:
Embed with the product development team as a trusted partner, uncovering new ways to improve the product and drive growth
Define and interpret A/B tests that help answer critical questions about the impact of model and UX changes to our product
Establish a data-driven product development culture by driving the definition, tracking, and operationalizing of feature-, product-, and company-level metrics
Develop and socialize dashboards, reports, and other ways of enabling the team and company to answer product data questions in a self-serve way
You might thrive in this role if you have:
5+ years experience in a quantitative role navigating highly ambiguous environments, ideally as a founding data scientist or product analyst at a hyper-growth product company or research org
Proposed, designed, and run rigorous experiments with clear insights and product recommendations utilizing SQL and Python
Defined, implemented, and operationalized new feature and product-level metrics from scratch
Excellent communication skills with demonstrated ability to communicate with product managers, engineers, and executives alike
Strategic insights beyond the paradigm of statistical significance testing
You could be an especially great fit if you have:
Demonstrated prior experience in NLP, large language models, or generative AI
Strong programming background, with ability to run simulations and prototype variants
Experience validating quantitative insights with qualitative methods (e.g. surveys, UXR)

About OpenAI
OpenAI is an AI research and deployment company dedicated to ensuring that general-purpose artificial intelligence benefits all of humanity. We push the boundaries of the capabilities of AI systems and seek to safely deploy them to the world through our products. AI is an extremely powerful tool that must be created with safety and human needs at its core, and to achieve our mission, we must encompass and value the many different perspectives, voices, and experiences that form the full spectrum of humanity.
We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
OpenAI Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity Policy Statement
For US Based Candidates: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.
We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities, and requests can be made via this link.
OpenAI Global Applicant Privacy Policy
At OpenAI, we believe artificial intelligence has the potential to help people solve immense global challenges, and we want the upside of AI to be widely shared. Join us in shaping the future of technology.",4.4,OpenAI,"San Francisco, CA",Unknown,,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,315.0,CA,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist Engineer,"$146K
/yr","Company Overview:
MACOM designs and manufactures semiconductor products for Data Center, Telecommunication and Industrial and Defense applications. Headquartered in Lowell, Massachusetts, MACOM has design centers and sales offices throughout North America, Europe and Asia. MACOM is certified to the ISO9001 international quality standard and ISO14001 environmental management standard.
MACOM has more than 65 years of application expertise with multiple design centers, Si, GaAs and InP fabrication, manufacturing, assembly and test, and operational facilities throughout North America, Europe, and Asia. Click here to view our facilities. In addition, MACOM offers foundry services that represents a key core competency within our business.
MACOM sells and distributes products globally via a sales channel comprised of a direct field sales force, authorized sales representatives and leading industry distributors. Our sales team is trained across all of our products to give our customers insights into our entire portfolio.

Data Scientist Engineer

Job Description:
Responsible for investigating existing systems and providing architectural guidance, technological recommendations, and transitions strategies for the MACOM engineering data system and manufacturing execution system. The Data Scientist Engineer will improve and maintain large-scale data solutions that make use of on-premises databases and cloud solutions which organize disparate real time data streams from globally deployed test systems for future analysis. This work is the foundation for data access and querying according to the business needs. Must be passionate about data and have a strong understanding of the related initiatives such as data governance, quality, security, and processes. Must have a hands-on approach to database warehouse and cloud data lake technologies. A strong understand of the benefits and tradeoffs of technical stack and design decisions in support of manufacturing and engineering stakeholders is important. Will work with a highly collaborative team focused on building and supporting systems and solutions from the ground up.

Key Responsibilities:
Individual in this role will be working in the Big Data Team to improve data accessibility and data quality across the organization
Support various teams across MACOM with their data needs
Develop and deploy data pipeline to collect data from various sources and store in cloud
Assist in development of tools that allow users to access data stored in cloud and on-prem databases.
Collaborate with other members of the team to enable creative problem solving.

Key Competencies & Skills required:
Hands on experience with AWS platforms and tools (including but not limited to S3, QuickSight, Lambda, Athena, SAM)
Fluent in SQL and at scripting languages (Python, Java preferred)
Experience with building data pipeline and ETL
Strong understanding of relational and no-SQL databases
Knowledge of data ingestion using spark for supporting various file types like Json, Xml, Csv and databases
Able to architect high availability, high performance systems with zero risk of data loss
Knowledge of development methodologies like Agile, Scrum, DevOps and test-driven development.
Knowledge of API, Apache Spark, Grafana, Loki, Git, Docker, Linux
Experience uniting disparate legacy data sources into a unified platform for analysis and operations
AWS certifications a plus
Data Engineer certification a plus
Experience in the semiconductor industry is a plus

Required Qualifications and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related field required (Master’s degree preferred)
Proven ability to work in distributed systems
Must be able to develop creative solutions to problems
Strong analytical and creative thinking skills for effective and timely decision-making.
Strong communication skills – oral, written, and presentation.
Strong inter-personal skills and ability to motivate team members.
Ability to make work fun and contribute to the collaborative environment of the team
Due to ITAR regulations, candidate must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident

EEO:

MACOM is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. MACOM will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, marital status, or any other category protected under applicable law.

Reasonable Accommodation:
MACOM is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with physical and mental disabilities. If you have a disability and are in need of a reasonable accommodation with respect to any part of the application process please call +1-978-656-2500 or email HR_Ops@MACOM.com. Provide your name, phone number and the position title and location in which you are interested, and nature of accommodation needed, and we will get back to you. We also work with current employees who request or need reasonable accommodation in order to perform the essential functions of their jobs.",3.7,M/A Com Technolgy Solutions,"Lowell, MA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1950.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,146.0,MA,74.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist Product Manager,"$130K
/yr","At Lilly, we unite caring with discovery to make life better for people around the world. We are a global healthcare leader headquartered in Indianapolis, Indiana. Our employees around the world work to discover and bring life-changing medicines to those who need them, improve the understanding and management of disease, and give back to our communities through philanthropy and volunteerism. We give our best effort to our work, and we put people first. We’re looking for people who are determined to make life better for people around the world.
Organization Overview
At Lilly USA Data and Analytics, we are dedicated to using innovative technology to drive innovation and improve patient outcomes. Our team collaborates across various departments to deliver impactful solutions that enhance our digital presence and operational efficiency.
What You Will Do:
Own the development and implementation of AI models and algorithms to solve complex business problems.
Collaborate with multi-functional teams to find opportunities for AI-driven improvements.
Design, develop, and deploy machine learning models and AI solutions.
Analyze and interpret data to provide actionable insights and recommendations.
Stay updated with the latest advancements in AI and machine learning technologies.
Ensure the scalability and robustness of AI solutions.
How You Will Succeed:
Understanding of the technical, ethical, and user experience challenges and opportunities of generative AI systems and models.
Leadership qualities and the ability to make significant, impactful decisions
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent communication and teamwork abilities.
Knowledge of natural language processing (NLP) and computer vision.
Familiarity with cloud platforms like AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud.
Your Basic Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in computer science, Data Science, or a related field.
1+ years of experience working with AI systems, preferably generative AI systems
2+ years of product management experience delivering end-to-end products from conceptualization to launch, ideally at a technology company working on ML/AI based products
Deep understanding of ML tech stacks for building, deployment, customization, and integration.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or Java.
Experience with machine learning frameworks like TensorFlow, PyTorch, or scikit-learn.
What You Should Bring:
Master's degree in a relevant STEM field preferred.
Experience with AWS, Azure or Databricks
Experience implementing Machine Learning Operations (ML Ops) frameworks that take models from proof of value to mature and automated.
Familiarity with data manipulation libraries (e.g., Pandas, NumPy) and experience with SQL and NoSQL databases.
Experience with Agile Development, CI/CD, Jenkins, Github, and Automation platforms.
Demonstrated ability to analyze large, complex data domains and craft practical solutions for subsequent data exploitation via analytics.
Demonstrated ability to communicate with a geographically dispersed group of business and technical colleagues
Team Values:
Innovate: Embrace new ideas and technologies to drive continuous improvement.
Accelerate: Work effectively with team members and stakeholders to achieve common goals.
Include: Uphold the highest standards of ethical behavior and transparency.
Deliver: Strive for excellence in all aspects of your work.
About the Organization:
Lilly IT builds and maintains capabilities using cutting edge technologies like most prominent tech companies. What differentiates Lilly IT is that we create new possibilities through tech to advance our purpose – creating medicines that make life better for people around the world, like data-driven drug discovery and connected clinical trials. We hire the best technology professionals from a variety of backgrounds, so they can bring an assortment of knowledge, skills, and diverse thinking to deliver innovative solutions in every area of our business.

The LillyUSA Tech@Lilly team is at the forefront of leveraging data and technology to launch new medicines to market, raise awareness, and gain access to medication for appropriate patients. With a deep technical and business understanding, working across all therapeutic areas/disease states, we design and implement digital solutions to power our business, creating best-in-class customer engagements that improve patient outcomes and deliver business results.
Lilly is dedicated to helping individuals with disabilities to actively engage in the workforce, ensuring equal opportunities when vying for positions. If you require accommodation to submit a resume for a position at Lilly, please complete the accommodation request form (https://careers.lilly.com/us/en/workplace-accommodation) for further assistance. Please note this is for individuals to request an accommodation as part of the application process and any other correspondence will not receive a response.

Lilly is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of age, race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.
Our employee resource groups (ERGs) offer strong support networks for their members and help our company develop talented individuals for future leadership roles. Our current groups include: Africa, Middle East, Central Asia Network, African American Network, Chinese Culture Network, Early Career Professionals, Japanese International Leadership Network (JILN), Lilly India Network, Organization of Latinos at Lilly, PRIDE (LGBTQ + Allies), Veterans Leadership Network, Women’s Network, Working and Living with Disabilities. Learn more about all of our groups.
#WeAreLilly",4.1,Lilly,"Indianapolis, IN",10000+ Employees,1876.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,IN,148.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Working Hours : Full Time
Locations : Livonia, Michigan
Experience : 2+ Years

About the Role:
Soothsayer is seeking Data Scientist who has an interest in solving challenging ML/ AI problems. The Data Science team works on a variety of exciting analytics (ML, AI) projects.
Job Responsibilities
Solve cutting edge, challenging problems working alongside a great team of world class data scientists and analytics experts
Having a passion for solving interesting and challenging big data problems
Communicate results to scientific, business, and stakeholders
Mine data to prototype models for targeting and personalizatio
Collaborate with other engineers, data scientists
Key Skills
Python, Spark, Spark Mlib, SQL, insurance
Education & Experience
Masters or Ph.D. in computer science, Physics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or other quantitative/ Computational discipline.
2+ years hands-on industry work experience designing and building large-scale data, machine learning, and analytics applications and pipelines. Proficiency with Spark, Hadoop, Hive, and SQL
2+ years of INDUSTRY experience in analytics or ML or data science field.
2+ years of INDUSTRY experience with Python data analysis libraries (pandas, sklearn, numpy, scipy, and matplotlib), and Spark MLlib. Dimensionality reduction techniques such as PCA, SVD, embeddings etc.
2+ years of INDUSTRY experience with Data engineering experience, including SQL and manipulating large structured or unstructured datasets for analysis Strong hands-on experience in implementing machine learning algorithms and models Excellent data presentation skills
Experience working with GIT and shared codebases
Good to have
Prior work experience in the insurance
Prior experience in building Deep Learning models using Keras, TensorFlow etc.
Must to have
Ph.D. or Masters degree + 2 years of industry experience OR Bachelors degree + 5 years of industry experience
2 years of hands-on industry experience in Data Science/ ML
2 years of hands-on industry experience in python
1 year of hands-on industry experience in Spark MLlib
1 year of hands-on industry experience in SQL
Industry experience with large structured and unstructured datasets
Experience in building Deep Learning models using Keras, TensorFlow is a big plus
Insurance experience is a big plus
Soothsayer Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer and e-Verify Company.
Soothsayer Analytics is a Data Science company based out of Livonia, MI and offices in Columbus, OH and offshore in Hyderabad India. Advanced Analytics firm focused on Pattern Recognition and Unstructured Data.
Our team actively works with, creates, and researches cutting edge Data Science techniques. We approach each problem individually and architect custom solutions.
Our strength lies in our ability to build and productize proprietary algorithms and analytical tools.
Advised by 10 industry experts whose domain knowledge we leverage to better architect industry specific solutions.
Our delivery partners include 20+ Data Scientists with a combined 75 Patents and 300+ Publications.
We collaborate with this brain trust to keep us abreast of state-of-the-art techniques and to help deliver world-class results. We utilize cutting edge Machine Learning and Statistical Techniques to extract Hidden Insights and Patterns from Complex, High Dimensional, and Unstructured Data.
Our major clients include: DOW Chemicals, Ford, Visteon, D&B, Timken, US steels, Steelcase, Abercrombie, Express, Stanley Steemer, Whirlpool, AEP, NiSource, GEA, etc.
Soothsayer Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer and e-Verify Company.",3.3,Soothsayer Analytics,"Livonia, MI",Unknown,,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,MI,,1,0,1,0,1
Data Scientist,"$109K
/yr","Base Pay Range: $80,800.00 - $137,400.00 Annually
Primary Location: USA-MI-Ann Arbor-KLA
KLA’s total rewards package for employees may also include participation in performance incentive programs and eligibility for additional benefits identified below. Interns are eligible for some of the benefits identified below. Our pay ranges are determined by role, level, and location. The range displayed above reflects the minimum and maximum pay for this position in the primary location identified in this posting. Actual pay depends on several factors, including location, job-related skills, experience, and relevant education level or training. If applicable, your recruiter can share more about the specific pay range for your preferred location during the hiring process.
Company Overview
KLA is a global leader in diversified electronics for the semiconductor manufacturing ecosystem. Virtually every electronic device in the world is produced using our technologies. No laptop, smartphone, wearable device, voice-controlled gadget, flexible screen, VR device or smart car would have made it into your hands without us. KLA invents systems and solutions for the manufacturing of wafers and reticles, integrated circuits, packaging, printed circuit boards and flat panel displays. The innovative ideas and devices that are advancing humanity all begin with inspiration, research and development. KLA focuses more than average on innovation and we invest 15% of sales back into R&D. Our expert teams of physicists, engineers, data scientists and problem-solvers work together with the world’s leading technology providers to accelerate the delivery of tomorrow’s electronic devices. Life here is exciting and our teams thrive on tackling really hard problems. There is never a dull moment with us.
Group/Division
KLA is well known for its high-performing business model which routinely produces significant profit margins and revenue. Key to supporting KLA business is the finance team that partners with corporate and global business organizations to provide expertise and guidance for developing and executing sound business models and practices. The Finance organization consists of operations and corporate finance teams. The operations finance team influences business decisions by gathering the best available operations information, distilling it and making recommendations to our management team on the best course of action. The corporate team provides a broad range of services, such as financial planning, corporate accounting, tax, industry analysis and benchmarking, internal audits, SEC reporting and merger and acquisition support.
Job Description/Preferred Qualifications
A Data Scientist is responsible for providing KLA executives and product groups across the company with critical data and analysis that helps them to make the better business decisions.
Job Description Responsibilities:
Developing and implementing databases and data collection systems which includes creation and management of databases and data collection systems that efficiently gather relevant information.
Identifying critical meaningful metrics and setting priorities: While collaborating with our internal customers to resolve most crucial Key Performance Indicators (critical metrics) to supervise, analyze, and establish priorities for the company.
Gathering information from original and secondary sources by acquiring comprehensive information for analysis from various sources, including primary and secondary sources.
Sorting and sanitizing data: Prior to analysis, data needs to be organized and cleansed to ensure accuracy and quality.
Identifying trends and patterns in large datasets: Apply sophisticated analytical techniques to model and uncover important trends and patterns hidden within extensive datasets.
Creating visual representations of data in the form of infographics, charts, PowerPoint slides, PowerBi representations: Employ data visualization tools to provide insights in a visually appealing and understandable format, enabling collaborators to easily absorb and comprehend understand sophisticated information. Excellent visualizations may also be able to be demonstrated externally in Investor Relations materials or in other presentations by c-suite executives.
Generating and modifying reports: Develop reports that summarize their findings, providing actionable insights and recommendations for decision-making purposes. These reports are continually refined and adjusted based on evolving data analysis requirements.
Building and maintaining PowerBI dashboards: Design and maintain interactive dashboards that offer real-time visualizations of critical metrics, allowing partners to monitor performance and make informed decisions.
Documenting data models, metrics, and infrastructure: Document the data models, metrics, and supporting infrastructure they create and maintain to ensure data integrity and facilitate collaboration
Minimum Qualifications
Doctorate (Academic) Degree and 0 years related work experience; Master's Level Degree and related work experience of 3 years; Bachelor's Level Degree and related work experience of 5 years.
Strong mathematical skills to help collect, measure, organize and analyze data
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Solid understanding of and experience with reporting packages (PowerBi), databases (SQL etc), programming (Python, R, XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
A high level of intellectual curiosity and a strong interest in understanding the semiconductor and electronics ecosystems
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Problem-solving skills
Accuracy and attention to detail
Strong verbal and written communication skills
The company offers a total rewards package that is competitive and comprehensive including but not limited to the following: medical, dental, vision, life, and other voluntary benefits, 401(K) including company matching, employee stock purchase program (ESPP), student debt assistance, tuition reimbursement program, development and career growth opportunities and programs, financial planning benefits, wellness benefits including an employee assistance program (EAP), paid time off and paid company holidays, and family care and bonding leave.
KLA is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or any other status protected by applicable law. We will ensure that qualified individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us at
talent.acquisition@kla.com
or at +1-408-352-2808 to request accommodation.",4.0,KLA,"Ann Arbor, MI",5001 to 10000 Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Machinery Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,109.0,MI,48.0,1,0,0,0,1
Expert Data Scientist,"$184K
/yr","Requisition ID # 161031

Job Category: Accounting / Finance
Job Level: Individual Contributor
Business Unit: Gas Engineering
Work Type: Hybrid
Job Location: San Ramon

Department Overview
The Risk Management team is responsible for overseeing the enterprise risk management practices within the Gas functional area. The team works closely with risk owners in asset management and operation groups to provide support to understand gas risks. The team also collaborates with the Enterprise Operations and Risk Management team to continue to mature and improve risk management practices within the company.

Position Summary
The successful candidate will be responsible for leading development and building statistical models, data analysis and generating visualizations using several analytical tools such as Python, R, Amazon Web Services (AWS), and Tableau to better understand, predict and manage PG&E’s risk in Gas. This position will combine asset performance research using internal and external data, along with financial information and risk management analysis. This position will also interact with other stakeholders outside the risk management department to facilitate the acquisition of data, determine its quality, and engage the risk owners and stakeholders on the development of quantitative risk models. As an Expert Data Scientist, it will also be required to effectively communicate the results and the model calculations to various PG&E personnel with different backgrounds (technical and non-technical) and to train other data scientists to do the same.

Position duties may include (but are not limited)-
Lead development and maintenance of quantitative risk models in support of enterprise risk management activities and regulatory proceedings.
Collaborate with Gas Operations risk owners and stakeholders to better understand their risks, available data, and provide solutions for the best modeling techniques.
Use risk model outcomes to support the portfolio prioritization process.
Be able to effectively communicate how the quantitative risk models work and explain the results to risk owners and the leadership team.
Create visualizations using R, Python or Tableau to communicate risk models results.
Extract useful statistics and insight from asset performance data to drive/support the quantitative risk assessment process.
Assess business implications associated with modeling and supports subject matter experts in the application of potential solutions.

This position is hybrid, working from your remote office and your assigned work location based on business need. The assigned work location will be within the PG&E Service Territory (San Ramon, CA)

PG&E is providing the salary range that the company in good faith believes it might pay for this position at the time of the job posting. This compensation range is specific to the locality of the job. The actual salary paid to an individual will be based on multiple factors, including, but not limited to, specific skills, education, licenses or certifications, experience, market value, geographic location, and internal equity. Although we estimate the successful candidate hired into this role will be placed towards the middle or entry point of the range, the decision will be made on a case-by-case basis related to these factors.

A reasonable salary range is:

Bay Area Minimum: $136,000
Bay Area Maximum: $232,000

This job is also eligible to participate in PG&E’s discretionary incentive compensation programs.

Job Responsibilities
Researches and applies advanced knowledge of existing and emerging data science principles, theories, and techniques to inform business decisions.
Creates advanced data mining architectures / models / protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in structured and unstructured data sets
Extracts, transforms, and loads data from dissimilar sources from across PG&E for their machine learning feature engineering
Applies data science/ machine learning /artificial intelligence methods to develop defensible and reproducible predictive or optimization models that involve multiple facets and iterations in algorithm development.
Wrangles and prepares data as input of machine learning model development and feature engineering
Writes and documents reusable python functions and modular python code for data science.
Assesses business implications associated with modeling assumptions, inputs, methodologies, technical implementation, analytic procedures and processes, and advanced data analysis.
Works with sponsor departments and company subject matter experts to understand application and potential of data science solutions that create value.
Presents findings and makes recommendations to senior management.
Act as peer reviewer of complex models
Qualifications-

Minimum:
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Physics, Econometrics or Economics, Engineering, Mathematics, Applied Sciences, Statistics, or equivalent field.
6 years in data science (or no experience, if possess Doctoral Degree or higher)

Desired:
Excellent written and oral communication skills for coordinating across teams and effective communication of risk model assumptions/results.
Demonstrated collaboration or paired development work history.
Advanced Excel/Visual Basic skills.
A strong understanding of one or several analysis and programming packages such as R, SAS, or Python (with working knowledge of Pandas, SciPy, Numpy, IPython).
Deep knowledge of applied statistics including complex multivariate statistical analysis, Bayesian statistics, Time Series analysis (e.g Autoregressive models).
Proven proficiency in developing and implementing predictive models.
Experience and interest in data visualization techniques. Ability to convey complex analyses with the most efficient and intuitive visual methods and the ability to effectively communicate findings.
A passion and curiosity for data and data-driven decision making.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applying these techniques to make business decisions.
Ability to teach and/or mentor junior colleagues.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SQL, etc.
Experience with quantitative risk modeling specific to natural gas (gas dispersion, flare radiation, fireball, etc).
Gas Operations knowledge.
Familiarity with gas transmission and/or gas distribution flow models.",4.0,PG&E Corporation,"San Ramon, CA",10000+ Employees,1905.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,184.0,CA,119.0,1,0,0,1,1
Image Analysis Scientist,"$130K
/yr","Are you passionate about advanced pathology imaging and digital image analysis? Can you apply these skills to help us in drug discovery? Do you have expertise in applying image analysis techniques to complex tissue imaging data and have an appetite for applying these skills to advance the boundaries of science to deliver life-changing medicines to patients? We have an opening at our Pathology department at AstraZeneca!
As an Image Analysis Scientist, you will apply brand new technologies and advanced image processing and analysis to help derive biological insights from digital pathology imaging data to support drug development projects. You will work alongside our team of image analysis scientists, imaging scientist, pathologists, biologists and data scientists within Clinical Pharmacology and Safety Sciences (CPSS).
CPSS is changing the way imaging technologies are combined to offer unprecedented insight and impact. Our global Imaging teams combine data from histology, digital pathology, multiplex immunofluorescent assays and advanced molecular imaging techniques (including mass spectrometry imaging) to understand the spatial biology of disease and drug discovery.
This position offers the opportunity to be involved in the investigation of both the safety and efficacy of drugs within our projects in both a preclinical and clinical setting. We believe this is a truly exciting opportunity.
The Role
You will support drug discovery project delivering image analysis endpoints. You will develop image analysis algorithms using commercial software platforms and bespoke innovative computer vision models primarily for digital pathology based imaging modalities (H&E, IHC, multiplex immunofluorescence) across multiple therapeutic areas. You will be fully connected with our global imaging teams offering access to our full suite of technologies.

You will take a lead in delivering established and cutting-edge image analysis for imaging data sets. Providing expertise in image processing, segmentation and quantitative analysis using both established image analysis software as well as other computer vision based machine learning and deep learning approaches to derive solutions to a range of problems in biomedical images. Working in a highly multidisciplinary environment with scientists across AstraZeneca.
Main Duties and Responsibilities:
Drive the delivery of impact to drug projects through image analysis support across all AZ therapy areas
Deliver & develop image analysis support and data generation for digital pathology based imaging activities for preclinical studies. (e.g. Positive cell count, tissue segmentation, dual-stain analysis)
Experience using vendor platform (e.g HALO/Visiopharm) and other computer vision based approaches.
Collaborate with cross functional teams e.g. Imaging scientists, Pathologists and other Bioscientists, to develop analysis strategies & plans, lead image analysis studies, analyse images and derive results for drug safety and efficacy assessment.
Prepare and present visualization of image analysis results, associated with drug treatments, response and survival data and other sample attributes using appropriate statistical methods.
Active participation in the use of FAIR standards to support enterprise level image data storage and management, data ingestion processes, tools and technology to support current and future analyses and data insights to support AZ drug development portfolio.
Collaborate with other Image Analysis scientists within the Pathology group and wider AZ organization to propose, review and finalize future image analysis algorithm development and project work.
Communicates project results, conclusions and recommendations effectively to colleagues, teams, partners and collaborators through written reports and oral presentations at internal and external meetings.
Contributes to the publication of scientific abstracts, posters, presentations, manuscripts and/or patent applications.
Education & Experience Requirements:
MSc/PhD in a Biological Science, Biomedical Engineering, Bioinformatics, Computer Science or related field with 2 or more years of related experience in academia or pharmaceutical/biotech/CRO organization
Essential Requirements:
Prior experience of digital pathology and performing image processing, segmentation, classification and analysis of tissue-based imaging data is critical.
Shown experience using HALO and/or Visiopharm image analysis software
Experience delivering computer vision/machine learning approaches using off-the-shelf image analysis software (e.g. QuPath, ImageJ), or applying programming skills (e.g. Python, R, MATLAB) for tailored solutions
Knowledge of preclinical/clinical histopathology techniques such as H&E, IHC, multiplex IF & ISH is favorable.
Experience designing, developing, implementing and validating computer vision,machine learning, deep learning & image analysis processes to address quantification questions within tissue images.
Strong problem-solving skills with the ability to work both independently and collaboratively, and to handle several concurrent, fast-paced projects.
When we put unexpected teams in the same room, we fuel bold thinking with the power to inspire life-changing medicines. In-person working gives us the platform we need to connect, work at pace and challenge perceptions. That’s why we work, on average, a minimum of three days per week from the office. But that doesn't mean we’re not flexible. We balance the expectation of being in the office while respecting individual flexibility. Join us in our unique and adventurous world.
Why AstraZeneca?
At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being bold - finding those moments and recognizing their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organization to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means we’re opening new ways to work, pioneering groundbreaking methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.
So, what’s next?
Are you ready to bring new ideas and fresh thinking to the table? We have one seat available, and we hope it’s yours.
Where can I find out more?
Check out our landing page for more information on our BPD group https://careers.astrazeneca.com/bpd
Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/
Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/
Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en
The annual base pay (or hourly rate of compensation) for this position ranges from $ 104,270.40 to $ 156,405.60, either as annual base pay or as the hourly rate (annual base pay divided by 2080 hours)]. Hourly and salaried non-exempt employees will also be paid overtime pay when working qualifying overtime hours. Base pay offered may vary depending on multiple individualized factors, including market location, job-related knowledge, skills, and experience. In addition, our positions offer a short-term incentive bonus opportunity; eligibility to participate in our equity-based long-term incentive program (salaried roles), to receive a retirement contribution (hourly roles), and commission payment eligibility (sales roles). Benefits offered included a qualified retirement program [401(k) plan]; paid vacation and holidays; paid leaves; and, health benefits including medical, prescription drug, dental, and vision coverage in accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable plans. Additional details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the Company reserves the right to modify base pay (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, Company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Waltham, MA",10000+ Employees,1913.0,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Pharmaceutical & Biotechnology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,130.0,MA,111.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Science / AI Engineer,"$133K
/yr","Introduction
ASML US, including its affiliates and subsidiaries, bring together the most creative minds in science and technology to develop lithography machines that are key to producing faster, cheaper, more energy-efficient microchips. We design, develop, integrate, market, and service these advanced machines, which enable our customers - the world’s leading chipmakers - to reduce the size and increase the functionality of their microchips, which in turn leads to smaller, more powerful consumer electronics. Our headquarters are in Veldhoven, Netherlands, and we have 18 office locations around the United States including main offices in Chandler, Arizona, San Jose and San Diego, California, Wilton, Connecticut, and Hillsboro, Oregon.
Job Mission
The EUV Source team in San Diego operates in a fast-paced, uniquely innovative, and challenging environment to deliver new-to-industry products supporting the commercialization of EUV technology by ASML. The Data Science/AI Engineer will be part of the EUV Source Performance team within ASML San Diego. Due to high complexity of the EUV light source, we, as Source Performance, are a dedicated team with the mission to validate and ensure that EUV sources meet or exceed customer performance requirements and expectations. In order to execute this mission, EUV Source Performance acts as the critical enabler of knowledge acquisition and transfer throughout the products development process, via:
Substantive participation in the technology development and system definition process for products in definition and early development stage.
Ensuring quality of the module to sub-system to system-level performance testing and validation for the products in integration phase.
Driving technology improvements enabling new products field release and refinement of system specifications based upon deep understanding of factory and field performance.
The creation and delivery of analytic tooling, action plans and procedures to drive maximum solving power of our customer support organizations for sustaining products.
The Data Science/AI Engineer will be an individual contributor on a team responsible for extracting the highest business value possible from the data available. This person will also refine requirements towards the data engineering team to ensure a rich and complete dataset is available for consumption and may be required to execute some data engineering work themselves. This role is part of a team aiming to further develop the site’s data science and AI competence. The person in this role will be responsible for executing the data science and AI work needed to further advance ASML’s capability to learn quickly and advise product changes that benefit the overall performance of the EUV light source. These projects include physics based model development, machine learning, Gen-AI, reduced order models, and the development of digital twins representing the EUV source, its sub-components, and the factory.
The role requires a willingness to develop a deep understanding across multiple engineering disciplines beyond data science in order to be effective. To be successful, the candidate must combine strong technical skills, problem solving and numerical analysis skills, and desire for life-long learning. In addition, to be effective in the role, candidates must possess interpersonal skills to cross functional boundaries and to build constructive and effective relationships across the organization and promote cross-functional and cross-sector collaboration.
Duties and Responsibilities
Contribute towards the technical roadmap representing the data science and AI activities of the site that supports the product roadmap and aligns with business objectives
Participate in the end-to-end AI and data science lifecycle, from data collection and preprocessing to model deployment and monitoring. Collaborate with other engineers in the best applications of data science solutions for various complex problems we are trying to resolve.
Apply theoretical models, concepts, methods, and novel experimental techniques to quantitatively interpret performance of EUV source systems across a wide range of issues and multiple technical disciplines.
Produce clear, concise technical documentation in defined company formats, present results and align with cross-functional teams.
Work closely with cross-functional groups (systems engineering, development engineering, scientists, IT, global customer support personnel, manufacturing personnel, senior management, marketing, external customers) to set clear technical direction and achievable milestones.
Travel as required to both customer sites and other ASML sites for the purposes of reporting, alignment, and collaboration.
Complete service, expense reports, and other administrative responsibilities in accordance with ASML’s procedures and with supervisor’s approval.
Other duties as assigned.
Education and experience
MS in Computer Science, Data Science, or Machine Learning. PhD preferred. Candidates with a degree in Physics that have specialized their careers in data science will also be considered.
Must have a minimum of 3 years’ experience in a similar role.
Experience in the semiconductor industry a plus.
Skills
Must have significant experience working in the following cloud and development environments: Azure Kubernetes Service (AKS), Google Distributed Cloud Edge (GDCE), Apache Spark, Azure Databricks, Python, MATLAB, and related technologies. Additionally, proficiency with MLFlow for managing the end-to-end machine learning lifecycle, including experimentation, reproducibility, and deployment, is required.
The ideal candidate will have extensive experience in designing and implementing machine learning and deep learning architectures. This includes:
Developing and optimizing neural network architectures using frameworks such as TensorFlow and PyTorch.
Implementing scalable machine learning models and algorithms in a cloud-based environment.
Experience with Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision, and other AI domains.
Knowledge of model deployment and serving strategies, including the use of containerization technologies such as Docker and Kubernetes.
Proficiency in using GPU and TPU hardware accelerators for deep learning training and inference.
Experience in monitoring and maintaining the performance of deployed models to ensure they meet business and technical requirements.”
Understanding of the concept of large complex system integration and practices.
Understanding of the concepts of optics and lasers, plasma generation, and control systems.
Excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills.
Excellent inter-personal and customer service skills, with an advanced understanding of customer relationship building.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to reduce large amounts of data, create a concise summary, and effectively report results through written and/or graphical formats.
Ability to define and execute tasks based on project descriptions with minimum or no supervision.
Other Information
This position is located in San Diego, CA. It works on a hybrid schedule of 3 days onsite/2 days remote. It requires onsite presence to attend in-person work-related events, trainings and meetings and to further ensure teamwork, collaboration and innovation.
Routinely required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch. Occasionally required to move around the campus.
Occasionally lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Must be willing to work in a clean room environment, wearing coveralls, hoods, booties, safety glasses and gloves for entire duration of shift.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee routinely is required to sit; walk; talk; hear; use hands to keyboard, finger, handle, and feel; stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, reach, and stretch.
This position may require access to controlled technology, as defined in the Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require the Company to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
EOE AA M/F/Veteran/Disability
Potential candidates will meet the education and experience requirements provided on the above job description and excel in completing the listed responsibilities for this role. All candidates receiving an offer of employment must successfully complete a background check band any other tests that may be required.
The current base annual salary range for this role is currently:
$0-0
Pay scales are determined by role, level, location and alignment with market data. Individual pay is determined through interviews and an assessment of several factors that that are unique to each candidate, including but not limited to job-related skills, relevant education and experience, certifications, abilities of the candidate and pay relative to other team members.
The Company offers employees and their families, medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees are able to participate in the Company’s 401k plan. Employees will also receive eight (8) hours of vacation leave every month and (13) paid holidays throughout the calendar year. For more information, please contact the Recruiter or click on this link Compensation & Benefits in the US.
All new ASML jobs have a minimum application deadline of 10 days.
This position requires access to controlled technology, as defined in the United States Export Administration Regulations (15 C.F.R. § 730, et seq.). Qualified candidates must be legally authorized to access such controlled technology prior to beginning work. Business demands may require ASML to proceed with candidates who are immediately eligible to access controlled technology.
Diversity and inclusion
ASML is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values and respects the importance of a diverse and inclusive workforce. It is the policy of the company to recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job titles without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, or gender identity. We recognize that diversity and inclusion is a driving force in the success of our company.
Need to know more about applying for a job at ASML? Read our frequently asked questions.
Request an Accommodation
ASML provides reasonable accommodations to applicants for ASML employment and ASML employees with disabilities. An accommodation is a change in work rules, facilities, or conditions which enable an individual with a disability to apply for a job, perform the essential functions of a job, and/or enjoy equal access to the benefits and privileges of employment. If you are in need of an accommodation to complete an application, participate in an interview, or otherwise participate in the employee pre-selection process, please send an email to USHR_Accommodation@asml.com to initiate the company’s reasonable accommodation process.
Please note: This email address is solely intended to provide a method for applicants to initiate ASML’s process to request accommodation(s). Any recruitment questions should be directed to the designated Talent Acquisition member for the position.",4.1,ASML,"San Diego, CA",10000+ Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Electronics Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,133.0,CA,40.0,1,0,1,0,1
AI/ML Health Data Scientist Senior Consultant,"$108K
/yr","Job Family:
Data Science Consulting

Travel Required:
Up to 10%

Clearance Required:
Ability to Obtain Public Trust
What You Will Do:
As an AI/ML Health Data Science Senior Consultant with Guidehouse you will present during meetings, summits, and working sessions with senior client executives. Provide subject matter expert support across multiple client engagements; develop and review presentations, briefings, and memos, and reports. Identify client needs and develop solutions to address these needs. Prioritize and handle multiple tasks, researching and analyzing pertinent client, industry and technical matters, utilizing problem-solving skills, and communicating effectively in written and verbal formats to various audiences (including various levels of management and external clients) in a professional business environment. Scope and staff projects to meet client requirements. Develop work plans that reflect project scope and client expectations. Provide oversight and development of work products from start to finish (from brainstorming and framework development to final edits and end-product). Exemplify and reinforce quality standards in work products. Gather/create/share experiences in area of expertise with focus on best practices.
Additionally, you will support:
Engagement Oversight and Management
Ensure compliance with contract terms and conditions and internal firm policies
Manage contract budgets
Develop trusted relationships with clients
Provide direction, feedback, and coaching to team members
Build a pipeline of new business through active relationship development/management, proposal efforts, and thought leadership efforts
Career Development and Mentorship
Mentor employees within the practice field of activity.
Provide subject matter support, guidance and coaching of team members
What You Will Need:
Required:
Minimum Security Clearance: US Citizenship
Minimum Years of Experience: 3
Minimum Education: Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Economics, or similar quantitative discipline
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree and 3 years of prior relevant consulting experience (relevant experience may be substituted for formal education or advanced degree)
3 years of experience with analytics development including Python or R
Experience visually communicating data analysis visually, including bespoke analyses and BI Tools such as Power BI or Amazon QuickSight
Experience managing data product development at enterprise scale, including on cloud platforms, Spark or other big data ML systems, and comfort using Jira, Slack, Teams, and other collaboration tools
3+ years of database experience, including SQL and noSQL
A deep understanding of advanced analytics and Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning (AI/ML) landscape
2+ years of consulting experience in top-tier management consulting, investment banking, finance, corporate strategy, product management
Managed projects to timeline, scope and budget on multiple teams simultaneously
Experience advising/briefing senior executives
What Would Be Nice to Have:
Education: M.S./M.A. in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Economics, or similar quantitative discipline.
Experience with standards-based health data code sets and value sets
Experience with state level public health surveillance systems for state reportable, national notifiable, syndromic, inter-state sharing, or other similar use cases
Experience with commercial health datasets, e.g., claims, encounters, risk scoring, HEDIS measures, etc.
Knowledge of recent and ongoing public health initiatives in surveillance and informatics
Experience managing a team of 1+ direct reports, including one-on-one meetings, feedback, coaching, retention, and career progression
Public health or healthcare experience

What We Offer:
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Student Loan PayDown
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program
Mobility Stipend
About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",3.6,Guidehouse,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,108.0,GA,6.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The CDC Foundation helps the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) save and improve lives by unleashing the power of collaboration between CDC, philanthropies, corporations, organizations and individuals to protect the health, safety and security of America and the world. The CDC Foundation is the go-to nonprofit authorized by Congress to mobilize philanthropic partners and private-sector resources to support CDC’s critical health protection mission. Since 1995, the CDC Foundation has raised over $1.9 billion and launched more than 1,300 programs impacting a variety of health threats from chronic disease conditions including cardiovascular disease and cancer, to infectious diseases like rotavirus and HIV, to emergency responses, including COVID-19 and Ebola. The CDC Foundation managed hundreds of programs in the United States and in more than 90 countries last year. Visit www.cdcfoundation.org for more information.

Job Highlights
Location: Remote, must be based in the United States
Salary Range: $92,700-$134,275 per year, plus benefits. Individual salary offers will be based on experience and qualifications unique to each candidate.
Position Type: Grant funded, limited-term opportunity
Position End Date: June 30, 2025

Overview
The Data Scientist will play a crucial role in advancing the CDC Foundation's mission by leveraging data to inform strategic decisions and initiatives in a public health organization. This role is aligned to the Workforce Acceleration Initiative (WAI). WAI is a federally funded CDC Foundation program with the goal of helping the nation’s public health agencies by providing them with the technology and data experts they need to accelerate their information system improvements.
Working within the Michigan Department of Health and Human Services (MDHHS) Public Health Administration (PHA), the Michigan Department of Health and Human Services (MDHHS) Public Health Administration (PHA), the Data Scientist will utilize advanced analytics, statistical techniques, and innovative data science approaches (such as machine learning algorithms) to derive insights from the implementation and use of Admission, Discharge, Transfer (ADT) messages for public health use. Activities may include supporting the State of Michigan (SOM) centralized information technology (IT) owner in design and implementation of a decoupled ADT data environment, pilot projects demonstrating increased interoperability between existing public health technology environments and supporting ADT data quality improvement initiatives. These efforts will require engagement across MDHHS and local public health, with the SOM centralized IT owner, with the state health information exchange (HIE) entity (MiHIN), and other internal and external public health partners. These efforts will ultimately enable cross-domain use for MDHHS and local health department public health practitioners, improved ADT data quality, and furthering MDHHS’s ability to develop new public health insights through de-siloed data access. Work activities will be adjusted for the timeline of the position.
The Data Scientist will be hired by the CDC Foundation and assigned to the Michigan Department of Health and Human Services Public Health Administration. This position is eligible for a fully remote work arrangement for U.S. based candidates.
Responsibilities
Develop, implement, and improve data analysis and visualization tools for use by organization staff, to provide timely, relevant information that informs decisions affecting public health’s use of ADT message data.
Analyze diverse datasets related to public health issues to identify trends, patterns, and correlations.
Apply statistical methods and machine learning algorithms to extract actionable insights.
Identify data quality improvement opportunities remediation approaches.
Create compelling visualizations and reports to communicate findings to partners and decision-makers.
Create and Present data-driven insights in a clear and understandable manner to facilitate informed decision-making.
Collaborate with MDHHS PHA and its partners to understand their data needs and objectives.
Serve as trusted advisor to MDHHS PHA business areas on best practices for the application of ADT message data for public health use.
Serve as thought leader to SOM centralized IT owner on the design and development of a decoupled ADT data solution for public health use.
Provide data-driven support and guidance to inform public health policies and initiatives.
Stay abreast of emerging trends, technologies, and methodologies in data science and analytics.
Explore innovative approaches to address complex public health challenges and improve data analysis capabilities.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Data Science, Statistics, Epidemiology, Health Informatics, or related field. Master’s or PhD in related field preferred.
Minimum 5 years of relevant professional experience
Strong analytical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Experience in assessing data quality across large datasets.
Experience in interpreting complex datasets and derive meaningful insights.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical partners and communicate public health concepts to technical focused audiences effectively.
Flexibility to adapt to evolving project requirements and priorities.
Experience in developing and implementing educational or training materials in support of building sustainable technological capabilities.
Outstanding interpersonal and teamwork skills; collegial; energetic; and able to develop productive relationships with colleagues, partners, and partners.
Demonstrated ability to work well independently and within teams
Experience working in a virtual environment with remote partners and teams
Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Proficiency in programing languages such as Python or R strongly preferred.
Experience with data manipulation and analysis tools (e.g., SQL, Pandas, NumPy) strongly preferred.
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI) strongly preferred.
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Scikit-learn) strongly preferred.
Special Notes
This role is involved in a dynamic public health program. As such, roles and responsibilities are subject to change as situations evolve. Roles and responsibilities listed above may be expanded upon or updated to match priorities and needs, once written approval is received by the CDC Foundation in order to best support the public health programming.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status, and all other characteristics protected by law.

We comply with all applicable laws including E.O. 11246 and the Vietnam Era Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 governing employment practices and do not discriminate on the basis of any unlawful criteria in accordance with 41 C.F.R. §§ 60-300.5(a)(12) and 60-741.5(a)(7). As a federal government contractor, we take affirmative action on behalf of protected veterans.

The CDC Foundation is a smoke-free environment.
Relocation expenses are not included.",4.3,CDC Foundation,Michigan,1001 to 5000 Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,113.0,Michigan,,1,0,0,1,1
"Manager, Data Scientist","$172K
/yr","Total Wine & More is seeking a Principal Data Scientist to join our growing Data Services team in our Bethesda, MD office. We are looking for a Principal Data Scientist, interested in driving projects from conception to deployment, making a tangible impact on the organization while growing the next generation of data scientists at TWM by sharing your expertise and inspiring their growth. You will work with the latest data science tools and techniques to deliver business value through impacting consumer behavior. You will need to partner with cross-functional teams to deliver innovative solutions to high priority initiatives. You will report to the Director of Data Science and Analytics.
You will
Oversee data science projects from inception to completion, ensuring successful delivery.
Lead and mentor a team of data scientists, fostering a collaborative and productive environment
Demonstrate deep knowledge of data science techniques, programming languages, and machine learning framework
Develop a deep understanding of the business context and industry trend
Understand the business context and apply data science to solve real-world problems
Effectively communicate project progress, outcomes, and insights to stakeholders
Champion best practices in ML/AI domain across Total Wine & More. Communicate effectively with stakeholders of various tech skillsets about project implementation, results and evolutions of project
You will come with
Bachelor's degree from four-year College or university in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related field. Master’s or PhD preferred
8+ years of experience in data science, predictive analytics, econometrics or related fields
7+ years of experience in software engineering, data engineering, or related fields.
Understanding customer analytics
Proven track record in building impactful solutions using predictive & prescriptive modeling
Experience in the use of machine learning, econometrics, predictive modeling
Experience in leveraging the cloud in the application of advanced analytics
Experienced with general programing, statistical languages, and deep learning packages used to manipulate data and build statistical and machine learning models at a large scale, such as Python, PyTorch, Tensorflow, Keras, SQL, and SQL-like query languages for NoSQL databases
Understanding of data science-related technology landscape, processes and design principles
Familiarity with data architecture, data engineering, data management, and data analysis tools and techniques
Passionate about data, data science, and insight generation
Familiar with retail, wholesale, planning and allocation systems, or supply chain operations, preferred
Strong analytic skills, attention to detail, ability to multi-task, troubleshoot and problem solve along with the ability to make recommendations based on analysis are extremely important
Must possess excellent verbal, written, and presentation communication skills
Must be self-managed, highly motivated and have a strong drive for results
Must be naturally able to exert influence, drive and steer stakeholders in the right direction
We offer
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Generous store discounts
Health care plans (medical, prescription, dental, vision)
401(k), HSA, FSA, Pre-tax commuter benefits
Disability & life insurance coverage
Paid parental leave
Pet insurance
Critical illness and accident insurance
Discounted home and auto insurance
College tuition assistance
Career development & product training
Consumer classes
& More!
Grow with us
Total Wine & More is the country's largest independent retailer of fine wine, beer and spirits, and we continue to grow our footprint year over year. Total Wine offers exciting and unique career opportunities across the country and in our corporate office. Our strength is our people. We have a commitment to training and career growth, all in an environment that values new ideas and teamwork. If you share our entrepreneurial spirit and a passion for providing best-in-class customer experience, take a moment to apply or learn more at www.TotalWine.com/About-Us/Careers!
The exempt compensation range for this position is $146,600 - $197,700. Compensation may vary based on a number of factors including, but not limited to, market location, job-related knowledge, skills and/or experience. Total Wine & More considers several factors when establishing compensation. Estimated salaries determined by third parties have not been validated by Total Wine & More. Total Wine & More is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. Total Wine & More makes reasonable accommodations during all aspects of the employment process, including during the interview process. Total Wine & More is a Drug Free Workplace.
The information provided above indicates the general nature and level of work required of the position and is not a comprehensive list of all responsibilities or qualifications. Benefits list is only a highlight of some of the benefits offered to team members; eligibility for certain benefits apply.",3.4,Total Wine & More,"Bethesda, MD",5001 to 10000 Employees,1991.0,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,172.0,MD,33.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist - LLM,"$200K
/yr","Overview:
Spotter is a platform for Creators, providing services and software designed to accelerate growth for the world's best Creators and brands. Creators working with Spotter can access the capital, knowledge, community, and personalized AI software products they need to succeed. With unique knowledge of how Creators work, the resources they need to grow, and the challenges they face, Spotter is empowering top YouTube Creators to succeed.
Spotter has already deployed over $940 million to YouTube Creators to reinvest in themselves and accelerate their growth, with plans to reach $1 billion in investment by 2024. With a premium catalog that spans over 725,000 videos, Spotter generates more than 88 billion monthly watch-time minutes, delivering a unique scaled media solution to Advertisers and Ad Agencies that is transparent, efficient, and 100% brand safe. For more information about Spotter, please visit https://spotter.com.
We're looking for a talented and intensely curious LLM specialist and deep learning modeler that is nimble and focused with a startup mentality: You want your models and code to ship and improve the lives of real customers, not rot in a research department. You'll be fine-tuning and serving various models, but you'll also obsess over learnings in the industry and apply them in your daily work. Like for all of us, the outcome matters more to you than how we get there. You get a kick out of serving tools that improve and accelerate the workflows of the top YouTube creators in the world! If that all sounds like you, keep on reading.
What You'll Do
You'll fine-tune and serve LLMs and LLM-based pipelines to help build best-in-class workflow tools for the world's top YouTube creators, and you'll ship updates and new features on a weekly basis
You'll be part of a small but mighty and highly motivated team (~15 people strong) that operates like a startup within a startup–with all the chaos that comes with that–but also real camaraderie, diverse backgrounds, skills and opinions and plenty of fun.
You'll learn and grow every day - from the industry, your peers and most importantly, your customer zero - the creators!
Responsibilities
Fine-tune pre-trained language models for generative AI applications.
Apply, discover and research techniques to optimize existing LLM training and serving, as well as improving the model quality.
Develop and deploy the LLMs for a variety of content generation tasks.
Share your discoveries, learnings and results with other modelers in the company working on related projects.
Continuously research and stay up-to-date with recent advancements in NLP and large language models, applying novel techniques and methodologies to improve our models.
Read all the newsletters and obsess over new industry learnings, startups utilizing LLMs in novel ways, and other ways the real world is utilizing LLMs.
Conduct experiments and benchmarking to assess the performance of various model architectures and optimize hyperparameters.
Troubleshoot and resolve any issues arising during model training and deployment.
Work with product teams to ensure smooth product delivery with high standards, prioritize short-term returns and long-term growth.
Who You Are
PhD in Data Science related field (Machine Learning, Computer Science, Statistics, etc...)
Hands-on experience in developing models, in optimizing model training and tuning and in deploying Large Language Models such as GPT, LLaMA, BERT, or Transformer-based architectures with strong knowledge in tokenization and embeddings.
Experience in developing deep learning models as a Data Scientist and experience in building products backed up ML /AI
Experience with transfer learning, meta learning and predictive modeling.
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills and
Intensely curious to learn how AGI is evolving day in and day out.
Excited about creators
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
Good knowledge in other deep learning models such as CNN, RNN.
Take a creative and strategic approach to solve hard problems. Simplify the complex. Bring in fresh ideas from new places.
Why Spotter
Medical insurance covered up to 100%
Dental & vision insurance
401(k) matching
Stock options
Complimentary gym access
Autonomy and upward mobility
Diverse, equitable, and inclusive culture, where your voice matters.
In compliance with local law, we are disclosing the compensation, or a range thereof, for roles that will be performed in Los Angeles. Actual salaries will vary and may be above or below the range based on various factors including but not limited to skill sets; experience and training; licensure and certifications; and other business and organizational needs. A reasonable estimate of the current pay range is: $150K-$250K salary per year. The range listed is just one component of Spotter's total compensation package for employees. Other rewards may include an annual discretionary bonus and equity.
Spotter is an equal opportunity employer. Spotter does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, religion, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic characteristics or information, marital status, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, and related medical conditions), gender, gender identity, gender expression, age, sexual orientation, military status, veteran status, use of or request for family or medical leave, political affiliation, or any other status protected under applicable federal, state or local laws.
Equal access to programs, services and employment is available to all persons. Those applicants requiring reasonable accommodations as part of the application and/or interview process should notify a representative of the Human Resources Department.",3.4,Spotter,"Culver City, CA",Unknown,,Company - Private,Advertising & Public Relations,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,200.0,CA,,0,0,0,1,1
Planning Analytics and Risk Management - Associate Data Scientist - Innovation,"$88K
/yr","US-OH-Fairfield
Description

Make a difference with a career in insurance
At The Cincinnati Insurance Companies, we put people first and apply the Golden Rule to our daily operations. To put this into action, we’re looking for extraordinary people to join our talented team. Our service-oriented, ethical, knowledgeable, caring associates are the heart of our vision to be the best company serving independent agents. We help protect families and businesses as they work to prevent or recover from a loss. Share your talents to help us reach for continued success as we bring value to the communities we serve and demonstrate that Actions Speak Louder in Person®.
If you’re ready to build productive relationships, collaborate within a diverse team, embrace challenges, and develop your skills, then Cincinnati may be the place for you. We offer career opportunities where you can contribute and grow.
Build your future with us
The Cincinnati Insurance Companies' Planning Analytics and Risk Management department has an open position of Associate Data Scientist – Innovation. This position will be based in our corporate headquarter in Fairfield, Ohio, reporting to the Director of Innovation and Research.
This newly formed innovation analytics team supports our strategic innovation across the company, covering commercial and personal line P&C insurance, reinsurance, and life insurance. The work may impact any stage of the insurance life cycle, ranging from agency relationship, marketing and risk selection, pricing, underwriting, loss control and risk mitigation, service and operation, retention, claims, and fraud. The team’s goal is to bring new data, analytics, and technology into the corporation to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the overall business. The team will also support the analytics need for any new insurance and reinsurance product.
Many departments at our headquarters in Fairfield, Ohio, offer hybrid work options, empowering associates to work from home several days a week. Depending on your role and responsibilities, hybrid options may be available for those working at headquarters.
Salary: The pay range for this position is $75,000 - $100,000 annually. The pay determination is based on the applicant’s education, experience, location, knowledge, skills, and abilities. Eligible associates may also receive an annual cash bonus and stock incentives based on company and individual performance.
Be ready to:
work very closely with various business teams depending on the fast-changing needs
learn the business and pain points from the domain experts
utilize analytics thinking and skills to identify possible solutions
develop prototypes together with business and IT that can make an impact to the business
massage and understand the data
design and build machine learning models
evaluate the model performance and develop practical cost benefit analysis
analyze operational process and build RPA tools (or search for available tools)
perform ad hoc data analyses and reporting
Be equipped with:
passion in numbers and quantitative analysis
knowledge and experience in deep learning (image segmentation and NLP experience preferred)
good coding skills
strong problem-solving skills and a forward-looking mindset
good people skills and excellent communication skills
knowledge in the insurance industry a big plus
Bring education and experience from:
a graduate level degree in a quantitative field such as math, physics, computer science, or economics; PhD preferred
Enhance your talents
Providing outstanding service and developing strong relationships with our independent agents are hallmarks of our company. Whether you have experience from another carrier or you’re new to the insurance industry, we promote a lifelong learning approach. Cincinnati provides you with the tools and training to be successful and to become a trusted, respected insurance professional – all while enjoying a meaningful career.
Enjoy benefits and amenities
Your commitment to providing strong service, sharing best practices, and creating solutions that impact lives is appreciated. To increase the well-being and satisfaction of our associates, we offer a variety of benefits and amenities.
Embrace a diverse team
As a relationship-based organization, we welcome and value a diverse workforce. We provide equal employment opportunity to all qualified persons without regard to race; creed; color; sex, including sexual orientation, gender identity and transgender status; religion; national origin; age; disability; military service; veteran status; pregnancy; AIDS/HIV or genetic information; or any other basis prohibited by law. .",4.1,The Cincinnati Insurance Companies,"Fairfield, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1968.0,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,88.0,OH,56.0,0,0,0,0,1
OPERATIONS RESEARCH ANALYST/DATA SCIENTIST,"$109K
/yr","Facility/Facilities: Washington DC
Veracity Engineering is an industry leader in aviation engineering and management consulting. We apply proven principles and innovative approaches to solve tomorrow’s problems today. Since 2001, Veracity’s staff of experienced, passionate and creative professionals has provided our government and commercial clients with innovative solutions to modernize air traffic systems and advance global initiatives in safety, efficiency, and capacity.
Veracity Engineering is an industry leader in aviation engineering and management consulting. We apply proven principles and innovative approaches to solve tomorrow’s problems today. Since 2001, Veracity’s staff of experienced, passionate, and creative professionals has provided our government and commercial clients with innovative solutions to modernize air traffic systems and advance global initiatives in safety, efficiency, and capacity.
Veracity Engineering has an exciting opportunity for Operations Research Analyst/Data Scientist (Level 5). This position is responsible for supporting The Office of Capital Budgets formulates, executes, and maintains financial systems in support of Facilities and Equipment (F&E) and Research, Engineering, and Development (RE&D) budget justifications, financial plans, inquiries, and audits. The Capital Budgets Division (ABP-300) has three branches: Budget Formulation (ABP-310), Budget Execution (ABP-320), and Budget Systems (ABP-330).
POSITION OVERVIEW:
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Conducts quantitative analysis using operations research tools, economics, and other quantitative techniques in the areas of procedural implementations and performance issues.
Creates analysis procedures.
Assists in the definition of machine learning and data mining strategies.
Creates, deploys, maintains and refines decision management models.
Specialist in modeling and simulation functions or operations such as, but not limited to exercises, plans, coordination, demonstrations, and instruction in the fields such as, but not limited to health, environmental, transportation, law enforcement, and security for military and civilian agencies.
Requirements
Education:
Bachelor’s Degree in operations research, computer science, engineering, business, mathematics, information systems, or management science.
Experience:
2-6 years relevant experience
Substitutions:
Master’s Degree in related field may be substituted for Bachelor’s degree and 3 years experience.
PhD in related field may be substituted for Bachelor’s degree and 7 years experience.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools or controls; use fingers and hands to type or write; reach with hands and arms; talk or hear; taste or smell. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this job.
WORK ENVIRONMENT:
This position is performed in a traditional office environment.
At Veracity, we want our employees to excel and grow professionally. With an emphasis on continuing education, we demonstrate our commitment to employee growth and development by providing tuition reimbursement for education and certifications. In addition to tuition reimbursement, we offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry: competitive health benefits package, paid time off, 401K matching, and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks.
U.S. Eligibility Requirements (Standard for all U.S. Positions)
Interested candidates must submit an application and resume/CV online to be considered.
Must be 18 years of age or older.
Must be willing to submit to a background investigation; any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background investigation.
Must have unrestricted work authorization to work in the U.S. For U.S. employment opportunities, Veracity hires U.S. citizens, permanent residents, asylees, refugees, and temporary residents. Temporary residence does not include those with non-immigrant work authorization (F, J, H, or L visas), such as students in practical training status. Exceptions to these requirements will be determined based on the shortage of qualified candidates with a particular skill. Veracity will require proof of work authorization.
Must be willing to execute Veracity’s Confidentiality and Non-Disclosure Agreement which requires, among other things, post-employment obligations relating to non-solicitation, confidentiality, and non-disclosure.
Veracity believes that all persons are entitled to equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against nor favor any applicant because of race, sex, color, disability, national origin, religion, creed, age, marital status, veteran status, gender, gender identity/expression, actual or perceived sexual orientation, or any other protected characteristic. Equal employment opportunity will be extended in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship, including, but not limited to, recruitment, hiring, training, promotion, transfer, demotion, compensation, benefits, layoff, and termination. In addition, Veracity will make reasonable accommodations to known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant with a disability, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the operation of our business.
NOTE: This job description is not intended to be all-inclusive. Employee may perform other related duties as required to meet the ongoing needs of the organization. Employment at Veracity Engineering is “at will,” meaning that neither you nor Veracity Engineering has entered into a contract regarding the duration of your employment. Veracity is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.
At Veracity, we want our employees to excel and grow professionally. With an emphasis on continuing education, we demonstrate our commitment to employee growth and development by providing tuition reimbursement for education and certifications. In addition to tuition reimbursement, we offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry: competitive health benefits package, paid time off, 401K matching, and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks.
U.S. Eligibility Requirements (Standard for all U.S. Positions)
Interested candidates must submit an application and resume/CV online to be considered.
Must be 18 years of age or older.
Must be willing to submit to a background investigation; any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background investigation.
Must have unrestricted work authorization to work in the U.S. For U.S. employment opportunities, Veracity hires U.S. citizens, permanent residents, asylees, refugees, and temporary residents. Temporary residence does not include those with non-immigrant work authorization (F, J, H, or L visas), such as students in practical training status. Exceptions to these requirements will be determined based on the shortage of qualified candidates with a particular skill. Veracity will require proof of work authorization.
Must be willing to execute Veracity’s Confidentiality and Non-Disclosure Agreement which requires, among other things, post-employment obligations relating to non-solicitation, confidentiality, and non-disclosure
Veracity believes that all persons are entitled to equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against nor favor any applicant because of race, sex, color, disability, national origin, religion, creed, age, marital status, veteran status, gender, gender identity/expression, actual or perceived sexual orientation, or any other protected characteristic. Equal employment opportunity will be extended in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship, including, but not limited to, recruitment, hiring, training, promotion, transfer, demotion, compensation, benefits, layoff, and termination. In addition, Veracity will make reasonable accommodations to known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant with a disability, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the operation of our business.",4.3,Veracity Engineering,"Washington, DC",51 to 200 Employees,2001.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,109.0,DC,23.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Consultant - AI/ML Data Science Consulting, Health Segment - Campus 2024","$119K
/yr","Job Family:
Data Science Consulting

Travel Required:
Up to 10%

Clearance Required:
Ability to Obtain Public Trust
What You Will Do:
Guidehouse’sData Scienceteam helps clients maximize the value of their data and automate business processes. This high performing team works with clients to implement the full spectrum of data analytics and data science, from data querying and data wrangling to data visualization and dashboarding, to predictive analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence as well as robotic process automation (RPA). Our services enable our clients to define their information strategy, enable mission critical insights and data-driven decision making, reduce cost and complexity, increase trust, and improve operational effectiveness.
Our consultants focus on client services, while also supporting business development, internal firm initiatives, and ongoing professional development

As a Consultant, you will be given the opportunity to support projects addressing some of the most significant project challenges faced by our federal andclients. Our projects are very fluid and require self-motivated individuals willing to develop solutions on their own or in a team of highly skilled professionals. Project members can be provided the opportunity to interact with our clients' senior management, as well as with the opportunity to enhance their skills in the areas of technical competency, business development, client service, and people development. You will be working with an experienced team to support the development of client deliverables, internal and client presentations, day-to-day project logistics, and any additional project tasks.
Depending on your area expertise and team assignment, this position provides individuals the opportunity to serve clients in the area(s) of informatics, data analytics, IT strategy, software development, visual design, process improvement, cybersecurity, information management systems.

What You Will Need:
Minimum Years of Experience: 0 years
Minimum Degree Status: Undergraduate Degree (Must still be enrolled in an accredited undergraduate or graduate degree program through Fall 2023 and graduate by Summer 2024)
Security clearance: Ability to obtain a Public Trust clearance
Degree concentration in Computer Science, Data Analytics, Data Science, Economics, Engineering, InformationSystems, Mathematics, Operations Research, Statistics, or similar quantitative discipline
Demonstrable skills with analytical models, methods, applications, and tools, such as:
Statistical analysis, predictive modelling, simulation, machine learning, and artificial intelligence
Selecting and applying the appropriate analytical techniques
Analytics for business, operations, human capital, or financial management
Analyzing large and complex data sets, with strong aptitude for conducting quantitative and qualitative analysis
Proficiency in an analytics programming language, such as R, Python, or SAS (Statistical Analysis System)
Visualization skills with tools such Tableau, Power BI, or R Shiny

What Would Be Nice To Have:
Skills and/or proven success in the following:
Contributing as a team member: understanding personal and team roles, contributing to a positive working environment by building strong, collaborative relationships with team members
Collaborating and working in a team environment, as well as the ability to work independently
Communicating effectively to various audiences, including various levels of management and external clients, in a professional environment
Identifying and addressing client needs, building relationships with clients, demonstrating flexibility in prioritizing and completing tasks, communicating potential conflicts to a supervisor
Business development including RFP/RFQ responses, developing white papers/concept papers, and building and demonstrating prototype solutions to customers
Knowledge of defense, national security, financial, healthcare, international development, or state and local government environment
The annual salary range for this position is $94,900.00-$142,300.00. Compensation decisions depend on a wide range of factors, including but not limited to skill sets, experience and training, security clearances, licensure and certifications, and other business and organizational needs.

What We Offer:
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance
401(k) Retirement Plan
Basic Life & Supplemental Life
Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Student Loan PayDown
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities
Skills Development & Certifications
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program
Mobility Stipend
About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",3.6,Guidehouse,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,119.0,GA,6.0,1,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$139K
/yr","Since 1965, Stoneridge has designed and manufactured advanced, award-winning technologies including driveline and transmission actuation systems, vision systems, emissions control systems, safety systems, and security and monitoring systems for vehicle OEMs in the commercial vehicle, automotive, off-highway and agricultural vehicle markets. We’re focused on the areas of greatest market need – both today and tomorrow. Our core products and technologies are aligned with industry megatrends including safety and security, vehicle intelligence, fuel efficiency and emissions. Join the Stoneridge Team as we continue to build upon our strong history and reputation for quality products to deliver innovative products and systems that address a need, exceed our customers’ expectations, and motivate our team.
JOB SUMMARY:
Stoneridge Advanced Engineering team is looking for a talented and motivated Sr Data Scientist to enhance our capabilities in understanding and utilizing our data across the entire engineering division. This role will not only focus on vision AI but also on broader applications of data science and AI to solve diverse problems within the company. The ideal candidate will play a crucial role in developing and implementing data-driven solutions to optimize our operations and drive business growth.
PRINCIPLE RESPONSIBILITIES:
Analyze and interpret complex datasets to identify patterns, trends, and insights.
Develop and implement predictive models and machine learning algorithms to solve various business problems.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business requirements and translate them into data science projects.
Work on a wide range of applications, including but not limited to vision AI, cloud-based applications, and other data-driven solutions across the company.
Design and conduct experiments to validate hypotheses and optimize processes.
Identifying detailed data needs, sources, and structure to support solution development.
Communicate findings and insights effectively to non-technical stakeholders through reports, visualizations, and presentations.
Work with data engineers to ensure data quality and integrity.
Stay current with the latest advancements in data science and AI technologies and methodologies.
Mentor junior data scientists and provide guidance on best practices.
QUALIFICATIONs:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems, or a related field and 3+ years of experience with proven experience working as a Data Scientist in the automotive industry OR Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems, or a related field and 5+ of experience with proven experience working as a Data Scientist in the automotive industry.
Experience with manipulating high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources to highlight patterns, anomalies, relationships, and trends.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python or R.
Experience with ML/DL frameworks (e.g., scikit-learn, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Strong knowledge of statistical methods and data analysis techniques.
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, matplotlib, seaborn).
Familiarity with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, Spark) and cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Google Cloud, Azure).
Proven experience working with relational databases (e.g., MySQL, PostgreSQL) to extract, transform, and load (ETL) data for analysis. Plus: Experience with cloud-based databases (e.g., Amazon Redshift, Google BigQuery) or NoSQL databases (e.g., MongoDB, Cassandra) for handling big data
Stoneridge is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer. We do not discriminate against any applicant or employee based on race, color, religion, national origin, gender, age, sexual orientation, marital status, mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected by the applicable laws in the countries we operate. Stoneridge also prohibits harassment of applicants or employees based on any of these protected categories.",3.4,Stoneridge,"Novi, MI",1001 to 5000 Employees,1965.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),0,1,139.0,MI,59.0,1,0,1,1,0
Data Scientist,"$140K
/yr","The Aerospace Corporation is the trusted partner to the nation’s space programs, solving the hardest problems and providing unmatched technical expertise. As the operator of a federally funded research and development center (FFRDC), we are broadly engaged across all aspects of space— delivering innovative solutions that span satellite, launch, ground, and cyber systems for defense, civil and commercial customers. When you join our team, you’ll be part of a special collection of problem solvers, thought leaders, and innovators. Join us and take your place in space.
At Aerospace, we are committed to providing an inclusive and diverse workplace for all employees to share in our common passion and aspiration – to carry out a mission much bigger than ourselves.
Information Systems and Cyber Division (ISCD) staff couple the latest in information system technologies, such as elastic compute clouds, containerization, microservices, real-time operating systems, and visualization frameworks, with expertise in cyber security, software architecture, software engineering, data science, Artificial Intelligence, process improvement, and software development to deliver responsive, resilient, high-performance software intensive systems to our Intelligence Community, DoD, and civilian customers
The Data Science and Artificial Intelligence Department (DSAID) seeks a creative and enthusiastic Data Scientist to join a diverse team of engineers, data scientists, and programmers with a passion for researching, prototyping, understanding, and building AI and data enabled tools across the space enterprise. We are a growing, innovative, and collaborative department that makes meaningful contributions to National Security Space (AF, NRO, etc.), and Civil and Commercial customers (NASA, MDA, DHS, etc.).
Data Scientists contribute to projects involving one or more of the following disciplines: Data Science, Applied or Theoretical Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Deep Reinforcement Learning, Physics Inspired ML, Classification Systems, Natural Language Processing, Artificial Intelligence, or Computer Vision. They are team-oriented, take initiative, are focused on developing cutting-edge technologies and frameworks, and are comfortable balancing a variety of projects spanning internally funded research and development to direct customer support for mission-critical space systems. They may mentor other staff members, begin to specialize in a discipline of interest, and begin to provide technical input and leadership on their projects.
This positions specifically is for the Data Driven Algorithms Research section, where we conduct and review research on how cutting-edge technologies in Data Science and AI can be applied to various customer applications.
Work Model
This is a fulltime position based in Colorado Springs, Co or Chantilly, Va , offering a hybrid work model that combines 3 regular onsite workdays and remote flexibility as the business needs allow.
What You’ll Be Doing
DSAID’s customers range from National Security Space (AF, NRO, etc.) to civil (NASA, NOAA, etc.) and commercial (commercial space, autonomous vehicles, etc.)
DSAID applies data science and AI knowledge across the space enterprise, to Aerospace enterprise capabilities, and towards corporate workforce development and strategic focus areas
Data Scientists learn and develop their skills by working on teams spanning disciplines, experience levels, and organizational boundaries.
Primary functions include:
Evaluation of technologies for use in scalable and resilient mission-critical applications in a production environment
Coordinated development and execution of experiments
Coordinated development of proof-of-concept infrastructure configuration and software prototypes
Collaboration with small, innovative teams to deliver features and products
Written and verbal presentation of results to team members and stakeholders
Reinforcing an environment of learning and progress with team members and others
Focus on accountability and innovation in leadership competency development
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change, or new ones may be assigned as needed
Data scientists must maintain a commitment to ongoing learning in order to stay current with government missions and the ever-changing climate of data science and AI. This requires both ongoing education in relevant domains, such as physics, math, and/or computer science, as well as an understanding of the existing systems and future objectives of government missions.
What You Need to be Successful
Minimum Requirements for the Date Scientist- Senior Member of Technical Staff
Bachelors or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems, Electrical or Computer Engineering, Physics, Mathematics or related technical field(s)
5 or more years of experience in Data Scientist or Machine Learning Engineer or AI/ML Researcher role in any domain
Software development skills including familiarity with machine learning and deep learning libraries in Python
Some experience with and understanding of software engineering concepts (DevOps, algorithms, data structures, etc.)
Experience with and understanding of machine learning and statistics
Working knowledge of Unix/Linux operating systems
Demonstrated ability to cooperate as a member of a team
This position requires ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance, which is issued by the US government. U.S citizenship is required to obtain a security clearance.
In addition to the above, the minimum requirements for the Data Scientist- Engineering Specialist :
Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems, Electrical or Computer Engineering, Physics, Mathematics or related field(s)
8 or more years of experience in Data Scientist or Machine Learning Engineer or AI/ML Researcher role in any domain
How You Can Stand Out
It would be impressive if you have one or more of these:
Ph.D. from an accredited program in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems, Electrical or Computer Engineering, Physics, Mathematics or related field(s)
Experience creating effective data visualizations and user interfaces, communicating results
Experience with containerization platforms (Docker, Kubernetes, etc.)
Demonstrated ability to operate independently and proactively seek guidance as needed
Demonstrated ability to exercise judgement and critical thinking in a scientific discipline
Participation in extracurricular activities related to data science (e.g. Kaggle competitions)
Domain expertise relevant to one or more customer organization mission areas (USSF, NRO, etc.)
We offer a competitive compensation package where you’ll be rewarded based on your performance and recognized for the value you bring to our business. The grade-based pay range for this job is listed below. Individual salaries within that range are determined through a wide variety of factors including but not limited to education, experience, knowledge and skills.
(Min - Max)
$103,500 - $175,900
Pay Basis: Annual
Leadership Competencies
Our leadership philosophy is simple: every employee, regardless of level and role, can demonstrate leadership. At Aerospace, our commitment is our people. To cultivate our talent and ensure that we have a strong pipeline of future leaders, we want individuals who:
Operate Strategically
Lead Change
Engage with Impact
Foster Innovation
Deliver Results
Ways We Reward Our Employees
During your interview process, our team will provide details of our industry-leading benefits.
Benefits vary and are applicable based on Job Type. A few highlights include:
Comprehensive health care and wellness plans
Paid holidays, sick time, and vacation
Standard and alternate work schedules, including telework options
401(k) Plan — Employees receive a total company-paid benefit of 8%, 10%, or 12% of eligible compensation based on years of service and matching contributions; employees are immediately eligible and vested in the plan upon hire
Flexible spending accounts
Variable pay program for exceptional contributions
Relocation assistance
Professional growth and development programs to help advance your career
Education assistance programs
An inclusive work environment built on teamwork, flexibility, and respect
We are all unique, from diverse backgrounds and all walks of life, yet one thing bonds all of us to each other—the belief that we can make a difference. This core belief empowers us to do our best work at The Aerospace Corporation.
Equal Opportunity Commitment
The Aerospace Corporation is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. We believe that a diverse workforce creates an environment in which unique ideas are developed and differing perspectives are valued, producing superior customer solutions. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, age, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, color, religion, genetic information, marital status, ancestry, national origin, protected veteran status, physical disability, medical condition, mental disability, or disability status and any other characteristic protected by state or federal law. If you’re an individual with a disability or a disabled veteran who needs assistance using our online job search and application tools or need reasonable accommodation to complete the job application process, please contact us by phone at 310.336.5432 or by email at
ieo.mailbox@aero.org
. You can also review
Know Your Rights
: Workplace Discrimination is Illegal
, as well as the
Pay Transparency Policy Statement
.",4.0,The Aerospace Corporation,"Chantilly, VA",1001 to 5000 Employees,1960.0,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,140.0,VA,64.0,1,0,0,0,0
Mid Data Scientist,"$129K
/yr","Job Description:

Prescient Edge is seeking a Mid. Data Scientist to support a federal government client.

Benefits:
At Prescient Edge, we believe that acting with integrity and serving our employees is the key to everyone's success. To that end, we provide employees with a best-in-class benefits package that includes:
A competitive salary with performance bonus opportunities.
Comprehensive healthcare benefits, including medical, vision, dental, and orthodontia coverage.
A substantial retirement plan with no vesting schedule. Career development opportunities, including on-the-job training, tuition reimbursement, and networking.
A positive work environment where employees are respected, supported, and engaged.
Description:
Conducts data analytics, data engineering, data mining, exploratory analysis, predictive analysis, and statistical analysis, and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products, enabling more infom1ed analytic decisions.
Proactively retrieves information from various sources, analyzes it for better understanding about the data set, and builds Al tools that automate certain processes.
Duties typically include creating various ML based tools or processes, such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems.
Performs statistical analysis, applies data mining techniques, and builds high quality prediction systems.
Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications, including Microsoft Office (Power BI) and Tableau; major data science languages, such as Rand Python; managing and merging of disparate data sources, preferably through R, Python, or SQL; statistical analysis; and data mining algorithms.
Should have prior experience with large data Multi-INT analytics, ML, and automated predictive analytics.
Shall work with and design, prototype, and deployment of complex asynchronous frameworks.
Shall work with and design, develop, and actively participate in open-source libraries and technologies such as the Netflix/Twitter stack or equivalent Microservices tooling sud1 as Service Discovery, Circuit Breakers, and Software Load Balancing.
Shall design, prototype, and integrate distributed caching frameworks such as Evcache and Redis Work with Platforms as a Service such as AWS, Cloud FoW1dry, and OpenShift.
Shall support software and web architecture development, requirements analysis, process execution and evaluation, selection, and evaluation of COTS/GOTS tools, and integration (with both new and legacy systems).
Shall design, prototype, test, and maintain software and web-based applications and content solutions to satisfy customer requirements.
Shall follow a formal design process using formal specifications, data flow diagrams, and other accepted design techniques and also shall adhere to laws, standards, and established guidelines for prototyping and delivery of software and web tools (e.g., software reuse, modifiable, efficient, reliable, understandable, fault tolerant).
Shall provide software process management and configuration management throughout the software/web prototyping lifecycle.
Shall develop strategies, roadmaps, standards, and reference architecture / implementation of prototypes into Enterprise tools.
Shall develop and maintain current and planned state architectural documents such as Domain roadmaps, Standards, Patterns, reference architecture/implementation documents for Enterprise Applications.
Shall solve complex problems with many variables using various security, network, storage, and computer platforms.
Shall develop full-stack and reference architecture designs for infrastructure across hybrid environments inclusive of cloud platforms.
Shall participate in the development of governance processes to ensure that objectives are achieved, risks are managed appropriately, and the organization's resources are used responsibly for the infrastructure landscape.



Job Requirements:

Desired experiences:
At least 8 years of experience conducting analysis relevant to the specific labor category with at least a portion of the experience within the last 2 years.
Demonstrates comprehensive mission knowledge and skills that affirms completion of all developmental training and experiences for the labor category.
Demonstrates ability to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete, indirect, highly complex, seemingly unrelated, and / or technically advanced.
Demonstrates ability to work independently with minimal oversight and direction.
Demonstrates ability to collaborate and work with other IC members on information sharing, driving collection, and addressing analytic disputes and conflict resolution.
Desired education:
Bachelor’s degree in an area related to the labor category from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
An additional 4 years of experience in the specific labor category, for a total of 12 years of experience in the specific labor category, may be substituted for a bachelor’s degree.
Security Clearance:
Security clearance required TS/SCI with CI POLY or the ability to obtain CI POLY.
Location:
Reston, VA.",4.2,Prescient Edge Federal,"Herndon, VA",51 to 200 Employees,2008.0,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,129.0,VA,16.0,1,0,0,1,0
Senior Data Scientist - Statistics,"$123K
/yr","Description
United's Digital Technology team designs, develops, and maintains massively scaling technology solutions brought to life with innovative architectures, data analytics, and digital solutions.

Our Values: At United Airlines, we believe that inclusion propels innovation and is the foundation of all that we do. Our Shared Purpose: ""Connecting people. Uniting the world."" drives us to be the best airline for our employees, customers, and everyone we serve, and we can only do that with a truly diverse and inclusive workforce. Our team spans the globe and is made up of diverse individuals all working together with cutting-edge technology to build the best airline in the history of aviation.

With multiple employee-run ""Business Resource Group"" communities and world-class benefits like health insurance, parental leave, and space available travel, United is truly a one-of-a-kind place to work that will make you feel welcome and accepted. Come join our team and help us make a positive impact on the world.

Job overview and responsibilities
Provides mathematical modeling and analysis services to support critical financial, operational, and/or strategic planning decisions and engages in supporting project teams in value added activities that generate practical solutions to complex business problems, explores new business alternatives, and drives improvement in business decisions
Develops the approach and methods to define and solve management problems through quantitative analysis and analytical models using statistics, machine learning, forecasting techniques, and structured programming languages
Identifies, researches, or solves large complex problems using big data and statistics, forecasting and machine learning principles
Leverages understanding of the business process to identify and implement statistics, forecasting and machine learning solutions that will result in significant bottom-line contributions
Builds and develops statistics, forecasting and machine learning model applications, and provides client support leveraging operations research knowledge
Participates in model design, prototype, and model development for several efforts that occur simultaneously, and interfaces with product delivery groups
Raises concerns when scope of analysis may not align with time available and can choose an appropriate scope of analysis to conduct balancing ROI to time available
Designs analytic plan/develop hypotheses to test
Understands limitations of analysis (what it can and cannot be used for)
Anticipates working team questions to data and approach
Identifies solution quality risks and on-time risks
Understands the business value, process, and expectations before focusing on choice of a technical solution
Understands the intuition behind the numbers (i.e. does it make sense?)
Provides on-going analytical services to client organizations
Communicates results to management and clients
Contributes deck content and builds the story for the deck with guidance to summarize findings
Develops and delivers presentations aligned with Ai standards
Speaks in a manner appropriate for working team and their level +1
Keeps informed about the latest analytical methods and research in the statistics, forecasting, machine learning and analytics fields
United Airlines is an equal opportunity employer. United Airlines recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender identity, sexual orientation, physical ability, age, veteran status, and other protected status as required by applicable law.
Qualifications
Required
Advanced degree (PhD or ABD)
Statistics or other related quantitative discipline involving quantitative analysis and application of advanced statistical methods
Coursework or work experience with statistics and/or forecasting techniques
Coursework or work experience in model prototyping through use of statistical package(s) including SAS or SPSS, Minitab and/or BI tools
Coursework or work experience with C, C++, Java, R, Python, or other structured programming language
Good business, technical, verbal/written communication, presentation and sales skills. Adaptability to changing business environment
Good interpersonal skills and ability to interact with clients
Proficient with MS Office
Successful completion of interview required to meet job qualifications
Reliable, punctual attendance is an essential function of the position
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States for any employer.
Successful completion of interview required to meet job qualification
Reliable, punctual attendance is an essential function of the position
Preferred
Minor in computer science and/or formal advanced computer science coursework
2+ years of professional experience in analytical field
1+ years of airline business experience
1+ years designing and programming/coding data structures for large-scale computer models
Experience with Julia programming language
Knowledge of United/industry data sources
Structured programming for large-scale computer models
Demonstrated ability to create business value

Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT",3.9,United Airlines,"Chicago, IL",10000+ Employees,1926.0,Company - Public,"Airlines, Airports & Air Transportation",Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,123.0,IL,98.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist II,"$104K
/yr","Position Highlights:
Position: Data Scientist II
Location: 4901 Searle Parkway, Skokie IL 60077
Full Time
Hours: Monday-Friday, 8am- 4:30pm
Hybrid Schedule
Job Summary:
As a Data Scientist II at Endeavor Health, you will be responsible for the development of methodologies and implementation of solutions for quantitative, predictive and prescriptive analytics for improving patient outcomes, increasing operational efficiency and providing general statistical support to the organization. Essential to this role are intellectual curiosity, effective communication skills, ability to explain technical concepts to nontechnical audiences, evaluate, adopt and master technical tools used in accomplishing the above-mentioned goals. You will be responsible for advancing innovation, conducting research and advocating for the adoption of cutting edge technologies.

To be successful in this role, you will be expected to remain updated on the latest scientific methodologies, technologies and best practices.
What you will do:
Develop predictive models for making clinical and operational decisions
Document and support your work to the highest possible standards
Design and provide statistical support for clinical studies
Write and submit refereed scientific papers
Help organizational leaders with hypotheses testing and action planning using data visualizations
Develop novel tools incorporating actionable models and guide point-of-care operational decisions
Develop expertise in data manipulation, prediction, and visualization
Choose the most appropriate analytical techniques for the business challenge at hand
Work with IT and data warehouse experts to design and develop end-to-end analytics product
What you will need:
Education: Master's Degree
Preferred Education: Ph.D. Degree
Experience: minimum one (1) year of professional experience preferred
Unique or Preferred Skills:
Strong intellectual curiosity
Advanced degree in statistics, applied mathematics, predictive analytics, computer science, operations research or related quantitative discipline
Typically, 1 - 3 years of work experience, including full model life cycle development
Demonstrated proficiency with data science tools and programming languages (e.g., R, Python)
Familiarity with database management tools (e.g., SQL)
Strong written and verbal communication skills, ability to make decisions and explain technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders
Proven track record of driving insightful findings from quantitative and qualitative data
Familiarity with the healthcare industry is a plus
Benefits:
Career Pathways to Promote Professional Growth and Development
Various Medical, Dental, Pet and Vision options
Tuition Reimbursement
Free Parking
Wellness Program Savings Plan
Health Savings Account Options
Retirement Options with Company Match
Paid Time Off and Holiday Pay
Community Involvement Opportunities
Endeavor Health is a fully integrated healthcare delivery system committed to providing access to quality, vibrant, community-connected care, serving an area of more than 4.2 million residents across six northeast Illinois counties. Our more than 25,000 team members and more than 6,000 physicians aim to deliver transformative patient experiences and expert care close to home across more than 300 ambulatory locations and eight acute care hospitals – Edward (Naperville), Elmhurst, Evanston, Glenbrook (Glenview), Highland Park, Northwest Community (Arlington Heights) Skokie and Swedish (Chicago) – all recognized as Magnet hospitals for nursing excellence. For more information, visit
www.endeavorhealth.org
.
When you work for Endeavor Health, you will be part of an organization that encourages its employees to achieve career goals and maximize their professional potential.
Please explore our website (
www.endeavorhealth.org
) to better understand how Endeavor Health delivers on its mission to “help everyone in our communities be their best”.
Endeavor Health is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. Please refer to the main career page for more information.
Diversity, equity and inclusion is at the core of who we are; being there for our patients and each other with compassion, respect and empathy. We believe that our strength resides in our differences and in connecting our best to provide community-connected healthcare for all.
EOE: Race/Color/Sex/Sexual Orientation/ Gender Identity/Religion/National Origin/Disability/Vets, VEVRRA Federal Contractor.",3.5,Endeavor Health,"Skokie, IL",Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,104.0,IL,,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$128K
/yr","You Lead the Way. We’ve Got Your Back.
With the right backing, people and businesses have the power to progress in incredible ways. When you join Team Amex, you become part of a global and diverse community of colleagues with an unwavering commitment to back our customers, communities and each other. Here, you’ll learn and grow as we help you create a career journey that’s unique and meaningful to you with benefits, programs, and flexibility that support you personally and professionally.
At American Express, you’ll be recognized for your contributions, leadership, and impact—every colleague has the opportunity to share in the company’s success. Together, we’ll win as a team, striving to uphold our company values and powerful backing promise to provide the world’s best customer experience every day. And we’ll do it with the utmost integrity, and in an environment where everyone is seen, heard and feels like they belong.
Join Team Amex and let's lead the way together.
As part of our diverse tech team, you can architect, code and ship software that makes us an essential part of our customers’ digital lives. Here, you can work alongside talented engineers in an open, supportive, inclusive environment where your voice is valued, and you make your own decisions on what tech to use to solve challenging problems. Amex offers a range of opportunities to work with the latest technologies and encourages you to back the broader engineering community through open source. And because we understand the importance of keeping your skill fresh and relevant, we give you dedicated time to invest in your professional development. Find your place in technology on #TeamAmex.
Let’s share success.
Global Infrastructure Product Services aims to establish and reinforce a culture of effective metrics, data-driven business processes, architecture simplification, and cost transparency.
As the Data Science team in Global Infrastructure Product Services embarks on building and deploying advanced data science and machine learning (ML) models, we are looking for a senior data scientist to build, deploy and monitor models in production. This is an individual contributor role with responsibilities ranging from hands-on coding, debugging, documentation to stakeholder management and presentations.
A successful data scientist knows that delivering on that promise takes foresight, planning and agility. We are seeking data scientists who are not only technically adept, but also understand the importance of harnessing the power of data to streamline financial operations, enhance decision-making and improve business outcomes.
This team is focused on developing and maintaining dynamic technology infrastructure cost allocation and production models. The financial forecasting models will help ensure that our technology spending is transparent, efficient, and properly aligned with our strategic objectives. The role requires a blend of technical prowess in data engineering, data science, MLOps, and an understanding of enterprise infrastructure components & their economics.
Let’s build on what you know.
If you are a pioneer in developing and continuously evolving data science models in production that drive and monitor infrastructure and cost consumption analysis, you'll find a fit in our Data Science team in Global Infrastructure Product Services. To succeed in this newly forming team, you’ll need to be comfortable navigating ambiguity to stand up solutions 0à1 while discovering and leveraging enterprise platforms and best practices.
Here’s just some of what you’ll do:
Design and build scalable solutions using AI and Machine Learning (Generative AI, Natural Language Processing, Reinforcement Learning, and Time Series predictions) in financial forecasting and optimizing infrastructure resource utilization to help further mature our FinOps and AIOps framework
Own the model building and refining from identifying business problems, collecting training dataset, analyzing data, modeling, validating to delivering production grade solutions at scale.
Drive high-level and detailed technical design conversations and reviews
Be responsible for health and quality of the code across the portfolio, including leadership over innovation, functional testing, and CI/CD tool integration
Work closely with stakeholders across Technology, Finance and business unit portfolio leaders to define scope, requirements and incorporate cost drivers, allocation methods, and infrastructure nuances
Ensure best practices are aligned with Enterprise Architecture and ML COEs
Develop SQL queries, scripts and routines to automate data processing and enhance the model’s accuracy and efficiency
Generate insightful data visualization and reports to aid in decision-making
Lead training sessions and create comprehensive documentation to empower end users to leverage the cost model effectively
Provide technical mentorship to team members at junior levels
Function as an active member of an agile team
Are you up for the challenge? Here’s what you should have:
Master’s degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems, or related STEM fields.
3+ years full lifecycle product development and engineering leadership in highly available, highly scalable, and high throughput systems
Demonstrated experience in building and owning data science solutions and pipelines within the MLOps ecosystem in at least 2 of the 3 major cloud platforms (Vertex AI, Azure Machine Learning, AWS Sagemaker).
Experience in automating, troubleshooting and upgrading data & machine learning pipelines that allow model retraining and continuous monitoring
Hands-on expertise with handling distributed (multi-tiered) systems and automated testing – unit and performance testing
Demonstrated experience in building and deploying a diverse set of Machine Learning (GLM, GBM, Neural Networks) and NLP solutions at scale
Proficiency and Hands-on Experience with Git, CI/CD tools, Elasticsearch, and a solution in each category: Orchestration, Container, Model Serving, Observability, and Feature Store
Strong proficiency in programming with Python, Machine Learning libraries and APIs (TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, ScikitLearn, H20.ai, XGBoost)
Experience in deploying out-of-the box LLMs and Generative AI solutions.
Experience in data visualization and observability with a focus on real time serving and monitoring of time series data with alerts
Thorough understanding of enterprise infrastructure technologies (Compute, Storage, Network, Mainframe) to inform model development
Strong project management skills and effective stakeholder management skills, coupled with a continuous improvement mindset
Excellent presentation and communication skills, capable of explaining complex technical choices in simple terms to a diverse audience
Experience in Financial Services industry is preferred
Salary Range: $90,000.00 to $165,000.00 annually + bonus + benefits
The above represents the expected salary range for this job requisition. Ultimately, in determining your pay, we’ll consider your location, experience, and other job-related factors.
We back our colleagues and their loved ones with benefits and programs that support their holistic well-being. That means we prioritize their physical, financial, and mental health through each stage of life. Benefits include:
Competitive base salaries
Bonus incentives
6% Company Match on retirement savings plan
Free financial coaching and financial well-being support
Comprehensive medical, dental, vision, life insurance, and disability benefits
Flexible working model with hybrid, onsite or virtual arrangements depending on role and business need
20+ weeks paid parental leave for all parents, regardless of gender, offered for pregnancy, adoption or surrogacy
Free access to global on-site wellness centers staffed with nurses and doctors (depending on location)
Free and confidential counseling support through our Healthy Minds program
Career development and training opportunities
For a full list of Team Amex benefits, visit our Colleague Benefits Site.
American Express is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, disability status, age, or any other status protected by law.
We back our colleagues with the support they need to thrive, professionally and personally. That's why we have Amex Flex, our enterprise working model that provides greater flexibility to colleagues while ensuring we preserve the important aspects of our unique in-person culture. Depending on role and business needs, colleagues will either work onsite, in a hybrid model (combination of in-office and virtual days) or fully virtually.
US Job Seekers/Employees - Click here to view the “Know Your Rights” poster and the Pay Transparency Policy Statement.
If the links do not work, please copy and paste the following URLs in a new browser window: https://www.dol.gov/agencies/ofccp/posters to access the three posters.
Employment eligibility to work with American Express in the U.S. is required as the company will not pursue visa sponsorship for these positions.",4.1,Amex,"New York, NY",10000+ Employees,1850.0,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,128.0,NY,174.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$119K
/yr","Job Family:
Data Science Consulting

Travel Required:
None

Clearance Required:
Ability to Obtain Public Trust
What You Will Do:
Collaborate cross-functionally with business stakeholders, data scientists, and software engineers to understand requirements and translate them into technical solutions.
Communicate technical concepts and model capabilities to non-technical stakeholders in a clear and compelling manner.
Develop and maintain production-grade code for data systems and products.
Build and optimize data models and systems.
Analyze and interpret complex data sets to support decision making.
Stay up to date with developments in data engineering, Business Intelligence, AI, and ML.

What You Will Need:
US Citizenship is required
Bachelor's degree is required
Minimum ONE (1) year of experience as a data analyst or in a similar role
Excellent programming skills in Python, TensorFlow, PyTorch, or other relevant frameworks.
Proficiency in numeric computing Python libraries such as NumPy, Pandas/Polars, Streamlit, and Scikit-learn.
Strong understanding of data modeling, data warehousing, and ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes.
Experience in building and deploying production-grade data systems or products.
Familiarity with statistical concepts and methods, such as regression analysis, hypothesis testing, and time series analysis.
Excellent critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Ability to communicate complex data insights and recommendations effectively to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Proven track record of delivering impactful data-driven projects or products.

What Would Be Nice To Have:
Familiarity with financial data sources, regulations, and industry-specific use cases such as fraud, know-your-customer, forecasting, credit risk management, pricing and revenue optimization, Fair Lending, and/or ESG among others.
Experience with cloud-based data platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google Cloud).
Experience in working with unstructured data sources (e.g., text, images, audio).
Understanding of machine learning and deep learning techniques.
Knowledge of data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, Plotly).
Familiarity with agile software development methodologies.
Technical/product management and software experience.
The annual salary range for this position is $94,900.00-$142,300.00. Compensation decisions depend on a wide range of factors, including but not limited to skill sets, experience and training, security clearances, licensure and certifications, and other business and organizational needs.

What We Offer:
Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.
Benefits include:
Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance
Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays
Parental Leave
401(k) Retirement Plan
Group Term Life and Travel Assistance
Voluntary Life and AD&D Insurance
Health Savings Account, Health Care & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Transit and Parking Commuter Benefits
Short-Term & Long-Term Disability
Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development, Certifications & Learning Opportunities
Employee Referral Program
Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach
Care.com annual membership
Employee Assistance Program
Supplemental Benefits via Corestream (Critical Care, Hospital Indemnity, Accident Insurance, Legal Assistance and ID theft protection, etc.)
Position may be eligible for a discretionary variable incentive bonus
About Guidehouse
Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",3.6,Guidehouse,"Atlanta, GA",1001 to 5000 Employees,2018.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,119.0,GA,6.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist II,"$112K
/yr","At American Equity Investment Life Holding Company®we offer leading annuity products that help empower our clients to fulfill their needs and wants in retirement. Our success comes from hiring high-energy individuals who embody the beliefs that drive our unique culture. We currently fund over half a million retirements nationwide, and have been headquartered in West Des Moines, Iowa, for over twenty-five years with satellite offices in Charlotte, NC and New York, NY.
GENERAL PURPOSE OF THE JOB:
The Data Scientist II, as a member of the Data Analytics & Reporting Center of Excellence (COE), applies their skills in artificial intelligence, machine learning, advanced analytics, statistical analysis and programming to develop data-driven solutions to support corporate initiatives. This role uses large and disparate data sets, advanced analytical techniques and machine learning to build and analyze models that predict the best course of action to impact business results. He/she collaborates with business partners to define the technical problem statement, develop efficient and accurate analytical models and incorporate them into analytical data products or tools with the support of a cross-functional team.
** This position is located in West Des Moines, Iowa and will work a hybrid onsite schedule **
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Works within a Center of Excellence (COE) model for supporting business enablement by leveraging company data to drive decisions.
Provides subject matter expertise in advanced analytics across variety of techniques, including data aggregation, statistical modeling, predictive modeling and machine learning.
Leads, executes and analyzes complex data related analytical projects that drive business decisions and efficiencies.
Creates repeatable, interpretable, dynamic and scalable models that are seamlessly incorporated into analytic data products.
Collaborates with business partners to develop novel ways to meet objectives utilizing data, cutting edge techniques, and tools.
Effectively communicates the analytics approach and how it will meet and address objectives to business partners.
Identifies and develop long-term processes, frameworks, tools, methods and standards.
Shares passion for data science with the broader enterprise community.
Uplifts the capabilities of the Data Analytics and Reporting team through collaboration and coaching.
Ensures adherence to data management and data governance policies and standards.
Works with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams and utilizes passion for providing data-driven insights to improve business outcomes.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Direct Reports:
None
General Description of Indirect Reports (2 and 3-downs):
None
EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE:
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as statistics, mathematics, computer science, data science OR Graduate degree in a quantitative discipline and demonstrated Data Science skill set; plus, five (5) years of progressively responsible related experience, or equivalent combination of education and/or experience.
Strong experience with writing advanced SQL queries, feature engineering, data analysis, data tools, building prototypes, deploying and maintaining production models, using and creating algorithms and creating simulations.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, PROFESSIONAL DESIGNATIONS:
N/A
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES:
Experienced using statistical computer languages such as Python/R.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and machine learning techniques including GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.
Experience writing advanced SQL to query databases.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics including regression, classification, anomaly detection, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc. on large data sets.
Experience merging and transforming disparate internal & external data sets together.
Experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, H20.ai, Cloud AI platforms, containerization.
Experience visualizing data for business stakeholders using tools such as Tableau (preferred), Power BI, MicroStrategy, Domo, Qlik.
Experience with supporting deployment, monitoring, maintenance and enhancement of models.
Participate in Data Analytics and Reporting code reviews, lead machine learning code reviews.
Strong customer service orientation and ability to build strong relationships across the Business.
Strong organizational and planning skills.
Excellent communication skills and ability to effectively present information to stakeholders and respond to questions.
Ability to successfully handle pressure and meet deadlines in a fast-paced work environment.
This description covers the major purpose and essential functions of the job. It is not intended to give all details or a step-by-step account of the way each task is to be performed. Employees may receive other job related instructions and be required to perform other job related work requested by their manager. All requirements are subject to possible modification to provide reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities.",3.5,American Equity,"West Des Moines, IA",501 to 1000 Employees,1995.0,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,IA,29.0,1,0,1,0,1
Palantir Data Scientist,"$132K
/yr","In this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the future with confidence by tapping into the power of data analytics, robotics, and cognitive technologies such as Artificial Intelligence (AI). Our Strategy & Analytics portfolio helps clients leverage rigorous analytical capabilities and a pragmatic mindset to solve the most complex of problems. By joining our team, you will play a key role in helping to our clients uncover hidden relationships from vast troves of data and transforming the Government and Public Services marketplace.

Work you'll do

The Palantir Data Scientist will design future-state, modern data architecture, pipelining, and analysis for transformation at the enterprise level using advanced cloud architectural principles. Using tools such as Palantir Foundry, they will also work with cutting-edge DevOps technologies, develop advanced analytics products, and apply data pipelining and statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable key mission outcomes.

The team

Deloitte's Government and Public Services (GPS) practice - our people, ideas, technology and outcomes-is designed for impact. Serving federal, state, & local government clients as well as public higher education institutions, our team of over 15,000+ professionals brings fresh perspective to help clients anticipate disruption, reimagine the possible, and fulfill their mission promise.

The GPS AI & Data offering is responsible for developing advanced analytics products and applying data visualization and statistical programming tools to enterprise data in order to advance and enable the key mission outcomes for our clients. Our team supports all phases of analytic work product development, from the identification of key business questions through data collection and ETL, and from performing analyses and using a wide range of statistical, machine learning, and applied mathematical techniques to delivery insights to decision-makers. Our practitioners give special attention to the interplay between data and the business processes that produce it and the decision-makers that consume insights.

Qualifications

Required:

Bachelor's Degree

2+years of data science and data manipulation

2+ years of experience with pipeline and application development within Palantir Foundry

2+ years experience working with Palantir Foundry engineers

Must be able to obtain and maintain required security clearances necessary for the role

Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future

Preferred:

2+ years of prior professional services or federal consulting experience

Creativity and innovation - desire to learn and apply new technologies, products, and libraries

Strong written and verbal communication skills

Strong organizational skills

Information for applicants with a need for accommodation: https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/careers/articles/join-deloitte-assistance-for-disabled-applicants.html

#engcamp2024",3.9,Deloitte,"Rosslyn, VA",10000+ Employees,1850.0,Company - Private,Business Consulting,Management & Consulting,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,132.0,VA,174.0,0,0,0,0,0
Senior Data Scientist,"$189K
/yr","About the team
Zillow is reimagining real estate to make home a reality for more and more people. As the most-visited real estate website in the United States, Zillow® and its affiliates help movers find and win their home through digital solutions, first class partners, and easier buying, selling, financing and renting experiences. Millions of people visit Zillow Group sites every month to start their home search, and now they can rely on Zillow to help make it easier to move. The work we do helps people get home and no matter what job you're in, you will play a critical role in making home a reality for more and more people.

Our efforts to streamline the real estate transaction are supported by a deep-rooted culture of innovation, our passion to redefine the employee experience, a fundamental commitment to Equity and Belonging, and world-class benefits. These benefits include comprehensive medical, dental, vision, life, and disability coverages as well as parental leave, family benefits, retirement contributions, and paid time off. We’re also setting the standard for work experiences of the future, where our employees are supported in doing their best work and living a flexible, well-balanced life. But don’t just take our word for it. Read recent reviews on Glassdoor and recent recognition from multiple organizations, including: the 100 Best Companies to Work For, Glassdoor Employees’ Choice Award, Bloomberg Gender-Equality Index, Human Rights Campaign (HRC) Corporate Equity Index, and TIME 100 Most Influential Companies list.
About the role
Zillow Group is currently seeking a Sr. Data Scientist to join the Marketing Analytics and Data Science team. As a Sr. Data Scientist, you will play a vital role in developing the next generation of measurement models and methods aimed at providing insights and support decision-making for marketing stakeholders.
This team works closely with the marketing organization to discover strategic opportunities in areas spanning brand marketing and performance marketing across channels like google, Facebook, TV & multiple business lines like rentals, B2C and B2B. In this role, you will play a crucial role in elevating our marketing measurement capabilities by developing a more holistic measurement strategy across various marketing campaigns, channels, and granularities. You will leverage your expertise in data analysis, causal inference techniques applied for marketing, experiment design, and marketing analytics to design and implement robust measurement models and collaborate with cross-functional teams to achieve marketing goals. More specifically you will:
Marketing Measurement Evolution:
Conduct in-depth analyses of marketing campaign performance using advanced statistical methods and causal inference techniques.
Design and execute rigorous experiments to measure the effectiveness of various marketing channels and strategies.
Develop and maintain predictive models to optimize campaign targeting and maximize marketing effectiveness through channel optimizations.
Develop & execute holistic experimentation modeling framework:
Lead the development and implementation of a comprehensive marketing experimentation platform encompassing various marketing channels, LOBs, and granularities.
Identify opportunities to expand/ further develop the current experimentation platform's capabilities to support a wider range of metrics and channels.
Design & implement a scalable experimentation platform for tests and other marketing experiments to test different marketing hypotheses.
Develop robust statistical models to analyze experiment results and draw data-driven conclusions.
Dive into Zillow's internal and third party data (think Hive, Presto, SQL Server, Tableau) to develop solutions that will help move the business forward and enable better decisions at a rapid speed.
Communication & Collaboration:
Collaborate with data engineering teams to design and optimize data pipelines and workflows to support efficient & accurate data collection, storage, and processing.
Develop and maintain data pipelines for extracting, transforming, and loading (ETL) data relevant to marketing experiments.
Provide insights and recommendations based on data analysis to improve marketing campaign effectiveness, customer targeting, and lead generation.
Effectively communicate complex analytical findings to diverse stakeholders, translating technical concepts into actionable insights and recommendations.
This role has been categorized as a Remote position. “Remote” employees do not have a permanent corporate office workplace and, instead, work from a physical location of their choice, which must be identified to the Company. U.S. employees may live in any of the 50 United States, with limited exceptions.
In California, Colorado, Connecticut, Hawaii, Illinois, Maryland, Minnesota, Nevada, New York, Washington state, and Washington DC the standard base pay range for this role is $145,500.00 - $232,500.00 Annually. This base pay range is specific to California, Colorado, Connecticut, Hawaii, Illinois, Maryland, Minnesota, Nevada, New York, Washington state, and Washington DC and may not be applicable to other locations.
In addition to a competitive base salary this position is also eligible for equity awards based on factors such as experience, performance and location. Actual amounts will vary depending on experience, performance and location.
Who you are
We are looking for someone who is passionate about reporting, translating complicated data sets and business problems into easily consumable and impactful insights. You will also need to be unafraid of tackling complexity and new business problems. We're searching for a Data Scientist who has:
An undergraduate or Master's degree in a quantitative field (e.g. mathematics, engineering, statistics, finance, or similar) 4 years of work experience involving quantitative data analysis and complex problem solving.
7+ years of experience in data science specifically in marketing analytics.
Experience in designing and implementing A/B tests and marketing experiments and/or experience in creating platforms that serve A/B tests for marketing at scale.
5+ years of experience implementing a variety of measurement methods across modeling and testing for various marketing use cases
5+ years or more of experience as a data scientist experience querying multi-terabyte-sized noisy data sets such as clickstream data.
A strong understanding of statistical concepts, measurement methods, and causal inference techniques as it relates to the marketing space.
Mastery of SQL, Excel, and either Python or R, along with some experience with Databricks, Tableau, or other visualization software.
Ability to work cross-functionally and strong written, verbal, and visual communication skills.
Proficiency in modeling techniques, a deep understanding on various drivers forms of attribution methods and measurement mechanisms in the marketing space
Understanding and appreciation of how marketing strategies vary across B2B and B2C & how that influences measurement and data science methods.
Demonstrated experience in coaching teams both at a tactical layer and strategic layer.
Nice to Have
Experience with tools like Databricks, Snowflake, Looker, Tableau, Airflow or Fivetran
Ph.D degree in a quantitative field (e.g. science, engineering, mathematics) or equivalent experience.
Understanding of changes happening in the privacy realm and marketing measurement ecosystem
Work in agile methodology and familiar with Jira tool
Familiar with data engineering tools and platforms
Experience in SEO and working with click stream data
Get to know us
Zillow is reimagining real estate to make home a reality for more and more people.
As the most-visited real estate website in the United States, Zillow® and its affiliates help movers find and win their home through digital solutions, first class partners, and easier buying, selling, financing and renting experiences. Millions of people visit Zillow Group sites every month to start their home search, and now they can rely on Zillow to help make it easier to move. The work we do helps people get home and no matter what job you're in, you will play a critical role in making home a reality for more and more people.
Our efforts to streamline the real estate transaction are supported by a deep-rooted culture of innovation, our passion to redefine the employee experience, a fundamental commitment to Equity and Belonging, and world-class benefits. These benefits include comprehensive medical, dental, vision, life, and disability coverages as well as parental leave, family benefits, retirement contributions, and paid time off. We’re also setting the standard for work experiences of the future, where our employees are supported in doing their best work and living a flexible, well-balanced life. But don’t just take our word for it. Read recent reviews on Glassdoor and recent recognition from multiple organizations, including: the 100 Best Companies to Work For, Glassdoor Employees’ Choice Award, Bloomberg Gender-Equality Index, Human Rights Campaign (HRC) Corporate Equity Index, and TIME 100 Most Influential Companies list.
Zillow Group is an equal opportunity employer committed to fostering an inclusive, innovative environment with the best employees. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please contact your recruiter directly.
Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with applicable state and local law.
Applicants who receive job offers from Zillow Group will be asked to sign a Proprietary Rights Agreement which includes confidentiality, intellectual property assignment, customer and employee non-solicitation, and non-competition provisions. If you are contacted for a role at Zillow Group and wish to review a copy of the Proprietary Rights Agreement prior to receiving an offer, you may request a copy from your Recruiter.",3.9,Zillow,Remote,5001 to 10000 Employees,2005.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,189.0,Remote,19.0,1,0,0,0,1
Sr. Data Scientist,"$174K
/yr","McKesson is an impact-driven, Fortune 10 company that touches virtually every aspect of healthcare. We are known for delivering insights, products, and services that make quality care more accessible and affordable. Here, we focus on the health, happiness, and well-being of you and those we serve – we care.
What you do at McKesson matters. We foster a culture where you can grow, make an impact, and are empowered to bring new ideas. Together, we thrive as we shape the future of health for patients, our communities, and our people. If you want to be part of tomorrow’s health today, we want to hear from you.
Job Title: Sr. Data Scientist
Job Description:
The Sr. Data Scientist will be an integral part of McKesson’s Generics Analytics team and will be responsible for developing and implementing data-driven strategies that enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of pricing decisions made within McKesson's Generics organization. The Sr. Data Scientist should be able to work on complex business problems by leveraging our in-house data sources within a collaborative environment. This role will work in cross-functional data and enablement teams, to uncover insights, optimize processes, provide recommendations, and improve pricing related decision-making. They will collaborate across the team to build and deliver on broad data, analytics and digital organizational capabilities related to pricing transformation. They should be able to identify data and insights-based opportunities for enhancing Generics business performance, testing and validating various hypothesis and then industrializing the AI/ML solution pipeline. They will critically evaluate on what can be done with data, where are the opportunities to monetize data, how can data-based insights be incorporated in existing business processes and systems. This role will drive delivery excellence and will lead strengthening trust across multiple stakeholders. The ideal candidate will be an expert in analytics and AI/ML-based pricing of pharmaceutical products with deep understanding of healthcare distribution and supply chain.
Key Responsibilities:
Lead development of analytical and data science solutions for different Generics business stakeholders
Utilize advanced analytics, machine learning, and predictive modeling to identify and uncover opportunities for price optimization, margin improvement, revenue acceleration, reducing leakage / revenue loss, product replacement, demand and revenue forecasting, reducing stockouts and optimizing inventory.
Collaborate with business stakeholder & technology teams to identify existing, or new, areas that can benefit significantly from advanced analytics and data science.
Communicate strategy and results to technical and non-technical audiences / develop and maintain strong relationships with key stakeholders, partners, and internal clients .
Streamline AI/ML delivery process with “fail fast” approach for experimenting and Agile implementation to scale the solutions that has been proven to be valuable for the business.
Build AI engineering frameworks, ML systems, data pipelines and security with enterprise value priorities and are deployable.
Have good understanding and appreciation for data governance and AI governance principles and coach the teams to adopt the guidelines for the same.
Lead building of comprehensive analytical insights engine that optimizes various pricing outputs across multiple algorithms and scenarios to provide the most optimal recommendation and an ability for the users to perform simulations and make best pricing decisions.
Drive key AI and analytical initiatives, providing clear timelines and actionable plans for implementation and value generation.
Lead, motivate, and inspire teams to embrace AIML technologies and contribute to the organization's overall success.
Leverage CICD best practices, including test automation and monitoring, to ensure successful deployment of ML models and application code.
Ensures all code is well-managed to reduce vulnerabilities, models are well-governed from a risk perspective, and the ML follows best practices in Responsible and Explainable AI.
Continuously monitor and optimize AI models and algorithms to improve performance and reliability.
Monitor real-time performance of deployed models, analyze performance data, and proactively identify and address performance issues to ensure optimal model performance.
Troubleshoot and resolve production issues related to ML model deployment, performance, and scalability in a timely and efficient manner.
Implement security best practices for machine learning systems and ensure compliance with data protection and privacy regulations.
Develop and maintain documentation, standard operating procedures, and guidelines related to MLOps processes, tools, and best practices.
Support stakeholders’ analytic needs, gather user requirements, help drive adoption.
Manage business stakeholder relationships to drive action and value from data science insights.
Assist in developing and maintaining long-term stakeholder relationships and networks.
Critical / Must have skills:
8+ years of data science and advanced analytics experience
4+ years of healthcare / pharmaceutical / distribution experience
2+ years of pricing analytics and data science modeling experience
Proven record of building data and analytics models and solutions in the pricing space, preferably in the healthcare, pharmaceutical, and/or supply chain domain.
Previous experience in managing complex analytical and data science projects to deliver business outcomes.
Demonstrated ability to tackle problems across the full data stack, from data wrangling (leveraging SQL or other methodologies) to stakeholder consumption at scale.
Strong grasp of fundamental statistical concepts: linear regression, A/B testing, outlier analysis, probability distributions, tests for independence, etc.
Knowledge of machine learning / data science best practices
Demonstrated experience data visualization skills (PowerBI, Tableau, RShiny)
Experience in developing cloud computing data and analytic platforms (Snowflake, Databricks, Azure, AWS, GCP etc)
Deep knowledge of advanced analytics and big data technologies and methodologies, as well as proven experience translating big data into actionable outcomes in healthcare / pharmaceutical / biotech industries
Proven track record of solving complex problems, thinking creatively, and using data to tell a story to influence senior level stakeholders.
Outstanding verbal and written communication with all levels of management, ability to translate technical term into business insights.
Ability to work in a matrix environment and build partnership with both internal and external stakeholders.
Very strong team player
Strong verbal and written communication
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, applied mathematics, machine learning, or a related data centric-technical field. Master’s degree preferred.
Preferred skills
Industrializing AI/ML based solutions by creating a homegrown analytics-based decisioning engine/platform.
Understanding of financial statement analysis and cost accounting principles and / or experience in financial accounting / FP&A related analytics in the healthcare distribution space
****Relocation is not budgeted for this role****
We are proud to offer a competitive compensation package at McKesson as part of our Total Rewards. This is determined by several factors, including performance, experience and skills, equity, regular job market evaluations, and geographical markets. The pay range shown below is aligned with McKesson's pay philosophy, and pay will always be compliant with any applicable regulations. In addition to base pay, other compensation, such as an annual bonus or long-term incentive opportunities may be offered. For more information regarding benefits at McKesson, please click here.
Our Base Pay Range for this position
$130,400 - $217,400
McKesson is an Equal Opportunity Employer

McKesson provides equal employment opportunities to applicants and employees and is committed to a diverse and inclusive environment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability, age or genetic information. For additional information on McKesson’s full Equal Employment Opportunity policies, visit our Equal Employment Opportunity page.

Join us at McKesson!",3.7,McKesson,"Irving, TX",10000+ Employees,1833.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,174.0,TX,191.0,0,0,0,1,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$180K
/yr","Our Purpose
We work to connect and power an inclusive, digital economy that benefits everyone, everywhere by making transactions safe, simple, smart and accessible. Using secure data and networks, partnerships and passion, our innovations and solutions help individuals, financial institutions, governments and businesses realize their greatest potential. Our decency quotient, or DQ, drives our culture and everything we do inside and outside of our company. We cultivate a
culture of inclusion
for all employees that respects their individual strengths, views, and experiences. We believe that our differences enable us to be a better team – one that makes better decisions, drives innovation and delivers better business results.
Title and Summary
Senior Data Scientist
Who is mastercard?
We work to connect and power an inclusive, digital economy that benefits everyone, everywhere by making transactions safe, simple, smart and accessible. Using secure data and networks, partnerships and passion, our innovations and solutions help individuals, financial institutions, governments and businesses realize their greatest potential. Our decency quotient, or DQ, drives our culture and everything we do inside and outside of our company. We cultivate a culture of inclusion for all employees that respects their individual strengths, views, and experiences. We believe that our differences enable us to be a better team – one that makes better decisions, drives innovation and delivers better business results.

Overview

Services within Mastercard is responsible for acquiring, engaging, and retaining customers by managing fraud and risk, enhancing cybersecurity, and improving the digital payments experience. We provide value-added services and leverage expertise, data-driven insights, and execution.

As a Senior Data Scientist specializing with domain experience in AdTech, MarTech, or Loyalty, you will play a pivotal role in driving data-driven decision-making across various aspects of our business.

Role
Leveraging your expertise in machine learning, statistical analysis, and data mining, you will be responsible for developing advanced algorithms, models, and analytics solutions to optimize advertising campaigns, enhance marketing effectiveness, and maximize customer loyalty.

Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business objectives and translate them into data science initiatives.

Design, develop, and implement machine learning algorithms and predictive models to optimize advertising targeting, campaign performance, and customer segmentation.

Utilize advanced statistical techniques to analyze large datasets, extract actionable insights, and identify trends to improve marketing strategies and customer engagement.

Conduct A/B testing and experimentations to measure the effectiveness of marketing campaigns and initiatives, and provide recommendations for optimization.

Develop personalized recommendation systems and content personalization algorithms to enhance customer experiences and drive user engagement.

Lead the development of data-driven attribution models to accurately measure the impact of marketing activities across various channels and touchpoints.

Stay abreast of the latest advancements in data science, machine learning, and AI technologies, and evaluate their potential applications within the AdTech, MarTech, and Loyalty domains.

Mentor and provide guidance to junior data scientists, fostering a culture of continuous learning and innovation within the team.

All about you
Proficiency in building AI/ML models at scale
Knowledge of MLOps and model lifecycle management
Hands on with python, pyspark and distributed computing concepts
Mastercard is an inclusive equal opportunity employer that considers applicants without regard to gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, ethnicity, disabled or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. In the US or Canada, if you require accommodations or assistance to complete the online application process or during the recruitment process, please contact reasonable_accommodation@mastercard.com and identify the type of accommodation or assistance you are requesting. Do not include any medical or health information in this email. The Reasonable Accommodations team will respond to your email promptly.
Corporate Security Responsibility

All activities involving access to Mastercard assets, information, and networks comes with an inherent risk to the organization and, therefore, it is expected that every person working for, or on behalf of, Mastercard is responsible for information security and must:
Abide by Mastercard’s security policies and practices;
Ensure the confidentiality and integrity of the information being accessed;
Report any suspected information security violation or breach, and
Complete all periodic mandatory security trainings in accordance with Mastercard’s guidelines.
In line with Mastercard’s total compensation philosophy and assuming that the job will be performed in the US, the successful candidate will be offered a competitive base salary based on location, experience and other qualifications for the role and may be eligible for an annual bonus or commissions depending on the role. Mastercard benefits for full time (and certain part time) employees generally include: insurance (including medical, prescription drug, dental, vision, disability, life insurance), flexible spending account and health savings account, paid leaves (including 16 weeks new parent leave, up to 20 paid days bereavement leave), 10 annual paid sick days, 10 or more annual paid vacation days based on level, 5 personal days, 10 annual paid U.S. observed holidays, 401k with a best-in-class company match, deferred compensation for eligible roles, fitness reimbursement or on-site fitness facilities, eligibility for tuition reimbursement, gender-inclusive benefits and many more.
Pay Ranges
San Francisco, California: $138,000 - $221,000 USD",4.2,Mastercard,"San Francisco, CA",10000+ Employees,1966.0,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,180.0,CA,58.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist with AI/ML,"$68K
/yr","Job Type: Contract
Job Category: IT
Job Description
Job Title: Data Scientist with AI/ML
Job Summary:
We are seeking a talented and experienced Data Scientist with expertise in Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning to join our team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing data-driven solutions and implementing advanced algorithms to drive business decisions and improve processes.
Responsibilities and Duties:
Analyze complex datasets and extract valuable insights using AI/ML techniques
Develop predictive models and algorithms to forecast trends and patterns
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to identify business opportunities and challenges
Implement and optimize machine learning algorithms to enhance decision-making processes
Communicate findings and recommendations to stakeholders in a clear and concise manner
Qualifications and Skills:
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or related field
Minimum of 3 years of experience in data science and machine learning
Strong programming skills in Python, R, or other relevant languages
Proficiency in data visualization tools such as Tableau or Power BI
Solid understanding of AI/ML techniques and algorithms
Excellent problem-solving and analytical skills
Strong communication and team collaboration abilities
#DataScientist #ArtificialIntelligence #MachineLearning #DataAnalysis #DataMining #DataVisualization #Python #RProgramming #PredictiveModeling #BigData #StatisticalAnalysis #USJobs #TechJobs #DataJobs #AIJobs #MLJobs
Job Type: Full-time
Location: United States
Required Skills
Data Analyst",Not listed,Realign LLC,"Phoenix, AZ",Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,68.0,AZ,,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist (L5) - Algo System Evaluation and Explainability,"$445K
/yr","Job Requisition ID
JR28912
Job Posting Date
08-01-2024
Teams
Data Science & Analytics
Work Type
Remote
Netflix is one of the world’s leading entertainment services with 278 million paid memberships in over 190 countries enjoying TV series, films and games across a wide variety of genres and languages. Members can play, pause and resume watching as much as they want, anytime, anywhere, and can change their plans at any time.
The Role
We are seeking a Senior Data Scientist with strong machine learning and causal inference experience to lead algo evaluation and explainability. Our algos cover a wide range of modeling techniques from boosted trees to neural networks, including deep networks and LLMs. In this role, you will develop methods and models to explain why our product promotes or doesn’t, a given title to a member. Working in a highly collaborative and cross-functional environment, you will be responsible for partnering with our Product and Algo Engineering teams to develop a deep understanding of our algo systems and generate robust methodologies that answer the “why” behind product recommendations.
As a Senior Data Scientist, you’ll be at the forefront of recommender systems and product innovation. You’ll work across teams of data scientists, algorithm engineers, and product stakeholders to advance our understanding of how Netflix content is promoted to our members. Note that you will be jumping in at an exciting time for personalization systems - this role will help us redefine what a Netflix subscription means for our members around the world!
In this role, you will:
Ensure that our personalization systems produce trustworthy, high-quality outputs to maximize our members' experience.
Develop a robust framework, combining online and offline methods, to comprehensively understand the outputs of our recommendations.
Research and incubate evaluation methods in the product by partnering early and often with our Algorithm Engineering teams.
Establish strong partnerships with stakeholders to shape the vision of a space, whether that is by helping determine a product strategy or define new metrics.
To be successful in this role, you have:
An advanced degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, or a related quantitative field.
5+ years of relevant experience focused on building and delivering real-world machine learning models with demonstrated impact.
Strong interest and experience with LLMs.
Strong Quantitative Programming skills in a language such as Python.
Exceptional oral and written communication skills.
Passion for driving product vision and innovation strategy by leveraging a broad set of techniques and building strong partnerships with stakeholders.
Ability to work independently and drive your own projects.
Embodies Netflix values while bringing a new perspective to continue to improve our culture.
Our compensation structure consists solely of an annual salary; we do not have bonuses. You choose each year how much of your compensation you want in salary versus stock options. To determine your personal top of market compensation, we rely on market indicators and consider your specific job family, background, skills, and experience to determine your compensation in the market range. The range for this role is $170,000 - $720,000.
Netflix provides comprehensive benefits including Health Plans, Mental Health support, a 401(k) Retirement Plan with employer match, Stock Option Program, Disability Programs, Health Savings and Flexible Spending Accounts, Family-forming benefits, and Life and Serious Injury Benefits. We also offer paid leave of absence programs. Full-time hourly employees accrue 35 days annually for paid time off to be used for vacation, holidays, and sick paid time off. Full-time salaried employees are immediately entitled to flexible time off. See more detail about our Benefits here.
Netflix is a unique culture and environment. Learn more here.
We are an equal-opportunity employer and celebrate diversity, recognizing that diversity of thought and background builds stronger teams. We approach diversity and inclusion seriously and thoughtfully. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, ancestry, national origin, caste, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, disability, medical condition, pregnancy, genetic makeup, marital status, or military service.
Job is open for no less than 7 days and will be removed when the position is filled.",4.2,Netflix,Remote,5001 to 10000 Employees,1997.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,445.0,Remote,27.0,1,0,0,0,0
Research Data Scientist,"$91K
/yr","All required qualifications must be documented on application materials
Required Qualifications:
B.A/B.S. with 2 years of experience in electrical engineering, computer science, neuroscience with a strong quantitative focus, or related field or a combination of education and experience to equal 6 years.

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with clinical data analysis
Experience with high dimensional data analysis
Experience with neurophysiological data (MEG/EEG, fMRI, single neurons)
Job Duties/Responsibilities:

Work in conjunction with faculty mentor to determine training agenda. (10%)
Participate in the design, implementation, and evaluation of a research project. (50%)
Prepare and present data to study investigators. (10%)
Author, co-author, and otherwise collaborate on reports, conference papers and journal articles. (15%)
Prepare postdoctoral fellowship and grant applications. (10%)
Supervise research assistants and laboratory personnel. (5%)

Job Overview:
Develops computer code for running and analyzing closed-loop neural recording and stimulation experiments. Work with scientists, physicians and engineers to transform complex requirements into software

Assists with administering behavioral and stimulation experiments.

Analyzes, curates, and debugs codes written by other programmers and scientists

Analyzes and integrates existing commercial and open-source software solutions with tailored in-house software solutions

Programs databases according to design specifications of data models using state-of-the-art languages to access databases

Integrates scientific software packages with database solutions

Designs and develops user interfaces to scientific software packages

Develops web- and app-interfaces to scientific software packages

Develop code to control and interact with hardware for running experiments • Implement behavior task logic in code using existing or new codebases

Write, test and troubleshoot scripts for running behavior experiments

Write unit tests and validation functions to ensure that software is working according to specifications

Write well documented code, refactor and document existing code • Manage scientific analysis codebase, address GitHub issues, maintain documentation • Build visualization tools to evaluate data quality and scientific results

Other Duties: Performs other duties as assigned.
More information about the team:
Alexander Herman, MD PhD and David Darrow, MD are the co-PIs of this unique interdisciplinary lab focused on neurophysiological and neuromodulation studies of decision making, with applications to addiction, chronic pain and mood disorders.

Applications must be submitted online. To be considered for this position, please click the Apply button and follow the instructions. You will be given the opportunity to complete an online application for the position and attach a cover letter and resume.
Additional documents may be attached after application by accessing your ""My Job Applications"" page and uploading documents in the ""My Cover Letters and Attachments"" section.
To request an accommodation during the application process, please e-mail employ@umn.edu or call (612) 624-UOHR (8647).

The University recognizes and values the importance of diversity and inclusion in enriching the employment experience of its employees and in supporting the academic mission. The University is committed to attracting and retaining employees with varying identities and backgrounds.
The University of Minnesota provides equal access to and opportunity in its programs, facilities, and employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, gender, age, marital status, disability, public assistance status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression. To learn more about diversity at the U: http://diversity.umn.edu.
Any offer of employment is contingent upon the successful completion of a background check. Our presumption is that prospective employees are eligible to work here. Criminal convictions do not automatically disqualify finalists from employment.

The University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (UMTC)
The University of Minnesota, Twin Cities (UMTC), is among the largest public research universities in the country, offering undergraduate, graduate, and professional students a multitude of opportunities for study and research. Located at the heart of one of the nation's most vibrant, diverse metropolitan communities, students on the campuses in Minneapolis and St. Paul benefit from extensive partnerships with world-renowned health centers, international corporations, government agencies, and arts, nonprofit, and public service organizations.",4.2,University of Minnesota,"Minneapolis, MN",Unknown,1851.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,91.0,MN,173.0,0,0,0,0,0
SENIOR DATA SCIENTIST,"$144K
/yr","Summary
The Opportunity
At Hyatt, we’re working to Advance Care through data-driven decisions and automation. This mission serves as the foundation for every decision as we create the future of travel. We can’t do that without the best talent – talent that is innovative, curious, and driven to create exceptional experiences for our guests, customers, owners, and colleagues.
Hyatt seeks an extraordinary data scientist to help build the algorithmic assets and features that Hyatt guests, members, customers, and internal users leverage to transform the guest experience and drive efficiencies across the operations of our business.
In this role, you will have the opportunity to work on a wide variety of data science projects across Personalization, Generative AI, Forecasting, and Decision Science.
You will be a part of a ground-floor, hands-on, highly visible team which is positioned for growth and is highly collaborative and passionate about machine learning and AI.
Applying the latest techniques and approaches across the domains of data science, machine learning, and AI isn’t just a nice to have, it’s a must. You will be part of a team passionate about diversity, equity, and inclusion, committed to nurturing curiosity and new skills and building connections with stakeholders, colleagues, and guests across the organization.

Who We Are
At Hyatt, we believe in the power of belonging and creating a culture of care, where our colleagues become family. Since 1957, our colleagues and guests have been at the heart of our business and helped Hyatt become one of the world's best and fastest-growing hospitality brands. Our transformative growth and the addition of new hotels, brands, and business lines can open the door for exciting career and growth opportunities for our colleagues.
As we continue to grow, we never lose sight of what’s most important: People. We turn trips into journeys, encounters into experiences, and jobs into careers.

Why Now?
This is an exciting time to be at Hyatt. We are growing rapidly and are looking for passionate changemakers to be a part of our journey. The hospitality industry is resilient and continues to offer dynamic opportunities for upward mobility, and Hyatt is no exception.

How We Care for Our People
Our purpose sets us apart—to care for people so they can be their best. Every business decision is made through the lens of our purpose, and it informs how we have and will continue to support each other as members of the Hyatt family. Our care for our colleagues is the key to our success. We’re proud to have earned a place on Fortune’s prestigious 100 Best Companies to Work For® list for the last ten years. This recognition is a testament to how our Hyatt family continues to come together to care for one another, our commitment to a culture of inclusivity, empathy, and respect, and making sure everyone feels like they belong.

We’re proud to offer exceptional corporate benefits which include:
Annual allotment of free hotel stays at Hyatt hotels globally
Flexible work schedules
Work-life benefits including well-being initiatives such as a complimentary Headspace subscription, and a discount at the on-site fitness center
A global family assistance policy with paid time off following the birth or adoption of a child as well as financial assistance for adoption
Paid Time Off, Medical, Dental, Vision, 401K with company match

Our Commitment to Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion
Our success is underpinned by our diverse, equitable, and inclusive culture and we are committed to diversity across the board—from whom we hire and develop, the organizations we support, and whom we buy from and work with.
Being part of Hyatt means always having space to be you. Our global teams are a mosaic of cultures, ethnicities, genders, ages, abilities, and identities. We constantly strive to reflect the world we care for with teams that achieve and grow together. To learn more about our commitments to DE&I, please visit the Why Hyatt section of the Hyatt career page.

Who You Are
As our ideal candidate, you understand the power and purpose of our Culture of Care and embody our core values of Empathy, Inclusion, Integrity, Experimentation, Respect, and Well-being. You enjoy working with others, are results-driven, and seek various opportunities to develop personally and professionally.

The Role
Support a variety of algorithmic products with core algorithmic data science capabilities
Hands-on developer of internal models/processes such as machine learning models, numerical optimization, recommender systems, NLP and Generative AI, time-series forecasting, statistical significance testing, operational ml-as-a-service API development, and streaming event data processing.
Stay up to date with the latest data science research and how it can be applied to Hyatt’s business.
Work collaboratively with other data scientists and business partners to ensure proper execution/integration of forecasting products.
Report on model metrics, bias, explainability, and incremental business impact with a commitment to ethical data science.
Demonstrate holistic thinking, strategic agility, and leadership at all levels of the organization.
Qualifications
Experience Required:
Master’s degree in computer science, statistics, or related fields required, PhD preferred.
5+ years of data science experience driving impact with a focus on one or more of (Personalization, Forecasting, Generative AI, Decision Science). Hospitality experience is not required.
Expertise in Python, SQL, and Spark. Additional software experience preferred ie Docker.
Expertise in a broad array of machine learning frameworks (Scikit-Learn, XGBoost, Tensorflow, PyTorch, MXNet, LLM, etc).
Experience developing operation AI services.
Experience operating in AWS cloud environment with large datasets.
Experience with streaming data architectures.
Experience with optimization solvers (Gurobi, CPLEX, etc)
Experience operating in an Agile Methodology environment.
Experience with DevOps and CI/CD concepts.
Excellent communication and teamwork skills.
Position will not require customer-facing interaction
The position responsibilities outlined above are in no way to be construed as all-encompassing. Other duties, responsibilities, and qualifications may be required and/or assigned as necessary.

We welcome you:
Research shows that women, people of color, and other historically excluded groups, tend to apply to jobs, only if they meet all the listed job qualifications. Unsure if you check every box, but feeling inspired to enhance your career? Apply. We’d love to consider your unique experiences and how you could make Hyatt even better.",4.0,"Hyatt Corporate Office, Chicago","Chicago, IL",10000+ Employees,1957.0,Company - Public,Hotels & Resorts,Hotels & Travel Accommodation,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,144.0,IL,67.0,1,0,1,1,1
Data Scientist Positions,"$121K
/yr","Data Scientist positions are available through the Princeton Precision Health Initiative at Princeton University. The Princeton Precision Health (PPH) initiative seeks to hire staff scientists in data science, computational biology, psychology, and neuroscience. The rank will be Associate Professional Specialist or Professional Specialist, commensurate with experience. The PPH initiative takes an interdisciplinary, data-driven approach to healthcare and mental health, leveraging the synergy of science and policy to enable targeted solutions to biomedical, clinical, and societal challenges and support precision health. Professional data scientists with expertise in computer science (with an emphasis on machine learning) will be critical contributors to the success of PPH. The positions will report to Professor Olga Troyanskaya, the Director of PPH, though the data scientists will be expected to work with multiple faculty and research groups participating in PPH research, providing data analysis and modeling expertise across this interdisciplinary research space at Princeton. Data scientists should have a strong track record in modeling big data using advanced deep-learning methods. A prior experience with neural, biological, biomedical, or genetic data is advantageous. In addition, candidates should have experience creating robust software code that can be shared across groups and with the biomedical research community. The data scientists must serve as a hub for collaborative projects across disciplines; thus, extensive research experience or training is required. Applications must be submitted online at https://www.princeton.edu/acad-positions/position/32821. Applications must include a curriculum vitae and contact information for three references. Essential Qualifications: - A Ph.D. in Computer Science, Computational Biology, Neuroscience, Psychology, or a related field. These positions are subject to the University's background check policy. The work location for these positions is in-person on campus at Princeton University.",4.5,Princeton University,"Princeton, NJ",5001 to 10000 Employees,1746.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,NJ,278.0,0,0,0,0,0
Sr Data Scientist Enterprise,"$133K
/yr","Come work at a place where we take pride in creating a workplace environment that values hard work, commitment, and growth.
Job Description:
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Information Systems/Sciences, Business Analytics, Machine Learning, Information Technology Management or relevant field of study required
Master’s degree preferred
Work Experiences:
3+ years of experience in data science or related field, with a focus on predictive/prescriptive modeling, and statistical analysis required
Experience in the retail industry, preferably in an omnichannel environment
Skills:
Proficiency in Python/R for predictive analytics and BigQuery for data analysis
Advanced skills in SQL, statistical methods and techniques to address business needs
Ability to process large datasets of structured and unstructured from various source (e.g. Transactional, customer behavior data, qualitative/quantitative survey data etc.)
Ability to translate business requirements into data science projects and communicate findings effectively to stakeholders using an unbiased, data-driven approach
Experience with ETL processes, data pipeline creation, and integration of diverse data sources
Analytical, with strong problem-solving abilities and creative resolution skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for presenting complex information in a clear and concise manner
Self-motivated and able to work independently and within a team setting
Ability to remain organized, pay strict attention to detail, and meet critical deadlines with high volume, fast-paced environment
Responsibilities:
Design, build, and validate predictive models to support various business functions such as sales forecasting, customer segmentation, and propensity scoring models.
Lead project lifecycles from problem conception to delivery, encompassing metric development, data manipulation, visualization, and analytical/model implementation
Perform in-depth analyses of customer data to reveal insights and identify opportunities for enhancing the customer experience across all touchpoints (Online, App, In-store, Media, etc.. )
Collaborate closely with stakeholders from marketing, omnichannel, pricing, merchandising, real estate, and executive teams to derive insights and formulate recommendations.
Integrate and analyze data from various sources, including transactional, behavioral, and external data, to provide a comprehensive view of the customer journey.
Provide guidance and mentorship to junior data scientists, fostering a collaborative and innovative team environment.
Develop a thorough understanding of Academy’s policies, procedures and safety rules
Duties may change; team members may be required to perform other duties as assigned
Physical Requirements & Attendance:
Regular attendance required
Acceptable level of hearing and vision to perform job duties
Adhere to company work hours, policies, procedures and rules governing professional staff behavior
Full time
Equal Employment Opportunity
Academy is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate with regard to employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other category protected by law.",3.4,Academy Sports,"Katy, TX",10000+ Employees,1938.0,Company - Public,Sporting Goods Stores,Retail & Wholesale,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,133.0,TX,86.0,1,0,0,0,1
"AIML - Sr Data Scientist, AIML Data","$204K
/yr","Summary

Posted: Oct 10, 2023

Role Number:200509858

Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally? The vision for the AIML Data organization is to improve products by using data as the voice of our customers. Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience. You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.

Description

Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Siri’s user facing products. Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that Siri engineering will use every day. Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing work, and presentations. Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive knowledge of Siri Search data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development. Partner closely with Siri search engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and systems that are part of Siri’s ability to understand and respond to requests. You should be passionate about building outstanding products. This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.

Key Qualifications
Proficiency in data science, machine learning, and analytics, including statistical data analysis and A/B testing. Experience crafting, conducting, analyzing, and interpreting experiments and investigations.
Experience articulating and translating business questions and using statistical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Capable of driving projects of varying sizes and scopes - some will take months and some weeks - and you will need to know when to dive deep.
Strong communication skills and the ability to naturally explain difficult technical topics (especially causal topics) to everyone from data scientists to engineers to business partners.
Strong programming skills, including data-querying skills (SQL and/or Spark, etc.) and experience with a scripting language for data processing and development (e.g., Python, R, or Scala).
5 years of relevant work experience.

Education & Experience

Advanced degree in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Operational Research, Bioinformatics, Economics, Psychology, Computer Science, Sociology, Mathematics, Physics, or similar quantitative field.

Additional Requirements

Pay & Benefits
At Apple, base pay is one part of our total compensation package and is determined within a range. This provides the opportunity to progress as you grow and develop within a role. The base pay range for this role is between $143,100 and $264,200, and your base pay will depend on your skills, qualifications, experience, and location.

Apple employees also have the opportunity to become an Apple shareholder through participation in Apple’s discretionary employee stock programs. Apple employees are eligible for discretionary restricted stock unit awards, and can purchase Apple stock at a discount if voluntarily participating in Apple’s Employee Stock Purchase Plan. You’ll also receive benefits including: Comprehensive medical and dental coverage, retirement benefits, a range of discounted products and free services, and for formal education related to advancing your career at Apple, reimbursement for certain educational expenses - including tuition. Additionally, this role might be eligible for discretionary bonuses or commission payments as well as relocation. Learn more about Apple Benefits.

Note: Apple benefit, compensation and employee stock programs are subject to eligibility requirements and other terms of the applicable plan or program.

More
Apple is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We take affirmative action to ensure equal opportunity for all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or other legally protected characteristics. Learn more about your EEO rights as an applicant.",4.1,Apple,"Cupertino, CA",10000+ Employees,1976.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,204.0,CA,48.0,1,0,1,0,0
"NAMS2 - Data Scientist I, II, III","$101K
/yr","Company Description

Crown is a leader in planning and implementing aerospace and advanced transportation services, with a focus on advanced air mobility (AAM). We have more than three decades of experience in developing strategy, exploring concepts, assessing technologies, developing use cases, and projecting economic impacts for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), and State Departments of Transportation. We are looking for an exceptional new team member to join our Crown innovators working with companies and government agencies to safely advance aviation’s newest frontier. Join our team to pioneer a better, more sustainable future

Job Description

Crown is looking for all levels of Data Scientists to work on the NAMS-2 project in Mountain View, CA to:
Identify trends, patterns, and anomalies found in big data sets by performing extensive data analysis to develop insights.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation processes to prepare data, implement data models, conduct analysis, and develop databases.
Interpret results from multiple structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques and tools.
Collaborate with teams to understand each data analysis projects' underlying purpose, focus, and objectives.
Design, develops, and implements the most valuable data-driven solutions for the
organization

Qualifications

Level I - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 0-2 years of related experience.
Level II - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Exposure to some of the complex tasks within the job function. Requires 2 -4 years of related experience.
Level III - A Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or equivalent. Requires 5 - 8 years of related experience.

Additional Information

Visit: www.crownci.com for additional information on our company.
Competitive benefits program and matching 401K!
Crown is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, age, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.
Persons unable to complete an online application should contact Crown HR for assistance at (703) 650-0663 ext 3059.
Crown is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor
Crown was voted Best Places to Work in 2021
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.8,"Crown Consulting, Inc.","Mountain View, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1989.0,Company - Private,National Agencies,Government & Public Administration,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,101.0,CA,35.0,0,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$121K
/yr","Title: Data Scientist - Big Data Engineer
Place of Performance: Remote - Austin, TX 77040
Duration: 9 Months Approx.

About Radiant
Radiant is committed to solving complex challenges for our customers by delivering innovative technology solutions. Our client-centric model increases transparency and accountability, which helps promote efficiency and effectiveness. We work and grow together with our customers, and we help empower our clients to achieve success. Our flexible delivery model allows us to provide end-to-end solution delivery, single project execution, and, or strategic resources. CMMI Maturity Level III and ISO 9001 2015 certified.

Required Skills:
4 years of Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 years of Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 years of Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 years of Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 years of Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 years of Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 years Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.

Responsibilities:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
The above job description and requirements are general in nature and may be subject to change based on the specific needs and requirements of the organization and project.

This is a remote position.",3.1,Radiant Digital,"Austin, TX",201 to 500 Employees,2000.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,121.0,TX,24.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$57.50
/hr","Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
Proven experience in data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
Demonstrated experience in data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Experience working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
Experience working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Experience:
Data Scientist: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",Not listed,Tekfocus Minds LLC,Remote,Unknown,,Company - Public,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,57.5,Remote,,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$55.50
/hr","Job Overview:
The Office of the Attorney General’s Chief Data Office (CDO) is seeking a dynamic and visionary Data Scientist to join our team and support our System Modernization efforts for the Child Support Division.
This individual must be able to work in a heavily technical environment, preparing and optimizing data for Snowflake and utilizing SAS Viya to build comprehensive federal and state reports.
You will play a pivotal role in transforming, analyzing, and leveraging our data assets to drive strategic initiatives and business outcomes.
You must be comfortable analyzing data, developing predictive modeling algorithms, and can communicate your findings through visualizations enabling the discovery of solutions to business problems.
As a Data Scientist your role will be impactful, visible, and rewarding.
Responsibilities will include:
Data Conversion and Reporting Support for System Modernization Efforts
Data Transformation and Integration: Prepare and optimize data for migration to Snowflake and SAS Viya platforms, ensuring seamless integration and functionality by creating data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
Develop Federal and State Reports: Build comprehensive reports that meet federal and state requirements using Snowflake and SAS Viya, ensuring accuracy and compliance.
Scrum Team Collaboration: Work as a member of an agile team to deliver new features and functions, delivering best-in-class value-based technology solutions.
Data Quality Management: Develop and implement databases, ETL processes, data collection systems, and data quality strategies that optimize statistical efficiency, accuracy, and quality.
Problem Examination and Resolution: Examine problems within the Data Intelligence space using ETL, Lambda, and Glue, and implement necessary changes to ensure data quality improvement.
Data Analytics and Insights: Utilize advanced data analytics techniques to support strategic decision-making, ensuring data integrity, quality, and timeliness of results.
Required Qualification/Skill Experience:
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
4 Years: Strong knowledge of database management and data warehousing concepts.
4 Years: Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation.
4 Years: Data conversion and report building using Snowflake and SAS Viya.
4 Years: Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, and R.
4 Years: Working with data analytics and business intelligence tools.
4 Years: Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment.
4 Years: Proficiency in ETL processes and tools such as AWS Glue and Lambda.
Position Details:
The primary work location(s) will be at OAG State Office located at 5500 E. Oltorf St, Austin, TX 78741.
Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM.
The working position is Telework.
Services are expected to start 11/12/2024 and are expected to complete by 08/31/2025. Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 1000 hours. This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing. ""work made to hire.""
Pay: $58/hr as W2.
S#: 302CSD2504
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $53.00 - $58.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Expertise in SQL for data querying and manipulation: 4 years (Required)
Data analytics and business intelligence tools: 4 years (Required)
Data transformation processes using ETL, SQL, Python, R: 4 years (Required)
Data conversion and report building Snowflake and SAS Viya.: 4 years (Required)
Working in a Scrum or Agile development environment: 4 years (Required)
Proficiency in ETL processes & tools as AWS Glue and Lambda: 4 years (Required)
Strong knowledge of database Mangat. & Data warehousing: 4 years (Required)
Ability to Commute:
Austin, TX 78741 (Required)
Ability to Relocate:
Austin, TX 78741: Relocate before starting work (Required)
Work Location: In person",5.0,Advanced Proactive Solutions LLC,"Austin, TX",Unknown,,Company - Private,Security & Protective,Management & Consulting,Unknown / Non-Applicable,1,0,55.5,TX,,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Data Lake","$90K
/yr","For over 90 years, Topcon’s vision has been to solve societal challenges around the globe. In healthcare, we are developing innovations that improve patients’ health and quality of life.
We empower eye care providers with advanced imaging, diagnostic solutions, and intelligent data technology. Our robotic devices deliver simplicity without compromise, by capturing clear images with the push of a button.
By joining Topcon Healthcare, you become part of a growing, diverse, global team. With office locations throughout North America, whether you are on-site, remote, or hybrid, our culture empowers you to contribute to company and personal success each day. At Topcon Healthcare, you can grow your career, gain new perspectives, and help address society’s most pressing challenges. If you have drive, passion, and a desire to be part of a collaborative team, we want to hear from you.
At Topcon Healthcare, we don’t wait for the future. We invent it. Join us.
Learn more about working with us at
topconcareers.com
THI is seeking a mission-driven a Data Scientist, Data Lake specialized in data cleaning, curation, and labeling. This role will play a critical role in ensuring the quality and usability of ophthalmic data for machine learning and other analytics initiatives. This individual will be responsible for developing and implementing data cleaning and preprocessing pipelines, curating datasets for specific use cases, and executing data labeling efforts.
Main Responsibilities:
Data Cleaning and Preprocessing:
Design and implement robust data cleaning processes to identify and address missing values, outliers, inconsistencies, and errors in datasets.
Develop and maintain data preprocessing pipelines to standardize, transform, and normalize data.
Utilize statistical and machine learning techniques to identify and correct data quality issues.
Data Curation and Labelling:
Select, extract, and organize relevant data from diverse sources to create curated datasets tailored to specific use cases.
Ensure data consistency, integrity, and documentation throughout the curation process.
Design and manage data labeling projects to generate high-quality labeled data.
Implement quality control measures to ensure the accuracy and consistency of labeled data.
Develop and maintain tools and scripts for automating data cleaning, curation, and labeling tasks.
Collaboration and Communication:
Collaborate with clinical scientists, data engineers, ML engineers, and domain experts to understand data needs and challenges.
Clearly communicate data quality findings and recommendations to stakeholders.
Stay up to date on the latest techniques and tools in data cleaning, curation, and labeling.
Qualifications:
BSc or MSc in Life Sciences, Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computer or Data Science
2 years’ experience doing clinical science or developing data-driven algorithms for medical devices.
Experience in the ophthalmic industry is preferred, and experience with OCT data is highly preferred.
Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, set priorities, and handle multiple tasks and projects with a high degree of efficiency and comfort with ambiguity.
Expertise with statistical packages such as Python or R is highly desirable.
Expertise with Matlab, IDL, or similar packages is highly desirable.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL.
Experience with cloud computing applications (such as AWS or Azure)
A passion for leveraging data to improve patient care and drive innovation
Base Pay:
Expected Base Pay Range: $70,000 to $110,000 Annualized
The base pay range included is a projected hiring range for a position, level and potential work location(s) listed. Topcon provides the compensation range that it in good faith believes it might pay and/or offer for this position. This compensation range is based on a full-time schedule.
Benefits*:
Topcon offers a comprehensive benefit package for this position including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, tax saving spending accounts a 401(k) plan with employer match, tuition reimbursement in addition to other perks and benefits. We also offer time off for our employees to recharge. Our employees are eligible for paid company holidays, paid personal time off, and paid sick time that meets or exceeds state/local requirements.
Topcon reserves the right to ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and offer additional benefits and other compensation; individual candidate compensation may be determined based on individual skills, experience, training, certifications, education, final work location and other factors not related to an applicant’s sex or other status protected by local, state, or federal law. Changes in the position level, location or other factors associated with the role may change the final determined compensation. The recruiter can provide additional information during the hiring process.
Topcon time off policies can vary between roles which are exempt or non-exempt. For hourly (“non-exempt”) employees, we offer personal paid time off which accrues in accordance with local standards. For salaried (“exempt”) employees, we offer a flexible paid time off policy giving you flexibility to take time when needed, while supporting business needs. All paid time off policies are in accordance with or exceeding local law. Employees working at least 30 hours per week are eligible for our Health and Welfare benefit package.
EEO Statement:
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status.",3.2,Topcon Healthcare,"La Jolla, CA",201 to 500 Employees,,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,90.0,CA,,1,0,0,1,0
IT Data Scientist I-IV,"$103K
/yr","IT Data Scientist I-IV
- (2400277)

Founded in 1934, Medical Mutual is the oldest and one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio. We provide peace of mind to more than 1.6 million Ohioans through our high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans.
Medical Mutual’ s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we don’t answer to Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us and help our members achieve their best possible health and quality of life.
IT Data Scientist I
Entry-level data scientist developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist II
Experienced junior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends
IT Data Scientist III
Senior data science developer specialized in design and development of machine learning models. Senior data scientists are expected to be self-sufficient and able to assist in coaching junior data scientists. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
IT Data Scientist IV
Expert data science developer responsible for leading team activities for design and development of machine learning models. Core job duties are extracting data and preparing data for machine learning models and designing, optimizing, measuring and testing machine learning models. Additional responsibilities include planning and development for integration of machine learning models into production systems, and ad-hoc exploratory analytics to understand and describe data-driven trends.
Responsibilities
IT Data Scientist I
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist II
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist III
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned
IT Data Scientist IV
Feature selection/design and extracting and preparing data for machine learning models
Developing, optimizing and testing machine learning models
Measuring and understanding performance of machine learning models and proposing/experimenting with methods to improve models
Designing and executing production system integration for machine learning models
Working with business for feature selection and design, presenting and reviewing model performance, explaining model performance metrics in terms of business impact
Ad-hoc analytics and data science work to explore data and understand and describe data trends
Learns new technical concepts and software languages as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned

Qualifications
IT Data Scientist I
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
0 to 1-year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
Python programming language
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist II
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
2+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
2+ years of experience with SQL programming language
1+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Programming design and coding techniques required
Familiarity with systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
Machine learning system integration
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist III
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
4+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
4+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Advanced programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
IT Data Scientist IV
Education and Experience
Masters/PhD degree in Computer Science, mathematics, machine learning/AI or equivalent combination of a bachelor’s degree and work experience
6+ year experience with machine learning techniques (feature encoding techniques, embeddings, various kinds of models, hyperparameter optimization, regularization techniques, loss and performance metrics) in a team environment
6+ years of experience with SQL programming language
2+ years of experience with python programming language
Technical Skills and Knowledge:
Mastery of programming design patterns and coding techniques required
Skilled with all parts of the systems development life cycle required
Relational database technologies and query semantics required
Python programming language required
Machine learning system integration required
ML in Python/Jupyter notebooks environment
AWS SageMaker
Python ML libraries, strategies, and techniques
R programming language
Data analytic and visualization experience using R or Python
ETL technology and techniques
Preferred skills in Python, PySpark, VS Code, Azure Technology Stack, Azure Databricks, Azure ML, Azure AI Studio, Azure Open AI Services, Open AI GPT-x (4, 4o, o1), LLM Architecture, Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) Pattern, LLM Fine Tuning, Azure Open AI SDK / REST APIs, REST APIs, Git (Github / Azure Dev Ops), Jira / Jira Align, Github Copilot, Microsoft 365 Copilot, and Dynamics 365 Copilot
Medical Mutual is looking to grow our team! We truly value and respect the talents and abilities of all of our employees. That's why we offer an exceptional package that includes:
A Great Place to Work
We will provide the equipment you need for this role, including a laptop, monitors, keyboard, mouse, and headset.
Whether you are working remotely or in the office, employees have access to on-site fitness centers at many locations, or a gym membership reimbursement when there is no Medical Mutual facility available. Enjoy the use of weights, cardio machines, locker rooms, classes and more.
On-site cafeteria, serving hot breakfast and lunch, at our Brooklyn, OH location. Convenience stores at many locations.
Discounts at many places in and around town, just for being a Medical Mutual team member.
The opportunity to earn cash rewards for shopping with our customers.
Business casual attire, including jeans.
Excellent Benefits
Employee bonus program
401(k) with company match up to 4% and an additional company contribution.
Health Savings Account with a company matching contribution.
Excellent medical, dental, vision, life, and disability insurance — insurance is what we do best, and we make affordable coverage for our team a priority.
Access to an Employee Assistance Program, which includes professional counseling, personal and professional coaching, self-help resources and assistance with work/life benefits.
Company holidays and up to 16 PTO days during the first year of employment with options to carry over unused PTO time.
After one year of service, parental leave for eligible employees who become parents through maternity, paternity, or adoption.

An Investment in You
Career development programs and classes.
Mentoring and coaching to help you advance in your career.
Tuition reimbursement up to $5,250 per year, the IRS maximum.
Diverse, inclusive, and welcoming culture with Business Resource Groups.

About Medical Mutual
Medical Mutual’s status as a mutual company means we are owned by our policyholders, not stockholders, so we do not answer Wall Street analysts or pay dividends to investors. Instead, we focus on developing products and services that allow us to better serve our customers and the communities around us.
There is a good chance you already know many of our Medical Mutual customers. As the official insurer of everything you love, we are trusted by businesses and nonprofit organizations throughout Ohio to provide high-quality health, life, disability, dental, vision and indemnity plans. We offer fully insured and self-funded group coverage, including stop loss, as well as Medicare Advantage, Medicare Supplement, and individual plans. Our plans provide peace of mind to more than 1.5 million Ohioans.
We are not just one of the largest health insurance companies based in Ohio, we are also the longest running. Founded in 1934, we aree proud of our rich history with the communities where we live and work.
At Medical Mutual and its family of companies we celebrate differences and are mutually invested in our employees and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse and nicotine testing.

Primary Location US-OH-Brooklyn
Work Locations Brooklyn 100 American Road Brooklyn 44144
Job 7 - General Staff
Organization Enterprise Analytics
Schedule Regular
Shift Standard
Employee Status Individual Contributor
Job Type Full-time
Job Level Day Job
Job Posting Oct 16, 2024, 2:39:10 PM",4.1,Medical Mutual of Ohio,"Brooklyn, OH",1001 to 5000 Employees,1934.0,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,103.0,OH,90.0,1,0,1,1,1
Associate Data Scientist,"$77K
/yr","Transport is at the core of modern society. Imagine using your expertise to shape sustainable transport and infrastructure solutions for the future? If you seek to make a difference on a global scale, working with next-gen technologies and the sharpest collaborative teams, then we could be a perfect match.
What you will do
As a Data Scientist, you will apply advanced data analytics techniques to analyze various types of vehicle and test data and provide detailed insights to simulation and engineering teams. The position entails a high level of collaboration with engineering teams working on future products, analyzing different types of logged and/or measured data (high frequency and low frequency) from customer trucks, field trucks and test vehicles to help make data driven engineering decisions.

Key Responsibilities
Utilize advanced analytics and machine learning techniques on customer and test vehicle data to extract meaningful insights and provide actionable recommendations to engineering and simulation teams
Integrate data from multiple sources (Customer vehicles, test vehicles etc.) and automate data flow, ensuring data quality and consistency, to facilitate deployment of advanced analytics techniques within vehicle engineering
Create data visualizations and dashboards to translate technical and customer data to provide actionable insights to stakeholders
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product development, and IT, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Collaborate with global teams on developing and improving analysis & simulation strategies based on actual customer data
Collaborate with engineering, testing and IT teams to drive development of AI/ML models to support and accelerate predictive modeling in engineering
Stay updated with the latest advancements in data science and automotive technologies to continuously improve usage of data analytics within vehicle engineering

Your future team
The Advanced Calculation Team is an important part of the Vehicle Engineering function for Volvo Group Trucks Technology, north America. Our team is a dynamic team of highly competent engineers who specialize in various CAE disciplines. We are responsible for ensuring functional requirements are met for durability & reliability, thermal management, cooling performance and other mechanical systems for heavy duty trucks developed for North America.
Who are you?
Do you dream big? We do too, and we are excited to grow together. In this role, you will bring:
A strong attention to detail with the ability to interpret data and translate information into actionable intelligence.
Capable of networking with individuals and teams across various departments and sites, sharing information and resources as needed, and working towards achieving common group goals.
Effective communication with the ability to listen effectively, transmit information accurately, and actively seek feedback from other experienced engineers, project managers, etc.
Ability to perform a wide range of tasks, respond positively to changing timelines and/or project scope, and open to accepting new challenges, responsibilities, and assignments.
Ease with communicating highly technical information to people of varying technical ability.
A desire and passion to create the very best product, working as an integral part of a highly technical organization.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
1-3 years of experience in data analytics with automotive industry background. Heavy duty vehicle experience is considered a plus
Demonstrated experience with machine learning and advanced analytics for predictive modeling such as regression analysis, neural networks (Deep Learning, RNN, LSTM, DQN etc.), time series forecasting, classification, clustering etc.
Proficiency in statistical analysis methods and programming languages such as Python (including libraries like Numpy, SciPy, Pandas, Tensorflow), SQL, Git, Azure, Hadoop, Matlab/Simulink, pySpark
Experience with building dashboards and help create visualizations from data using PowerBI, QlikView, Tableau etc.
Familiarity with Database Management Systems (BDMS) and proficiency in querying and manipulating data using SQL
Experience with Git and version control methods is a plus

What’s in it for you?
We offer a solid package of compensation and benefits, plus you will enjoy:
An organization the prioritizes employee's health and well-being.
Working in an empowered team solving complex challenges.
Opportunity to work with new technologies such as automation, electromobility, and connectivity.
Modern workspaces that allow agility and collaboration.
Multiple electric charging stations for cars.
Onsite facilities and activities that make everyday life easier including a cafeteria, chair massages, fitness center and fitness classes offered daily.
Ready for the next move?
If you are a Data Analyst / Scientist with an interest in working with a global organization focused on impacting everyday lives, apply today and join our team on this exciting journey!

We value your data privacy and therefore do not accept applications via mail.

Who we are and what we believe in
Our focus on Inclusion, Diversity, and Equity allows each of us the opportunity to bring our full authentic self to work and thrive by providing a safe and supportive environment, free of harassment and discrimination. We are committed to removing the barriers to entry, which is why we ask that even if you feel you may not meet every qualification on the job description, please apply and let us decide. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.”

Applying to this job offers you the opportunity to join Volvo Group. Every day, across the globe, our trucks, buses, engines, construction equipment, financial services, and solutions make modern life possible. We are almost 100,000 people empowered to shape the future landscape of efficient, safe and sustainable transport solutions. Fulfilling our mission creates countless career opportunities for talents with sharp minds and passion across the group’s leading brands and entities.

Group Trucks Technology are seeking talents to help design sustainable transportation solutions for the future. As part of our team, you’ll help us by engineering exciting next-gen technologies and contribute to projects that determine new, sustainable solutions. Bring your love of developing systems, working collaboratively, and your advanced skills to a place where you can make an impact. Join our design shift that leaves society in good shape for the next generation.",4.1,Volvo Group,"Greensboro, NC",10000+ Employees,1927.0,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,77.0,NC,97.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist (Mid),"$118K
/yr","This job opportunity is part of an RFP process; candidates are invited to submit their resumes detailing relevant experience.
Location: Bethesda, MD (Hybrid)
LCG is a minority-owned technology consulting firm that has been a trusted partner to more than 40 federal agencies, including 21 of the 27 Institutes and Centers (ICs) at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). For over 25 years, LCG has brought digitization and innovation to the Health and Human Services (HHS) and the NIH ecosystems. We support IT organizations by bringing precision technology and operation models that achieve mission capabilities and performance success.
Job Title: Data Scientist (Mid)
Job Summary: We are seeking an intermediate-level Data Scientist to perform extensive data analysis on large datasets to develop insights, identify trends, patterns, and anomalies. The successful candidate will collaborate with various teams to understand project objectives, perform data mining, data cleaning, and aggregation, and implement data models. This role will involve working with structured and unstructured data sources using programming, statistical, and analytical techniques. The Data Scientist will also support cloud computing initiatives, including developing automation solutions and enabling scientific cloud workflows.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze and interpret large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and anomalies.
Perform data mining, cleaning, and aggregation to prepare data for analysis and model implementation.
Develop and implement data models, conduct analysis, and interpret results using statistical techniques.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand the objectives and focus of data analysis projects.
Design, develop, and implement data-driven solutions to support organizational objectives.
Contribute to cloud computing initiatives, including automated self-service portals, cloud module development, and integration support for scientific computing.
Assist with cloud security operations by supporting the validation of security vulnerabilities and maintaining necessary security documentation.
Provide data analysis and insights to support decision-making for cloud environments, including usage, cost, and workload rationalization.
Support cloud workload migration projects by performing infrastructure assessments and assisting in business case development.
Collaborate with product management and development teams to support data-driven decisions for cloud platforms and products.
Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in data analysis, statistical modeling, and data mining.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, SQL, and experience with data visualization tools.
Knowledge of cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, GCP) and experience with GitHub API integrations.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with attention to detail.
Familiarity with cloud security best practices and compliance standards such as NIST and FISMA.
Experience in cloud computing, scientific workflows, and automation.
Familiarity with Azure Active Directory (AD) and GitHub automation tools.
Experience in cloud enablement and workload migration for scientific computing environments.
Knowledge of federal security and compliance standards.

The projected compensation range for this position is $98,100 to $135,750 per year benchmarked in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area. The target salary is 114,000. The salary range provided is a good faith estimate representative of all experience levels. Salary at LCG is determined by various factors, including but not limited to role, location, the combination of education/training, knowledge, skills, competencies, certifications, and work experience.
LCG offers a competitive, comprehensive benefits package which includes health insurance options (medical, dental, vision), life and disability insurance, retirement plan contributions, as well as paid leave, federal holidays, professional development, and lifestyle benefits.
Devoted to Fair and Inclusive Practices
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. If you are interested in applying for employment with LCG and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department by email at hr@lcginc.com.
Securing Your Data
Beware of fraudulent job offers using LCG's name. LCG will never request payment-related details or advancement of money during the application process. Legitimate communication will only come from lcginc.com or system@hirebridgemail.com emails, not free commercial services like Gmail or WhatsApp. If you receive suspicious emails asking for payment or personal information, contact us immediately at hr@lcginc.com.
If you believe you are the victim of a scam, contact your local law enforcement and report the incident to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.",3.8,"LCG, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",201 to 500 Employees,1990.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,118.0,MD,34.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$96K
/yr","We are searching for a Data Scientist – someone who works well in a fast-paced setting. In this position, you will harness the largest pediatric healthcare dataset in the nation to deliver analytics, insights, and solutions that help us create a healthier future for our global community.
The individual in this role delivers data analytics and supports the development and implementation of advanced analytic tools to meet the needs of teams throughout the organization. Works with a multidisciplinary team to design, develop, and create analytical solutions through applications of data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), and emerging technologies. Collaborates with clinical, business, and information systems team members to ideate and create new analytic solutions impacting patient care and hospital operations. Partners with subject matter experts to understand the relationship
between workflows and data and uses that data to create innovative solutions that support and advance targeted outcomes.
Exercises knowledge of descriptive, predictive, and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques, to develop strategic insights to drive operational and clinical goals.
Teaches developers, architects and analysts how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Provides data science and statistical support for advanced analytics projects at Texas Children's Hospital. Analyzes and interprets clinical, operational, and other data to provide insight into care delivery and operational initiatives. Responsible for evaluating data quality, preparing data, generating insights, and developing and presenting high-impact data stories. Serves as a subject matter expert associated with data analysis processes, advanced analytics techniques, statistics, and meaningful data visualizations. Provides consultation and support in the development, analysis, interpretation, and management of a
variety of complex data sources. Works on multiple concurrent projects.
Think you’ve got what it takes?
Job Duties & Responsibilities
Creates data models and generates data insights
Generates and communicates business and clinical insights, using various techniques and understanding the strengths and risks of different approaches to data analysis
Analyzes large, noisy datasets and identifies meaningful patterns that provide actionable results. Data sources may include the Enterprise Data Warehouse, various source systems and databases, and data from external sources such as the Census Bureau. Source data may include both structured and unstructured data
Evaluates and communicates data quality within the context of the problem being analyzed, and implements appropriate data cleaning techniques when preparing data
Performs basic and advanced statistical analyses, modeling, interpretation, documentation, and presentation
Builds and tests statistical, optimization, and machine learning models, including regression, classification, clustering, natural language processing, deep learning, and/or statistical modeling. Applies best practices for data preparation, statistical methods, and approaches to data analysis to ensure valid and reliable results
Independently owns descriptive, diagnostic analysis of complex data problems, consulting with data architects and subject matter experts as needed.
Designs, develops, and creates advanced analytical solutions
Communicates data insights and acts as a data storyteller by translating data analyses into easily understandable dialogue and terms to influence business decisions or actions.
Provides statistical consultation
Plans, communicates, and manages risk related to tasks
Participates in overall analytics and application support delivery activities
Skills & Requirements
Required master's degree in mathematics, computer science, statistics, engineering, analytics, life sciences, or a specific healthcare field (such as nursing, pharmacy, respiratory, etc.)
Preferred Ph. D
3 years of experience in experience in data science, data analytics, business analysis, data modeling, statistical analysis, statistical modeling, or machine learning
A Ph. D may substitute for 2 years of experience.",3.7,Texas Children's Hospital,"Houston, TX",10000+ Employees,1954.0,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,96.0,TX,70.0,0,0,0,0,0
"Data Scientist, Growth","$175K
/yr","The Wealthfront Data Science Team utilizes our rich financial and behavioral data to influence key product and marketing decisions, as well as to safeguard our clients’ information and assets. The team draws from backgrounds in Computer Science, Natural Sciences, Statistics, Operations Research and Econometrics.

The Data Scientist in this role will be primarily embedded within Wealthfront’s Growth Team. The Growth Team is focused on acquiring new clients, as well as deepening Wealthfront’s relationship to existing clients. The team addresses this mandate by designing creative initiatives that cut across product lines. These initiatives can include testing new in-app features, discovering new channels of client acquisition, launching email campaigns, or targeted incentives – all based on unique insights about our clients and their interaction with the prevailing economic environment.

A fundamental trait for an effective Growth Data Scientist is curiosity for discovering new insights about client behavior. This person will enjoy going deep into the data to understand what’s driving client actions, proposing ideas for new projects and for driving clarity on the ‘why’ behind experiment results.

Technical tools used in this role include Hypothesis testing (potentially with atypical distributions), mathematical transforms of variables, data mining, natural language processing (NLP) and machine learning (ML). You don't need experience in all of the techniques but must have the ability to pick them up as needed.

Potential project areas for this role include (but are not limited to) analyzing client signup flow, creating client groups according to business rules or automated clustering, creating ML models for estimating incentive revenues or costs and Named Entity Recognition using NLP.
Responsibilities
Demonstrate an owner’s mindset in formulation, execution, communication and timing of your projects.
Analyze and explain A/B test experiment results. Investigate why the experiment was a success or a failure. Discover client segments for whom the experiment worked unusually well or otherwise.
Suggest follow ups for recently concluded initiatives and experiments. Create and present rationales for questions including whether the experiment should be continued, and what should be different in the next iteration.
Work closely with Product, Design, Engineering and User Research members on the Growth Team to craft a long term (quarterly) learning plan and subsequently execute your part in that plan.
Collaborate with cross functional stakeholders to come up with feasibility of an experiment, experiment structure and opportunity sizing/impact of the experiment to guide the team’s roadmap.
Work with Data platform teams to procure required (but unavailable) data.
Enhance overall Data Science team execution through hands-on help, design feedback and peer review.
Requirements
A Master's or a PhD degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, or Natural Sciences with 4+ years of prior experience in a Data Science role. Exceptions to these requirements may be considered on a case-by-case basis.
Prior experience in Growth or Marketing
Prior experience analyzing complex experiments, including developing data insights and data backed recommendations for stakeholders.
Strong communication, storytelling and collaboration skills and a record of partnering across organizations to sharpen project requirements. Sometimes this includes re-framing the original request to solve a more general problem with similar effort.
Hands-on mathematical and software engineering skills to execute on complex projects.
Proficiency in Python and SQL.
Desire and ability to mentor junior Data Scientists within the team by exemplifying math, engineering and technical communication skills.
Estimated annual salary range: $165,000 - $185,000 USD plus equity and a discretionary bonus.

Benefits include medical, vision, dental, 401K plan, generous time off, parental leave, wellness reimbursements, professional development, employee investing discount, and more!

About Wealthfront

Wealthfront started with the ambition to transform the investment advisory business, with the goal to unlock access to high quality investment advice for millions who were underserved by the traditional institutions. We built one of the first automated investment products that allows you to invest in a personalized portfolio of thousands of companies in seconds for a remarkably low fee. We then expanded. We now work with partner banks to offer exceptional banking features through a Wealthfront Brokerage Cash Account, which makes it remarkably easy for people to automate their finances end-to-end and eliminated the hassle of money management, all of which resulted in attracting more than $70 billion of our client’s hard earned money, pioneering the robo-advisor category and transforming the broader industry. And yet, we have a long way to go to achieve our mission to build a financial system that favors people, not institutions.

Wealthfront’s vision is to make it delightfully easy to build long-term wealth on your own terms. This vision is more relevant than ever because millions more people are getting into the market early and investing their hard earned savings in a handful of stocks. While this is a great way to start, it is inconsistent with building long-term wealth. We want to empower young investors to expand their horizon, and easily explore and execute on a wider range of investing strategies, make informed investment decisions that are consistent with their values and beliefs while also making it effortless to grow and compound their savings exponentially in a way that’s transformational to their lives and their long-term future.

For more information please visit www.wealthfront.com.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Please review our candidate privacy notice.",4.1,Wealthfront,"Palo Alto, CA",51 to 200 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Investment & Asset Management,Financial Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,175.0,CA,13.0,1,0,0,1,0
DH Data Scientist,"$173K
/yr","Job Description:
Job Summary
The Data Scientist is responsible for maximizing the value of rich date resources available. This person will independently investigate and derive actionable insights to drive improvement for research and development and for clinical deployment of DeepHealth products.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Utilize statistics, data mining and programming knowledge to analyze clinical data and present insights to key stakeholders.
Identify patterns to drive improvement of research, product development and clinical deployment.
Generate and test hypotheses independently.
Investigate and improve data quality.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze product performance.
Summarize data in concise reports including tables, plots and other visual representations.
Document analysis for the engineering and clinical teams.

PLEASE NOTE: This is not an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities and requirements of the position described above. Other functions may be assigned and management retains the right to add or change duties at any time.

Minimum Qualifications, Education, and Experience
Bachelor’s degree in relevant field such as computer science, math, statistics, engineering (M.S. preferred).
At least two (2) years of experience (five plus (5+) years preferred).
Expertise in Python and scientific libraries such as numpy and pandas.
Expertise with data visualization techniques.
Experience working with medical data.
Experience evaluating machine learning models.
Experience evaluating clinical performance preferred.
Familiarity with machine learning techniques preferred.
Strong individual team contributor and collaborator.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.

Quality Standards
Communicates, cooperates, and consistently functions professionally and harmoniously with all levels of supervision, co-workers, patients, visitors, and vendors.
Demonstrates initiative, personal awareness, professionalism and integrity, and exercise confidentiality in all areas of performance.
Follows all local, state and federal laws concerning employment to include but not limited to: I-9, Harassment, EEOC, Civil rights and ADA.
Follows OSHA regulations, RadNet and site protocols, policies and procedures.
Follows HIPAA, compliance, privacy, safety and confidentiality standards at all times.
Practices universal safety precautions.
Promotes good public relations on the phone and in person.
Adapts and is willing to learn new tasks, methods, and systems.
Reports to work regularly as scheduled; consistently punctual with respect to working hours and lunch schedules, and maintains satisfactory personal attendance in accordance with RadNet guidelines.
Consistently adheres to the time management policies and procedures.
Completes job responsibilities in a quality and timely manner.

Physical Demands
This position often requires sitting, standing, walking, bending, twisting, reaching with hands and arms, using hands and fingers, handling, or feeling, speaking, listening, and high-level cognitive thinking. Must be able to use a computer and other office machinery including copiers, scanners and computer software. Must be able to lift up to 10 pounds occasionally. The position requires the ability to travel (~20% of time), drive a vehicle, and utilize other forms of transportation.

Working Environment
Office setting

Pay Range: USD $165,000.00 - USD $180,000.00 /Yr.",2.6,Deephealth,"Cambridge, MA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,173.0,MA,40.0,1,0,0,1,1
Wildfire Data Scientist,"$111K
/yr","Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills and talents to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.
Position Summary

We are seeking a highly skilled Data Scientist to join our team focused on innovative Wildfire Mitigation strategies. As a Data Scientist specializing in wildfire mitigation, you will play a crucial role in leveraging data-driven insights to develop and implement proactive measures to mitigate the impact of wildfires on communities and utility infrastructure. This position will analyze historical wildfire data, data on wildfire ignitions, data from vegetation management, and other relevant datasets to develop predictive models to assess wildfire risks and behavior to aid in prevention of wildfire events.
This is a hybrid position with 3-days per week (T-W-Th) in office at the Xcel Energy location listed for this position.
Applicants must be authorized to work for ANY employer in the U.S. We are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment visa at this time for this position.

Essential Responsibilities
Follow consistent practices to ensure data integrity and deal with imperfections in data. Champion the acquisition of new data sources to enhance value and fill gaps; automate collection processes; effectively process structured and semi-structured/unstructured data; proficiently integrate varied datasets; collaborate with business stakeholders as needed to ensure solid data understanding and proper data transformation; work cross-functionally with development and engineering teams; analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns; draw conclusions and gain actionable insights.
Build predictive models; propose solutions and strategies for business problems; apply the appropriate machine learning algorithm to data problems (e.g. supervised vs. unsupervised machine learning, clustering, ensemble methods, etc.); validate model results. Work closely with architecture and engineering team to deploy models; communicate results in a clear and non-technical manner.
Interact with senior management and effectively communicate technical information to numerous audiences (e.g. senior management, client community, peers and junior associates);effectively develop relationships with individuals inside and outside of IT; deliver difficult messages and express disagreement with others with confidence and self-control; address challenges to analytic processes and influence others to change their approach and work collectively to implement new tools/techniques; gain support from related stakeholders for analytic solutions and champion data driven business decisions.
Apply appropriate statistical techniques to data exploration and model development/assessment; communicate complex statistical concepts to non-technical audiences; maintain skills through continuing education.
Create meaningful data visualizations to communicate results and highlight business impact; utilize various techniques and delivery methods of visualization that are audience appropriate.
Effectively collaborate with others to deliver efficient and high quality code; implement solid validation process to ensure consistency and minimize errors; champion more efficient ways to produce code iteratively; maintain skills through continuing education; stay up to date on new technologies/ tools; seamlessly transition between languages to apply the right approach to the problem.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in IT or math related field and 7 years of experience in analytics OR Master's degree in IT or math related field and 5 years of experience in an analytics
Problem solving skills, business acumen, and demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills
Expert SQL, Python skills Distributed Computing experience Excellent data visualization skills
Knowledge of data architecture and structure
Experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, predictive modeling are imperative; text mining and topic modeling are plus
Experience with Neural Networks and corresponding technologies
As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com.
Non-Bargaining
The anticipated starting base pay for this position is: $92,300.00 to $130,567.00 per year
This position is eligible for the following benefits: Annual Incentive Program, Medical/Pharmacy Plan, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Dependent Care Reimbursement Account, Health Care Reimbursement Account, Health Savings Account (HSA) (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Limited-Purpose FSA (if enrolled in eligible health plan and HSA), Transportation Reimbursement Account, Short-term disability (STD), Long-term disability (LTD), Employee Assistance Program (EAP), Fitness Center Reimbursement (if enrolled in eligible health plan), Tuition reimbursement, Transit programs, Employee recognition program, Pension, 401(k) plan, Paid time off (PTO), Holidays, Volunteer Paid Time Off (VPTO), Parental Leave
Benefit plans are subject to change and Xcel Energy has the right to end, suspend, or amend any of its plans, at any time, in whole or in part.
Deadline to Apply: 10/24/24
EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)
ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.",3.3,Xcel Energy,"Denver, CO",10000+ Employees,1909.0,Company - Public,Energy & Utilities,"Energy, Mining & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),0,1,111.0,CO,115.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","As a Data Scientist with a focus on machine learning, you will be responsible for developing and deploying data models that provide critical insights to drive data-driven decision-making across the organization. You'll work with large datasets to build predictive and prescriptive models, evaluate their performance, and collaborate with cross-functional teams to implement these models into business processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection, Cleaning, and Preparation:
Source and collect large datasets from multiple sources, ensuring high data quality.
Perform data preprocessing, including cleaning, normalization, transformation, and feature engineering, to prepare data for machine learning models.
Manage data pipelines and ensure efficient data flow for real-time analysis.
Model Development and Deployment:
Design, develop, and validate machine learning models for classification, regression, clustering, and recommendation systems.
Deploy machine learning models in production environments, ensuring they operate efficiently and scale as needed.
Continuously monitor, test, and update models in production to maintain optimal performance.
Machine Learning Techniques and Analysis:
Apply machine learning algorithms, including supervised and unsupervised learning techniques, to solve complex business problems.
Conduct A/B testing, cross-validation, and hyperparameter tuning to optimize models for accuracy and generalizability.
Leverage advanced techniques such as deep learning, reinforcement learning, or natural language processing when appropriate.
Visualization and Communication:
Visualize complex data and model outcomes using data visualization tools like Matplotlib, Seaborn, and Tableau to effectively communicate insights.
Present findings and actionable insights to non-technical stakeholders through clear, concise reports and presentations.
Collaborate with product managers, engineers, and business analysts to translate data insights into strategic initiatives.
Project Management and Cross-Functional Collaboration:
Lead data science projects from concept to completion, managing timelines, objectives, and deliverables.
Work closely with data engineers to maintain data infrastructure and optimize data processing workflows.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business goals and ensure that data science efforts are aligned with organizational objectives.
Continuous Learning and Development:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in data science and machine learning, and experiment with new tools and techniques.
Share knowledge and best practices with the data science team, contributing to the team's growth and development.
Attend conferences, workshops, and other professional development opportunities to enhance skills and knowledge.
Key Skills and Qualifications:
Technical Skills:
Programming Languages: Proficiency in Python or R, with strong knowledge of libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, and Scikit-learn for data manipulation and model building.
Machine Learning Frameworks: Experience with TensorFlow, PyTorch, or Keras for building and deploying machine learning models.
Big Data Technologies: Familiarity with tools like Apache Spark, Hadoop, or Dask for processing and analyzing large datasets.
SQL: Ability to write complex SQL queries to extract, transform, and load data from relational databases.
Machine Learning Knowledge:
Supervised Learning: Experience with classification, regression, and time-series forecasting models.
Unsupervised Learning: Knowledge of clustering, principal component analysis (PCA), and anomaly detection.
Deep Learning: Understanding of neural networks and deep learning architectures for tasks such as image and speech recognition.
NLP: Familiarity with natural language processing techniques, such as topic modeling, sentiment analysis, and text classification.
Data Visualization:
Proficiency in data visualization tools, such as Matplotlib, Seaborn, Plotly, or Power BI, to create compelling visualizations of data and model results.
Experience with dashboarding tools, like Tableau or Power BI, to create interactive reports and dashboards.
Statistical and Mathematical Skills:
Strong understanding of statistical analysis, hypothesis testing, and probability.
Knowledge of linear algebra, calculus, and optimization methods commonly used in machine learning.
Soft Skills:
Problem-Solving: Ability to analyze complex problems and develop data-driven solutions.
Communication: Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to present technical information to non-technical stakeholders.
Collaboration: Experience working in cross-functional teams, with the ability to build strong relationships with team members across the organization.
Education and Experience:
Education: Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field. A Ph.D. is a plus.
Experience: 2+ years of experience in data science, with a focus on building and deploying machine learning models in a business setting.
Portfolio: A portfolio of completed projects demonstrating experience in machine learning, with examples of model development, deployment, and impact on business outcomes.
Example Projects:
Predictive Analytics: Developed a model to predict customer churn, enabling the company to implement targeted retention strategies.
Recommendation System: Built a recommendation engine for personalized product recommendations, which increased customer engagement.
Sentiment Analysis: Implemented a sentiment analysis model for customer feedback, helping the marketing team to understand customer sentiment and adjust campaigns accordingly.
Anomaly Detection: Created an anomaly detection model for fraud detection, reducing fraudulent transactions by identifying patterns in real-time.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $118,635.00 - $128,216.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Natural language processing: 1 year (Required)
Machine learning: 1 year (Required)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
Regression analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work Location: On the road",1.0,KesarWeb,United States,1 to 50 Employees,,Company - Private,--,--,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,123.0,United States,,1,0,1,0,1
"Data Scientist I, Lega Lab","$94K
/yr","WHY UT SOUTHWESTERN?
With over 75 years of excellence in Dallas-Fort Worth, Texas, UT Southwestern is committed to excellence, innovation, teamwork, and compassion. As a world-renowned medical and research center, we strive to provide the best possible care, resources, and benefits for our valued employees. Ranked as the number 1 hospital in Dallas-Fort Worth according to U.S. News & World Report , we invest in you with opportunities for career growth and development to align with your future goals. Our highly competitive benefits package offers healthcare, PTO and paid holidays, on-site childcare, wage, merit increases and so much more. We invite you to be a part of the UT Southwestern team where you'll discover a culture of teamwork, professionalism, and a rewarding career!

JOB SUMMARY
Works under specific direction to provide analysis and develops algorithms and software for clinical and/or basic research problems. Impacts data acquisition, management, and analysis in basic, translational, and clinical research, including clinical trials.

A Data Scientist I position is available in the Dr. Bradley Lega laboratory. Dr. Lega is an Associate Professor in the Department of Neurological Surgery at UT Southwestern Medical Center. He has secondary appointments in Neurology and Psychiatry. Dr. Lega's research focuses on how brain conditions affect memory. The research he began at the University of Pennsylvania, and that he continues at UT Southwestern, focuses on preserving memory function and restoring memory to patients with brain injuries or brain tumors.

This candidate will support study efforts studying intercranial Signal and data analysis for a new project. Prefer Master's degree or PHD in computational field. Candidate will need to be organized and have the ability to collaborate with trainees including undergraduate, graduate, medical students, as well as post-doctoral fellows and co-workers.

BENEFITS
UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:

PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage

100% coverage for preventive healthcare-no copay

Paid Time Off, available day one

Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)

Paid Parental Leave Benefit

Wellness programs

Tuition Reimbursement

Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer

Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!

EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATION
Required

Education
Master's Degree M.S. in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, (Bio)mathematics, (Bio)statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, or related field or
Bachelor's Degree B.S. with demonstrated experience in broadly defined areas of bioinformatics

Experience

JOB DUTIES

Analyzes and develops formalisms, algorithms and software for applications in biomedical research.

Develops and maintains software tools and infrastructure for resolving specific problems.

Assists in the development, testing and revision of programs in a team with diverse bioinformatics expertise.

Performs other duties as assigned.

SECURITY AND EEO STATEMENT
Security
This position is security-sensitive and subject to Texas Education Code 51.215, which authorizes UT Southwestern to obtain criminal history record information.

EEO Statement
UT Southwestern Medical Center is committed to an educational and working environment that provides equal opportunity to all members of the University community. As an equal opportunity employer, UT Southwestern prohibits unlawful discrimination, including discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or veteran status. Benefits UT Southwestern is proud to offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits package to eligible employees. Our benefits are designed to support your overall wellbeing, and include:
PPO medical plan, available day one at no cost for full-time employee-only coverage
100% coverage for preventive healthcare – no copay
Paid Time Off, available day one
Retirement Programs through the Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS)
Paid Parental Leave Benefit
Wellness programs
Tuition Reimbursement
Public Service Loan Forgiveness (PSLF) Qualified Employer
Learn more about these and other UTSW employee benefits!",3.9,UT Southwestern,"Dallas, TX",10000+ Employees,1943.0,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,94.0,TX,81.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Ambulatory Transformation & Performance","$165K
/yr","Description
The Data Scientist plays a pivotal role in transforming raw data into actionable insights that drive the efficient operation of ambulatory clinics. This position involves advanced data modeling, statistical analysis, and the application of machine learning techniques to identify trends, optimize performance, and support data-driven decision-making. The Data Scientist will design and maintain robust data models, develop predictive models, and collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex data sets. The role requires expertise in data analysis, a strong understanding of healthcare data, and a commitment to enhancing the financial viability and operational efficiency of ambulatory clinics.
Develop, refine, and maintain complex data models that support ambulatory operations, ensuring data accuracy and consistency.
Apply statistical analysis and machine learning techniques to analyze large datasets, identify trends, and generate predictive insights.
Design and implement predictive models to forecast key performance indicators, patient outcomes, and ambulatory operational efficiencies.
Create and validate algorithms for data mining, cleansing, and transformation to enhance data usability
Lead or participate in projects focused on enhancing data infrastructure, analytical capabilities, and reporting frameworks.
Explore and implement innovative data science techniques and tools to address complex challenges in ambulatory operations.
Stay current with advancements in data science and healthcare analytics, applying new methods and technologies to improve performance and outcomes.
Work closely with cross-functional teams, including IT, clinical, and business stakeholders, to understand data needs and deliver actionable insights.
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and other stakeholders in a clear, concise, and actionable manner.
Provide guidance and mentorship to analysts within the team
Lead efforts in data integration, ensuring seamless interoperability between multiple data sources and systems
Enforce data governance standards, including data quality, metadata management, and data security protocols.
Develop and manage ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) processes to curate data from various sources into structured formats suitable for analysis.
Document and maintain data lineage, ownership, and access requirements, ensuring compliance with healthcare regulations
salary range: $102500-$227700
Qualifications
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a related field or equivalent experience/training.
Minimum of 3+ years of experience in a healthcare-related organization, with a strong understanding of healthcare data and operations
Minimum of 5 years of experience with Python or R for data analysis, modeling, and machine learning applications.
Proven expertise in data modeling, information design, and data integration.
Advanced knowledge of data management systems, practices, and standards.
Experience with complex data quality, governance issues, and data conversion.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Ability to abstract and represent information flows in systems through effective modeling.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with a demonstrated ability to work collaboratively across diverse teams.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Databricks, including managing and processing large datasets in a distributed environment.
Experience with Azure DevOps, including managing workflows, version control, and collaborative project management.",3.9,UCLA Health,"Los Angeles, CA",5001 to 10000 Employees,1919.0,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Healthcare,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,165.0,CA,105.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","The Group:
Morningstar’s Research group provides independent analysis on individual securities, funds, markets, and portfolios. The Research group also provides data on hundreds of thousands of investment offerings, including stocks, mutual funds, and similar vehicles, along with real-time global market data on millions of equities, indexes, futures, options, commodities, and precious metals, in addition to foreign exchange and Treasury markets. Morningstar is one of the largest independent sources of fund, equity, and credit data and research in the world, and our advocacy for investors’ interests is the foundation of our company.

The Role:
As a Data Scientist, you will be a leading contributor in the implementation of Artificial Intelligence (AI) within Data Collections software applications, API’s, and other data products. This role requires significant interaction with both upstream and downstream stakeholders across Technology, Data, Products, Sales/Service, and Research.

The Data Scientist will transition approved Data Collections AI products from a prototype phase to a scalable and consumable service. Often, these services must be integrated into Morningstar’s platform of financial products, so that our clients can use these software tools in the investment decision-making process.

We are looking for an individual who possesses strong technical development skills, an ability to follow analyst requirements and technical specifications for robust code, and a passion for investment research.

This position reports to the Tech Manager of the Data Collections AI team. This position is based in our Chicago office. We follow a hybrid policy of 3 days onsite and 2 days remote work. Candidates must be currently authorized to work Permanently in the United States - this position does not sponsor H-1B Visa.

Responsibilities:
Automate manual data collection processes by applying cutting-edge solutions to tackle NLP problems, e.g., text classification, NER tasks.
Collaborate with upstream data analysts to clarify business needs, define project scope, design ML/AI solutions, and iteratively improve workflows and data storage practices
Implement ML/AI solutions from start to finish and collaborate with peer engineering teams for model deployment
Design innovative ways to improve automation rates for data collection
Research on latest technologies and propose new solutions to existing problems
Participate in team brainstorming sessions, provide guidance to MLDAs (machine learning data analysts), and contribute to the codebase
Introduce and follow good development practices, innovative frameworks and technology solutions
Follow best practices like estimation, planning, reporting and improvement brought to processes in daily work

Requirements:
No minimal industrial experience is required, if you have a Ph.D. degree in engineering, computer science, statistics or related field
Must demonstrate ML/AI knowledge and skills through research and/or side-projects in NLP related fields, if you have no prior industrial experience
Must have 2+ years of industrial experience in a data science role featuring NLP tasks, if you have a master’s degree or below
Fluent with Python and related packages like NumPy, pandas, scikit-learn, NLTK, PyTorch, TensorFlow, etc.
Sound knowledge of common ML/AI algorithms (e.g., linear/logistic regression, random forest, gradient boosting) and Deep Learning algorithms in particular (e.g., transformers, BERT, open-source LLMs)
Experience with SQL
Great communication and presentation skills
Able to work independently and being proactive
Experience with generative AI is preferred
Experience with finetuning LLMs is preferred
Experience with DevOps tools (e.g. Sagemaker, Git, Jenkins) is desirable
Experience developing and deploying solutions using services in the Amazon AWS ecosystem (Lambda, Sagemaker, EC2, RDS, EMR) is desirable
Intermediate knowledge of statistical methods is desirable
Familiarity with common data cleaning and munging techniques
Familiarity with data visualization
Familiarity with statistical methods, e.g., linear/logistic regression, optimization
Familiarity with mutual fund, fixed income, and equity data is a plus

001_MstarInc Morningstar Inc. Legal Entity
Morningstar’s hybrid work environment gives you the opportunity to work remotely and collaborate in-person each week. We’ve found that we’re at our best when we’re purposely together on a regular basis, at least three days each week. A range of other benefits are also available to enhance flexibility as needs change. No matter where you are, you’ll have tools and resources to engage meaningfully with your global colleagues.",3.9,Morningstar,"Chicago, IL",5001 to 10000 Employees,1984.0,Company - Public,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,IL,40.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$108K
/yr","Feedzai is the world's first RiskOps platform for financial risk management, and the market leader in safeguarding global commerce with today's most advanced cloud-based risk management platform, powered by machine learning and artificial intelligence. Feedzai is securing the transition to a cashless world while enabling digital trust in every transaction and payment type. The world's largest banks, processors, and retailers trust Feedzai to protect trillions of dollars and manage risk while improving the customer experience for everyday users, without compromising privacy. Feedzai is a Series D company and has raised $282M to date. With a valuation of +$1.5B, the company's technology protects 900 million people in 190 countries.
The Data Science Team within Customer Success is highly engaged with our clients making use of their critical thinking skills with a business-focused mentality and customer-facing attitude. They activate, maintain, and support clients, develop models and rules, and train & enable them. In addition, they work cross-functionally with other departments (e.g., Research, Product, Marketing) in a collaborative team spirit spanning the globe to ensure we deliver best in class risk prevention solutions. Being on the frontline of fighting crime and protecting people from financial harm is incredibly inspiring to each of us. Join Us!
Your Day to Day:
Understanding the data which our clients provide to us;
Cleaning that data and validating that it is correct;
Preprocessing the data, usually by using a mixture of shell scripts and a programming language such as Python, Java, Scala, etc
Iteratively computing features and tuning parameters to improve the quality of the model;
Communicating your findings to the project manager and assisting him/her in decision making on the Data Science part of the project;
Work together with key stakeholders (data scientists, engineers, risk managers) from our clients;
Work with other parts of the organization (Product, Research, etc.) to improve processes, best practices and tooling.
You Have & You Know-how:
MSc or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related field;
We welcome candidates with a minimum of 2 years of experience, ranging up to senior-level professionals;
Proficient in Machine Learning (training and testing, avoiding overfit, etc.);
Knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Spark, Hadoop and related;
Proficiency in bash, Python and either Java or Scala;
Knowledge of resource monitoring and runtime optimization (both at JVM and OS level);
Knowledge of statistics or data visualization is a plus;
Knowledge of tree based algorithms (Random Forests, XGBoost, LGBM) is a plus;
Knowledge of Deep Learning algorithms is a plus;
Ability to communicate your findings in a clear way.
The Customer Success Team is responsible for delivering our product to our clients. This includes education, configuration, solution development, and risk strategy to enable our clients to address their pain points. We collaborate with our clients to ensure they have the right solution, build out a strategy and training plan for them, and then support them through each phase of our client lifecycle. We grow at a fast clip and believe no challenge is too big or too small. Therefore, we have an open environment that encourages us to lean in, try new things, and discover our potential. Join Us!
#LI-IP1 #LI-Hybrid
Your First 30-Days at Feedzai:
You will be immersed in our brand with training, connections, and one-on-one time with your manager. You may shadow your colleagues virtually or onsite at an office depending on where you work as you are supported through your Feedzai journey. In addition, you will have access to a ton of information to give you history, context, and all the knowledge you can handle about Feedzai and the team. Finally, you will start working on projects and collaborating on work currently being done. We can't wait to have you join the team!
Life at Feedzai Instagram
Feedzai Culture
Feedzai is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Feedzai does not accept unsolicited resumes from recruiters or employment agencies.
Feedzai will use the personal data you provide us with by filling out this form for reviewing your application and to potentially negotiate a contract with you. Your personal data will be retained by Feedzai for 24 months following your application. Please see our Privacy Notice available at https://feedzai.com/about-us/privacy/ for more information on how we process your personal data.",3.1,Feedzai,"Atlanta, GA",501 to 1000 Employees,2011.0,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,108.0,GA,13.0,1,0,1,0,0
Data Scientist,"$127K
/yr","Our vision is to transform how the world uses information to enrich life for all.
Micron Technology is a world leader in innovating memory and storage solutions that accelerate the transformation of information into intelligence, inspiring the world to learn, communicate and advance faster than ever.
As a Data Scientist at Micron Technologies, you will play a crucial role in analyzing and extracting valuable insights from large datasets related to semiconductor manufacturing, process optimization, and quality control. You'll collaborate with multi-functional teams to develop innovative solutions that improve product performance, yield, and reliability.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Data Analysis: Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) on semiconductor manufacturing data, including wafer fabrication, yield, and defect rates.
Model Development: Develop predictive models using machine learning techniques (such as regression, classification, and clustering) to optimize manufacturing processes and improve product quality.
Feature Engineering: Extract relevant features from raw data, considering factors like material properties, process parameters, and environmental conditions.
Anomaly Detection: Identify anomalies and outliers in semiconductor production data, suggesting corrective actions to improve yield.
Collaboration: Work closely with engineers, physicists, and domain experts to understand semiconductor processes and translate business requirements into data-driven solutions.
Visualization: Build clear and informative visualizations to communicate findings and insights to collaborators.
Continuous Improvement: Stay up to date with industry trends, research advancements, and emerging technologies in data science and semiconductor manufacturing.
QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
Master’s or Ph.D. in Data Analytics, Data Science, or related field with practical experience with Virtual Metrology, AI, process control, yield improvement, quality control, semiconductor process engineering, image analytics, or related semiconductor field focus.
EXPERIENCE
Prior experience in semiconductor manufacturing, yield optimization, or process control is highly desirable.
Technical Skills:
Proficiency in Python,
Strong knowledge of machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques.
Familiarity with web application and reporting, Experience with SQL and database management
Technologies:
ML frameworks: Decision trees, Clustering, Regression, Neural Networks, NLP, Pytorch, Big Data, Tensorflow, Pandas, Streamlit
Tools and technologies:
Docker, Containerization, Kubernetes, Jenkins, Ansible, Elasticsearch, SSL, Microservices, data visualization tools (e.g., Streamlit, Tableau, PowerBI, etc.).
Cloud expertise:
Google Cloud Platform, OpenShift Container Platform
AI Skills:
AI specialization and Virtual Metrology/Modeling/Computation:
Python library sklearn, xgboost, pycaret, etc. with the ability to learn any new package.
Knowledgeable with the general process of data science work like data extraction, feature extraction, feature selection and modeling.
Familiar with the skills to deal with time series data (feature extraction, modelling, similarity measure of time series).
Image specialization:
Familiar with deep learning network CNN and package keras.
Frontend:
Languages: HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Typescript
Frameworks/Libraries: Angular, HighCharts, Plotly, AG Grid, BootStrap, Ngx Bootstrap, RxJS
Packaging: npm, Jenkins
Backend/API:
Languages: Python,
Preferred, but not required: Java, C#, PHP, Perl, C++
Frameworks: Flask, FastAPI, Experience with RESTful APIs, Minor experience with WSLs
Databases: MySQL, MSSQL, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, BigQuery SQL, Snowflake SQL, basic understanding of SSL
Tools:
Git, Bitbucket
Soft Skills:
Analytical approach and problem-solving abilities.
Strong communication skills to work effectively with teams from various functions.
Adaptability and willingness to learn new technologies and methodologies.
Project Skills:
AGILE, Waterfall, Scrum, Software Development Lifecycle, JIRA, Change management, Release management, Configuration management
Schedule: Ability to conduct and/or attend meetings when needed in the evening.
As a world leader in the semiconductor industry, Micron is dedicated to your personal wellbeing and professional growth. Micron benefits are designed to help you stay well, provide peace of mind and help you prepare for the future. We offer a choice of medical, dental and vision plans in all locations enabling team members to select the plans that best meet their family healthcare needs and budget. Micron also provides benefit programs that help protect your income if you are unable to work due to illness or injury, and paid family leave. Additionally, Micron benefits include a robust paid time-off program and paid holidays. For additional information regarding the Benefit programs available, please see the Benefits Guide posted on micron.com/careers/benefits.
Micron is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other factor protected by applicable federal, state, or local laws.
To learn about your right to work click here.
To learn more about Micron, please visit micron.com/careers
For US Sites Only: To request assistance with the application process and/or for reasonable accommodations, please contact Micron’s People Organization at hrsupport_na@micron.com or 1-800-336-8918 (select option #3)
Micron Prohibits the use of child labor and complies with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and other international and industry labor standards.
Micron does not charge candidates any recruitment fees or unlawfully collect any other payment from candidates as consideration for their employment with Micron.",3.8,Micron,"Manassas, VA",10000+ Employees,1978.0,Company - Public,Computer Hardware Development,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,127.0,VA,46.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$113K
/yr","The CDC Foundation helps the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) save and improve lives by unleashing the power of collaboration between CDC, philanthropies, corporations, organizations and individuals to protect the health, safety and security of America and the world. The CDC Foundation is the go-to nonprofit authorized by Congress to mobilize philanthropic partners and private-sector resources to support CDC’s critical health protection mission. Since 1995, the CDC Foundation has raised over $1.9 billion and launched more than 1,300 programs impacting a variety of health threats from chronic disease conditions including cardiovascular disease and cancer, to infectious diseases like rotavirus and HIV, to emergency responses, including COVID-19 and Ebola. The CDC Foundation managed hundreds of programs in the United States and in more than 90 countries last year. Visit www.cdcfoundation.org for more information.

Job Highlights
Location: Remote, must be based in the United States
Salary Range: $92,700-$134,275 per year, plus benefits. Individual salary offers will be based on experience and qualifications unique to each candidate.
Position Type: Grant funded, limited-term opportunity
Position End Date: June 30, 2025
Overview
The Data Scientist will play a crucial role in advancing the CDC Foundation's mission by providing informatics expertise and performing health informatics activities for a public health organization, which require specialized knowledge and skills in both health and information technology, including health informatics, scientific analysis, data management, and security standards. This role is aligned to the Workforce Acceleration Initiative (WAI). WAI is a federally funded CDC Foundation program with the goal of helping the nation’s public health agencies by providing them with the technology and data experts they need to accelerate their information system improvements.

Working within North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office, the Data Scientist will plan and manage the development, implementation, and maintenance of data systems and informatics processes needed for data generation, storage, processing, and analysis. The Data Scientist will collaborate with data content experts, analysts, data scientists, data modelers, warehouse architects, IT staff and other organization staff to design and implement proposed solutions that meet the needs of the public health agency.

The Data Scientist will be hired by the CDC Foundation and assigned to the North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Division Data Modernization Office. This position is eligible for a fully remote work arrangement for U.S. based candidates.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, select, test, implement, and evaluate new or modified informatics solutions, data structures, and decision-support mechanisms to support agency information management needs within various contexts.
Create and manage the systems and pipelines that enable efficient and reliable flow of data, including ingestion, processing, and storage.
Create new and update existing health integration engine (Rhapsody) routes to handle new data elements and formats creating the necessary output for upload into surveillance systems and databases as well as reporting to the CDC.
Develop, implement, and improve data analysis and visualization tools for use by organization staff, to provide timely, relevant information that informs decisions affecting the public’s health.
Analyze diverse datasets related to public health issues to identify trends, patterns, and correlations.
Apply statistical methods and machine learning algorithms to extract actionable insights.
Develop predictive models to anticipate disease patterns, assess risk factors, and guide intervention strategies.
Continuously optimize algorithms for enhanced accuracy and performance.
Create compelling visualizations and reports to communicate findings to partners and decision-makers.
Present data-driven insights in a clear and understandable manner to facilitate informed decision-making.
Collaborate with the public health organization and its partners to understand their data needs and objectives.
Provide data-driven support and guidance to inform public health policies and initiatives.
Knowledgeable about industry trends, best practices, and emerging technologies in informatics and data management, and incorporating the trends into the organization's data infrastructure.
Provide technical guidance to other staff.
Prepare and maintain system documentation and architecture diagrams for processes assigned (new and existing).
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Informatics, Computer Science, Information Technology, Data Science, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of relevant professional experience
Proficiency in programming languages commonly used in data engineering, such as Python, Java, Scala, or SQL. Candidate should be able to implement data automations within existing frameworks as opposed to writing one off scripts.
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Scikit-learn).
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Power BI).
Strong analytical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to interpret complex datasets and derive meaningful insights.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Expertise with Rhapsody Integration Engine (Rhapsody Certification or ability to obtain certification preferred)
Experience with multiple health data types (i.e. HL7, ELR, eCR, FHIR)
Solid understanding of API-based architectures (including FHIR)
Ability to convey technical concepts to non-technical partners effectively.
Flexibility to adapt to evolving project requirements and priorities.
Professional certifications in data science, machine learning, or public health analytics preferred.
Outstanding interpersonal and teamwork skills; collegial; energetic; and able to develop productive relationships with colleagues, partners, and partners.
Demonstrated ability to work well independently and within teams
Experience working in a virtual environment with remote partners and teams
Proficiency in Microsoft Office.
Special Notes
This role is involved in a dynamic public health program. As such, roles and responsibilities are subject to change as situations evolve. Roles and responsibilities listed above may be expanded upon or updated to match priorities and needs, once written approval is received by the CDC Foundation in order to best support the public health programming.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, mental or physical disabilities, veteran status, and all other characteristics protected by law.

We comply with all applicable laws including E.O. 11246 and the Vietnam Era Readjustment Assistance Act of 1974 governing employment practices and do not discriminate on the basis of any unlawful criteria in accordance with 41 C.F.R. §§ 60-300.5(a)(12) and 60-741.5(a)(7). As a federal government contractor, we take affirmative action on behalf of protected veterans.

The CDC Foundation is a smoke-free environment.
Relocation expenses are not included.",4.3,CDC Foundation,North Dakota,1001 to 5000 Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,Civic & Social Services,Nonprofit & NGO,$25 to $100 million (USD),0,1,113.0,North Dakota,,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$105K
/yr","Position Details
Position Details
Job Title
Data Scientist

Position Number
8150736

Job Category
University Staff

Job Type
Full-Time

FLSA Status
Exempt

Campus
Maywood-Health Sciences Campus

Department Name
PHYSIOLOGY

Location Code
PHYSIOLOGY (06240A)

Is this split and/or fully grant funded?
Yes

Duties and Responsibilities
The Data Scientist will perform detailed analyses of large bodies of heterogeneous omics and clinical data to discover new patterns and insights that impact patient health or augment human capabilities. The Data Scientist should have deep expertise in the methods used to analyze data and deep knowledge of data types, topics, and scientific challenges and approaches that will be used to help inform and define new products, experiences, and technologies. This position works in conjunction with basic and clinical scientists to create intelligence-driven systems to solve complex translational problems.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Participates in multidisciplinary teams to design, develop, and recommend new approaches for data-driven decision-making.
Leads discovery processes on pioneering Artificial Intelligence (“AI"")/Machine Learning (“ML”) based approaches to solve complex data problems across a variety of domains.
Provides strategic direction regarding data science and AI.
Guides and educates basic science and clinical teams to provide unbiased and accurate information, analysis, consultation, and recommendations to support strategic and operational data science initiatives.
Develops analytics tools that can be used by other staff with non-technical expertise.
Supports scientific projects under the supervision of the principal investigator.
Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis.


Minimum Education and/or Work Experience
Bachelor’s degree in related field required

Qualifications
BS, the position would not necessarily require a PhD, as considerable experience in the field would be acceptable.

Certificates/Credentials/Licenses
N/A

Computer Skills
Office Suite skills, AI/Machine Learning based approaches. Designs, develops, applies, and modifies scripts or software applications to support data management, extraction, and analysis

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Required operation of university owned vehicles
No

Does this position require direct animal or patient contact?
No

Physical Demands
None

Working Conditions
None

Open Date
10/01/2024

Close Date

Special Instructions to Applicants

Diversity and Inclusion Statement
Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion

As one of the nation’s largest Jesuit, Catholic universities, Loyola University Chicago fosters a transformative cultural experience that honors diversity, equity, and inclusion. We are committed to not only recruiting, but also retaining a diverse, mission driven workforce and enabling a culture of inclusiveness in an environment that values service excellence, stewardship, personal well-being, and professional development for all of our employees. Loyola University Chicago supports its staff and faculty with a wide array of affordable, comprehensive and competitive benefits centered on health and wellness, financial security, equity, and work-life balance. We actively seek those who wish to join our faculty, staff, and students in a community of diverse opinions, perspectives, and backgrounds supporting our Jesuit mission and striving toward the same goal of being persons for and with others.


Quick Link for Posting
https://www.careers.luc.edu/postings/29300",3.8,Loyola University Chicago,"Maywood, IL",1001 to 5000 Employees,1870.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,105.0,IL,154.0,0,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist, Product Analytics","$175K
/yr","As a Data Scientist at Meta, you will shape the future of people-facing and business-facing products we build across our entire family of applications (Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, WhatsApp, Oculus). By applying your technical skills, analytical mindset, and product intuition to one of the richest data sets in the world, you will help define the experiences we build for billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses around the world. You will collaborate on a wide array of product and business problems with a diverse set of cross-functional partners across Product, Engineering, Research, Data Engineering, Marketing, Sales, Finance and others. You will use data and analysis to identify and solve product development’s biggest challenges. You will influence product strategy and investment decisions with data, be focused on impact, and collaborate with other teams. By joining Meta, you will become part of a world-class analytics community dedicated to skill development and career growth in analytics and beyond.Product leadership: You will use data to shape product development, quantify new opportunities, identify upcoming challenges, and ensure the products we build bring value to people, businesses, and Meta. You will help your partner teams prioritize what to build, set goals, and understand their product’s ecosystem.Analytics: You will guide teams using data and insights. You will focus on developing hypotheses and employ a diverse toolkit of rigorous analytical approaches, different methodologies, frameworks, and technical approaches to test them.Communication and influence: You won’t simply present data, but tell data-driven stories. You will convince and influence your partners using clear insights and recommendations. You will build credibility through structure and clarity, and be a trusted strategic partner.


Data Scientist, Product Analytics Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex data sets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches.
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our products that serve billions of people and hundreds of millions of businesses.
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends.
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations.
Partner with Product, Engineering, and cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions.



Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, a relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
A minimum of 4 years of work experience in analytics (minimum of 2 years with a Ph.D.)
Experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), and/or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R)
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, relevant technical field, or equivalent practical experience.



Preferred Qualifications:
Masters or Ph.D. Degree in a quantitative field.



About Meta:
Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.


Meta is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. Meta participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law. Please note that Meta may leverage artificial intelligence and machine learning technologies in connection with applications for employment.

Meta is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.

$145,000/year to $204,000/year + bonus + equity + benefits

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about benefits at Meta.",4.0,Meta,Remote,10000+ Employees,2004.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,175.0,Remote,20.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$93K
/yr","Job Overview:
Graham Tech is seeking a skilled and experienced Data Scientist to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing a set of techniques and analytics applications that transform raw data into meaningful insights, supporting strategic decision-making processes. This role will require proficiency in data-oriented programming languages, visualization software, and a deep understanding of data mining, data modeling, natural language processing, and machine learning.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and implement data-driven techniques and analytics applications to transform raw data into actionable insights.
Apply advanced data mining, data modeling, natural language processing (NLP), and machine learning (ML) techniques to extract and analyze large structured and unstructured datasets.
Visualize data findings using cutting-edge visualization tools, ensuring that data is presented clearly and effectively to stakeholders.
Interpret and report data analysis results, providing insights to inform decision-making processes.
Create and maintain dynamic data reports that offer real-time insights for business needs.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and implement strategies that leverage data analysis to solve complex business challenges.
Work independently to perform all functional duties and responsibilities in a fast-paced, results-driven environment.
Requirements:
Experience: 3-10 years of experience in data science, analytics, or a related field.
Education: BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field.
Technical Skills: Proficiency in data-oriented programming languages (e.g., Python, R, SQL) and visualization software (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, D3.js).
Strong expertise in data mining, data modeling, NLP, and ML techniques.
Experience working with large datasets, both structured and unstructured.
Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI (Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information) clearance required.
Additional Qualifications:
Strong analytical, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to present technical findings to non-technical stakeholders.
Ability to work independently and manage multiple projects in a high-pressure environment.
Compensation:
At Graham Technologies, we believe in treating every person the way we want to be treated - fairly. Our compensation package ensures everyone at Graham Technologies is given equal pay for equal work - regardless of race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, disability, religion, age, nationality, or even negotiation skills!
Most IT companies can probably offer many of the same services, but what sets us apart from the others is truly our people! We care about our employees and show it often with sincere appreciation and acknowledgment of not only the final work products but also the little steps taken along the way! In addition, our generous benefits package helps our team members live well and prosper.
Here are just a few highlights:
Four Week's Accrued PTO First Year
Ten Paid Federal Holidays
Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance
401(k) Plan with Annual Employer Contributions
Flexible Schedules
Reimbursements for Continued Education and Training

Why Graham Technologies?
Our Core Values say it all!
Value our Customers
Care about our Employees
Passionate about Innovation
Believe in a Strong Work Ethic
Rely on Teamwork
Integrity Matters

Founded in 2007, GTech is a consulting services firm zealous about providing the best solutions to address our client's needs and maximize the value of their investments. One way we do this is by providing exceptional employees for our clients-whose range of expertise expands the entire IT industry! We've cultivated a family of individuals where integrity, commitment, and reliability are etched into the heart of our delivery teams.
In addition, we are equally zealous about caring for our employees - the lifeblood of our business! We've purposefully created a culture that is friendly, family-oriented, and all-inclusive. Our team members are encouraged to ""have a life,"" both in and out of the office, through flexible schedules (where available), continuing education, and support to pursue their passions!",4.4,Graham Technologies,"Tampa, FL",51 to 200 Employees,2007.0,Company - Private,Information Technology Support Services,Information Technology,$5 to $25 million (USD),0,1,93.0,FL,17.0,1,0,0,0,1
"Data Scientist III, Analytics","$179K
/yr","Expedia Group brands power global travel for everyone, everywhere. We design cutting-edge tech to make travel smoother and more memorable, and we create groundbreaking solutions for our partners. Our diverse, vibrant, and welcoming community is essential in driving our success.
Why Join Us?
To shape the future of travel, people must come first. Guided by our Values and Leadership Agreements, we foster an open culture where everyone belongs, differences are celebrated and know that when one of us wins, we all win.
We provide a full benefits package, including exciting travel perks, generous time-off, parental leave, a global hybrid work setup (with some pretty cool offices), and career development resources, all to fuel our employees' passion for travel and ensure a rewarding career journey. We’re building a more open world. Join us.
Data Scientist III, Analytics
Are you excited by the opportunity to pioneer the future of travel? Do you want to redefine the way people plan, search for, and book their travel? At Expedia Group, we believe that travel brings the world together, and we are passionate about the endless possibilities.
The InsurTech team at Expedia is responsible for managing the InsurTech P&L and driving its strategy and business development efforts across the Expedia Group globally. We deliver millions of dollars of incremental revenue making a direct and meaningful impact to the company's bottom-line. At the same time, we increase customers’ confidence to book travel and make difference in their lives.
Introduction to team
This role is an excellent opportunity to join the InsurTech Analytics Team where we are passionate about delivering outstanding user experience! We power and deliver product analytics, user behavior analysis, experimentation, and visualization services that enable highly tailored and optimized experiences using the scientific methods and applied insights. We’re looking for a highly motivated individual to join our team to help us formulate business strategy and to deliver impactful analytics insights. If you enjoy using data to build business cases, solve business problems, improve ongoing business activities, and to work on a team that functions as the “business owner” you will fit right in. In this role, you will use your analytical and business skills to inspire product, engineering, finance and customer support, and our strategic partners to prioritize, implement and scale our product ideas
In this role, you will:
Provide strategic analysis and insights for the InsurTech business, while actively looking for opportunities to grow the business
Own end to end process in evaluating A/B or multivariate tests to improve learning; proactively uncover opportunities and recommend new features for test and learn; evaluate and apply alternative methods to supplement randomized testing
Performs advanced statistical analyses on experimental data to identify trends and derive actionable insights
Apply your expertise in data modeling, quantitative analysis, data mining, data visualization with a goal of improving customer experience and business results with a religious focus on impactful analytics, steward product team to drive insights
A high performing individual contributor who consistently applies and enhances the analytics capabilities, best practices and processes to solve complex business issues and identify opportunities
Function independently, assessing existing and upcoming business needs
Works with data engineers to ensure best practices are implemented through experimentation platform
Effectively communicates statistical findings and insights to stakeholders and collaborate with product development teams to integrate statistical insights into decision-making
Experience and qualifications:
Bachelor's, Masters or PhD degree in Mathematics, Science, Statistics, Engineering or 5+ years’ data analytics experience in a business context
Strong analytical/modeling skills with ability to convert raw data into measurable insights
Able to structure / work on data exploration problems, with innovative ways and solutions, bringing to bear strong reporting and data visualization skills
Strong hands-on experience in SQL
Proficient in building data visualizations (Tableau, Looker, etc.)
Intermediate (or better) knowledge of Statistics
Experience with R, python, or other coding language a plus
Experience with web analytics tools such as Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics a plus
Experience in modeling selection, building and evaluation
The total cash range for this position in Seattle is $137,500.00 to $192,500.00. Employees in this role have the potential to increase their pay up to $220,000.00, which is the top of the range, based on ongoing, demonstrated, and sustained performance in the role.
Starting pay for this role will vary based on multiple factors, including location, available budget, and an individual’s knowledge, skills, and experience. Pay ranges may be modified in the future.
Accommodation requests
If you need assistance with any part of the application or recruiting process due to a disability, or other physical or mental health conditions, please reach out to our Recruiting Accommodations Team through the Accommodation Request.
We are proud to be named as a Best Place to Work on Glassdoor in 2024 and be recognized for award-winning culture by organizations like Forbes, TIME, Disability:IN, and others.
Expedia Group's family of brands includes: Brand Expedia®, Hotels.com®, Expedia® Partner Solutions, Vrbo®, trivago®, Orbitz®, Travelocity®, Hotwire®, Wotif®, ebookers®, CheapTickets®, Expedia Group™ Media Solutions, Expedia Local Expert®, CarRentals.com™, and Expedia Cruises™. © 2024 Expedia, Inc. All rights reserved. Trademarks and logos are the property of their respective owners. CST: 2029030-50
Employment opportunities and job offers at Expedia Group will always come from Expedia Group’s Talent Acquisition and hiring teams. Never provide sensitive, personal information to someone unless you’re confident who the recipient is. Expedia Group does not extend job offers via email or any other messaging tools to individuals with whom we have not made prior contact. Our email domain is @expediagroup.com. The official website to find and apply for job openings at Expedia Group is careers.expediagroup.com/jobs.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. This employer participates in E-Verify. The employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.8,Expedia Partner Solutions,"Seattle, WA",10000+ Employees,1996.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),0,1,179.0,WA,28.0,1,0,0,0,1
Data Scientist / Data Resource Analyst II,"$78K
/yr","International Studies and Programs (ISP) supports MSU global learning and international engagement under the MSU Strategic Plan 2030 in the areas of research, teaching, and outreach. To fulfill its main objectives, ISP communicates key international data to university leadership and the public and serve as a campus-wide analytical resource. ISP manages MSU’s International Data Portals, which provide visualizations of MSU's Externally Funded International Projects, International Student Enrollment, Education Abroad, International Agreements Data, and International Research Collaboration. These dashboards utilize Tableau, Tableau Prep, and SQL Oracle to draw from MSU’s electronic data warehouse (EDW). International Studies and Programs (ISP) collaborates with units across campus to streamline and upgrade the international data plan.
ISP is seeking a Data Scientist who is curious, creative, and can see both the big picture and work with attention to detail. The successful candidate will have strong technical, interpersonal and communication skills to convey findings to various audiences and positively influence university leadership. The Data Scientist will need to articulate complex issues to a non-technical audience clearly and effectively. Daily activities may include development of data representations and visualizations, advising on predictive models and creating easy to understand reports and dashboards. This will be a full-time (100% FTE) 12-month fixed-term position funded for one year with the possibility of reappointments depending on funding and performance.
ISP is currently operating under a hybrid modality structure, with staff working three days in person and two days remote. ISP values individual and group differences and encourages applicants who will contribute to a culture of inclusion on campus.
Primary responsibilities include:
Data Analysis and Reporting
Analyze, interpret, summarize, and present data and findings in a clear, comprehensive, and effective manner
Conduct internal and external benchmarking analysis for ISP
Develop and design reports and dashboards in Tableau
Support Data-Driven Decision Making
Consult with and support ISP leadership and units by pulling and analyzing data
With ISP leadership, collaborate with other campus units on communicating, building, and evaluating data tools and streamlining data reporting
Provide analysis and decision support for university international initiatives, projects, and planning as needed
Provide training/capacity development support for ISP units in various data-related topics
Represent ISP on university-wide data-related committees
Keep apprised of trends and conversations about data in higher education and international education
Database Management and Development
Build custom SQL to meet reporting requirements and manage ISP International Data Portals
Perform query tuning and root cause analysis to optimize database performance and correct errors
Develop SQL to create database tables, views, and stored procedures to support data storage and report development
Provide targeted training on tools and platforms when necessary
Minimum Requirements
Master’s degree in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field including other degrees with a strong quantitative emphasis
Three to five years of post-graduate work experience in data mining, data warehousing, data science, data management, as well as data analysis and visualization
Experience writing advanced SQL queries; expertise with Oracle PL/SQL, expertise with Tableau
Experience using data retrieval and manipulation, and expertise in statistical tools (such as SAS, SQL, STATA, R, D3, Python) and data visualization tools (such as Tableau and Tableau Prep)
Demonstrated success in managing collaborative projects involving cross-functional and interdisciplinary teams
Excellent communication skills including presenting, editing, and writing, as well as ability to demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy
Desired Qualifications
Doctorate in statistics, computational science, a social science discipline, or related field with a strong quantitative emphasis
Proven excellence in program or project management
Experience working in a university setting and in-depth knowledge of university administrative organization, policies, procedures, and practices for institutional research-oriented roles
Experience managing higher education related data (student, research, business support systems)
Understanding of data warehouse technologies (Oracle preferred) and familiarity with data integration processes using enterprise ETL tools (DataStage preferred) and the role of data stewardship
Ability to model and analyze data in statistical tools (SPSS, R, SAS, Python, or similar) combined with experience integrating large datasets from a variety of sources; experience with ETL tools (DataStage, Informatica)
Ability to work closely with clients to build custom dashboards, conduct data analysis to support ISP centers and other units, as well as develop and streamline data reporting
Make data-informed recommendations to administrators to contribute to decision making
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship, age, disability or protected veteran status.
Required Application Materials
Resume and cover letter
Work Hours
STANDARD 8-5
Description of End Date
one year from date of hire
Website
https://www.isp.msu.edu/
Bidding eligibility ends October 22, 2024 at 11:55 P.M.",4.3,Michigan State University,"East Lansing, MI",10000+ Employees,1855.0,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,78.0,MI,169.0,1,0,0,0,1
Senior Data Scientist,"$114K
/yr","Careers Category: Data, Analytics & User Research
Careers location: Remote, US; Remote, Canada
Connected Worker Type: Connected
Requisition Id: R_113619
ABOUT US
Zynga is a leading developer of the world's most popular social games that are played by millions of people around the world each day. Since our founding in 2007, our mission has been to connect the world through games and delight consumers with social gaming experiences.
OUR TEAM
Zynga’s Applied AI group focuses on developing innovative ways to tackle problems within the game development process, demonstrating directly the ways that AI can improve the creativity and productivity of team members across Zynga. Our team is multi-disciplinary, and includes Engineers, Data Scientists and Product Managers among others. We build cloud-based tools and technologies to support every aspect of the development process, from concept development through to LiveOps and publishing operations.
To be successful in this role you should have curiosity about the areas of Game Development, Artificial Intelligence and Computational Creativity, be a proactive learner, have good depth in technical skills, and a strong desire to build high quality software that delivers value and efficiency.
KEY ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Write well-crafted, efficient and testable code and algorithms
Design and build AI systems that solve computational creativity challenges
Implement and deploy solutions as part of a larger microservice architecture
Plan and implement tasks of small to medium scale independently
Excellent communication skills and comfort working in a collaborative inter-discipline environment
DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Ph.D. or M.S. in Computer Science with specialization in AI, or equivalent experience
Experience building AI systems for games, procedural content generation, or computational creativity
Understanding of principles of AI, including ML
Familiarity with principles of game design and implementation
Familiarity with Python, and at least one of Typescript, C++, or Unity C#
Familiarity with containers and cloud infrastructure principles – AWS preferred
Desire to learn and share knowledge with peers, collaborate in a cross-functional team
WHAT WE OFFER YOU
Competitive salary, bonus plan and ESPP (Employee Stock Purchase Plan)
401K Company Match Contribution (US)
RRSP/DPSP company match contribution (Canada)
Health coverage, dental, disability, critical illness, EAP, and life insurance (Canada)
Medical, dental, vision, EAP, life insurance, and disability benefits (US)
Virtual mental health and neurodiversity support programs
Global Fitness reimbursement program
Global Wellbeing Program
Financial wellness program with unlimited access to certified financial planners
Discretionary Time Off policy for many employees
Family planning support program
Generous paid parental, pregnancy-related disability, caregiver, and compassionate leaves
Zynga happy hours and frequent employee events
Flexible working hours on many teams
Culture of diversity and inclusion including employee resource groups
Work with cool people and impact millions of daily player
This is a fully remote role that may be based anywhere in the United States. Below are the expected salary and wage ranges for applicants based in locations where the pay transparency law is in effect:
Colorado: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
California: $87,400 and $129,340 per year
New York State (inclusive of New York City): $98,400 and $145,620 per year
Washington: $82,600 and $122,320 per year
Base pay offered is based on market location, and may vary further depending on individualized factors for job candidates, such as job-related knowledge, skills, experience, and other objective business considerations. Subject to those same considerations, the total compensation package for this position may also include other elements, including a bonus and/or equity awards and eligibility to participate in our 401(K) plan, in addition to a full range of medical, dental, vision, and basic life insurance. Employees will also receive 16 paid holidays per calendar year, unlimited discretionary time off, and will receive up to 6.5 sick days per calendar year. Details of participation in these benefit plans will be provided if an employee receives an offer of employment. If hired, employee will be in an “at-will position” and the company reserves the right to modify base salary (as well as any other discretionary payment or compensation or benefit program) at any time, including for reasons related to individual performance, company or individual department/team performance, and market factors.
#LI-RK2
Zynga does not engage in financial exchanges during the recruitment or onboarding process. We do not conduct job interviews over third-party messaging apps such as Telegram, WhatsApp or others. We will never ask you for your personal or financial information over unofficial chat channels. Our in-house recruitment team only contacts individuals via official company email addresses (i.e., via a zynga.com or naturalmotion.com email domain).
If you believe you have been the victim of a scam, you may wish to contact the authorities. In the United States, you may file a complaint with the FBI. More information is available here: https://www.ic3.gov.",4.2,Zynga,United States,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007.0,Company - Public,Video Game Publishing,Media & Communication,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),0,1,114.0,United States,17.0,1,0,0,1,1
Data Scientist,"$99K
/yr","Type: Description:
Position: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
Duration: 12 months +
Job Description
Minimum Qualifications:
Have image processing background and a good understanding on image quality
Experience in data science and analytics, including statistical data analysis.
Strong programming skills, including python and Linux scripting for data processing and tool development.
B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or related areas.
Good communication skill and positive working attitude
Expect to be self-motivated, proactive, and solution-oriented
Preferred Qualifications:
Hands-on experience with data batch processing and handling
Experience with deep learning network model training and inferencing
3 years of relevant work experience
Please send your resumes to gjose@sisinc.com (Max 3-4 pages)
Location San Diego , CA Min Experience (yrs): Required Education: Not Specified Benefits:",4.1,SIS,"San Diego, CA",201 to 500 Employees,1987.0,Company - Private,Film Production,Media & Communication,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,99.0,CA,37.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$88K
/yr","Position Description:

Mathematica applies expertise at the intersection of data, methods, policy, and practice to improve well-being around the world. We collaborate closely with public- and private-sector partners to translate big questions into deep insights that improve programs, refine strategies, and enhance understanding. Our work yields actionable information to guide decisions in wide-ranging policy areas, from health, education, early childhood, and family support to nutrition, employment, disability, and international development. Mathematica offers our employees competitive salaries, and a comprehensive benefits package, as well as the advantages of being 100 percent employee owned. As an employee stock owner, you will experience financial benefits of ESOP holdings that have increased in tandem with the company’s growth and financial strength. You will also be part of an independent, employee-owned firm that is able to define and further our mission, enhance our quality and accountability, and steadily grow our financial strength. Learn more about our benefits here.
At Mathematica, we take pride in our commitment to diversity. Building an inclusive culture that draws on the individual strengths of employees from different ethnic backgrounds, cultures, lifestyles, abilities, and experience is key to our success.
We are looking for a Data Scientist to lead and support data processing and analysis tasks, such as building data pipelines, monitoring data quality, developing documentation, applying statistical and data science methods, and creating data visualizations. Our junior data scientists underpin our company's core offerings in program improvement and data science, which yield crucial evidence and information for policy and decision makers. This position will either work remotely or flexibly in one of our office locations.
This position focuses on health policy, which includes projects such as:
Enhancing knowledge management and library curation across all VRDC projects by developing Python scripts that leverage large language models for automated document classification.
Monitoring the impacts of an alternative payment model for primary care in terms of care quality, cost, and health outcomes for diverse beneficiaries, using claims from thousands of primary care practices across the country and predicting future hospital costs and behavior.
Developing and testing how claims and survey data from federal and state-level programs could be used to measure patients’ experience of care, quality of life, care coordination, and long-term outcomes for beneficiaries enrolled in both Medicare and Medicaid.
Creating an interactive data visualization tool to help local policy and decision makers understand how social determinants of health are related to health outcomes in their county, using open-source data from public agencies and non-profits.
Specifically, this Data Scientist contributes to team-based projects by:
Co-developing analysis plans with a senior data scientist or researcher
Writing and maintaining programming systems in languages such as Python and R to obtain, combine, and transform datasets on cloud, internal, and client servers
Developing and maintaining documentation
Implementing quality assurance practices, such as version control and testing
Conducting analysis and communicating results, both to clients and internal teams, such as descriptive statistics, data visualizations, and model diagnostics
Leading and managing small teams and tasks with oversight from a senior staff member
Position Requirements:

Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree, with an academic record including courses in subjects such as statistics, data science, data analytics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, and/or social science; equivalent years of experience can be substituted
Demonstrated interest and/or experience using programming and data science and/or statistics to contribute to projects with a policy/social impact in academic and/or professional settings
At least three years of experience performing data cleaning and analysis using programming languages such as R, Python, or Julia in the academic, extra-curricular, or professional environment
Experience executing data science and statistics techniques including regression modeling, machine learning algorithms, network analysis, or natural language processing
Ability and desire to work independently as part of an interdisciplinary team that may be geographically dispersed. This includes being able to learn from and apply resources such as self-guided tutorials, package documentation, and academic articles and willingness to constantly learn and contribute to knowledge sharing with team members.
Experience with reproducible research principles, version control, interactive visualizations, and common packages/libraries for supporting data science work in R, Python, and/or Julia (e.g., tidyverse, R Shiny, R Markdown, pandas, NumPy, scikit-learn, MLJ.jl, DataFrames.jl, and/or Makie.jl).
Desired but not required: experience with healthcare datasets (for example, Medicare or Medicaid claims and enrollment data), production-quality machine learning applications, cloud computing environments, and algorithmic fairness and ethics
This position offers an anticipated annual base salary range of $75,000- $100,000. This position is eligible for a discretionary bonus based on company and individual performance. To apply, please submit a cover letter (optional), resume, code samples, and salary expectations.
Staff in our Health or Human Services units will eventually work with some of our largest clients, including the Centers for Medicaid & Medicare Services (CMS) and other agencies. Most staff working on these contracts will be required to complete a successful background investigation including the Questionnaire for Public Trust Position SF-85 (https://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/sf85p.pdf). Staff that are unable to successfully undergo the background investigation will need to be able to obtain work outside these contracts. Staff will work with their supervisor to get re-staffed, however if they are unable to do so it may result in employment termination due to lack of work.
STAFFING AGENCIES AND THIRD-PARTY RECRUITERS: Mathematica is not accepting candidates for this role or any technical role from staffing agencies or third-party recruiters. Please do not contact technical or senior staff at Mathematica or share unsolicited resumes. All agency inquiries go through the talent acquisition team and will be routed accordingly.
Available Locations: Washington, DC; Princeton, NJ; Remote
#LI-AR1
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Mathematica Policy Research,"Washington, DC",1001 to 5000 Employees,1986.0,Company - Private,Research & Development,Management & Consulting,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,88.0,DC,38.0,1,0,0,1,0
"Data Scientist, Ecommerce - USDS","$192K
/yr","Responsibilities
About TikTok U.S. Data Security
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video. Our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. U.S. Data Security (“USDS”) is a subsidiary of TikTok in the U.S. This new, security-first division was created to bring heightened focus and governance to our data protection policies and content assurance protocols to keep U.S. users safe. Our focus is on providing oversight and protection of the TikTok platform and U.S. user data, so millions of Americans can continue turning to TikTok to learn something new, earn a living, express themselves creatively, or be entertained. The teams within USDS that deliver on this commitment daily span across Trust & Safety, Security & Privacy, Engineering, User & Product Ops, Corporate Functions and more.

Why Join Us
Creation is the core of TikTok's purpose. Our platform is built to help imaginations thrive. This is doubly true of the teams that make TikTok possible.
Together, we inspire creativity and bring joy - a mission we all believe in and aim towards achieving every day.
To us, every challenge, no matter how difficult, is an opportunity; to learn, to innovate, and to grow as one team. Status quo? Never. Courage? Always.
At TikTok, we create together and grow together. That's how we drive impact - for ourselves, our company, and the communities we serve.
Join us.

About the Team
The e-commerce industry has seen tremendous growth in recent years and has become a hotly contested space amongst leading Internet companies, and its future growth cannot be underestimated. With millions of loyal users globally, we believe TikTok is an ideal platform to deliver a brand new and better e-commerce experience to our users. We are looking for passionate and talented people to join our product and operations team, together we can build an e-commerce ecosystem that is innovative, secure and intuitive for our users.

In order to enhance collaboration and cross-functional partnerships, among other things, at this time, our organization follows a hybrid work schedule that requires employees to work in the office 3 days a week, or as directed by their manager/department. We regularly review our hybrid work model, and the specific requirements may change at any time.

Responsibilities:
Work with large and complex datasets to solve a wide array of challenging problems using different analytical and statistical approaches
Apply technical expertise with quantitative analysis, experimentation, data mining, and the presentation of data to develop strategies for our E-commerce product
Identify and measure success of product efforts through goal setting, forecasting, and monitoring of key product metrics to understand trends
Define, understand, and test opportunities and levers to improve the product, and drive roadmaps through your insights and recommendations
Develop data pipelines and dashboards to enhance data infrastructure
Develop ML models to find potential creators, measuring LTV of users, etc
Cooperate with PM/Ops/R&D and other cross-functional teams to inform, influence, support, and execute product strategy and investment decisions
Qualifications
Bachelor degree or above, majoring in mathematics, statistics, computer science is preferred
Proficient in SQL, tableau and familiar with Python or R for modeling project
At least 3 years of working experience in data science, machine learning (experience in E-commerce preferred)
Self-driven, be able to work with cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate and present results of data analyses to stakeholders to drive business impact
TikTok is committed to creating an inclusive space where employees are valued for their skills, experiences, and unique perspectives. Our platform connects people from across the globe and so does our workplace. At TikTok, our mission is to inspire creativity and bring joy. To achieve that goal, we are committed to celebrating our diverse voices and to creating an environment that reflects the many communities we reach. We are passionate about this and hope you are too.

TikTok is committed to providing reasonable accommodations in our recruitment processes for candidates with disabilities, pregnancy, sincerely held religious beliefs or other reasons protected by applicable laws. If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation, please reach out to us at usds.accommodations@tiktokusds.com.

Data Security Statement
This role requires the ability to work with and support systems designed to protect sensitive data and information. As such, this role will be subject to strict national security-related screening.
Job Information
The base salary range for this position in the selected city is $144000 - $240000 annually.



Compensation may vary outside of this range depending on a number of factors, including a candidate’s qualifications, skills, competencies and experience, and location. Base pay is one part of the Total Package that is provided to compensate and recognize employees for their work, and this role may be eligible for additional discretionary bonuses/incentives, and restricted stock units.



Our company benefits are designed to convey company culture and values, to create an efficient and inspiring work environment, and to support our employees to give their best in both work and life. We offer the following benefits to eligible employees:



We cover 100% premium coverage for employee medical insurance, approximately 75% premium coverage for dependents and offer a Health Savings Account(HSA) with a company match. As well as Dental, Vision, Short/Long term Disability, Basic Life, Voluntary Life and AD&D insurance plans. In addition to Flexible Spending Account(FSA) Options like Health Care, Limited Purpose and Dependent Care.



Our time off and leave plans are: 10 paid holidays per year plus 17 days of Paid Personal Time Off (PPTO) (prorated upon hire and increased by tenure) and 10 paid sick days per year as well as 12 weeks of paid Parental leave and 8 weeks of paid Supplemental Disability.



We also provide generous benefits like mental and emotional health benefits through our EAP and Lyra. A 401K company match, gym and cellphone service reimbursements. The Company reserves the right to modify or change these benefits programs at any time, with or without notice.



For Los Angeles County (unincorporated) Candidates:


Qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records will be considered for employment in accordance with all federal, state, and local laws including the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers and the California Fair Chance Act. Our company believes that criminal history may have a direct, adverse and negative relationship on the following job duties, potentially resulting in the withdrawal of the conditional offer of employment:



1. Interacting and occasionally having unsupervised contact with internal/external clients and/or colleagues;



2. Appropriately handling and managing confidential information including proprietary and trade secret information and access to information technology systems; and



3. Exercising sound judgment.",3.2,TikTok,"Mountain View, CA",10000+ Employees,2016.0,Company - Private,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,0,1,192.0,CA,8.0,1,0,0,1,0
Data Scientist,"$164K
/yr","Recipient of the 2023 Exceptional PeopleFirst Workplace Award by IWPL, HelloGov® is an Artificial General Intelligence (AGI) company founded by ex-Machine Learning (ML) Researchers from OpenAI, Google, and the U.S. Department of Defense (DoD), united by our shared patriotism and belief of advancing AI in the U.S. public sector to maintain global competitiveness. We conduct AGI research, solution development, and human capital resourcing with the declared intention of Democratizing AI for the Public Sector™.
HelloGov® was founded on the principles of nurturing our employees’ careers and wellness. We take pride in providing a work-life balance that stems from years of building companies in Silicon Valley. Our founders have pioneered some of the best AI technologies in the market and have always operated with humility and ambition. We operate with an award-winning people first mantra of:
Transparency.
Flexibility.
Work life balance.
Culture of sharing credit.
Empowering every employee, from the shop floor to the top floor.
Good company policies.
Investment in people.
Focus on ergonomics.
Fun traditions.
Benefits (Tier I Health/Vision/Dental insurance, 401K, EAP, Equity, Stipends, Investment in your wellness)
Equality in Compensation (i.e. every team member, from Junior to Executive staff, receives a Sign-On Bonus)
We are seeking a team of Data Scientists with 3+ years of experience in multi-intelligence and multi-domain systems, with a strong background in NLP, computer vision, statistical learning theory, and ML model development. Candidates should be proficient in Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++, and have experience communicating technical concepts to business, technical, and non-technical audiences. This role leverages advanced AI technology set to dominate the market for the next decade, supporting national biodefense through integrated biosurveillance (IB).
Major Duties:
Designs, configures, develops, tests, and supports informatics and data science solutions for a wide array of technical use cases;
Applies analytical methodologies to diagnose data-related challenges, implement solutions, and evaluate performance;
Documents and presents requirements, design alternatives, and findings to team members and clients;
Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships; and
Experience with integrated development environments, data integration, data visualization, data mining, and analysis tools.
Maintains and guides the development of common libraries and tools used by multiple teams.
Aids in formulating a strategy on how to achieve rapid prototyping
Required Skills/Experience:
Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory;
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models;
Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility;
Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models; and
Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations.
LOCATION:
Falls Church, VA (Hybrid)
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATIONS:
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Artificial Intelligence, or related field required (Master's degree preferred).
CLEARANCE:
Top Secret (SCI eligible)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $138,997.00 - $189,983.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
No weekends
Experience:
Natural language processing: 3 years (Required)
AI models: 3 years (Required)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Python, R, Scala, Java, and/or C++: 5 years (Required)
large scale data handling + data mining: 5 years (Required)
GPU Modeling: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
DoD: 10 years (Preferred)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Falls Church, VA 22041",Not listed,HelloGov,"Falls Church, VA",-1,-1.0,-1,-1,-1,-1,0,1,164.0,VA,-1.0,1,0,0,0,0
Data Scientist,"$123K
/yr","Data Management System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for oversight and periodic updating of the Development Data Partnership’s data management system design, including: ingest, pre-processing, storage, provisioning, and access management. With support from unit leadership, the candidate shall coordinate with ITS counterparts who are responsible for efficient and secure implementation of the data management system.

Code and Data Documentation System Design and Coordination. The candidate shall be responsible for maintenance and improvement of our data and code documentation system, which shall utilize industry best practices for metadata, sustainability, efficiency, and usability. The candidate shall be supported by the team for adding content and promoting adoption of the system by Partnership members and the World Bank Data Lab community.

Advisory. The Candidate shall, as needed and with support from the team, provide advisory on the data management system, code and data documentation systems, data, and/or data science and data engineering methods, to World Bank staff and, on occasion, to Development Data Partnership member staff.

Data Science Analytics. The candidate shall, in coordination with team members and hired consultants, lead preparation of reusable code, methods, packages, and libraries for internal World Bank clients and/or grant-funded programs to support wider use of alternative data and data science best practices in international development.

Product Management. The candidate, with support from the team, shall lead the design and implementation of a new front end for our GitHub-based code catalogue, making our data science methods as discoverable and valuable as our data. The candidate will also be responsible for oversight of the peer review process for ensuring certified repositories are recognized and meet the Lab’s standards for code and documentation.

Learning. The candidate will support the team in the implementation of the data science certification program for WBG staff and in the development and delivery of learning events.
Selection Criteria
Master’s degree or equivalent qualification in the field of data science, computer science, or similar area of expertise with at least five years of relevant work experience.
A record of high-quality and well documented data science work, using modern programming libraries and best practices;
Ability to design complex data management pipelines for data ingest, storage, and access management;
Ability to design and implement code and data documentation systems;
Front-end web development experience;
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate effectively with colleagues in a multi-cultural team;
Ability to perform in a fast-paced environment;
Achievement of an AWS certification preferred;
Proficiency with the following programming languages, libraries, packages, web development resources, and platforms: python (+ NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Jupyter, Bokeh, Seaborn, etc.), HTML, JavaScript, Hugo, Flask, git, GitHub, Docker, AWS services (S3 buckets, AWS storage options, SageMaker, etc.).
World Bank Group Core Competencies
The World Bank Group offers comprehensive benefits, including a retirement plan; medical, life and disability insurance; and paid leave, including parental leave, as well as reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity and inclusive employer with a dedicated and committed workforce, and do not discriminate based on gender, gender identity, religion, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, or disability.
Learn more about working at the World Bank and IFC, including our values and inspiring stories.",4.1,World Bank Group,"Washington, DC",10000+ Employees,,Nonprofit Organization,--,--,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,123.0,DC,,1,0,0,1,1
DATA SCIENTIST,"$112K
/yr","Description
Applies knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to the development and improvement of processes. Identify limitations, or potential issues with datasets and data types that may impact performance from machine learning algorithms. Re-train models as needed to address new challenges, or novel goals. Aid investigators and stakeholders in the validation of results. Generate detailed reports and presentations. May mentor and train junior staff members.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Compile, manipulate, and analyze data using descriptive and inferential statistics to address a broad spectrum of research and administrative questions.
Use statistical software to create data analysis programs/syntax with appropriate documentation.
Understand and interpret data analysis programs/syntax written by others involved in data analysis in the department.
Explain complex statistical concepts in the form of presentations or written project reports/documentation
Write and/or review relevant portions of research study manuscripts and/or abstracts.
Effectively visualize and organize complex datasets for the production of high-quality figures and tables for reports, manuscripts, and presentations
Consult with various researchers or administrators regarding data analytic needs, feasibility of proposed analyses, sequential procedures, and project timelines
Perform other duties as assigned
Salary Range: $85,600 - $139,100

Qualifications
Doctorate degree in a related field OR Master's degree in a related field and two (2) years of related experience OR Bachelor's degree in related field and four (4) years of related experience required. Work experience may NOT substitute for education requirement.
UAB is an Equal Employment/Equal Educational Opportunity Institution dedicated to providing equal opportunities and equal access to all individuals regardless of race, color, religion, ethnic or national origin, sex (including pregnancy), genetic information, age, disability, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, and veteran’s status. As required by Title IX, UAB prohibits sex discrimination in any education program or activity that it operates. Individuals may report concerns or questions to UAB’s Assistant Vice President and Senior Title IX Coordinator. The Title IX notice of nondiscrimination is located at uab.edu/titleix.

Primary Location: University
Job Category: Professional & Managerial
Organization: 312000000 Dept of Medical Education
Employee Status: Regular
Shift: Day/1st Shift
Work Arrangement (final schedule to be determined by the department/hiring manager): Onsite",4.0,University of Alabama at Birmingham,"Birmingham, AL",10000+ Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 billion (USD),0,1,112.0,AL,,0,0,0,0,0
Product Data Scientist,"$124K
/yr","The Company
PayPal has been revolutionizing commerce globally for more than 25 years. Creating innovative experiences that make moving money, selling, and shopping simple, personalized, and secure, PayPal empowers consumers and businesses in approximately 200 markets to join and thrive in the global economy.

We operate a global, two-sided network at scale that connects hundreds of millions of merchants and consumers. We help merchants and consumers connect, transact, and complete payments, whether they are online or in person. PayPal is more than a connection to third-party payment networks. We provide proprietary payment solutions accepted by merchants that enable the completion of payments on our platform on behalf of our customers.

We offer our customers the flexibility to use their accounts to purchase and receive payments for goods and services, as well as the ability to transfer and withdraw funds. We enable consumers to exchange funds more safely with merchants using a variety of funding sources, which may include a bank account, a PayPal or Venmo account balance, PayPal and Venmo branded credit products, a credit card, a debit card, certain cryptocurrencies, or other stored value products such as gift cards, and eligible credit card rewards. Our PayPal, Venmo, and Xoom products also make it safer and simpler for friends and family to transfer funds to each other. We offer merchants an end-to-end payments solution that provides authorization and settlement capabilities, as well as instant access to funds and payouts. We also help merchants connect with their customers, process exchanges and returns, and manage risk. We enable consumers to engage in cross-border shopping and merchants to extend their global reach while reducing the complexity and friction involved in enabling cross-border trade.

Our beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We live each day guided by our core values of Inclusion, Innovation, Collaboration, and Wellness. Together, our values ensure that we work together as one global team with our customers at the center of everything we do – and they push us to ensure we take care of ourselves, each other, and our communities.
Job Description Summary: As a Data Scientist, you will spearhead our efforts to measure and enhance developer experience to integrate with PayPal's products. This role is central to our mission, offering you the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technology in a fast-paced environment. You will lead the data science projects for the initiatives that optimize features that are adopted by the external developer community, directly impacting PayPal's ability to offer seamless payment solutions to millions of users worldwide.
Job Description:
The Global Analytics and Data Science team is seeking a Data Scientist of PayPal’s SMB Analytics and ML Team to join us as exceptional problem solver with a passion for data insights and a relentless execution focus.
We are responsible to find opportunities and gaps in developer experience, product flows using statistical methods to strategize Product roadmap. This team empowers senior leadership with actionable insights for informed, data-driven decisions.
In this role, we are tackling the complex and fascinating challenge of optimizing the developer experience at PayPal. Developers go through a non-linear journey, from onboarding to integration, and it's crucial to understand their pain points at each stage. This includes analyzing what they search for, how they navigate the platform, when they begin integrating our APIs, and their activities during sandbox testing.
We aim to provide deep insights into these areas by applying advanced statistical methods and cutting-edge data science techniques. This allows us to uncover friction points and provide actionable recommendations to enhance the overall developer journey. Additionally, we leverage the latest generative AI tools to assist developers throughout their integration process. A key part of this role is to measure the efficacy and accuracy of these AI-driven solutions, ensuring they deliver value and improve the experience.
This is a unique opportunity to dissect the end-to-end developer journey, identify opportunities for product improvement, and collaborate with our product and engineering partners to drive innovation in developer tools and resources. The role goes beyond simple analytics, offering the chance to shape PayPal’s developer ecosystem and influence the tools that developers rely on to build seamlessly integrated solutions.
Your day to day:
Data Analysis and Decision Making:
Utilize large, complex datasets to drive improvements in developer KPIs.
Employ advanced analytical and statistical techniques to identify trends, issues, and opportunities.
Perform deep-dive analytics including Causal Inference analysis, Pre-Post analysis, Sensitivity analysis, financial projections, and additional ad-hoc exercises to provide holistic recommendations.
Strategic Influence: Develop and present insights and strategic recommendations to Product and Data Science leadership. Influence product direction and strategic decisions through data-driven insights.
Collaboration and Communication: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including product development, engineering, and marketing to implement data-driven improvements. Occasionally collaborate with developers to optimize their experiences. Mentor junior team members .
Innovation and Improvement: Lead initiatives to refine existing analytical processes and develop new approaches to business challenges. Promote a culture of continuous improvement and testing.
What do you need to bring
3+ years of experience in analyzing multi-dimensional datasets and creating actionable business solutions.
Strong educational background with a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Expertise in SQL, Excel, and visualization tools such as Tableau or Qlikview. Proficiency in a statistical programming language like R or Python is preferred.
Demonstrable experience with big data technologies such as Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, and BigQuery.
Knowledge of Python, Jupyter Notebooks, and SQL.
Exceptional communication skills to effectively articulate insights and influence cross-functional teams.
Prior experience in performing data science to fuel insights to drive Product within a high-tech environment.
Personal Attributes:
A data-driven decision maker, passionate about solving complex problems using analytical solutions.
A self-starter who is motivated to take initiative and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
A fun-loving team player who brings energy and enthusiasm to the workplace.
Comfortable with ambiguity and uncertainty in a dynamic business landscape.
PayPal is committed to fair and equitable compensation practices.

Actual Compensation is based on various factors including but not limited to work location, and relevant skills and experience.

The total compensation for this practice may include an annual performance bonus (or other incentive compensation, as applicable), equity, and medical, dental, vision, and other benefits. For more information, visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com.

The U.S. national annual pay range for this role is $72700 to $176000
For the majority of employees, PayPal's balanced hybrid work model offers 3 days in the office for effective in-person collaboration and 2 days at your choice of either the PayPal office or your home workspace, ensuring that you equally have the benefits and conveniences of both locations.

Our Benefits:
At PayPal, we’re committed to building an equitable and inclusive global economy. And we can’t do this without our most important asset—you. That’s why we offer benefits to help you thrive in every stage of life. We champion your financial, physical, and mental health by offering valuable benefits and resources to help you care for the whole you.
We have great benefits including a flexible work environment, employee shares options, health and life insurance and more. To learn more about our benefits please visit https://www.paypalbenefits.com

Who We Are:
To learn more about our culture and community visit https://about.pypl.com/who-we-are/default.aspx

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.
Belonging at PayPal:
Our employees are central to advancing our mission, and we strive to create an environment where everyone can do their best work with a sense of purpose and belonging. Belonging at PayPal means creating a workplace with a sense of acceptance and security where all employees feel included and valued. We are proud to have a diverse workforce reflective of the merchants, consumers, and communities that we serve, and we continue to take tangible actions to cultivate inclusivity and belonging at PayPal.

Any general requests for consideration of your skills, please Join our Talent Community.

We know the confidence gap and imposter syndrome can get in the way of meeting spectacular candidates. Please don’t hesitate to apply.",3.7,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",10000+ Employees,1998.0,Company - Public,Internet & Web Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),0,1,124.0,CA,26.0,1,0,0,0,1
Research Data Scientist,"$116K
/yr","Job ID
34394667
Category
Research and Development
Organization
University Library
Department
University Library Dept
Location
Main Campus - UCR
Salary
$81,500 - $150,100
Date Posted
October 10, 2024
Application Deadline
Open Until Filled
Schedule
8AM - 5PM
Full/Part Time
Full-time(100%)
Level of Supervision
General Supervision
Other Information
Qualifies for Employee Referral Bonus: No
UC Internal Job: No
Position Information
Reporting to the Director of Research Services, this position will be the driving force of the library's Data Science Initiative to support campus research through interdisciplinary collaboration on cutting-edge projects in STEM, Liberal Arts, and Social Sciences. Seeks opportunities to embed themselves in campus research teams to directly address UCR researchers' data and AI related needs through activities including but are not limited to: designing, developing and implementing infrastructure, systems, software and solutions; directly answering compute- and data- intensive research questions; contributing novel ideas, expertise, and methods to the teams' intellectual discourse and advancement; providing data/AI related consultation and instruction. In partnership with other library colleagues as well as UCR colleges, academic programs, and Research and Economic Development, Information Technology Services, and Research Computing, will continuously develop specialized and sought-after data science and AI expertise synergistic with UCR faculty's research agendas.

Candidates are encouraged to include a CV and/or portfolio link with examples of AI/Data related work, if available.

Finalists will be asked to conduct a presentation (including providing visual representation of work samples) as part of the interview process.

The full salary range for the Research Data Scientist is $81,500 - $150,100 annually. However, the expected pay scale for this position is up to $115,000 annually. We base salary offers on a variety of considerations, such as education, licensure and certifications, experience, and other business and organizational needs.

Applicants must have current work authorization when accepting a UCR staff position. Currently, we are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa for staff.

As a University employee, you will be required to comply with all applicable University policies and/or collective bargaining agreements, as may be amended from time to time. Federal, state, or local government directives may impose additional requirements.",4.2,"University of California, Riverside","Riverside, CA",1001 to 5000 Employees,,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),0,1,116.0,CA,,0,0,0,0,0
